trackId,title,description,genre,developer,url,rating,ratingCount,keyword
1300256105,Play and Learn Science,"The Play and Learn Science app contains a suite of educational kids games from PBS KIDS designed to encourage early science learning!

Kids can play a range of games that help them learn core scientific concepts, all while building and developing problem-solving skills.

As kids play, adults have access to co-learning prompts that offer ways to create “teachable moments” that help kids see how science is part of the world around them. It's easy to teach science through play and real-world experiences!

The Play and Learn Science app offers a variety of tips and strategies that help adults nurture a child’s scientific thinking. Hands-on activities for every game help bring the experiences in the app into the real world. This learning app encourages education outside of the app with co-learning activities for children and parents!  Make learning science fun with Play and Learn Science today!  

KEY FEATURES  

GAMES THAT TEACH
 • 15 engaging games covering core science topics
 • Roll different objects down ramps & over different materials to learn about the physics of moving objects and the forces that push and pull them. 
• Play with the sun and the shadows! Learn how light and objects interact, even during different times of the day .
• How does the weather work? Play with different weather controls to understand temperature and how it affects living things.  

MAKE LEARNING FUN
 • Kids from pre-school to kindergarten (pre-k) can get a fun head-start on their education. 
• Learn about Earth Science, Physical Science and Life Science through fun games. 
• Reward your kids with fun drawing tools and stickers for each game they play.  

SPEND TIME WITH YOUR CHILD 
• Fun co-learning activities that the whole family can enjoy! Go outside and see how the science really works! 
• Developed in collaboration with early childhood experts for the optimal learning experience .
• Read tips for parent-child engagement and activities that bring the lessons out of the lab and into the real world.  

COMPLETELY BILINGUAL 
• Switch between English and Spanish with the push of a button.   It’s time for your kids to know how learning science can be fun! Start playing and learning – download it for free!  

Play & Learn Science es una aplicación gratuita de
PBS Kids®, una de las marcas de medios educativos
más reconocidas y de mayor confianza en los
Estados Unidos. Esta aplicación bilingue educa a los
niños sobre Física, La Tierra, El Medio Ambiente, La
Vida y más, mediante divertidos experimentos para
compartir entre padres e hijos. Con más de 12
divertidos juegos que motivan la mente de los niños
a aprender más sobre ciencia, Ud. podrá pasar
momentos muy entretenidos con su hijo, y motivar
la exploración y la conversación más allá de el uso de
esta aplicación. Además es una herramienta perfecta
para ¡aprender y practicar el inglés!

ABOUT PBS KIDS
 The Play and Learn Science app is part of PBS KIDS’ ongoing commitment to helping kids build the skills they need to succeed in school and in life. PBS KIDS, the number one educational media brand for kids, offers all children the opportunity to explore new ideas and new worlds through television and digital media, as well as community-based programs.  For more PBS KIDS apps, visit http://www.pbskids.org/apps.   

ABOUT READY TO LEARN 
The Play and Learn Science app was created as part of the Corporation for Public Broadcasting (CPB) and PBS Ready To Learn Initiative with funding from the U.S. Department of Education. The contents of the app were developed under a cooperative agreement #U295A150003, from the U.S. Department of Education. However, these contents do not necessarily represent the policy of the Department of Education, and you should not assume endorsement by the Federal Government.  

PRIVACY
 Across all media platforms, PBS KIDS is committed to creating a safe and secure environment for children and families and being transparent about what information is collected from users.",Education,PBS Kids,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/play-and-learn-science/id1300256105?uo=4,4.18062,454,Life Science
1168348542,Zero: Fasting & Health Tracker,"Stop counting calories and start intermittent fasting with Zero, the world’s most popular fasting tracker and metabolic health app. 

Zero maximizes your body’s natural fat-burning ability between your last meal today and your first meal tomorrow. Based on the science of intermittent fasting, we help you extend your natural overnight fast to increase fat burning and accelerate weight loss. By building simple, science-backed habits, you’ll lose weight, preserve muscle, and live better, longer. Best of all, you’ll do this without counting calories, tracking macros, or restricting foods.

WE’RE #1 FOR A REASON

Zero Members have lost millions of pounds — and that’s no accident. Featured in GQ, Good Housekeeping, Men’s Health, Fortune, Techcrunch, Women’s Health, The Tim Ferriss Show, The Joe Rogan Experience, and more, Zero is the world’s most popular intermittent fasting app for all skill levels, from those embarking on their first health journey to expert health and fitness coaches. 

ZERO MEMBERS HAVE LOST MILLIONS OF POUNDS

Zero is a science-backed, evidence-based approach to losing weight and burning fat effectively. In just 28 days, you'll start to see transformative results, beginning with weight loss and extending to better mood and improved energy, all while transforming your relationship with food. By the 3-month mark, you'll have improved your body composition along with metabolic health markers including waist circumference, fat mass, blood pressure, glucose, and insulin. And the best part? You’ll never need another diet again.

START WITH JUST ONE TAP

The world's most popular intermittent-fasting Timer helps you track your fasts, your progress, and your goals. Start your Timer and stay on target with all the popular intermittent-fasting types, including: 

• 13-HOUR FAST, or “circadian- rhythm fast,” based on research by Dr. Satchin Panda (Salk Institute) that aligns your eating window with your body’s internal clock

• 16-HOUR FAST, or the 16:8 intermittent fast, used by celebrities, athletes, and millions of Zero Members to manage weight and improve metabolic wellbeing

• 18-HOUR FAST, or 18:6, for more advanced fasters

• Other popular fasts such as OMAD (one meal a day), the 20:4 fast, and custom prolonged fasts of up to 7 days

BURN FAT FASTER

Zero has helped millions of Members form new habits and achieve their weight-loss and health-gain goals. In just a few weeks, you’ll shift your metabolism towards burning more fat with real-time tips, personalized stats, and our exclusive Fat-Burning Mode. Discover insights into the changes your body is experiencing, get daily guidance, and break through plateaus with this one-of-a-kind approach powered by the science of intermittent fasting. 

EDUCATE
	
Learn the science behind the daily habits that help you succeed on your journey towards weight loss and health gain. Every week, the Zero science team distills cutting-edge health research down to actionable steps and delivers the latest insights on everything you need to know to get and stay healthy. You’re never alone with Zero as your guide. 

MOTIVATE

Stay focused with expert-led, science-backed content, community Challenges, achievements, and more. Zero is your partner for building healthy habits that propel you towards better, lasting health.

REWARD

Streaks and Badges celebrate your daily progress throughout your health journey, helping you make progress in the short term while achieving your long term health goals. 

Download Zero to get started.

Payment for Zero Plus will be charged to your iTunes Account when you subscribe. Subscriptions automatically renew unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24 hours before the end of the current period. Manage your subscription by going to your Account Settings.

Read more terms & conditions:
Terms of use: https://www.zerolongevity.com/terms-of-use
Privacy policy: https://www.zerolongevity.com/privacy-policy",Health & Fitness,"Zero Longevity Science, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/zero-fasting-health-tracker/id1168348542?uo=4,4.82484,444648,Life Science
1264941198,Baby Panda Preschool Science,"Search for ""BabyBus"" for even more free panda games for you to try! 

At Dinosaur World, you will learn how dinosaurs behave and meet other animals. Ski, play sand, and cook delicious food. Are you ready to explore Dinosaur World? Let's go! 


Explore Animal World
Hatch dinosaur eggs and feed baby dinosaurs; play basketball with tyrannosaurus! Play with sea lions and put on a sea show; deliver messages with pigeons and reach destination safely! 

Experience the four seasons
Bring delicious food and go on an outing in the woods; chase butterflies and have a picnic in the meadows; run a farm to harvest wheat and fruits; go skateboarding, build snowman, and have snowball fights in the snow! 

Learn about fruits and vegetables
Get to know fruits and vegetables such as corn, carrot, and grapes; you can also try out gourmet cooking: cake, fruit platter, pizza, cookies...they all look so delicious! 

What else do you want to try? Driving a car, steering a ship, or flying an airplane? Or play the dinosaur puzzle? Many more fun games at Dinosaur World are available for you to explore!

About BabyBus
—————
At BabyBus, we dedicate ourselves to sparking kids' creativity, imagination and curiosity,and designing our products through the kids' perspective to help them explore the world on their own.   

Now BabyBus offers a wide variety of products, videos and other educational content for over 250 million fans from ages 0-8 around the world! We have produced more than 150 children's educational games, 700 children's songs, and animations of various themes spanning the arts, health, and science.                      
—————
Contact us: ser@babybus.com
Visit us: http://app.babybus.com",Education,"BABYBUS CO., LIMITED",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/baby-panda-preschool-science/id1264941198?uo=4,3.97419,155,Life Science
523540409,Nearpod,"Bring student engagement into every classroom with Nearpod. 

Nearpod is a student engagement platform built to make teaching with technology easy. It’s designed to work with any classroom technology, from iPads and iPhones to Macs and Chromebooks. With Nearpod you can control what your students see and get feedback in real-time.   

Sign up for FREE today to create interactive learning experiences students will love! Our award-winning solution is used in 97 of the 100 largest U.S. school districts.

Nearpod’s formative assessments create a safe environment for students to learn and share. You can create and import your own Google Slides, Powerpoint of PDF lessons in minutes and add interactive activities such as:
VR Field Trips:  Take your students anywhere using virtual reality, without leaving your classroom
Time to Climb: Assess student understanding with a game-based activity.
Draw It: Have students draw, highlight, type, and add pictures on an interactive whiteboard
Collaborate! Board: Create collaborative learning opportunities where students can share ideas in real-time. 
Quiz: Assess students' understanding through multiple choice questions and receive instant feedback. 
Polls: Highlights student opinions, check for understanding, or provoke discussion. 
AND MORE!

Nearpod has over 7,000+ ready-to-run, customizable K-12 lessons for all grades and subjects. Find something for ELA, Math, Science, Social Studies, Computer Science, Digital Citizenship and more! Lessons are created in partnership with respected and trusted publishers such as:

Flocabulary
PhET
Desmos
Teaching Tolerance
Common Sense Education
iCivics
ReadWorks
Participate
AND MORE!

Nearpod offers supplement curriculum that aligns to state and districts priorities and goals:
Social and Emotional Learning (SEL)
College and Career Exploration (CCE)
Historical Perspectives and Literacy (HPL)
English Learners (EL)
Digital Citizenship and Literacy (DCL)
Learning Labs (LL)

To make your technology integration as seamless as possible, Nearpod has partnered with:
Apple
Google
Microsoft
Canvas
Schoology
Clever
ClassLink
Itslearning
Remind

What teachers are saying:  

“Having students with varying needs and abilities, I was struggling for a way to keep them all engaged in the same lesson. Nearpod allows the students to all feel successful and like they are part of the lesson.”
-Amy Benner, Language Arts Teacher


“I use VR headsets and @Nearpod app to organize virtual field trips to English speaking countries & interesting places in the world!”
-Hanna Dudich, EFL teacher


“Time to climb + A virtual field trip = maximum student engagement.  Thanks Nearpod for making lesson planning a Breeze.”
Michelle Gaetjens, Elementary Media Specialist 


SUBSCRIBING IN-APP:
- Subscribe to Nearpod Gold Edition annually ($119.99). You will be charged in your local currency at the prevailing exchange rate as defined by iTunes.
- Payment will be charged to iTunes Account at confirmation of purchase.
- Subscription automatically renews unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24-hours before the end of the current period.
- Account will be charged for renewal within 24-hours prior to the end of the current period, and identify the cost of the renewal.
- Subscriptions may be managed by the user and auto-renewal may be turned off by going to the user’s Account Settings after purchase.
- No cancellation of the current subscription is allowed during the active subscription period.
- Privacy policy: nearpod.com/privacy-policy
- Terms of use: nearpod.com/terms-conditions
- Any unused portion of a free trial period, if offered, will be forfeited when the user purchases a subscription.

Download Nearpod now and sign up for a FREE account to start experiencing the magic of Nearpod!",Education,NEARPOD INC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/nearpod/id523540409?uo=4,3.09621,1871,Life Science
306621789,HuffPost - News & Politics,"HuffPost is a Pulitzer Prize-winning digital source of news. We report with empathy and put people at the heart of every story, whether it's about news, politics, lifestyle or entertainment. We believe news is personal and real life is news. If something matters to our readers, it matters to us.

• Stay informed with breaking news alerts and top story digests.
• Browse articles, videos, podcasts and interactive content about a diverse range of topics and perspectives
• Hear from voices that are not always part of the conversation
• Enjoy all of HuffPost's editions in one app. (HuffPost is truly both global and local, with locally staffed newsrooms and editions around the world.)",News,The Huffington Post,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/huffpost-news-politics/id306621789?uo=4,4.56198,24574,Life Science
538790574,Earth School - Science Games,"The spaceship is about to launch! Kids, please make full preparations. The next stop is Earth School!

Here, you will discover knowledge about the Earth and the universe.

Begin with the Big Bang, then gradually learn the origin of black holes, planets, and galaxies. Interactive animations and easy operations inspire interest in science.

Our spaceship is now in the solar system. We can overlook the Earth and find that nearly 71% of its surface is covered by water. By the way, do you know where water came from? And that where there is water, there is life? And how did life originate? 

In Earth School, life's origin, cell division, and life evolution are all presented with fun animations and games to allow learning through play and feeling the charm of science. By examining the life of the dinosaurs, children learn the foundational concepts of evolution. 

Features
• 14 mini science games help children feel the charm of science.
• General knowledge of the universe and the Earth.
• Super-easy interactions, recommended for kids aged 2-7.
• No third-party advertising.
• Works offline.

About Yateland
Yateland crafts apps with educational value, inspiring preschoolers across the globe to learn through play! With each app we make, we are guided by our motto: ""Apps children love and parents trust."" Learn more about Yateland and our apps at https://yateland.com.

Privacy Policy
Yateland is committed to protecting users' privacy. If you would like to know more about how we deal with these matters, please read our full privacy policy at https://yateland.com/privacy.",Education,Yateland Learning Games for Kids Limited,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/earth-school-science-games/id538790574?uo=4,4.21024,3848,Life Science
1484295610,Idle evolution: Life on Earth,"""Life on Earth"" is not an ordinary idle game, but also a professional education game about life evolution. You can not only experience the easy and funny idle evolution games, but also learn the knowledge about mysterious ancient creatures and human culture.

---Story background---
Life has evolved for 4 billion years. Since the birth of human beings, only a million of years have passed. We can only occupy a few minutes on the timeline of life evolution. In the struggle against nature, these great prehistory creatures have stepped from the ocean to the land, from the low level to the high level, and on the Earth - our common home, they painted a colorful and shining historical picture!

You are a scientist in the paleontology laboratory. With the help of your robot assistant, you can study the history of paleontology, draw a blueprint for life evolution, and unlock the mysteries of life. 

●Casual idle game
This is a casual idle game. You can enjoy the real joy of game with less time and efforts!

●Popular science education
In Life On Earth, there are lots of professional knowledge of ancient creatures, you can learn new areas that you have never known before, and feel the greatness of life evolution!

●Biological restoration
Restoring the various real forms of ancient creatures, displaying their lifestyles and habits, just like communicate with ancient creatures face-to-face! Watching life evolve from spores to fish, dinosaurs, and humans.

●Intellectual equipment technology
Improve intellectual equipment technology, and with the power of technology, to restore the process of life evolution and fasten the speed of life evolution.

●Mysteries of Earth
Upgrade evolution technology, speed up the evolution of Paleontology, draw a blueprint for life evolution, and unlock the mysteries of life. 

The team members of Life On Earth are ancient creatures enthusiasts. In order to make this game, we have searched a large amount of literature materials. If you are also interested in life evolution, download Life On Earth to join us now! 

If you have any suggestion, welcome to send an email to us. We may add it in next versions.

Email: support@domobile.com
Website: https://www.domobile.com

Auto-renewable Subscription Rules
These rules are attachments of User Agreement. If there is any conflict between these Rules and the User Agreement, these Rules shall prevail.
If you need to use Life On Earth subscription service, you should agree to these rules in advance.

You understand and agree:
1.The subscription is automatic renewal service under the premise that you agree to use the Life On Earth subscription service. If you agree to use the subscription service, you are deemed to authorize DoMobile, when the subscription about to expire, have the rights to charge fee of next billing cycle from your iTunes account (hereinafter referred to as “accounts”) balances.
The subscription service is provided on the premise that you have bound with the above accounts, and DoMobile can successfully charge from the accounts. You are responsible for any failed renewal due to insufficient debit balance in the above accounts.

2.Subscription will automatically renew weekly. You can select the prefer rate.

3.Subscription automatically renews unless it is turned off at least 24-hours before the end of the current period.

4. You may suspend or terminate this subscription service by:
Open the phone Settings -> iTunes and App Store -> Apple ID, select “View Apple ID”, enter the “Account Settings” page, click “Subscribe”, select Life On Earth and cancel subscription.

5.Terms of use: http://tpkapp.domogame.com/evolution/loeen.html

6.Privacy Policy: https://www.domobile.com/best/privacy.html",Games,"DoMobile Co., Ltd.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/idle-evolution-life-on-earth/id1484295610?uo=4,4.60069,5537,Life Science
924977069,Facts - Daily Random Trivia,"Knowledge is power. Learn interesting things every day and surprise everyone with Daily Random Facts!

Want everyone to think you’re super smart? Amaze others with your unique knowledge of facts and stand out from the crowd. Or just try to learn something new every day. You’ll have loads of fun with Daily Random Facts so try it out today for free!

Explore thousands of facts and interesting content, sorted in categories like:


- Human body facts
- History dates
- Facts about animals
- Life hacks
- Facts for kids
- Facts about sports
- Trivia questions and answers
- Science facts
- Riddles
- And many more!

And now with Facts Premium you can:


+ Remove ads
+ Save your favorite facts
+ Change font and colors
+ Search facts by word
+ Browse facts curated in categories

To get access to the Facts Premium content and functionality, you can choose between a lifetime, monthly, and yearly auto-renewable subscription. This is a recurring transaction that will be charged to your iTunes Account at confirmation of purchase and will automatically renew unless you cancel it at least 24 hours before the end of your subscription. Renewals will be charged at the same cost within 24 hours prior to the end of the current period. You can manage your subscriptions and auto-renewal can be turned off by going to your iTunes Account Settings after purchase.

Privacy Policy: https://monkeytaps.net/privacy
Terms of Use: https://monkeytaps.net/terms",Reference,Monkey Taps,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/facts-daily-random-trivia/id924977069?uo=4,4.77816,61797,Life Science
1329077737,Greensboro Science Center,"Experience the Greensboro Science Center like never before! Augmented reality will enable you to bring exhibits to life right from your mobile phone or tablet. A daily events schedule featuring keeper talks, OmniSphere Theater shows and special events will help you plan your day.",Education,The Natural Science Center of Greensboro Inc,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/greensboro-science-center/id1329077737?uo=4,4.33333,9,Life Science
1467785755,Animal Life - Science for Kids,"Join Haley, our child-friendly science expert, on an interactive guided tour of the Animal Kingdom.

Build your own animal, visit the ocean floor, answer trivia questions, and much more! 

========

8 reasons why parents and kids adore Tappity apps:

• You get to interact with a real person: Haley, our science expert!
• You get to learn by reading, listening, and touching. Our app is 100% interactive and 100% narrated!
• You're learning real science--our lessons align with the Next Generation Science Standards (NGGS).
• You learn by play, just like you would in a game!
• You get to test your knowledge with fun science trivia!
• You're safe from 3rd party advertisements. Always.
• You can play offline. Perfect for long waits, drives, and flights.
• You can try it for free right now!

=========

In-App Purchases

This app is free to try! With no activation necessary, you can try out complete, playable lessons. If you'd like to unlock all of our content, there is a one-time payment. Try it out now! 


=========

Feedback and Support:

Have feedback or need help? Contact us at any time: hey@tappityapp.com

========= 

Who are we: 

Tappity believes in the power of storytelling and interactivity to make learning fun. We encourage play by including interactive engagement on every page and bringing in real-life science experts to guide your child. Tappity is currently used across 20 countries, and we’ll always offer an ad-free and safe environment for your children. Learn more about us at www.tappityapp.com.

Privacy Policy: http://tappityapp.com/privacy

Terms and Conditions: http://tappityapp.com/terms""",Education,"Tappity, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/animal-life-science-for-kids/id1467785755?uo=4,3.27273,11,Life Science
509970189,Easy Stop Watch&Timer,"Simple and easy stop watch & timer.
Portrait and landscape mode support

How to use: 
▶ Stop Watch
Press - start counting
Re-press - stop counting
Long press - Reset

▶ Timer
Setting icon 
-setting numbers
- Vibration and Sound On/Off
Press - Start count down
Long press - Reset",Utilities,"Life &Science Co.,Ltd.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/easy-stop-watch-timer/id509970189?uo=4,2.13635,44,Life Science
944140737,百度CarLife+,"【内容提要】
百度CarLife是一款支持手机-车机互联功能的车载语音出行助手。语音控制、专业导航、实时路况播报让驾车更安全；音乐、小说、电台让驾车更惬意；周边车位、加油、美食显示让驾车更方便。

-----------------------连接汽车·连接生活-----------------------
【特色功能】
1.地图导航·连接汽车数据更精准导航
  CarLife完美内置百度地图，最全最准的海量地点信息；实时路况智能播报，告别拥堵和罚单.

2.音乐电台·车载LIVE伴你一路前行
  CarLife汇集当下热门音乐和电台精品App,无论本地音乐或在线音乐广播，可共享到车载系统直接播放,奏出环绕最强音。

3.电话·安全驾驶沟通无忧
  CarLife同步手机通讯录和通话记录，来电去电轻松操作，一目了然。

4.第三方开放平台·横扫一路所需所求
  CarLife精选适合在车载环境下安全使用的第三方服务，覆盖车生活每一环节。养护、停车、加油、美食等服务陆续有来。
  持续更新，敬请期待。

百度CarLife用户QQ群：419328050
百度CarLife官网：http://carlife.baidu.com
百度CarLife邮箱：carlife@baidu.com


【注意/Attention】
1.应用内活动由百度主办，与苹果公司无关。
2.语音导航和电子狗会持续使用GPS定位服务，切换至后台播报时，仍会保持GPS连接，相比其他操作会消耗更多的电量。",Lifestyle,"Beijing Baidu Netcom Science & Technology Co.,Ltd",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/%E7%99%BE%E5%BA%A6carlife/id944140737?uo=4,2.46667,15,Life Science
1469028601,Game of Evolution: Merge Life,"Evolve! Start evolving right now, and you won't be able to stop! Don't be shy - evolve over breakfast, on the way to work, in a traffic jam, or on public transportation. Evolve during your lunch break, over dinner, and before bed. Evolve wherever you want! Evolution is so much fun! It's ""the greatest show on Earth"". And now it's right in your pocket!
""Evolution: Clicker"" is an idle game, or in other words they are called ""clickers"" or ""games that play by themselves"". How does this happen? For example, in the game ""2048"" you have numbers: you merge and move from 2 to 2048. Similar mechanics are in the Game of Evolution. You click and evolve from amoeba to human.
Start with the simplest organisms, then climb higher and higher up the tree of evolution: the evolution of species —> evolution of animals —> human evolution. Try to go through the evolution of the simplest species, be smart on the evolution of animals and be sure to fix the result of human evolution. Do not forget the main thing-to click!
The application is all for real: in the game you go through the evolution of the Proterozoic era to the modern world. Develop humanity and develop yourself. Click — go through the levels, earn coins and evolve. Click — get rewards for tasks, buy characters and evolve. You can accelerate evolution, but never stop! Evolution must continue!
And if you think you're almost done evolving, keep in mind that evolution never stops. It's an endless process of transformation where something new and exciting is always just about to appear. So keep on tapping, and new forms of life will fill the world of Evolution.
Child, teenager, adult - our idle game will appeal to everyone! Because it is colorful, interesting and very exciting! The incredible, addictive, amazing world of Evolution is waiting for everyone. You can't just stop evolving. Don't believe it? Try it for yourself!",Games,DCGamePub Limited,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/game-of-evolution-merge-life/id1469028601?uo=4,4.75534,1639,Life Science
1608876858,TerraGenesis: Landfall,"From the makers of TerraGenesis comes TERRAGENESIS: OPERATION LANDFALL a free city-building simulator game in which you build and manage cities on planets in our solar system and outer space. Become the mayor of the first extraterrestrial human city and build it up to bring life to another planet. Create life in space and expand your civilization across the galaxy in this city-building simulation. Develop your city with new buildings and level up your new space society, design facilities, manage resources and keep your galactic residents happy and healthy.



BUILD A NEW WORLD FOR HUMANITY OUTSIDE THE SOLAR SYSTEM
Create and build a new society in space as you lead the way for a new future for civilisation in this city-building simulation. Living with new water and oxygen resources beyond Earth is the next step in human evolution.  Explore, create, survive and expand cities around the universe and evolve this new world in outer space using NASA science in this free simulator. Expand your culture and capabilities to exceed your dreams on barren planets like Mars, or go beyond the solar system!

- Free city-building simulation: balance resource production with the needs of your growing community!
- Transform barren planets like Mars into modern cities with thriving civilisations in this free simulator
- Figure out how to support life in space: use strategy to build your city!
- Spread life throughout the universe and monitor resources to survive: supply oxygen, water and food to your citizens!
- Transform Mars and planets outside the solar system and plan your strategy using NASA science
- Explore, build and conquer new territories in outer space: The universe is constantly evolving – and you can be part of it!



EXPLORE PLANETS TO DEVELOP CIVILISATIONS IN SPACE
Create life on different planets using the latest technology for construction and the production of resources: bring life into a new era of evolution. The future is all about survival and evolution in space. Create new-age buildings and transform the planets of the galaxy. Adapt your strategy and conquer planets across the universe in this free city-building simulator!

TAKE PART IN RANDOM EVENTS
Space is unpredictable and demands new ways to survive. From building new cities to humanity's survival, TERRAGENESIS: OPERATION LANDFALL is a science-based city-building simulator – design and maintain sustainable growth in space. Build, manage and rule your own city in outer space and help human civilisation thrive!",Games,Tilting Point LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/terragenesis-landfall/id1608876858?uo=4,4.14255,1838,Life Science
1475089280,Tizi Town - My Space Games,"Ever wanted to know what is there up in the space? Always dreamt of becoming an astronaut and exploring the whole universe in your spaceship? Then this app is perfect for you. Begin your adventurous ride to the moon and other planets along with your alien friends. 

Count down the final hour before our rocket is scheduled for launch. We are going to the moon. Are you ready, our young astronauts, for the challenges ahead? Let the adventures begin! 

- Space Lab: 
See how things float in the solar system. Explore what all things float in the universe. 

- Space center: 
There are many different species of plants and animals in this space center. Do detailed research on them. Search every corner of this room to find the hidden secrets!

- Space Kitchen: 
After having a fun ride around the galaxy, you would definitely feel hungry. There is space-friendly food available in the kitchen which won't float because of the gravity. 

- Play Space Games: 
You can create your very own original space adventure story in this universe. You can even dress up every little astronaut in this game. There are some friendly aliens who would love to become your friends.

Key Features of My Space Town Adventures are:
* 15 new characters including astronauts and aliens.
* Various space items to play with!
* Touch, drag and explore every object and see what happens!
* Kids friendly content without violence or scary treatments
* Made for kids of ages 6-8, but everyone will enjoy playing in this universe.

Are you ready to begin your space adventure? Get started now by downloading this app!",Games,IDZ Digital Private Limited,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/tizi-town-my-space-games/id1475089280?uo=4,4.7523,541,Life Science
1418683646,Veeva CRM,"Veeva CRM is the global intelligent engagement solution for all field and office-based life sciences professionals that interact with healthcare professionals and organizations. Veeva CRM offers tailored, role-based experiences for sales and medical organizations, including primary care, specialty care, medical science liaisons, animal health, consumer health, and pharmacy sales. 

Note: Your organization must authorize access to the Veeva mobile app. You will have access to mobile features your organization has enabled based on your role.",Medical,Veeva Systems,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/veeva-crm/id1418683646?uo=4,4.20833,48,Life Science
1490505225,Plant Life - Science for Kids,"Join Haley, our child-friendly science teacher, on an interactive guided tour of the mysterious world of Plants.

Grow your own plant, learn about pollination, answer science trivia, and so much more!

========
8 reasons why parents and kids adore Tappity apps:

• You get to interact with a real person, Haley, our science expert!
• You get to learn by reading, listening, and touching. Our app is 100% interactive and 100% narrated!
• You're learning real science. Our lessons align with the Next Generation Science Standards (NGGS).
• You learn by play, just like you would in a game!
• You get to test yourself knowledge with fun science trivia based on what you've learned!
• You're safe from 3rd party advertisements.
• You can play offline. Perfect for long waits, car or plane rides.
• No constant nagging to purchase and unlock new parts of the app. Pay $4.99 once and that's it.


=========

In-App Purchases

If you'd like to unlock all of our content, there will be a one-time payment.

=========

Feedback and Support:

Have feedback or need help? Contact us at any time: hey@tappityapp.com

========= 

Who are we: 

Tappity believes in the power of storytelling and interactivity to make learning science fun. We encourage play by encouraging touch on every page and bringing in science experts to guide your child. Tappity is currently used across 20 countries, and we’ll always offer an ad-free and safe environment for your children. Learn more about us at www.tappityapp.com.

Privacy Policy: http://tappityapp.com/privacy

Terms and Conditions: http://tappityapp.com/terms",Education,"Tappity, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/plant-life-science-for-kids/id1490505225?uo=4,4.77778,27,Life Science
1206984146,Viome,"Our test reveals unique insights from the master regulators of your health - your gut microbiome, oral microbiome, and cells, and turns these insights into food recommendations and supplements formulated for your biology. Our app seamlessly integrates with HealthKit APIs, empowering you to take control of your well-being.

When it comes to food and supplements, don't treat your body like a black box. Test now!

Step 1: Order one of our tests at http://www.viome.com/tests
Step 2: Register your test, collect your samples at home, and complete your questionnaire
Step 3: You'll receive your results through your account (app or desktop) within 2-3 weeks

What you'll get with Viome

Your Integrative Health Scores (Scores vary based on the test you choose)
Your list of over 400 food recommendations categorized as Superfoods, Enjoy, Minimize, & Avoid
Recommendations for the exact food extracts, minerals, vitamins, digestive enzymes, amino acids, & herbs to support your scores
Recommendations for prebiotics and probiotic strains to support your scores
Ability to order your supplements, prebiotic, & probiotic customized formula through your account

Microbial activity are directly associated with your digestion, energy, weight, detoxification, immune health, healthy skin, and healthy aging. 

From your Viome test you can learn more about how your diet and lifestyle impact your microbes and key areas of your health through your Integrative Health Scores

Learn more about our science at http://www.viome.com/our-science

Biological Age
It's never too late to reset your biological clock by optimizing specific biological functions responsible for how you're aging internally.

Gut Health 
Optimize your digestion, strengthen gut lining, boost richness & diversity
Nutrient absorption
Inflammatory activity 
Digestion health
Gut lining health (risk of leaky gut)
Cellular & Energy Efficiency
Kickstart your cellular repair and cellular support processes
Anti-aging functions 
Anti-inflammatory functions
Cellular functions for energy production
Mitochondrial health
Antioxidant support

Immune System Health:
Support your body's alarm system
Overall immunity
Your body's preparedness to fight off bad viruses & bacteria
Toxin clearance

Inflammation Response:
Support your body's response to stress and immune tolerance.
Cellular functions under stress due to internal or external factors
Patterns or signs of stress triggered by your gut 
Your ability to address inflammation 

Oral Health:
Rebalance your oral microbiome to lower the risk of cavities, bad breath, and leaky gums.
Healthy gums
Better breath
Cavity risk
Heart & Cardiometabolic Health
Optimize functions related to your heart health.
Heart-kidney health
Blood vessel health
Blood pressure
Vascular health
Cholesterol accumulation
Brain & Cognitive Health 
Boost brain health and functions that support your cognitive awareness and your mood health
Serotonin production
GABA production
A healthy response to stress
Mental clarity
 
All samples are processed in our CLIA Certified Lab.

Your data is private and secure.

For support, reach out to us at https://support.viome.com/
*The Viome app is available in all countries that Apple services, except China
*For state regulatory reasons our tests are temporarily not available in NY.

Viome Precision Supplements are available through separate subscription after test results are released. Not included with Full Body Intelligence, Health Intelligence, or Gut Intelligence 

Test purchases.
At this time, Precision Supplements are not available outside the US.

*The information Viome provides is for educational and informational use only. The information is not intended to be used by the customer for any diagnostic purpose and is not a substitute for professional medical advice. This product is not intended to diagnose, treat, cure, or prevent any disease.",Health & Fitness,"Viome Life Sciences, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/viome/id1206984146?uo=4,4.53655,3077,Life Science
989094486,Knowledge Rehab: Get Smarter,"Think you know it all? Or do you admit there's a TON more you wish you'd actually learned in school and life? Ready to stop faking it in 2015? Time for Knowledge Rehab.

Through a multi-year project involving hundreds of students, teachers, professors, and experts (and even a few hipsters) from different fields, Brainscape has compiled a critical base set of knowledge across a huge range of subjects. Whether you want to review the arts, sciences, social sciences, or even pop culture and entertainment, it's all here. And it's optimized for the world's best new study platform: Brainscape.

What is Brainscape? It's a web & mobile education platform that helps anyone learn faster using proven cognitive science. Think of it like 'flashcards on steroids'. We bring together learners and educators to break knowledge into its most digestible building blocks, then we deliver it through a web & mobile study experience that is scientifically optimized for maximum memory retention.  Over 1 million students & teachers already use Brainscape to create, share, and find efficient study materials -- for foreign languages, academic subjects, standardized tests, and professional development.

And now, with Knowledge Rehab in the Brainscape platform, anyone can explore, study, and become wiser across a wide range of subjects that contribute to true cultural literacy. Knowledge Rehab includes:

• over 2000 multimedia, smart flashcards covering the most important facts, concepts, people, and events -- many with links to important other sources of information for further study from around the web (and world).
• 30 varied subjects that span the social sciences (art, music, religion, history, economics, etc) sciences (earth science, biology, physics,, etc), and pop culture (celebrities, food and drink, sports, social media lingo, etc)
• Brainscape's customized flashcard repetition algorithm that cuts your memorization time dramatically
• Convenient “browse” and “search” functions that allow you to easily find cards you want
• Ongoing feedback, statistics, and visualization tools to help you track your progress 
• a ""Leaderboard"" to allow you compare your own progress to that of the thousands of others studying Knowledge Rehab in Brainscape.

So whether you want to stop faking it at the MOMA . . . or want to actually recognize characters on the History Channel. . . or if you are tired of being clueless about different types of music and art. . . 

It's time for Knowledge Rehab!",Education,"Bold Learning Solutions, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/knowledge-rehab-get-smarter/id989094486?uo=4,4.78976,371,Life Science
922188121,My PlayHome School,"New from the creators of the award winning ""My PlayHome"" series!

""My PlayHome School"" expands the PlayHome world into the classroom! Explore the school and play at being teacher, experiment in the science room, take lunch in the cafeteria or even mop the corridors!

""My PlayHome School"" has no time limits, scores or power ups. Just free play that powers your child's imagination.

""My PlayHome School"" is also fully integrated with the all ""My PlayHome"" series apps so you can bring everything back home!


-----------------------------------------------

▶ NO IN-APP PURCHASES!
▶ NO 3RD PARTY ADVERTISEMENTS!
▶ NO SOCIAL NETWORKS, PUSH NOTIFICATIONS OR REGISTRATION!

-----------------------------------------------

...Just hours of imagination driven play!

-----------------------------------------------


-----------------------------------------------
http://www.myplayhomeapp.com/
http://www.facebook.com/playhome
http://twitter.com/myplayhomeapp",Entertainment,PlayHome Software Ltd,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/my-playhome-school/id922188121?uo=4,4.51011,841,Life Science
1327304528,Pepi Hospital: Learn & Care,"Step into a Pepi Hospital and become doctor, patient or just a curious explorer! Our new addition to a rich family of Pepi Play games offers a vast medical centre with tons of items, activities and ways to play. Join our characters in their workplace, soothe and treat patients, create Your own stories, discover and understand the everyday routines of a busy hospital.

DISCOVER BABY HOSPITAL
Baby Hospital is full of tiny patients, caring moms, and hands-on baby care! Feed babies, wrap them in soft blankets, and use real tools like baby scales, thermometers, and incubators to make sure they’re healthy and happy. Explore colorful baby rooms, soothe crying babies, and create heartwarming stories with your favorite Pepi characters!

TONS OF ACTION

Experience the daily life of a hospital full of action - from the small and cosy cafe to a busy pharmacy shop or the operating room, there are various experiences for players to toy with. Ambulance car will arrive regularly with new patients to take care of and new friends to meet. Only the most curious players will be able to find all the ways to treat their patients. This offers an amazing opportunity to set up various scenarios to take part in.

FUN & EDUCATIONAL

Even though the game is dedicated to a young audience, everybody can and should find a way to join in. The game encourages parents to play together and use the games educational values - while your child is discovering the opportunities throughout all 4 floors of the hospital, you can help him by moderating their experiences, creating and going through character stories, explaining the nature and use of items, expanding child’s vocabulary and basic medicinal knowledge.

HUNDREDS OF INTERACTIVE OBJECTS

Enhance your gameplay with hundreds of interactive objects that can be easily transferred through floors. Medical instruments, toys and even yoga balls can be given to the dwellers of Pepi Hospital for the most unpredictable results. Not to mention many opportunities to dress up your favourite characters!

COLORFUL AND UNIQUE CHARACTERS

Pepi Hospital has a wide variety of characters. Dozens of cute, cheerful and unique humans, pets, monsters and aliens are there to have fun and join your playful exploration of the Hospital building.

MEET THE PEPI BOT

We’re delighted to introduce a medical Pepi Bot, our new character built to accompany little players in our games. Pepi Bot is a cute, versatile friend able to follow you around the building and provide immediate help, to You and Your patients. Armed with the latest tech, Pepi Bot is a perfect sidekick to Your interactive stories. Cute little droid will provide medical tools and even carry a wardrobe for all those moments when you feel like playing in style!


FEATURES
• Vast medical centre packed with tons of items and machines!
• Multifunctional companion bot.
• Run your own lab — measure blood pressure, perform X-ray scans and much more!
• Get comfy in customisable dentist chair.
• Become physical therapist, create your own fitness routines!
• Welcome newborns. Weight and take a good care of them!
• Listen to Hospital dwellers talking on the phone. Each in his own unique way!
• Play with fishes while waiting at the reception.
• Ambulance regularly delivers new patients.

Terms of use:https://www.apple.com/legal/internet-services/itunes/dev/stdeula/
Subscription terms of use: http://www.pepiplay.com/terms-of-use/",Education,Antanas Marcelionis,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/pepi-hospital-learn-care/id1327304528?uo=4,4.45368,3044,Life Science
1518619206,LIFE Intelligence: Manage LIFE,"Facing a big decision? Fighting with a significant other? Live more intelligently. Beyond calming stress or anxiety, learn to solve the root cause of these stressors by digging deep with a practical, powerful all-in-one tool. LIFE’s emotional management toolkit and personal growth journey puts research rigor into optimizing your entire LIFE: your self, career, and relationships. Meditation and cognitive behavioral therapy (CBT) comprise less than 1% of our content and are free-forever features: because LIFE is so much more.

How can 5 minutes a day change your LIFE?
“A spiritual rehabilitator.” 
“I wish I’d had this 20 years ago.”
“The most coherent leadership course I’ve seen.” 

MAIN FEATURES

(1) MASTER YOUR MOOD
LIFE’s emotional management toolkit is your pocket problem-solver. Beyond tracking your mood, use our mood-management exercises to feel better on the fly. Anxious before a meeting? Use a grounding checklist or breathing video. About to have a hard conversation? Read coaching tips and write down what you’ll say with our 7-step walk-through. There’s something for just about every life situation, whether regretful, resentful or enraged.

“Helped me navigate difficult situations with scientifically-proven methods."" 

(2) MANAGE YOUR LIFE
LIFE’s comprehensive self-development course covers hundreds of bite-sized lessons, packed with helpful information to live a better life. Uniquely science-backed, all sources are cited for those most scrutinizing. Curated to a thoughtful 9-topic (mission) flow, develop deep self-awareness across:

1 Mental and emotional management
2 Self-awareness and emotional intelligence
3 Goal, values, and habits
4 Time management and regret minimization 
5 Decision-making and mental heuristics 
6 Stress management and social influence
7 Relationships, dating and marriage
8 Communication and conflict resolution
9 Leadership, motivation and teamwork

“Goes beyond single lessons from coaching or therapy and gives a broader set of knowledge & tools.”

(3) LOVE & LEAD
Did you know? Scientists can predict divorce with 90% accuracy. Whether single, dating, married, or divorced, LIFE’s free weekly conversation and/or journaling prompts help you better understand yourself and others. Share your insights with loved ones: because friends help friends live more intelligent, fulfilling lives. 

SELF AWARENESS STARTS HERE
“Tell me and I forget, teach me and I may remember, involve me and I learn.” (Benjamin Franklin) LIFE’s unique introspective method “sticks longer than if simply handed to you,” turning you into your own best therapist or coach. 

GET OUT OF A RUT AND ON WITH YOUR LIFE
Self-guided and 24/7, we are built for those who appreciate organization, efficiency, and privacy. We do a lot for a little, providing the breadth of therapy or coaching at the price of a Headspace or Calm. Our goal is to help you also do more with less: becoming the most efficient, effective, intentional version of you.	 

FREE FOREVER FEATURES
Try LIFE free! Get Mission 1.1 – Mission 2.4 (out of 9.4) free. These cover a healthy mind and self-knowledge, from cognitive behavioral therapy to narrative therapy. We believe everyone should have these basics to a happy life. Use our mood tracker, dozens of mood-management exercises, journaling prompts, relationship questions, and analytics anytime. 

SUBSCRIPTION TERMS
Invest in yourself with the full program and toolkit. Practice daily to master your moods and behaviors. Choose from auto-renewing subscription options of $9.99/mo or $59.99/yr ($5/mo). Prices are for USA customers and actual charges may be converted to your local currency. Terms of Service & Privacy Policy at https://www.lifeintelligence.io/terms-privacy",Health & Fitness,"CapsuleCurriculum, LLC",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/life-intelligence-manage-life/id1518619206?uo=4,4.80159,126,Life Science
1594324602,Tizi Town - My Museum Mystery,"Enter the history museum and create your own museum story in town!

Welcome to Tizi Town: My Museum, a fun-filled experience of prehistoric life for kids. Discover ancient civilizations, dinosaurs, artifacts, and more. Join the adventure and uncover the ancient town life!

EGYPTIAN WORLD:
In this Tizi Town Museum, explore the Egyptian Town World. Learn to play around with the Egyptian mummy and reveal its hidden secrets.

DINO WORLD:
Study the dinosaur species and learn about their history! Learn about dinosaur science for kids and dinosaur history facts.

SPACE STATION:
Travel across space! Learn about the planets, solar system, and satellites.

Explore the prehistoric era by studying the artifacts, preserves, exhibits, art pieces, characters, and more.

Play with 14+ characters in 4 different Tizi town museum scenes. Interesting history and science games for kids. Download now!",Games,IDZ Digital Private Limited,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/tizi-town-my-museum-mystery/id1594324602?uo=4,4.44444,9,Life Science
1453956361,Pretend Play in Hospital,"Pretend play in hospital is an imaginative open ended and role play game where you can discover and enjoy different roles like be a patient, doctor or clinic staff members. In this fun hospital you can manage and arrange a lot stuff, shop snacks, medicine and dress up any character as doctor or patient. Make the best story by self-defining game play. Explore all hospital rooms, medical labs and departments to enjoy creative and entertaining activities. 

Features:

-	Big family of characters and dresses to assign a role
-	Join as doctor, patient or just as explorer
-	Vast medical labs includes X-ray, MRI and ultrasound lab
-	Pharmacy shop and cash register
-	Physiotherapy Room with physical activities tests
-	Large reception area with creative tasks
-	A lot of interactive activities to keep you entertain.",Games,Farrukh Ahmad,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/pretend-play-in-hospital/id1453956361?uo=4,3.01416,353,Life Science
1440624570,CatchUp - Bite-Sized Summaries,"CatchUp is the place to get a quick download on today’s trending topics – from the latest Netflix hit, to podcast obsessions, bestselling books and major events – in manageable chunks of video, text & audio.

We start our days scrolling through headlines and social media chatter that pile up overnight, trapping us in a constant state of FOMO. Forget the guilt that comes with not being able to keep up with it all – CatchUp gives you back the control and lets you decide what content is worth more of your time and energy.

TRENDING TOPICS SUMMARIZED
The internet is constantly flooded with news, content and entertainment options. CatchUp's daily feed gives you short, concise videos summarizing the latest stories and trends so you can feel empowered, not overwhelmed. 

BOOKS, SHOWS, PODCASTS & BEYOND... IN MINUTES
Because staying in the know can sometimes feel daunting, CatchUp offers a library of the most popular books, shows, and podcasts summarized into 10 minute reads or listens, to give you just the basics.

- Top documentary summaries like “Inside Bill's Brain: Decoding Bill Gates” from Netflix or “The Inventor: Out For Blood In Silicon Valley” & new ones being added daily
- Tap into one of our Original Summaries where you can learn what’s happening on current issues like “The Away Story” or helpful life hacks like “How To Get A Job” all in a matter of minutes.
- Save your favorite titles & read them later on your Saved tab 

Non-Fiction Titles Include:

- 'How Not To Die' by Michael Greger M.D.
- Medical Medium by Anthony William
- 21 Lessons for the 21st Century by Yuval Noah Harari
- The Mamba Mentality by Kobe Bryant... & many more

Fiction Titles Include:

- ‘Macbeth' by William Shakespeare
- ‘1984’ by George Orwell
- ‘The Great Gatsby’ by F. Scott Fitzgerald
- 'Hamlet' by William Shakespeare... & many more

Original Titles Include:

- Emergencies 101
- What goes into a credit score?
- The Away Story
- Kobe Bryant: Life & Death... & many more

SO WHY CATCHUP?

- Highly curated content ensures useful learning and avoids waste of time 
- We’re always adding new content!
- We’ll summarize top selling books, current & historical topics, documentaries & many more 
- We have an awesome and talented pool of skilled writers
- All summaries are fact-checked for accuracy & quality
- We strive to share the tools of personal growth & information with everyone!
- Apply game changing ideas to improve important aspects of your life
- Keep up-to-date with the latest developments in business, science, health, tech, history, culture & more

PRICING & TERMS

- CatchUp is free to download
- Read our full Terms of Service/Privacy Policy at https://mammoth.la/privacy and  https://mammoth.la/terms
- Please reach out to support@catchupapp.com for support",Education,"Science Mobile, LLC",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/catchup-bite-sized-summaries/id1440624570?uo=4,3.58796,216,Life Science
1463163303,School Life Pretend Play Sim,"Welcome little students to have a busy day in School Life Pretend Play Sim. This imaginative game is specially made for kids with autism. Show your skills to spend a workaholic day in your high school. Visit classrooms, canteen & other area in the premises in this fun & adventure simulator.",Games,Aliana Kauser,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/school-life-pretend-play-sim/id1463163303?uo=4,3.21429,14,Life Science
544062479,Aktana Copilot,"Drive more personalized, coordinated and impactful field activity with real-time recommendations. Powered through a conversational AI assistant, users will receive nudges of relevant recommendations and insights.

- Engage HCPs with greater impact and simplify pre-calling planning by prepping with curated insights, content, and data. 
- Accelerate field execution by delivering suggestions and next best actions directly into the hands of users where they are working and when they need it.  
- Capture richer engagement data, enabling progressively more contextual recommendations and insights to field teams.",Business,Aktana Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/aktana-copilot/id544062479?uo=4,5.0,1,Life Science
532872580,MS Life Science Prep 2022-2023,"New 2022-2023 questions, full exams and vocabulary flashcards

Teacher Review
""As a Science teacher, I find many obstacles in finding the perfect medium in which to share information with my students. This often includes hours of google searches, you tube searches, etc. This app is amazing! It takes those hours I used to spend and turns them into seconds with one touch of this app. I love it! Thanks again for creating such an awesome app that gives me hours of my life back! ""

In the information age of today education, learning and teaching is changing fast. The technology that is being used in and outside of the classroom is everywhere. Almost every student has a cell phone with access to the Internet. Even with out Internet access there are educational applications for iPhone, iPad and so on. The methods for teaching students and special needs students are expanding. Some schools are going all iPad. Meaning all students will have iPads with digital textbooks and new learning tools. 

For students these types of applications can be very useful. The student who cannot focus on one type of learning at a time can flip back and fourth through the app to stay focused. The student who is an extremely visual learner will be attracted to the devices colorful screen of pictures in the lesson. The student who has trouble writing notes or preparing them self for a test can simply open up previous lessons and practice on the interactive quizzes of the apps. The student who is a auditory learner can listen to nature sounds while reviewing topics or watch videos related to each topic. The very high performing student can find interesting topic related daily news and summarize it for the class. All of these options can be utilized through one educational app.


MS Life Science Buddy is the ultimate tool for learning Biology. This app was designed by a teacher who has used all possible multimedia resources in the classroom for teaching regents curriculum. MS Life Science Buddy is not only an app for learning Biology and living environment but also a app for teachers. The features of this app makes studying extremely convenient. This app is a great study guide and great for exam prep.

The features of this app include everything you need to prepare for middle school biology. 

1. This app includes attractive lessons on all topics below. 
2. interactive Fun quizzes by topic (with real regents questions) 
3. Daily Biology and science news updates. 
4. Regents exams with the key. 
5. Fun videos from youtube. 
6. Flash cards by topic. 

This app would be ideal for classrooms with iPads because it has the resources to prepare for a middle school life science or to present a lesson. All the buddy apps are available on the app store and have been helping teachers and students since their release. This app is a great study guide and great for exam prep.",Education,Feraco media Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/ms-life-science-prep-2022-2023/id532872580?uo=4,2.0,1,Life Science
1541049439,Dōse,"Get your daily Dōse of fitness. 


Whether your goal is to lose fat, gain muscle or just find a sustainable groove with your fitness and body composition goals...Dōse delivers information that is backed in evidence based practice.

Featuring:

-   Learn more about physiology and fitness on your rest days in our mini-lecture series from Thoren Bradley, who has his Masters in Physiology and experience as an NCAA Division 1 strength training and conditioning coach. 

-   Exercises targeting each muscle group with easy to follow video demonstrations ranging from abs, chest, glutes, biceps and more.

-   Get your macros quicker with the Dose macro calculator and guidelines to target your goal. 

-   Receive 1:1 coaching tips from Thoren himself with the app messenger. 

-   Engage with other Dōse members in the community and share your progress.

-   Interactive at-home and gym programs to choose from. 

-   Easy to follow therapies and strengthening routines for commonly vulnerable joint areas. 

-   Integrates with Apple Health to keep track of your progress.

——————

Learn more about our terms of service at https://api.ongo.app/tos or privacy policy at https://api.ongo.app/privacy",Health & Fitness,Ongo Science Inc,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/d%C5%8Dse/id1541049439?uo=4,4.78594,299,Life Science
1484598134,Tizi Town - Kids Animal Games,"Welcome to brand new animal games! Go on a jungle adventure and meet lots of cute animals. If you like caring for pets and playing pet games, then this is the app for you. Be a part of the wildlife in the exciting ANIMAL TOWN including locations like animal school, science lab, cave home, camping area, candy shop and more!

JOIN THE JUNGLE ADVENTURE
It's a fun world of jungle adventure where you can touch, tap and interact with every single item in these best pet games. There are amazing secrets and surprises hidden inside every scene where you can play role-playing animal games.

TAKE CARE OF PETS
Take care of your favorite pets and feed them yummy food. Bathe them, groom them, dress them and play with them for hours in this animal town!

THERE's LOTS TO DO IN THIS ANIMAL TOWN:
* You can move cute characters and hundreds of items around however you wish in these awesome pet games. Set your imagination free!
* Visit different places: indoor as well as outdoors in this animal simulation game.
* 10 exciting and unique locations to explore.
* Get special pets like lion, tiger, monkey, squirrel, rabbit, rhinoceros, hippopotamus, cat, pig and bear.
* Completely safe to play. We always keep our pretend play apps totally kid-safe.
* No internet connection required. Play offline. Perfect to stay engaged for a long time.

If you like pet games and are looking for something different, DOWNLOAD this app right away! Start your wildlife safari now!",Entertainment,IDZ Digital Private Limited,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/tizi-town-kids-animal-games/id1484598134?uo=4,4.11111,72,Life Science
1636297151,Physical Life,"Physical Life is the tool to track the progress of your journey to a better self.

Track your daily progress by entering weight, steps, and exercise activity.

Fill out weekly reports to get the most reliable assessment of your body's dynamics. 

Visual graphs will help you summarize your progress and keep you motivated to reach your goals.",Health & Fitness,FIZIKL IQ - FZCO,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/physical-life/id1636297151?uo=4,4.92593,27,Life Science
1019078894,Animal Kingdom Science For Kids,"- 1000 high quality Science Interactive Questions to arouse your child's interest in learning about the world around him.

- Collect 33 amazing interactive 3D Animals to populate your Animal Kingdom

- Science Questions difficulties range from Preschool to First Grade

- 3 different theme-based quizzes to engage the learner 

- Intuitive quizzes with drag and drop to make learning fun

- Customize quiz settings to cater to different learner’s abilities.

- Design your very own Animal Kingdom, see the animals roam freely and show off your achievements",Education,Kok Leong Tan,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/animal-kingdom-science-for-kids/id1019078894?uo=4,4.4,5,Life Science
1492221776,DreamChild - Garbh Sanskar,"Dreamchild– Garbh Sanskar App is World’s 1st Mobile Application Providing Authentic, Easy to access and practical Garbh Sanskar Courses to get Divine and Dynamic Dream Child along with Celebrating and Enjoying Pregnancy.

Available Languages : Hindi & Gujarati

This App comprises of –
• A Complete 4Q (Physical, Intelligence, Emotional and Spiritual Quotient) development of the child in the womb
• Unique Vedic and Scientific Research
• 10+ years efforts of all Faculty Doctors, Physiologist, Yoga Trainers, Dietitians and Trainers
• 280+ Logical Stories
• 280+ Virtuous Stories
• 280+ Puzzles
• 280+ Emotional Videos
• 140+ Thoughtful Videos
• 140+ Five Senses Activities
• 140+ Inspirational Songs
• 140+ Spiritual Magazines
• 140+ Prenatal Articles
• 72+ Special Pregnancy Recipes
• 36+ Unparalleled Garbh Samvads
• 36+ Extraordinary Action Songs
• 36+ Creativity Activities
• 32+ Peaceful and Divine Parenting Skills
• 32+ Magical Skills for all Relationship
• 6+ Happy Life Skills
• Yoga – Pranayama – Exercise Videos
• 9 month Brain Development and Raga Music
• Inspirational Prayers and Mantras
• Amazing Dream Charts
• 7 Chakra Dhyan
• Pre and Post Pregnancy tips
• Visualizations and Auto-suggestion Guidance
• Weekly 4Q Activity Reporting
• 2+ Hours Awesome Seminar
• 12+ Hours Miraculous ONLINE Workshop
• 36+ Mind-blowing ONLINE Classes

Now, Garbhsanskar 4Q ACTIVITIES, WORKSHOP & CLASSES at your door step!

...Till date, whatever has been researched and applied in the field of Garbh Sanskar has been included in this App.

We make Mother happy and ready for her Dream Child",Health & Fitness,Dhaval Chheta,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/dreamchild-garbh-sanskar/id1492221776?uo=4,4.75758,33,Life Science
6451444491,Fierce Life Sciences Events,"Download the Fierce Life Sciences & Healthcare mobile app to enhance your experience at our events. Through the app, you can connect with participants, search the event community, schedule meetings, access onsite resources, and get the latest event updates and more.",Business,Questex LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/fierce-life-sciences-events/id6451444491?uo=4,0.0,0,Life Science
1003790491,Fishing With Grandpa,"Let’s go on a fishing adventure with Grandpa! Grab some gear, play underwater games, choose a lure, cast a line, hook and reel in a fish, and add new fish to your collection! Grandpa needs your help counting fish, spotting differences, identifying fish, solving puzzles and mazes, and more. Plus, watch videos of real anglers in action. Ages 3-6.

“What’s great about Fishing with Grandpa, and the rest of the apps in the series, is its lightheartedness; there’s no penalty for mistakes, just an encouragement to try again.” - Geeks With Juniors

“Fishing with Grandpa is highly recommended and a TWA Top Pick!” - Teachers With Apps

""Editor's Choice."" - Children's Technology Review

“TOP PICK. Fishing with Grandpa is a wonderful preschool learning app for long time fans of Grandma and Grandpa and newcomers alike.” - Smart Apps For Kids

Kids love Fishing With Grandpa because they go on an adventure full of fun and surprises.

Parents and teachers love Fishing With Grandpa because it covers a broad curriculum of basic skills education in a real-world context. 

Grandma and Grandpa apps are apps you can feel good about giving to your kids. They are educational beyond the school curriculum - they also teach life skills in real-world contexts.

EDUCATIONAL GAMES:
1. Find the Gear. Which one is the anchor?
2. Fish Groups. Which group has 5?
3. Crabby Mazes. Help the crab get to the treasure!
4. Fish Puzzles. Which fish are in these waters?
5. Spot the Difference. Which bird is different?
6. Fish Colors. Touch all the green fish!
7. Measure the Fish! How long is this fish?

Fun Interactive Extras:
1. Choose a Lure. Which lure should we use?
2. Cast line / Hook Fish. Move slowly… don’t scare them!
3. Reel it in! He’s almost in!
4. High five!
5. Add the fish to your collection!

Educational Videos:
Including how lures are used, what is a bobber, reeling in, earthworms, examining a lure, fly lures.

EDUCATIONAL CONTENT:
Colors: red, green, blue, purple, yellow, orange, brown, white, black, pink
Number groups: one, two, three, four, five, six
Problem solving: puzzles and mazes
Measurement: using a ruler
Fishing vocabulary: lure, bobber, reel, hook, bait, line, life vest, anchor, oar, and more.

Fishing With Grandpa includes colorful graphics, professional-quality music, sound effects, and voices. It was developed by an Educational Psychologist and parents and tested by children.

PRODUCT SUPPORT:

Fairlady Media is committed to developing high-quality family-friendly games that provide excellent entertainment value. Please contact us if you have suggestions for improvement or to get technical issues resolved: support@fairladymedia.com.

Also by Fairlady Media:

+ GRANDPA'S WORKSHOP (high-fiving Grandpa teaches primary skills, ages 2-6)
+ GRANDMA'S KITCHEN (fun and learning with Grandma and her wacky utensils, ages 4-7)
+ GRANDMA LOVES BUGS (explore the forest to learn about creepy-crawlies, ages 5 & under) 
+ GRANDPA IN SPACE (blast off in a custom rocket to explore the solar system, ages 6-8)
+ GRANDMA'S PRESCHOOL (the best school readiness app on the App Store, ages 3-6)
+ FISHING WITH GRANDPA (cast and reel in fish and play games with Grandpa, ages 3-6)
+ MUSIC WITH GRANDMA (learn about music and jam on musical instruments, ages 7+)
+ CAMPING WITH GRANDPA (go on a hiking adventure and learn about the wilderness, ages 5-8)
+ AT THE ZOO WITH GRANDMA AND GRANDPA (tour the zoo and learn about 50+ animals, ages 6-8)
+ GRANDPA'S TOY SHOP (design, build, and decorate toys to sell in Grandpa’s shop, ages 6-9)
+ BUILD WITH GRANDPA (demolish, design, build, paint, and decorate houses, ages 5-9)
+ GRANDMA'S BEACH FUN (sand, water, sun, and fireworks, ages 5-8)

+ SMASHING GRAMMAR (crush the nouns, verbs, and more to get a high score, ages 9+)

Links that take the user outside the app are contained behind a Parental Gate.",Education,"Fairlady Media, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/fishing-with-grandpa/id1003790491?uo=4,4.03448,29,Life Science
1526344521,Intention: Design your life,"We believe that if you keep your mind going in the right direction, your life will catch up with it.

Intention is focused on simple, actionable self care and mindset exercises to integrate into your daily routine.

Intention will give you access to:

- Curated meditations designed to improve your mindset, fill your life with gratitude and achieve your goals
- Short programs on topics like goal setting, habit building and mindset
- Guided journaling audios designed to gradually improve your life
- Guided morning, wind down and flexibility stretching routines.
- Actionable book summaries from top mindset, productivity and self growth books.
- Quick access ""mindset checklists"" that you can use on the go to create change
- A community of like-minded people with similar goals to yourself
- Monitor your daily activity with the Apple Health integration

This app is for you if:

- You know that there's value to reading, meditation and journaling but you need a safe, guided space to start.
- You're not really sure where you start when it comes to working on your mindset or shifting your thinking. You want an all in one tool designed to help move you forward.
- You want easy access to simple, actionable mindset tools that improve your life
- You want to integrate self care in the form of meditation, journaling and reading in your life

We become what we focus on. Fill your mind with the right stuff.

——————


Learn more about our terms of service at https://api.ongo.app/tos or privacy policy at https://api.ongo.app/privacy",Health & Fitness,Ongo Science Inc,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/intention-design-your-life/id1526344521?uo=4,4.71666,60,Life Science
1562260017,Avatar World Anime Life,"Welcome to the dreamy animation home & mini town where everything is super cute! You will start a splendid two-dimensional cute-character development & adventure game here!
Anime Craft Town is a two-dimensional style, super healing,and cute girl & boy development adventure game, which includes Q cute design, rich costumes & game props, and great gaming scenes with dazzling NPCs. You can create your own animation character, interact freely with different NPCs, and complete various interesting game tasks! By completing daily & achievement tasks, you can create and constantly upgrade a unique dream home for your exclusive character!
In the anime game, you can carefully nurture and develop your exclusive character, and explore the magical mini-town world with her! There are many fun and surprising task locations in the town: hair salon, beauty shop, furniture store, jewelry store, clothing store, pet shop, police station, hospital, garden, farm, fish pond, etc.. In these places, your character can interact with NPCs freely, and also get experience points and gold coins & diamonds through various task games!

Features:
--Create your own and unique two-dimensional anime character, and define her name, personality, specialty, and preferences, etc.!
--Customize the personal appearance of the anime character, and freely change her hairstyle, skin color, eyes, mouth, expression, etc.!
--Dress up your anime character with the most fashionable anime outfits! Mix and match hundreds of clothes, hair accessories, jewelry, shoes and more!
--Decorate and upgrade a unique dream house for the anime character, including living room, bedroom, kitchen, bathroom, garden and more!
--Explore rich and interesting town scenes like hair salon, beauty shop, furniture shop, jewelry store, clothing store, etc. Freely interact with NPCs and discover hidden game rewards!
--Become friends with the NPCs and develop a good relationship with them by completing their game tasks and orders!
--Perfect match of luxury clothing: you can choose from nearly a hundred of clothing styles, daily fashion, antique style, European complex, fantasy fairy tale, neutral and handsome, future science fiction..Through the collection of clothing and design materials, you can create a personalized and exclusive character style!
--Fashion hairstyles are carefully crafted: provide hair cleaning and care services, use hair dyeing, perm, braiding and other techniques to design smart and changeable fashion hairstyles!
--Exquisite and beautiful makeup: draw exquisite makeup for anime character, such as eyebrows, eyelashes, eye shadow, lipstick, blush, etc., and weave your makeup dreams!
--Fantasy furniture collocation for dream homes! Hundreds of furnitures let you unleash your creativity as you like, and constantly upgrade the decoration of animation character‘s fancy home!
--Daily draw blind boxes of great surprises to get more unique game items for your character!
--Through the camera function, you can save super beautiful scene pictures and character design pictures locally and share them with your friends!
--Super healing relaxing casual game!
--Play without Wi-Fi!",Games,Chengdu Bosijie Technology LLC.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/avatar-world-anime-life/id1562260017?uo=4,4.18182,11,Life Science
1462080429,IQVIA OCE,"IQVIA Orchestrated Customer Engagement (OCE) is a solution that connects sales, marketing, medical and other functions to help life sciences representatives transform to a new orchestrated commercial model.

OCE supports customer-facing personas such as territory managers, medical science liaisons, key account managers and life sciences representatives with functionality that goes far beyond traditional personal engagement and marketing automation.  OCE provides unmatched mobile access, advanced intelligence and digital marketing capabilities that enable brand marketers to run sophisticated multi-channel journeys and the field to trigger compliant digital touchpoints.

OCE is part of an integrated commercial ecosystem that enables you to manage the end-to-end process of customer engagement.",Medical,IQVIA Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/iqvia-oce/id1462080429?uo=4,4.21875,32,Life Science
1114684317,Astronomy & Space News,"Latest news on Astronomy, with a focus on space exploration, exoplanet discovery, astrobiology, and the the search for life beyond Earth.  

The Astronomy app is always updated the with the latest info from the web, Twitter and more.  Whether you are an amateur astronomer or a casual fan of space science, with this app you can learn plus discover from leading astronomers & space agencies around the globe such as NASA and the ESA.  You can also enjoy beautiful photos taken by observatories on Earth (and from space!) plus educational videos as well.

You can upgrade to the Pro version of the app via an in-app purchase which removes ads from the free edition, and support for extra features in the future.",News,Juicestand Inc,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/astronomy-space-news/id1114684317?uo=4,4.77857,2660,Life Science
1542185348,LIFE SCIENCE EXAMINATION BOOK,"Are you looking for helpful study guide to get assistance in preparing for competitive Life Science exams? How about enhancing your exam preparation with the help of mock test and practice paper? Learn the basics of Life Science exams with assessment test collections featuring in-depth information on every question answer. Whether you want to use your time effectively to prepare for the exam or need a question answer collection that can help you in getting good marks, this assessment test app is the right platform for you. 
Get Life Science Examination Book – Test Prep app today!

Ace Your Life Science Exam Preparation 
No need to worry about lack of test preparation material. The idea of the book entitled “Objective Life Science: MCQs for Life Science Examination” or Life Science Examination Book – Test Prep app was born to cover for the lack of comprehensive book covering all the aspects of various entry level life science competitive examinations. With the help of this mock test app, you can prepare for all life science competitive exams conducted by CSIR, DBT, ICAR, ICMR, ASRB, IARI, State and National Eligibility Test, and others.

Cover All Science Exam Topics Effectively 
Instead of troubling yourself with lots of study material, take help from this all-encompassing exam preparation app. This science exam study guide app, covers all the subjects of life science under 13 sections namely:
1. Molecules and their interaction relevant to biology;
2. Cellular organization; 
3. Fundamental processes; 
4. Cell communication and cell signaling; 
5. Developmental biology; 
6. System physiology – Plant; 
7. System physiology – Animal; 
8. Inheritance biology; 
9. Diversity of life forms; 
10. Ecological principles; 
11. Evolution and behavior; 
12. Applied biology and 
13. Methods in biology. 

Hundreds of Useful Assessment Test Questions
Leverage the significance of attempting question answer collections in your spare time to analyze your exam preparation and work on your weak areas. Each Section in this practice paper has been further divided into two parts with 200 short tricky questions and 100 applied conceptual questions. You can also learn the correct answers of the mock test to learn from your mistakes.

Learn Brainstorming techniques via Mock Test
The ultimate purpose of this study guide app is to equip the user with brainstorming challenges and solution for life science and applied aspect examinations. Train your brain to tackle with tough life science exam questions by learning new practice paper attempting techniques.

Real Time Practice Paper and Study Guide 
Prepare yourself to tackle the challenging life science exam realistically. This mock test app will push you through a learning drill that prepares you for actual paper on real time basis. It contains predigested information on all the academic subject of life science for good understanding, assimilation, self-evaluation, and reproducibility.

Features of Life Science Examination Book – Test Prep
Simple and easy mock test app UI/UX
Boost your exam preparation for life science exam effectively
Attempt practice paper from 13 different sections
More than 100 to 200 question answer available in every section
Learn in-depth information and brainstorming techniques from study guide
Attempt real time assessment test to evaluate your skills and eliminate any chances of error in actual science exam

Are you ready to ace your next life science exam? Download and use Life Science Examination Book – Test Prep today!",Education,Gentoo Labs LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/life-science-examination-book/id1542185348?uo=4,3.0,1,Life Science
1190478816,Ryan's School Life,"Ryan's School Life is a game based on a kid's school experience. This game is all about his experience of visiting school and attending various Classes. He didn't finish his homework last night, your support will help!

Put Ryan into School Bus and take him out on return as well.

~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
  WHAT CLASSES RYAN WILL ATTEND
~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~

* MATHS *
* ENGLISH *
* SCIENCE *
* SOLVING PUZZLE *

Be there with him to experience his School Life! Its a virtual school-going experience for everyone. Enjoy!

*** Get it FREE!!! ***",Games,JDM Marketing & Promotions LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/ryans-school-life/id1190478816?uo=4,3.0,2,Life Science
1552102915,Veeva Vault,"Access your Vaults on the go with the Vault Mobile app. Veeva Vault is the proven cloud-based platform for the life sciences industry.

Find and view documents, complete document tasks, see real-time dashboards, and easily create new documents by scanning or sharing files from your phone.

You can now also add content to placeholders, and opt-in to receive push notifications. To make document collaboration even more convenient, create and reply to document comments from within the app.

Vault Mobile now supports all Vault languages.

Vault Mobile currently does not support all Vault functionality. Stay tuned as we add new features.",Business,Veeva Systems,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/veeva-vault/id1552102915?uo=4,4.4,25,Life Science
503786734,Easy LED Display,"== Here comes the best LED display application in AppStore ==

""Easy LED Display"" is brilliant application that everyone should have!
Simple interface and powerful!

= How to use =
Enter your message, set options for the best display and touch the [Done] button. That's it!

Very useful to communicate with someone who is far from you, in noisy place and so on!
enjoy!",Lifestyle,"Life &Science Co.,Ltd.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/easy-led-display/id503786734?uo=4,1.0,1,Life Science
1097011778,NAMOO,"Smart toys can make science exciting! NAMOO is a fun, engaging exploration of the life of plants. Discover how leaves make food, experiment with underground root systems, or play with the parts of a plant cell! Interactive 3D simulations and straightforward language enable an immersive experience for curious minds.

*** App Store's App of the Day ***
*** Parents' Choice Silver Award ***

""This educational plant app illustrates lessons and engages students much better than any textbook or video.""
–Jenny Bristol, Common Sense Media 

""The existence of tools like NAMOO reminds me of why (in the right context) educational iPad apps can be SO AMAZING AND BENEFICIAL.""
–Luke Dormehl, Cult of Mac

""With a pleasant pace and a charming feel, it sets the standard for functional learner-centered mobile education.""
–Sarah Bell, Huffington Post

""NAMOO is a FANTASTIC TEACHING TOOL for children with its attractive visuals and interactive experience. However, it is also a great app for adults interested in learning more about the topics too.""
–Sandy Stachowiak, AppAdvice

""NAMOO is one of the most beautiful science apps for kids I’ve ever seen... If you want to take your kids on an immersive tour across the different parts of a plant, this app is a MUST-HAVE.""
–Eric Pramono, Geeks With Juniors

""This app is PERFECT for independent exploration...  You’re sure to spark the interest of students as you give them a chance to interact with high-quality content.""
–Monica Burns, ClassTechTips

There are many basic yet surprising things to learn about the inner workings of trees and flowers. How do plants turn carbon dioxide into food? How do flowers become fruits? Through the use of colorful interactive models, Namoo will help students gain a deeper understanding of the science at work. Namoo goes beyond the textbook! It is a multi-layered journey where you can play, experiment, and learn with ease.

Namoo features nine chapters. Each chapter is dedicated to a part of a plant and its function, including roots, stems, leaves, and flowers. Two chapters provide an in-depth look at cell structure and photosynthesis may awaken the scientist within!

In the world of Namoo, dynamic visuals are accompanied by clear explanations. Every tap of the screen yields a new bit of information. With students in mind, we have also included comprehensive reading blocks for each chapter. Namoo is designed to be a one-stop solution and an immersive tour through plant life.

FEATURES
- Nine chapters including: roots, root tips, leaf anatomy, plant cells, photosynthesis, flowers and fruits, trunks, and stems
- AR experience for the trunk chapter
- Original 3D artwork, music, and sound design
- Encyclopedia-inspired, interactive 3D simulations
- Plain labels, clear explanations, and student-friendly reading sections
- Immersive and fun learning for kids and adults
- Discover amazing processes such as pollination or photosynthesis in a fun, engaging way
- Experiment with different environmental conditions and see what happens!
- iPhone X support",Education,CRAYON BOX Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/namoo/id1097011778?uo=4,3.90625,32,Life Science
1548610818,LifeScience ORG,"We are the European leadership community of Life Science CEOs.

Being the CEO is a lonely journey. LifeScience ORG is proud to bring together some of the world’s brightest life science entrepreneurs, sharing insights on the important issues faced when building a life science venture. Our community connects CEOs across borders, building priceless relationships in Europe and beyond. We inspire and are inspired to put learning and ideas into action.",Business,LifeScience Connect LTD,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/lifescience-org/id1548610818?uo=4,5.0,1,Life Science
816139590,Popular Psychology Magazine,"Popular psychology is a magazine that will give you tips to improve your life!
Tips for a better life, love and happiness, jobs and finance, self development, are just some of the topics that you can read in the magazine.
Find tips on how to deal with bad habits, how to stay young, how to deal with stress, how to improve your marriage, tips to a better sex life. Discover how you can manage your finances, career tips, how to gain self confidence or how to improve yourself.
The magazine published monthly, so you can enjoy the new articles every month!
==================================
This magazine is proudly powered by PressPad.
Privacy Policy: https://presspadapp.com/terms-apps/
Terms of Use https://www.presspadapp.com/terms/",Education,PressPad Sp. z o.o.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/popular-psychology-magazine/id816139590?uo=4,5.0,4,Life Science
1451478169,ModuLife,"Please note: Access to the ModuLife platform is only available through participating trained healthcare providers. ModuLife is a virtual nutrition and wellness program supporting people with Crohn’s Disease. ModuLife is based on the Crohn’s Disease Exclusion Diet (CDED) designed for the dietary management of Crohn’s Disease. If you are interested in finding a ModuLife provider in your area, please visit MyModuLife.com.

The ModuLife app provides exclusive access to educational tools, diet tracking, recipes, meal plans, messaging, and more. All of these features can be accessed on-the-go or from the convenience of your home.

ON-DEMAND EDUCATION Get 24/7 access to educational videos and resources to support your ModuLife journey.

TRACKING TOOLS Log food intake, diet adherence, and well-being to help you stay on track.

MEAL PLANS View customized daily meal plans designed for your specific diet phase.

RECIPES Access hundreds of easy-to-follow CDED-friendly recipes.

UNLIMITED MESSAGING Ask for diet advice anytime through private instant messaging with nutrition specialists.

Compatible with the Apple Health App to track activity. Users can sync with the Apple Health app via the ‘Devices & Settings’ tile. Once synced, users can view their steps from Apple’s Health app under the Wellness Tracker tile.",Health & Fitness,Virtual Health Partners Inc,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/modulife/id1451478169?uo=4,2.6,10,Life Science
571351381,Food Lovers Fat Loss,"Log on to Food Lovers Online ™ wherever you are!

Eat all your favorite foods, and lose all of the weight you want, using your Food Lovers Online ™ account.   Get instant feedback and guidance to keep your metabolism in Fat Burning Mode all day long. 

This handy app gives you anywhere, anytime, 24/7 access to advanced Fat Loss tools on your iPhone. It’s the perfect Fat Loss companion for anyone who’s “always on the run” or who loves to eat out at restaurants!

You’ll get:
• Eating Journal with Instant Meal Assessments that guarantee every bite you eat is helping you to burn fat and lose weight
• Program Guides that show you at a glance how to turn ANY foods into a Fat Loss Meal or Snack 
• Portion Charts that make it easy to eat the perfect portion size every time
• Instant Feedback to help you make smarter food choices 
• Up-to-the-second Personalized Coaching that shows you exactly what to do, at that very moment, to increase your metabolism and maximize Fat Loss
• Food Search feature with Fat Loss information on hundreds of items
• Tracking tools for every aspect of getting lean, from sleep and exercise to water intake and vitamins

Free for Food Lovers Online ™ members Just download the app and sign in to your account with your username and password. The app requires a Food Lovers Online ™ account, and seamlessly syncs all the information you enter and the feedback you receive for seamless integration.",Health & Fitness,Alchemy Worldwide llc,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/food-lovers-fat-loss/id571351381?uo=4,2.2,5,Life Science
1451303858,ACTO Omnichannel,"ACTO is made for professionals in life sciences and healthcare. Use ACTO to get training, resources, coaching, live presentations, and analytics all in one place.

With everything in one place, use the ACTO Omnichannel Education app to:
- Find the information you need in seconds from documents, files, notes and more.
- Create your personalized learning journeys online and offline for your convenience and
media preferences
- Access all resources and capabilities to do pre-call prep
- Present for your in-person or virtual 'hall-calls'
- Facilitate two-way live coaching calls, role-play scenarios, and ride alongs
- Get insights from your managers and peers on best practices from the field
- Integrate with your CRM and consolidate everything you need from other tools in one place so you don't have to jump from app to app
- And so much more!

#PowerofONE",Education,ACTO Technologies Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/acto-omnichannel/id1451303858?uo=4,3.05882,17,Life Science
743622720,GE: National Geographic Magazine,"National Geographic Georgia magazine is available on iPhone and iPad. Subscribe once and get National Geographic Georgia on both devices. Download the application now to get a copy of the January 2013 issue for free (subscription not required).

Annual subscription: $23.99 (12 issues)
Monthly subscription: $2.99/month (1 issue)
Single issues: $3.99/issue

- Payment will be charged to your iTunes account at confirmation of purchase.
- Subscription automatically renews unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24-hours before the end of the current period.
- Account will be charged for renewal within 24 hours of the end of the current period, and the cost of the renewal will be provided.
- Subscriptions may be managed by the user. Auto-renewal may be turned off by going to the user’s iTunes Account Settings after purchase.
- No cancellation of the annual subscription is allowed during active subscription period.

National Geographic Georgia is an official Georgian language edition of the National Geographic Magazine.",News,LEMONDO BUSINESS LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/ge-national-geographic-magazine/id743622720?uo=4,3.92308,13,Life Science
1634418549,The MedTech Conference,"The MedTech Conference app is for the participants of The MedTech Conference. This powerful app brings the event to your mobile device and allows you to:
• Access event documentation
• Manage a personalized schedule for event sessions
• Receive important updates and announcements from event organizers
• Discover what’s around you (restaurants, bars, coffee shops, etc.)

If you are attending this event, it is highly recommended that you download this app!",Business,Advanced Medical Technology Association,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/the-medtech-conference/id1634418549?uo=4,0.0,0,MedTech
1523841598,Quik Labs,"QuikLAB™ 

The QuikLAB™ application (the ""App"") is designed to provide a convenient way for users to schedule a COVID-19 test at a QuikLAB™ mobile testing site, receive and store their encrypted COVID-19 test results, and manage their QuikPASS™ Report.  The App has two separate interfaces, one for consumer users and another for laboratory personnel, each having different functionalities. 

Once a consumer user has created a user account through the App, the App allows users to do the following with respect to COVID-19 tests performed at CLIA-licensed mobile laboratories: 
* Find a nearby QuikLAB™ testing site.
* Get directions to the QuikLAB™ testing site. The user can click on the address of the QuikLAB™ site, and the App will copy and paste this address into Apple map application. At no time will QuikLAB™ track the user's geographic location. 
* Schedule an appointment for COVID-19 testing at a QuikLAB™ testing site.
* Receive appointment reminders 6-hours prior to the scheduled appointment. 
* Receive a 6-digit identifying QR Code that is unique to the individual user.  The user's COVID-test will be logged with this QR Code to ensure the individual receives the correct test results. 
* Show the QR Code to laboratory personnel at the QuikLAB™ site to confirm the identity of the user.
* If the user consents to receiving COVID-19 test results through the App, the user will receive and can review COVID-19 test results on the App.
* View current and historical COVID-19 test results at any time.
* Share the QuikPASS™ Report, which is a de-identified, encrypted report of the COVID-19 test results, with organizations such as employers and schools to verify authenticity of a negative COVID-19 test result. Only users can share their personal QuikPASS™ Report with a third-party organization at the user's sole and absolute discretion. 
* At their discretion, upload an identification card to the App, which allows a third-party organization to identify the user at the time the QuikPASS™ Report is shared with such third-party organization. 

In addition, QuikLAB™ personnel will use the application for the following purposes:
* Scan the consumer user's QR code to pull up the user's account information. 
* Document the consumer user's verbal responses to the initial pre-testing health questionnaire. 
* Create a unique official laboratory report number, used to track the user's laboratory test through the testing process (e.g. the tray in which the test is inserted and the time remaining for test processing).
* Upload the consumer user's COVID-19 test results. 
* Generate a unique and encrypted QuikPASS™ Report for the user. 
* Communicate with the consumer user that the COVID-19 test is complete.
* If the user has a COVID-19 positive test or there are any issues with the test itself, QuikLAB™ personnel will contact the user through the App directly.",Medical,TPTGlobalTech Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/quik-labs/id1523841598?uo=4,4.88571,35,MedTech
1488016313,Medtech Insider,"Medtech Market Data, Startups, Trends

Stay ahead of the competition with the app that’s as ambitious as you are. Get the trusted insights and in-depth analysis you need from LSI, the global authority in medtech market intelligence & analysis.  Download the LSI app today and receive instant access to medtech market forecasts, procedure & patient volume trends, startup company profiles, and the latest news on investments and deals taking place in the global medical device & diagnostics industry.  Simple and easy to use, the LSI app provides you with instant access to the market sizes, trends, and competitor data you need, immediately.  Don’t have time (or budget) to access a full market report but need to quickly understand the dynamics and players in a specific segment?  This app is the solution.    Key benefits include:

- Alerts on new medtech market reports, databases and startup company profiles as they are released real-time so you can make better strategic decisions faster.  - Full access to global market size and growth rates for every major medical device & diagnostics segment.  - Comprehensive global surgical procedure volume data and trends for every major region including U.S., Europe, Asia, Latin-America, Central America – segmented by 37 key countries around the globe. 

- Coverage of privately held emerging medtech startups that are disrupting existing markets and creating new ones.  - Regularly updated deals data summarizing the M&A, licensing and investment activity defining the future of the medtech space.

- Profiles of the emerging companies LSI analysts have identified as “movers and shakers” that are raising capital and seeking strategic partners in the medtech space.
You can now tap into medtech market intelligence data from your mobile device anytime, anywhere.   Get the data and insights you need to make strategic decisions and moves as quickly as the innovations are occurring and the markets are changing.

Download LSI’s Medtech Pro app today and stay ahead of the competition. ",Medical,"Life Science Intelligence, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/medtech-insider/id1488016313?uo=4,5.0,9,MedTech
1588873348,MedTech Mongolia,"Манай аппликейшн нь таны сонгосон дурын эмийг Монгол улсад бүртгэлтэй эсэхийг шалгаж, эмийн дэлгэрэнгүй мэдээлэл, хувийн хуанли хөтлөх, онлайн захиалгаар хүргүүлэн авах боломжийг олгоно.",Health & Fitness,Tech Partners LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/medtech-mongolia/id1588873348?uo=4,0.0,0,MedTech
1461143375,Medtech Investing Europe,"Bringing together a fantastic range of breakthrough healthcare, life science and digital health firms seeking investment and partnerships with some of the most pro-active and ambitious investors in the sector.
Each event sees up to 40 technology companies pitching investment opportunities to an audience of 150 delegates including family offices, private wealth holders, VC’s, corporations, angel investors and many more. Central to the event is a forum programme that will address some of the major challenges and opportunities across healthcare, life science and digital health investment today.",Medical,Campden Wealth Limited,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/medtech-investing-europe/id1461143375?uo=4,0.0,0,MedTech
6470517885,Heart Recovery Events,"Enhance your event experience by using the Heart Recovery Events meeting app.

Download the Abiomed Events app to:
•	Get access to your personalized event agenda
•	Browse speaker and attendee profiles
•	Participate in live Q&A and polling sessions
•	Follow presentations, take notes and access virtual libraries
•	Complete surveys, exchange business cards and schedule meetings
•	View travel and venue information
•	Post, """"like"""" and comment on content

NOTE - You must be a registered participant with a valid email address to use this app.",Business,"Abiomed, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/heart-recovery-events/id6470517885?uo=4,0.0,0,MedTech
6633411316,Before and After Photo MedTech,"Transforme a Gestão de Fotos dos Seus Pacientes com Before and After MedTech

Bem-vindo ao Before and After MedTech, o exclusivo app disponível gratuitamente para cirurgiões Plásticos clientes da B/A Medtech, a solução principal para cirurgiões plásticos e profissionais estéticos que buscam uma plataforma avançada, segura e fácil de usar para gerenciar fotos de pacientes. Com mais de 20 anos de experiência em fotografia médica, projetamos um app que integra tecnologia de ponta e melhores práticas para aprimorar a forma como você captura, armazena e exibe imagens de antes e depois.

Principais Recursos:

Gestão Profissional de Fotos:
Capture fotos de alta resolução e bem alinhadas de antes e depois com facilidade. Nosso app garante que suas imagens sejam organizadas e acessíveis, permitindo que você se concentre em oferecer um atendimento excepcional aos pacientes.

Criptografia Imediata:
Proteja a privacidade dos seus pacientes com criptografia imediata de fotos. Nosso app criptografa automaticamente as fotos assim que são capturadas, garantindo que os dados sensíveis estejam protegidos contra acesso não autorizado.

Galerias Personalizáveis de Pacientes:
Crie galerias personalizadas para cada paciente ou projeto. Personalize como as imagens são exibidas e organizadas, facilitando o acompanhamento do progresso dos pacientes e a exibição do seu trabalho de forma eficaz.

Padronização Profissional de Antes e Depois:
Padronize a apresentação de suas fotos de antes e depois com nossas ferramentas intuitivas. Garanta consistência e clareza na exibição dos resultados, aprimorando seu portfólio profissional e as consultas com os pacientes.

Animações de Antes e Depois:
Crie animações impressionantes de antes e depois diretamente no app. Use essas animações para destacar transformações e compartilhá-las em suas redes sociais, aumentando o engajamento e promovendo seus resultados de maneira visualmente atraente.

Conformidade com HIPAA e LGPD:
Confie no nosso app para atender aos mais altos padrões de proteção e privacidade dos dados. Totalmente compatível com as regulamentações HIPAA e LGPD, garantimos que sua prática esteja em conformidade com os requisitos legais essenciais para o tratamento das informações dos pacientes.

Backup e Recuperação de Dados:
Nunca se preocupe com a perda de dados com nosso sistema robusto de backup e recuperação. Nosso app oferece opções seguras e confiáveis de backup para garantir que suas fotos e informações dos pacientes estejam sempre protegidas e prontamente disponíveis.

Interface Amigável:
Navegue facilmente por uma interface intuitiva e amigável. Seja capturando fotos ou gerenciando sua galeria, nosso app é projetado para facilidade de uso e eficiência.

Suporte Especializado:
Receba suporte de primeira linha de nossa equipe de especialistas. Estamos aqui para ajudar com quaisquer perguntas ou problemas que você possa encontrar, garantindo que você aproveite ao máximo os recursos do nosso app.

Por Que Escolher Before and After MedTech?

Com mais de 30.000 pacientes fotografados e ampla experiência no campo, Before and After MedTech é confiado por cirurgiões plásticos e profissionais estéticos líderes em todo o mundo. Nosso app combina anos de conhecimento do setor com tecnologia avançada para oferecer uma solução que é tanto confiável quanto inovadora. Eleve sua prática e simplifique sua gestão de fotos com uma ferramenta projetada especificamente para as demandas da cirurgia plástica moderna.

Experimente o futuro da gestão de fotos de pacientes com Before and After MedTech. Baixe agora e veja como nosso app pode transformar a forma como você captura, armazena e exibe seu trabalho.",Medical,Daniel Luis Fontes Barreto,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/before-and-after-photo-medtech/id6633411316?uo=4,5.0,2,MedTech
1376482341,Okadoc,"Struggling to schedule an appointment with your doctor? Okadoc to the rescue! 
 
Find all that you need in one place, from instant appointment booking to managing them in just a few clicks. 
 
With Okadoc you can:
 
• Access the real-time availabilities of tens of thousands of healthcare professionals
 
• Book an appointment online, 24/7, for an in-person or video consultation  

• Receive appointment reminders by SMS or email
 
• Safely share your medical documents
 
• Chat with your practitioner
 
• Pay for your consultations online
 
And much more!
 
Take your first step towards a better healthcare experience with us! Get the App now",Medical,OKADOC TECHNOLOGIES FZ LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/okadoc/id1376482341?uo=4,4.09999,10,MedTech
1129220048,Popit Medication Reminder,"Popit Medication Reminder is the best free clinically proven pill & medication reminder app. It helps you stay on top of your health.

Developed together with healthcare professionals, Popit Medication Reminder is a user-friendly, straightforward app. It is also used by some of the world’s largest pharmaceutical companies. Whether it's once or several times a day, or once per certain number of days, our flexible reminder feature can support you for different types of medication schedules. Calendar view helps you to check your medication taking habit in a quick glance. With Popit, you can manage your meds effortlessly!

EFFORTLESS - Popit is easy to use. It logs your pills and reminds you only if you miss your dose.

FLEXIBLE REMINDERS - Have a combination of daily and weekly medications? No problem! Popit supports daily, weekly, specific day and even interval reminders. It’s also super easy to update the reminders in case your medication regimen changes. 

WHO IS IT FOR? Popit is ideal for anyone taking regular medications. Birth control, diabetes, rheumatoid arthritis, IBD, IBS, high cholesterol, high blood pressure, ADHD, anxiety, depression, antibiotics, allergy, pain, etc. 

DOSE HISTORY & SCORE - See how you have been taking your medications and if you already took the dose or not. See your history as one number, the Popit dosing score.

OPTIONAL: AUTOMATED TRACKING WITH POPIT SENSE - With the optional Popit Sense pill & medication tracker, you don’t need to record your dose manually in the app. App reminds you only when you miss the dose.

Privacy:
We comply with strict privacy policy. No identifiable personal data is collected.",Medical,Popit Oy,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/popit-medication-reminder/id1129220048?uo=4,4.33333,3,MedTech
6499416778,MEDTECH-weighing scales,"MEDTECH- weighing scales is integrated with HealthKit to synchronize data such as your weight and physical indicators to the Apple HealthKit app. Before using this feature, you will be prompted to authorize and support iPhone 6 and later.
The path of Apple Health is: MEDTECH- weighing scales-> Devices->  Body Fat Scale-> setting-> nickname-> Health Kit",Health & Fitness,云波 楼,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/medtech-weighing-scales/id6499416778?uo=4,0.0,0,MedTech
373040910,Compendium – Medication Guide,"Com­pendi­um con­tains the com­plete data set of med­i­cines ap­proved in the USA, Switzer­land, or Spain, based on your lan­guage se­lec­tion.

The application provides medical professionals with detailed information about the drugs approved for use in the United States, Switzerland, Spain and Europe (BG, CS, DA, DE, EL, EN, ES, ET, FI, FR, HR, HU, IT, LT, LV, MT, NL, PL, PT, RO, SK, SL, SV)

The long process of leafing through and searching is over. Using the search function, you can find all the information within seconds.

Language of the data: English / Spanish / German / French

Functions:
•  Directly to the desired content via table of contents
•  PDF export 
•  Share content via Messages, Mail, AirDrop, Notes ...
•  Print function
•  Search function
•  Open content in different tabs


-----------------------------------
English (USA)
-----------------------------------

The Compendium App contains the complete data set of the FDA:
•  «Human Drugs»
•  «Human OTC Drugs»
•  «Animal Drugs»
•  «Medical Devices»

Table of Contents*:
•  Package Photos
•  Boxed Warning
•  Highlights of Prescribing Information
•  Prescribing Information
•  Indications and Usage
•  Dosage and Administration
•  Dosage Forms and Strengths
•  Contraindications
•  Warnings and Precautions
•  Adverse Reactions
•  Drug Interactions
•  Use in Specific Populations
•  Overdosage
•  Description
•  Clinical Pharmacology
•  Nonclinical Toxicology
•  Clinical Studies
•  Ingredients and Appearance

Total: ~ 140'000 Records


-----------------------------------
Spanish (Spain)
-----------------------------------

The application contains the complete data set of AEMPS-certified medicines in Spain.
(Agencia Española de Medicamentos y Productos Sanitarios)  •  Ficha técnica •  Prospecto
•  Evaluación
 Table of Contents*:
•  Fotos del producto
•  Nombre del medicamento
•  Composición cualitativa y cuantitativa
•  Forma farmacéutica
•  Datos clínicos
•  Propiedades farmacológicas
•  Datos farmacéuticos •  Titular de la autorización de comercialización


Total: ~ 28'175 Records


-----------------------------------
German / French (Switzerland)
-----------------------------------

The application contains the complete data set of Swissmedic-certified medicines in Switzerland.

Table of Contents*:
•  Zusammensetzung
•  Galenische Form und Wirkstoffmenge pro Einheit
•  Indikationen/Anwendungsmöglichkeiten
•  Dosierung/Anwendung
•  Kontraindikationen
•  Warnhinweise und Vorsichtsmassnahmen
•  Interaktionen
•  Schwangerschaft/Stillzeit
•  Wirkung auf die Fahrtüchtigkeit und auf das Bedienen von Maschinen
•  Unerwünschte Wirkungen
•  Überdosierung
•  Eigenschaften/Wirkungen
•  Pharmakokinetik
•  Präklinische Daten
•  Sonstige Hinweise
•  Zulassungsnummer
•  Packungen
•  Zulassungsinhaberin

Total: ~ 4000 Records


-----------------------------------
(* Incomplete list - depending on article)
-----------------------------------
Terms of Service: https://api.treeinspired.com/kp/TermsofService.pdf
Privacy Policy: https://api.treeinspired.com/kp/PrivacyPolicy.pdf
-----------------------------------",Medical,treeinspired GmbH,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/compendium-medication-guide/id373040910?uo=4,4.0,1,MedTech
6717593935,SEHTA MedTech Expo 2024,"This is the SEHTA MedTech Expo 2024 App. Download to get the latest information on the event, view the conference programme & save sessions to your own personal agenda and network with your fellow attendees with the messaging and meeting booking features. ",Business,Science & Engineering Health Technologies Alliance Ltd,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/sehta-medtech-expo-2024/id6717593935?uo=4,0.0,0,MedTech
1600009029,Kalogon,"The Kalogon app enables you to personalize your settings for Orbiter by Kalogon, Booster by Kalogon, and Sentinel powered by Kalogon. 
 
View/Update your seating profile, with guidance from your clinician, to define areas that require additional pressure relief or added firmness
Create presets to fit your health and lifestyle needs for your Orbiter
Configure cushion settings
Check the battery life of your Pressure Management System
For Orbiter: Turn on Massage Mode and set redistribution frequency
For Booster & Sentinel: Maintain your recommended pressure settings in single cell air cushions

Kalogon revolutionizes the way the world sits through technological innovation, cutting-edge research, and customer collaboration. By prioritizing empathy-driven design and embracing inclusivity, we aim to set a new benchmark in seating solutions for those who spend an extended time sitting, inspiring positive change in the industry. Our ultimate goal is to empower individuals to lead active, seated lives with enhanced comfort and well-being.",Medical,"Kalogon, Inc",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/kalogon/id1600009029?uo=4,4.63636,11,MedTech
6505068149,SHAKEiq: MedTech Sales Pro,"ShakeIQ: MedTech Sales Prod is a Next-gen MedTech sales intelligence and enablement platform, combining breakthrough insights, automation, and rep-centric usability to supercharge teams on the go.",Business,"ShakeIQ, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/shakeiq-medtech-sales-pro/id6505068149?uo=4,0.0,0,MedTech
1444389239,Patient - TotalCare,"Totalcaretm is a telemedicine platform that brings clinicians virtually to where you are. No need to take time off from work, drive through traffic and wait for a long time in the waiting room.

Launch Totalcaretm, find your clinician through extensive filter criteria, book an appointment, and have a virtual video/audio consultation!! All from the comfort of your home/office.

Complete Healthcare delivered to you!",Health & Fitness,"Hawkeye MedTech, Inc",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/patient-totalcare/id1444389239?uo=4,5.0,5,MedTech
1496963379,Osstell SmartPegs,"The Osstell SmartPegs app allows you to quickly find the right SmartPeg™ that fit your implant systems and abutments for even easier Osstell ISQ measurements.

Save time when you need to refill your SmartPegs by saving your most frequently used types as favorites. A link to easily purchase is also available. 

Educate yourself on the Osstell ISQ Scale, watch educational videos of leading experts within implantology or read clinical cases.",Medical,Osstell AB,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/osstell-smartpegs/id1496963379?uo=4,5.0,1,MedTech
1437265579,MTS Events,"The MTS Events mobile app is a member's only networking application for the participants of the MedTech Strategist Global Investment and Partnering Conferences. This powerful app brings the event to your mobile device and allows you to:
 
• Create and maintain a public profile
• Request meetings with speakers, sponsors, exhibitors and other participants
• Manage a personalized schedule for event sessions and meetings
• Send private messages to other Event Attendees
• Receive important updates and announcements from the event organizers
• Upload photos, videos, and other relevant documents (press releases, white papers, etc.)
• Discover what’s around you (restaurants, bars, coffee shops, etc.)
• Access event documentation",Business,"Innovation in Medtech, LLC",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/mts-events/id1437265579?uo=4,5.0,1,MedTech
6472815252,Citeline News and Insights,"Essential healthcare news and insights, powered by Citeline.

Unlock the world of healthcare with the new Citeline News and Insights app, providing seamless access to Citeline's suite of award-winning publications.

This is your go-to source for in-depth industry analysis and updates covering pharma, biotech, medtech, generics, health, and beauty. Get instant access to:

• Scrip's global market intelligence
• In Vivo's strategic insights
• Pink Sheet's regulatory analysis
• Medtech Insight's global updates
• Generics Bulletin's industry outlook
• HBW Insight's market coverage

Stay informed with critical news, competitor coverage, regulatory insights, and strategic analysis across the healthcare spectrum. Elevate your industry knowledge today with Citeline.

The Citeline News and Insights app is free to download and use. To obtain full access to our content, you must be a subscriber or take a free trial and sign in using your Citeline account. 
For more information, contact clientservices@citeline.com.",News,PHARMA INTELLIGENCE U.K. LIMITED,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/citeline-news-and-insights/id6472815252?uo=4,5.0,1,MedTech
1298699342,Camber Spine Technologies,"Camber Spine Technologies is dedicated to creating surgeon designed minimally invasive access solutions for the treatment of complex spinal pathology.

This iPad and iPhone App is designed to be an educational resource for our team, partners, and surgeon customers.",Medical,"Camber Spine Technologies, LLC",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/camber-spine-technologies/id1298699342?uo=4,0.0,0,MedTech
6464662700,RoboBusiness&DeviceTalks West,"Use the RoboBusiness and DeviceTalks West app during the event to help you plan and create your schedule, network with attendees and exhibitors and get up to date information in real time regarding event announcements.",Business,GARDNER BUSINESS MEDIA INC.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/robobusiness-devicetalks-west/id6464662700?uo=4,0.0,0,MedTech
1585877729,Cog PT Companion,"Seamlessly extending the capabilities of the Cog PT main application, the Cog PT Companion app is expertly designed for patient use, offering a diverse array of cognitive exercises and mental performance tasks.

BACKGROUND
Developed alongside the Cog PT main app, incorporating over a decade of research and clinical expertise.
Rigorously tested in clinical settings to ensure effectiveness and ease of use.
Extensively used in patient sessions, proven to enhance cognitive training outcomes.

KEY FEATURES
Personalized Cognitive Prescriptions: Access and perform cognitive exercises and mental training tasks assigned via the Cog PT main app.
Wide Range of Tasks: Simple Reaction Time, Motor Precision, Dual Processing, Coherent Breathing, Working Memory, and Vision tasks like Pursuit and Saccade.
Progress Tracking: Real-time feedback and updates on your cognitive training journey.
User-Friendly Design: Intuitive interface for easy engagement by patients of all ages and technological proficiency.

TECHNOLOGY AND ENGAGEMENT
3D Head Tracking for Vision Tasks: Utilizes ARKit and TrueDepth camera technology for accurate feedback on head position, enhancing the effectiveness of eye movement tasks.
Syncs with heart rate devices for comprehensive health monitoring.

Note: The Cog PT Companion app supports cognitive rehabilitation and mental performance enhancement. It is not intended for diagnosis, treatment, cure, or prevention of any disease.

SUPPORT AND PRIVACY
Direct support link to healthcare providers and the COG PT team for assistance.
Committed to your privacy. Review our privacy policy and terms and conditions here: https://sportsacademy.us/terms-of-use-privacy-policy/apps/",Health & Fitness,Academy Medtech Ventures Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/cog-pt-companion/id1585877729?uo=4,3.0,3,MedTech
1627179083,Medgami,"Medgami’s  Vision:
To simplify and transform the lives of doctors, while helping them greatly improve patient outcomes. 

Who We Are:
Medgami is a one-stop credible medical knowledge and a peer network platform that brings the best of medical learning content at doctors' fingertips to help them stay ahead, while offering a personalized experience with interactive features for doctors to connect with their patients better and to engage with their peer communities.

What We Do:
With our guiding principles centered around crafting an easy-to-use, personalized offering, Medgami offer experiences like peer connect, patient management, knowledge enhancement and medical updates for a comprehensive all-in-one enabler to simplify a doctor’s digital medical journey.



Medgami provides hand-picked content ranging from byte-sized news updates from the medical space to international CMEs, article summaries from leading publications and associations like ACC, ADA, AACE, etc., Interactive Case Plays, interesting do-you-knows to feed your curiosity to a comprehensive patient suite for doctors to connect with their patients. Added to this is the ability to access platforms like Cardio Companion, Endo Companion, UpToDate® to assist a doctor in his medical journey end-to-end, starting from diagnosis to CDSS to easy patient interactions.",Medical,EPC Tech Private Limited,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/medgami/id1627179083?uo=4,5.0,1,MedTech
1540557239,MedWatch News,"MedWatch is a business media covering the pharmaceutical and medtech industries. MedWatch reports on strategy, management, results, competitors, ambitions, successes, failures, opinions, regulatory affairs and much more. In other words, we have plenty of topics you can follow, and the MedWatch app makes this easier than ever.

The app provides a fast and easy overview of all relevant news within the industry. You can save articles and read them later and share relevant articles with colleagues and friends. The app ensures that you are always logged in and ready to access all our content.",News,Jyllands-Posten A/S,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/medwatch-news/id1540557239?uo=4,0.0,0,MedTech
6738273299,MedTech 360,"Take your career to the next level in one of the most lucrative industries, all while making a huge difference towards clinical outcomes. MedTech 360 is designed to help build your confidence, tap into your innate strengths, and guide you in your development. 

Our platform is filled with engaging courses, role playing, quizzes, live webinars from industry leaders from physicians, nurses, med device managers, current sales reps, clinical specialists and many more. 

With access to tons of coaches that have been in this industry for decades, they'll provide you with the tools you need to be incredibly successful. Our goal is to see you thrive in this industry and look forward to work with you in this amazing journey.",Education,"Medtech 360, LLC",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/medtech-360/id6738273299?uo=4,0.0,0,MedTech
6745162258,MedTech Forum 2025,"Welcome to the official app for MedTech Forum India 2025, Asia Pacific’s premier event for medical technology, innovation, and digital health. Designed to enhance your onsite and virtual experience, the MTF 2025 App is your all-in-one platform for staying informed, connected, and engaged throughout the Forum.

Key Features
• Live Agenda & Session Info – View the real-time event schedule, filter by track or theme, and build your personalized agenda.
• Speaker Profiles – Learn more about global keynote speakers, thought leaders, and panel experts.
• Networking Tools – Connect with fellow attendees, schedule meetings, and engage in 1:1 chats.
• Interactive Venue Map – Navigate the venue with ease, explore exhibitor booths, and locate amenities.
• Push Notifications – Get instant updates on session changes, speaker highlights, or networking activities.
• Downloadable Resources – Access exclusive content, whitepapers, and sponsor brochures.
• Live Polling & Q&A – Participate in sessions through interactive polls and submit your questions in real time.
• Sustainability Hub – Discover MTF’s green initiatives and find out how you can contribute.

Whether you’re a healthcare professional, startup founder, policymaker, or investor, MTF 2025 brings together a vibrant community of changemakers driving the future of healthcare in the Asia-Pacific region and beyond.

Join thousands of professionals across the medtech ecosystem to engage in meaningful conversations, discover breakthrough technologies, and gain actionable insights.

About the Organiser
MTF is convened by APACMed, the leading voice for the medical technology industry in Asia Pacific, committed to driving access, innovation, and collaboration in healthcare.

This app is compatible with iOS devices.",Business,DREAMCAST DIGITAL WORKS PRIVATE LIMITED,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/medtech-forum-2025/id6745162258?uo=4,0.0,0,MedTech
1444315169,Clinician - TotalCare,"Totalcaretm is a telemedicine platform that brings clinicians virtually to where you are. 

There is no monthly fee, software, or equipment purchase is necessary to use TotalCaretm. You can earn from telecosultation.

Your patients can share major complaints, medications, medical history, vitals, pictures and other necessary information to facilitate you to make a more informed diagnosis. You can readily provide care plans and follow-up appointment reminders.",Health & Fitness,"Hawkeye MedTech, Inc",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/clinician-totalcare/id1444315169?uo=4,5.0,2,MedTech
6504920960,Medtech Solutions (Danış),"""Danish"" psixoloji sağlamlığa təsir edən gündəlik problemləri həll etmək, stresi aradan qaldırmaq, rahatlıq təmin etmək və mənəvi sağlamlığı yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün ideal seçimdir.
Xidmətlərimizdən vebsayt və ya mobil tətbiq vasitəsilə faydalana bilərsiniz.

İstifadəçilər istək və problemlərinə uyğun gördükləri peşəkar psixoloqu seçərək, həm audio, həm də videozənglərlə məsləhətlər ala bilərlər. Bizim fərqimiz ondan ibarətdir ki, üzbəüz görüş üçün də imkan yaradırıq. Bununla yanaşı, gündəlik həyatda psixikasına təsir edən problemləri həll etmək, stressdən azad olmaq, psixoloji vəziyyətini yaxşılaşdırmaq və ümumi mənəvi dəstək üçün “Danish” ideal seçimdir.

Biz “Doğru müalicə, hər şeyi dəyişə bilər” prinsipi ilə fəaliyyət göstəririk. Sayt və tətbiqimizdəki bütün mütəxəssislər uzun illərin təcrübəsinə malik, ali təhsilli və peşəkar şəxslərdir. Onlar ciddi şəkildə yoxlanır, məlumatlarının doğruluğu təsdiq olunur və peşəkarlığı ilə tanınır.

Bizim tətbiq və vebsayt istifadəçilərin rahatlığı üçün yaradılıb və tam şəffafdır. Psixoloqlar haqqında geniş məlumat təqdim edilir ki, hər bir şəxs etibar etdiyi psixoloqu seçərək məsləhət alsın.

Əlavə olaraq, tətbiqimiz onlayn psixoloji dəstəyin üstünlüklərini təmin edir: evdən çıxmadan, istənilən zaman və yerdə dəstək almaq mümkündür. Onlayn konsultasiyalar anksiyete, depressiya və münasibət problemləri kimi vəziyyətlərdə effektlidir. Əlavə olaraq, sıx qrafikdə çalışan və psixoloqlara üz tutmaqdan çəkinən insanlar üçün əvəzolunmazdır.

Biz etik prinsiplərə riayət edir və istifadəçilərimizin şəxsi məlumatlarının təhlükəsizliyini müasir texnologiyalarla təmin edirik. Məqsədimiz hər bir şəxsin ehtiyaclarına uyğun xidmət təqdim edərək, psixologiyanı hərkəs üçün əlçatan etməkdir.

""Danish"" is an ideal choice for addressing everyday psychological issues affecting people's mental health, resolving stress, ensuring spiritual comfort, improving psychological well-being, and eliminating psychological difficulties, all through a single application.
We operate on the principle that ""Correct treatment can change everything,"" ensuring that individuals using our application receive continuous support from professionals. All specialists featured on our website and application are thoroughly vetted professionals with years of proven experience in their respective fields.

Our user-friendly website and mobile application allow convenient access to services anytime, anywhere. You can schedule consultations with your chosen psychologist at your preferred time and modify your appointment if needed. We also provide extensive information about psychologists, ensuring transparency so that users can confidently select and consult with trusted professionals.

One key advantage is the availability of face-to-face meetings.
We provide a physical location where patients can meet and consult with psychologists in person. This complements our online services and ensures comprehensive care.

We prioritize privacy and adhere to strict ethical standards. Our technology safeguards users' personal information, providing a secure and reliable platform. Our mission is to offer effective, personalized services that help individuals achieve inner harmony.Biz etik prinsiplərə riayət edir və istifadəçilərimizin şəxsi məlumatlarının təhlükəsizliyini müasir texnologiyalarla təmin edirik. Məqsədimiz hər bir şəxsin ehtiyaclarına uyğun xidmət təqdim edərək, psixologiyanı hərkəs üçün əlçatan etməkdir.",Lifestyle,Medtech Solutions MMC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/medtech-solutions-dan%C4%B1%C5%9F/id6504920960?uo=4,0.0,0,MedTech
1503650413,mVUE,Cutting edge micro ultrasound system.,Medical,"Wuxi VUE Medtech Co.,Ltd",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/mvue/id1503650413?uo=4,5.0,1,MedTech
6470379742,Mamhashi - zdrowie w Hashimoto,"Poznaj innowacyjne narzędzie, które pomoże Ci odzyskać kontrolę nad swoim zdrowiem! Mamhashi oferuje kompleksowe podejście do zarządzania chorobą Hashimoto, skupiając się na diecie, redukcji stresu, motywacji, wsparciu dietetyków oraz monitorowaniu wyników badań.
			
Co znajdziesz w aplikacji?			
			
- Przeciwzapalna Dieta — spersonalizowany jadłospis składający się z 4 posiłków dziennie, z możliwością wymiany dnia lub posiłku w zależności od Twoich preferencji. Dzięki informacjom o kaloryczności i bilansie makroskładników dokładnie wiesz, co jesz w danym dniu. Wybierz między klasyczną dietą a dietą bez glutenu i nabiału.
- Opcja dodawania posiłków do Ulubionych — zapisuj swoje ulubione przepisy i korzystaj z gotowej listy zakupów, by zrobić zakupy w mgnieniu oka.
- Monitorowanie Nawodnienia Organizmu — dbaj o codzienny poziom nawodnienia, by zwiększyć efektywność swojego planu żywieniowego.
- Dzienniczek Samokontroli — śledź swoje postępy w kontroli i redukcji masy ciała. Dane wprowadzane w module pomiarów wykorzystywane będą do modyfikacji i dopasowania planów diety zgodnie z Twoim aktualnym zapotrzebowaniem energetycznym.
- Motywacja — inspirujące cytaty, medytacje z elementami mindfulness, relaksacji, afirmacji, wizualizacji audio, porady coacha, ćwiczenia oddechowe oraz kojące nagrania poprawiające jakość snu.			
- Wsparcie Doświadczonych Ekspertów 24/7			
- Integracja z Apple Watch — synchronizuj dane i kontroluj postępy bez wysiłku.			
			
Opcje diety w Mamhashi:

- Dieta klasyczna lub bez laktozy i bez glutenu.
- Dieta Przeciwzapalna składająca się z 4 posiłków dziennie: śniadania, zdrowej przekąski, obiadu i kolacji.
- Dieta klasyczna lub bez laktozy i bez glutenu.
- Dieta o niskim Indeksie glikemicznym, pomocna w utrzymaniu stabilnego poziom cukru we krwi.
- Dieta bez goitrogenów — składników, które mogą zaburzać wchłanianie jodu.
- Wzmożona ilość ryb w diecie z odpowiednią ilością jodu i zdrowych tłuszczów.
- Szybkie i proste przygotowanie posiłków, gdzie przygotowanie przekąski to zaledwie 5 minut, a pozostałych dań —  kwadrans.
- Zdrowe słodkości w menu — zdrowe alternatywy wykluczające cukry proste.
- Jadłospis w stylu Zero Waste — ograniczamy straty produktów i Twój czas, pozwalając gotować obiady na 2 dni.		
			
W jaki sposób aplikacja usprawni Twoją codzienność z Hashimoto?			
		
- Codzienne wsparcie — nasi eksperci są zawsze dostępni, by odpowiedzieć na Twoje pytania i wesprzeć Cię na każdym kroku.
- Wszystko w jednym miejscu — aplikacja Mamhashi łączy czynniki wpływające na chorobę Hashimoto: dieta, stres, motywacja, wsparcie dietetyków oraz kontrola wyników badań.
- Szybka, 4 posiłkowa dieta przeciwzapalna.
- Pomoc w stabilizacji i redukcji masy ciała.
			
Aplikacja zapewnia użytkownikom rozbudowane funkcje, w tym dietę, dziennik samokontroli i inne, a wszystkie one wymagają aktywnej subskrypcji. Użytkownicy muszą dokonać płatności, aby uzyskać dostęp do tych ekskluzywnych funkcji.			
			
Opłata za dostęp do aplikacji będzie pobierana zgodnie z wybraną subskrypcją. Płatność zostanie automatycznie pobrana, chyba że zostanie wyłączona przynajmniej 24 godziny przed zakończeniem okresu abonamentowego. Subskrypcjami można zarządzać w Ustawieniach.			
			
Aplikacja Mamhashi korzysta z Apple Health, by otrzymywać niezbędne do świadczenia usługi informacje o Tobie i Twojej aktywności fizycznej.			
			
Dieta jest zgodna z zaleceniami żywienia, o których możesz przeczytać w publikacjach naukowych. Odwiedź dedykowaną stronę poświęconą chorobie Hashimoto https://app.mamhashi.pl/info lub zakładkę ""Info"" w aplikacji.			
			
Aplikacja nie jest produktem medycznym. Przed rozpoczęciem diety skontaktuj się z lekarzem, który upewni Cię, że nie ma żadnych przeciwwskazań do stosowania diety.			
			
Regulamin: https://app.mamhashi.pl/terms-of-service",Health & Fitness,DIETLABS MEDTECH SP Z O O,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/mamhashi-zdrowie-w-hashimoto/id6470379742?uo=4,5.0,1,MedTech
1588042231,OsstellConnect,"OsstellConnect is a free cloud-based solution offering a new way for clinicians to use data to enhance their dental implant treatments. It is the world’s largest implant online portal with more than a quarter of a million data points.

Use this app to access OsstellConnect and connect your Osstell Beacon and upload measurements to your account.

OsstellConnect is intended for professional use by dental clinicians working with dental implants. It will not be possible to use the functionality within the app without having an Osstell measuring device. 

OsstellConnect can add important information to the evaluation of implant stability and can be used as part of an overall treatment evaluation program. The final implant treatment decisions are the responsibility of the clinician.",Medical,Osstell AB,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/osstellconnect/id1588042231?uo=4,0.0,0,MedTech
6470379632,Cukrzyca.pl: dieta i motywacja,"Szukasz zintegrowanego narzędzia, które umożliwi Ci pełną kontrolę nad cukrzycą? Aplikacja Cukrzyca.pl to spersonalizowana fit dieta, eksperckie treści, przeliczniki wymienników węglowodanowych WW i kalkulator insuliny, jak również kompleksowy program żywieniowy i motywacja. Tu wszystko znajdziesz w jednym miejscu, by jeszcze łatwej zadbać o swoje zdrowie.

Nasza aplikacja to efekt ścisłej współpracy z Kliniką Chorób Wewnętrznych i Diabetologii Uniwersytetu Medycznego im. K. Marcinkowskiego w Poznaniu, co sprawia, że oferujemy Ci niezrównaną jakość i kompleksowość w zarządzaniu cukrzycą.

Odkryj, jak lepiej kontrolować cukrzycę, polepszyć swoje zdrowie i samopoczucie. Wspieramy w takich obszarach jak:

- Dieta i regulacja godzin spożywania posiłków,
- Odpowiednie nawodnienie organizmu,
- Obniżenie wskaźnika HbA1c - poprawa wyniku hemoglobiny glikowanej świadczy o lepiej prowadzonej cukrzycy,
- Zdrowy sen, redukcja stresu, motywacja,
- Unormowanie i utrzymanie prawidłowej masy ciała,
- Regularna aktywność fizyczna i odchudzanie,
- Kształtowanie zdrowych nawyków żywieniowych i zbalansowanego podejścia do diety.

Co znajdziesz w aplikacji Cukrzyca?

ZDROWA FIT DIETA I PLAN POSIŁKÓW NA KAŻDY DZIEŃ

- Bezpieczny, indywidualnie skrojony plan żywienia o niskim indeksie glikemicznym dopasowany do Twojej diagnozy i leczenia cukrzycy. 
- 15 lat eksperckiego wsparcia dietetyków — porady i jadłospisy opracowane zgodnie z wytycznymi Polskiego Towarzystwa Diabetologicznego.
- Informacja o wybranym dniu i kaloryczności jadłospisu wraz z procentowym podsumowaniem makro.
- Proste i szybkie fit dania, które przygotujesz w maksymalnie 30 minut a cały jadłospis na dany dzień w godzinę.
- 9 zdrowych planów żywieniowych: 4 posiłki dziennie dla osób z insulinoopornością i stanem przedcukrzycowym oraz 5 posiłków dziennie dla osób z cukrzyca typu 1 i typu 2.
- Dieta oparta o produkty o niskim indeksie glikemicznym, odpowiednia także dla osób z insulinoopornością. 
- Zdrowe zamienniki cukrów i szybkie przekąski do 1 WW — nie musisz podawać insuliny na korektę.
- Przepisy wzbogacone o zdjęcia, czas przygotowania, kaloryczność, a także przeliczniki WW i WBT.

DZIENNIK SAMOKONTROLI

- Opcja wprowadzania informacji o postępach w redukcji masy ciała — łatwe dostosowanie planów diety do Twojego aktualnego zapotrzebowania energetycznego. 
- Glikemia — monitorowanie poziomu glukozy we krwi.
- Możliwość wprowadzania wyników badań hemoglobiny glikowanej oraz profilu lipidowego. Dane te wykorzystasz na spotkaniach z diabetologiem.
- Zintegrowany kalkulator insuliny — obliczanie jednostki insuliny podanej do posiłku.

Co zyskasz po pobraniu aplikacji Cukrzyca?

- Stałą opiekę oraz wsparcie dietetyków i diabetologów w telefonie 24/7.
- Wszystkie narzędzia do zarządzania cukrzycą w jednym miejscu — spersonalizowana dieta, dziennik samokontroli, kalkulator insuliny, motywacja/edukacja, indeks glikemiczny pod kontrolą.
- Prosty, szybki jadłospis, który zachęca do zbalansowanej i zdrowej diety.
- Wyrównanie glikemii i obniżenie poziomu hemoglobiny glikowanej po rozpoczęciu diety z aplikacją.
- Rady i motywacje od ekspertów.

Opłata za dostęp do aplikacji będzie pobierana zgodnie z wybraną subskrypcją. Płatność zostanie automatycznie pobrana, chyba że zostanie wyłączona przynajmniej 24 godziny przed zakończeniem okresu abonamentowego. Subskrypcjami można zarządzać w Ustawieniach.

Aplikacja Cukrzyca.pl korzysta z Apple Health, by otrzymywać od tej usługi niezbędne do świadczenia usługi informacje o Tobie i Twojej aktywności fizycznej.

Dieta jest zgodna z zaleceniami żywienia, o których możesz przeczytać w publikacjach naukowych. Odwiedź https://app.cukrzyca.pl/info lub zakładkę ""Info"" w aplikacji.

Aplikacja nie jest produktem medycznym. Przed rozpoczęciem diety skontaktuj się z lekarzem, który upewni Cię, że nie ma żadnych przeciwwskazań do stosowania diety.

Regulamin: https://app.cukrzyca.pl/terms-of-service",Health & Fitness,DIETLABS MEDTECH SP Z O O,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/cukrzyca-pl-dieta-i-motywacja/id6470379632?uo=4,0.0,0,MedTech
6741070067,The MedTech Forum 2025,"Official application of the MedTech Forum 2025.
Find all the useful information about the conference: the complete programme, the speakers' list, the exhibition map... and get in touch with other participants!",Medical,MedTech Europe,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/the-medtech-forum-2025/id6741070067?uo=4,0.0,0,MedTech
6449032333,J&J MedTech XR,"Explore and learn about human body, using our Extended Reality App!",Health & Fitness,TXT e-solutions SPA,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/j-j-medtech-xr/id6449032333?uo=4,0.0,0,MedTech
1539890316,HNNPro,"All physical examination equipment has CE FDA CFDA certificate, applicable to China, Europe, and the United States.

HNNPRO, as the enterprise version of HiNounou, provides real-time customer health management functions for medical and nursing personnel and health centers, allowing them to understand the health status of customers in real time, improve service efficiency, and bring peace of mind to customers.

[Wellness monitoring system]
HNNPro provides a set of efficient physical health monitoring solutions for medical staff, health centers, community hospitals, and nursing homes. By using HiNounou Smart Health Kit, medical staff can perform physical check-up for clients and monitor changes of their physical health status, and generate health reports with health data.

[Tailored health reports] 
Medical and nursing personnel can use HNNPro to generate customized health reports based on the daily physical examination data of each customer. HNNPro also provides 24-hour real-time and comprehensive care, children can know the health status of their parents at any time; when there is an abnormality, the App will immediately send a warning to the user's family and his/her professional caregiver. This report will be very helpful in the treatment, management and prevention of acute and chronic diseases.

[Disclaimer]
Health risk assessment is based on your personal health information and health testing data. If the information is not accurate, the accuracy of the assessment results will be affected.

The occurrence and development of the disease is very complex. This risk assessment is not the basis of disease diagnosis and medication, and the prediction results are only for reference. If you need to confirm whether you are sick or not, please go to the relevant departments of the hospital and consult a professional doctor.",Health & Fitness,"HiNounou Intelligent Robot (Shanghai) Co., Ltd.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/hnnpro/id1539890316?uo=4,0.0,0,MedTech
1621528006,Medentee,"Medentee – Your All-in-One Solution for Medical Communities!
Designed specifically for medical professionals, Medentee is the ultimate platform for hosting events, managing files, and connecting with colleagues – all from one app. Whether you’re organizing webinars, building professional communities, or simply looking for a space to manage your data, Medentee has everything you need.

Host and Manage Events
Gain full control over your webinars and online events with intuitive tools for managing attendees, customizing branding, and interacting with your audience in real-time. Ensure your events reflect your professional identity, with Medentee allowing you to personalize your event’s.

Build and Grow Communities
Create and manage your medical organizations effortlessly. Whether you’re building a small group or a large professional network, Medentee makes community management simple and accessible for everyone.

Real-Time Communication
Stay connected with colleagues through Medentee’s seamless communication tools. Easily create and schedule calls for real-time discussions, share updates, and collaborate with others no matter where they are.

MedCloud – Secure Data Storage
Keep your files and documents safe with MedCloud, Medentee’s built-in cloud service. Organize your data, share resources, and access important documents anytime, from anywhere.

Medical Profile
Showcase your professional expertise with a dedicated medical profile. Highlight your qualifications, experience, and contributions to the medical field while networking with others in your community.

Why Medentee?
Medentee offers more than just an event platform – it’s a comprehensive solution designed to foster collaboration and communication within the medical community. With tools that simplify event hosting, community building, and secure data storage, Medentee empowers professionals to focus on what matters most.

Terms of Service Agreement 
By downloading Medentee, you agree to our Terms of Service. For more information, please visit our website: https://www.medentee.com/terms-of-use 
Join the growing community of medical professionals using Medentee to stay organized, connected, and informed!

Download Medentee today and experience the future of medical collaboration.",Medical,Medentee Limited,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/medentee/id1621528006?uo=4,0.0,0,MedTech
1458335847,HiNounou,"All physical examination equipment has CE FDA CFDA certificate, applicable to China, Europe, and the United States.

HiNounou helps seniors and patients with chronic diseases in the world to Live Longer, Healthier and Happier at home, and give Peace of Mind to their families who live far away from them.
We provide medical professionals and caregivers with real-time information about the health state of seniors as well as patients with chronic diseases. 

[Wellness monitoring system]
Our HiNounou AI Wellness Pack offers connected certified medical devices at home, from which our HiNounou App retrieves data and generates monitoring vital signs report that can be share to family and/or Professional caregivers. This pack includes Blood pressure meter, Oximeter, scale and other additional medical devices on demand such as Glucose meter and ECG.

[Long-term health report] 
A health report is generated via daily measurement. When the heath data is normal, the report conveys overall health status and provides needed reassurance. When abnormal, the App will send alerts to family and professional caregivers who will follow up.
Being known and reacted properly, this report will benefit treatment course, management and prevention of both acute and chronic diseases. 
 
[7/24 Telemedicine]
Whenever seniors and patients at home have health problems, they can simply click the assistance button to call medical professionals and get in-time medical advice from our partner AXA Assistance (China), Pelion Group (Poland) and from HiNounou wellbeing Assistance.

[User-friendly Interface]
The App is specially designed for seniors, with simple interface including both image and sound instructions, which enable them to do their daily check-up at home.

[Rewards program for more benefits]
Seniors are rewarded for daily monitoring with Nounou tokens. Once received they may exchange the tokens within the platform to purchase daily commodities and health services within our partners network.

[Disclaimer]
Health risk assessment is based on your personal health information and health testing data. If the information is not accurate, the accuracy of the assessment results will be affected.

The occurrence and development of the disease is very complex. This risk assessment is not the basis of disease diagnosis and medication, and the prediction results are only for reference. If you need to confirm whether you are sick or not, please go to the relevant departments of the hospital and consult a professional doctor.",Health & Fitness,"HiNounou Intelligent Robot (Shanghai) Co., Ltd.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/hinounou/id1458335847?uo=4,0.0,0,MedTech
6472816132,NavigateHER,"Navigate Maternity, a tech-enabled medical device company, enhances the coordination of maternal care by remotely monitoring patients and collecting and sharing data to support clinical decision making. The system captures important biometric, mood disorder, and socioeconomic information from the first prenatal appointment until twelve months after childbirth via the patient's mobile app and Bluetooth connected devices. Additionally, it facilitates seamless communication and collaboration between healthcare providers, ensuring that the patient receives timely and coordinated care throughout the perinatal period through enhanced surveillance, early intervention, and support for expectant mothers. Expectant mothers/mothers should use this app in conjunction with seeking their doctor's advice for making any medical decisions. The Navigate Maternity Team does not provide clinical advice.",Medical,Navigate Maternity Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/navigateher/id6472816132?uo=4,5.0,1,MedTech
6477848952,AFib 2024,"Welcome to AFib 2024, the official event app powered by Johnson & Johnson MedTech. Designed exclusively for attendees of the 22nd Atrial Fibrillation Symposium, this app is your all-access pass to an unforgettable experience. Download the app and enhance your Symposium experience by exploring the remarkable Faculty and Scientific Committee, our exclusive agenda, special sessions, and all the essential information about the Symposium.",Business,MCI Group Holding SA,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/afib-2024/id6477848952?uo=4,0.0,0,MedTech
6450908485,TD MASTER CLASS,"Total Definer MasterClass is an innovative e-learning application designed exclusively for plastic surgeons . With a wide range of high-quality content, TD MasterClass, webinar, interactive videos and more…

We offer an extensive catalog of courses designed and developed by internationally recognized plastic surgeons. Including advanced surgical techniques, procedures, patient safety, marketing strategies, photography and the latest trends in the industry.

▷ Already a Member? Sign-In to access your subscription.
▷ New? Try it for free! Subscribe in the app to get instant access.

TD MASTER CLASS offers an auto-renewing subscription that will allow you unlimited access to content on all your devices. Payment is charged to your Account at confirmation of purchase. Pricing varies by location and is confirmed prior to purchase. Subscription automatically renews unless canceled at least 24 hours before the end of the current billing period. Cancel anytime in Account Settings.

For more information see our:
-Terms of Service: https://totaldefinermasterclass.tv/pages/terms-of-service
-Privacy Policy: https://totaldefinermasterclass.tv/pages/privacy-policy",Medical,AH MEDTECH SAS,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/td-master-class/id6450908485?uo=4,0.0,0,MedTech
6446786639,Casez,"Welcome to Casez, the ultimate interactive case-based learning platform designed to enhance your medical education experience! Whether you're a student, resident, or an attending, Casez provides a unique and engaging way to share and practice cases.

Key Features:

Automatically Generated Presentation Slides: Easily follow along and learn from cases with dynamic presentation slides that are automatically generated for a seamless learning experience.

Student View Sync: Students can effortlessly follow along their devices , ensuring that they're always on the same page as the instructor and able to focus on the learning experience.

Built-in Audience Response System: Engage with the material and test your knowledge using interactive audience response questions throughout the cases. Gauge your understanding, challenge yourself, and see how you stack up against your peers!

Interactive Imaging: Dive deep into medical imaging with interactive CT, MRI, and PET scans, allowing you to examine and interpret images as if you were in a real clinical setting.",Education,"Omentum, LLC",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/casez/id6446786639?uo=4,5.0,1,MedTech
1557620647,Pharma.C,"PharmaC- A complete solution in ordering online pharmaceutical needs in Kuwait.

Connecting Pharmaceutical companies in one platform. Pharma.C is a turnover solution for pharmacy supply chain to automate the entire sales process. We help the pharmaceutical industry to upgrade to the latest technologies to automate the pharma business.

Ordering Process:

-Pin your LIVE location or enter your address.
-Experience shopping your needs in a few taps.
-Place your order
-Track it to your doorstep! 

Available Across:

Kuwait, GCC coming soon…",Lifestyle,CENTRAL CIRCLE CO. WLL,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/pharma-c/id1557620647?uo=4,1.9375,16,pharma
1493904088,Medical & Pharma Dictionary,"Medical & Pharma Dictionary with Voice Search gives the user access to a huge database of drugs details and their usages. Very helpful for medical & pharma exam preparation and increasing pharmapedia knowledge.

This Pharma Guide app contains latest modern use medicines details including medicine formula, medicine usage, medicine dosage etc.

Features:

Sleek Design
Pharma Index with Voice Search.
Intelligent Search.
Easy to Use.
Drugs Details, Overview, Indication, Generic Drug Formula, Side Effects etc.
Best for Medical Exam Preparation as it includes hundreds of Drugs details.

Disclaimer:
This app is especially design for Education purpose only, Please take drugs and medicines on 
you Physician Prescription.",Education,Muhammad Asad Khan,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/medical-pharma-dictionary/id1493904088?uo=4,3.88889,18,pharma
1128063069,PharmaGuide,"PharmaGuide

Instant and Predictive Search by:
Brand
Company Name
Generic Name (e.g. Cefoperazone)
Contents (e.g. Cefoperazone and Sulbactam)
Therapeutic Category (e.g. Cephalosporins)

Interaction Checker:
Interaction Checker feature lets you quickly identify any interactions among prescribed drugs.
You can select GENERICS as well as BRANDS in your country to check interaction.

Risk Factors

Information provided under Risk Factors include Contraindications, Precautions and Risks in Pregnancy and Lactation for the relevant product.

Pregnancy: Risk cannot be ruled out. 
Lactation: Contraindicated.
Contraindications: Severe respiratory depression, severe obstructive lung conditions.
Precautions: COPD, raised intracranial pressure, impaired consciousness, head injury, bradyarrhythmia, renal or hepatic impairment. Monitor for signs of respiratory depression. Brain tumour. Risk of tolerance and dependence. Elderly or debilitated patients.

Dosage (Alongwith Indications)

Fast, Quick & Easy Access to Accurate Dosage in Specific Indications

The usual dosage are: Adults: Usually 1 gm daily by deep IM., slow IV inj over at least 2-4 min, or IV infusion. Severe infections, 2-4 gm as a single dose every 24 hrs. Children: Usually 20-50 mg/kg once daily by IM inj., slow IV inj over at least 2-4 min, or IV infusion. Severe infections, up to maximum 80 mg/kg daily. Doses over 50 mg/kg to be given by slow IV infusion over at least 30 minutes. Neonates: IM/IV: Postnatal age ≤ 7 days or > 7 days (body wt ≤ 2 Kg): 50 mg/kg/day given every 24 hrs. Postnatal age > 7 days, body wt > 2 Kg: 50-75 mg/kg/day given every 24 hrs.

Administration

How to prepare and administer e.g. an Injectable
The drug may be administered by IV intermittent infusion over 10-30 min; final concentration for IV administration should not exceed 40 mg/mL. The drug has also been administered by direct IV push over 2-4 min. Inject deep IM into large muscle mass.
IM Injection: 250 mg/500 mg/1000 mg VIAL: To make concentration of 250 mg/mL add Water for Injection 0.9 mL in 250 mg vial; 1.8 mL in 500 mg vial; 3.6 mL in 1000 mg vial.
IV: 250 mg/500 mg/1000 mg VIAL: To make concentration of 100 mg/mL add Water for Injection 2.4 mL in 250 mg vial; 4.8 mL in 500 mg vial; 9.6 mL in 1000 mg vial.
Compatibility: Stable in D5W, D10W, NS, Sodium bicarbonate 5%, bacteriostatic water, SWFI.
Stability: For IV infusion in NS or D5W, solution is stable for 3 days at room temperature or 10 days when refrigerated.

Interactions

Amikacin, Aminoglycosides, Anticoagulants, Gentamicin, Kanamycin, Neomycin, Netilmicin, Streptomycin, Tobramycin, Warfarin.

Adverse Effects

GI upset, skin reactions, blood dyscrasias. Rarely pseudomembranous colitis, raised liver enzymes, glycosuria, oliguria, haematuria, bronchospasm, phlebitis at inj site, urinary and biliary precipitates, pancreatitis.

Alternate Products

Quickly find Alternate Products - Just Click the Appropriate Button
e.g. Searching for an Alternative of Amaryl",Medical,Asif Baig,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/pharmaguide/id1128063069?uo=4,2.85714,7,pharma
1155146582,Veeva Engage,Veeva Engage enables healthcare providers to communicate directly with pharmaceutical companies from one easy-to-use application. Physicians can now use their iOS device to attend video conference calls and webinars hosted by any life science company using Veeva Engage.,Medical,Veeva Systems,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/veeva-engage/id1155146582?uo=4,4.15789,38,pharma
1637943638,Dragon Pharma,"Dragon Pharma is a leading brand of high quality sports supplements, with the most scientifically advanced compounds on the market.

Our team brings you more than 15 years of experience within the dietary sports supplement industry, much of it within the groundbreaking pro testosterone/hormonal regulation category. All our products are tested for purity to make sure that we not only create the absolute best products, but to also help you get into the best shape of your life.

We have a team of scientists and researchers work using state of the art scientific knowledge combined with world-class manufacturing facilities, while maintaining pharmaceutical quality standards to ensure that you have the highest quality products to take your physique to the next level. 

Download our app to start shopping!",Shopping,DRAGON PHARMA USA LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/dragon-pharma/id1637943638?uo=4,4.92347,196,pharma
879211577,GE Pharmacy,"App Description:
It’s easy to manage your prescriptions on the go — anywhere and anytime — with Giant Eagle Pharmacy app
 
Features:
• Refills — Request a refill by entering your prescription number

• Transfers — Transfer your prescriptions to any Giant Eagle Pharmacy

• Prescription Management — Easily view and manage prescription details including dosage, refill status, expiration date, prescribing physician, pharmacy location and more

• Notifications — Opt in to receive instant notifications and texts reminding you when prescriptions are due for a refill or ready to be picked up

• Pharmacy Locator — Find a Giant Eagle Pharmacy near you by entering your ZIP code or using your current location

• Account Management — Set up and manage accounts for each of your family members in one place

• Appointment Management — Create appointment reminders and add your prescribing physician’s information for easy access",Health & Fitness,Giant Eagle Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/ge-pharmacy/id879211577?uo=4,3.78467,548,pharma
1637886971,Pharma ASMR,Do you want to relax to the magic of compounding pharmacy? Prepare the pills and curate your bottles! This pharmacy ASMR is the relaxation you need.,Entertainment,FAUNA PRODUKSIYON VE TASARIM TICARET ANONIM SIRKETI,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/pharma-asmr/id1637886971?uo=4,2.66667,3,pharma
1084607724,PharmaWatch,"Access your full account on the PharmaWatch Portal anywhere, anytime. Quickly and easily see the temperature, humidity, and/or differential pressure conditions of your critical environments or valuable inventories including refrigerators, freezers, rooms, incubators, stability chambers, operating rooms and more.  Handle User Check-In with one click from your phone or tablet, and respond to Alerts from the convenience of your mobile device. 

At-A-Glance Dashboard

•	Monitored Environments are clearly shown by Location and Zone
•	See the last temperature, humidity, differential pressure reading etc. 
•	Includes the time of the last reading
•	Simple text indicates Alert Status

Convenient Check-In Functionality

•	Easily ‘Check-In’ using the App and record who checked the readings and when
•	Meets CDC and many State requirements for logging temperature
•	Schedule reminders on your phone to signal that Check-In is due
•	Automates data collection needed for FDA, CDC, and state regulatory compliance

Readings in Graphical Form

•	Scroll through the values stored, 6 hours at a time
•	Data shown in 5-minute increments

Prioritized Alert List

•	Quickly scroll through Actionable Alerts by Zone
•	Most important Alerts are shown at the top of the list 
•	Acknowledge new Alerts to inform the system that you are aware of the problem
•	Reset, Document, and Close Alerts from your device when the problem is resolved 
•	Ensures compliance by recording who, when, and what was done",Medical,American Pharma Technologies Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/pharmawatch/id1084607724?uo=4,5.0,2,pharma
1552054482,Hi Pharma - هاي فارما,"Hi Pharma is most trusted online store in of personal care and health supplements for Arab region for thousands of customers.A health and beauty hub that is in line with the needs, desires and aspirations of our customers.The best and most up-to-date products in one platform for a truly valuable and enjoyable shopping experience. 
We constantly observing your feedback and always try to bring new content to keep you up-to-date with all the latest trends & Brands!",Shopping,"PARIS INTERNATIONAL COMPANY FOR TRADING IN ALL MEDICAL EQUIPMENT, SUPPLIES AND TOOLS LLC",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/hi-pharma-%D9%87%D8%A7%D9%8A-%D9%81%D8%A7%D8%B1%D9%85%D8%A7/id1552054482?uo=4,3.66667,3,pharma
1542444978,Qatar Pharma,"Qatar Pharma is the first intravenous infusion facility in Doha, Qatar, and is the leading Pharmaceutical Company in the Arabian Gulf which started operating in the year 2009. It has a promising provision of high-quality medicinal products in the health care sector.
Qatar Pharma is the leader in infusion therapy and clinical nutrition in the Gulf. Qatar Pharma is producing quality products applying cGMP.

Payment options are flexible as you can pay online or just pay with cash upon delivery.

Qatar Pharma App ensures a quick, easy & user-friendly ordering process......

We are always looking for ways to improve. Please do send us your feedback & suggestions to socialmedia@qatarpharma.org",Shopping,QATAR PHARMA FORPHARMACEUTICALS INDUSTRIES,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/qatar-pharma/id1542444978?uo=4,5.0,2,pharma
1265907475,PharmaFrog,"What is new?  
1.     Automatically generates drug- and disease-specific Single-Choice Questions and deploys them within Learning Units, Quizzes and daily Refreshers. 
2.     Helps you remain proficient in pharmacotherapies of your choice by identifying your knowledge gaps.
 
PharmaFrog is an innovative learning and reference tool for pharmacology and pharmacotherapy. We believe that these disciplines should be understood rather than memorized. PharmaFrog explains pharmacotherapies using mechanisms - from physiology of drug targets through pharmacology to guideline-based clinical situations in which drugs are deployed. 
 
PharmaFrog addresses healthcare professionals and students, as well as interested laypersons. It is to be used only for educational purposes. If you have asked yourself:
> What is the target of a given drug and what physiological processes does it affect?
> Which drugs do I use to treat a given disease and why?
> How do I deploy drugs in specific, common clinical situations in accordance with the latest guidelines?
- PharmaFrog has an answer. Fully offline.  At your fingertips.",Medical,Universitaetsmedizin der Johannes Gutenberg-Universitaet Mainz,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/pharmafrog/id1265907475?uo=4,4.76471,17,pharma
1517215447,PharmaTube,"* Pharma Tube is the first Arabic pharmacology videos on Youtube, which have started since 2011, including more than 250 hours until May 2020.

* Videos had been watched by about 7 million viewers since 2011, with more than 100,000 subscribers in the channel until May 2020.

* Pharma Tube containing lectures about basic and clinical pharmacology with pharmacotherapy, which are prepared from Pharma Guide book

* Illustrations by Arabic language.

* Prepared by pharmacist; Dhshan Hassan Dhshan.

* These lectures are specialized for workers in the medical field (pharmacists, physicians, dentists and nurses).

For your suggestions please contact me;

- Facebook account
https://www.facebook.com/Dr.Dhshan

- Gmail
Dr.dhshan@gmail.com

- Pharma Guide (Facebook page )
https://www.facebook.com/Pharma.Guide.book",Education,Dahshan Hassan,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/pharmatube/id1517215447?uo=4,4.375,8,pharma
1468657260,PharmaPlus,"PharmaPlus® Mobile Application provides complete information on all the drugs available in Pakistan right in your pocket, a quick and handy reference for medical students, medical professionals and pharmaceutical industry. There are some essential & critical information required by healthcare professionals on any medicines such as; contents, indications and dosage, contraindications and precautions for any particular medicine. It is impossible for Healthcare Professionals to memorize all these information. Thus it is crucial to make this information handy and available all the time.
PharmaPlus® Mobile Application is an offline application which can be downloaded to smart phones, hence permanent connection of internet would not be required to use the application. It is updated once a month in order to keep the information up-to-date. It is to facilitate healthcare professionals to validate their prescription to avoid medical error. Medication errors include:
•	Incorrect dosage or administration of medicine.
•	Incorrect duration of treatment and Inappropriate intervals
•	Ignoring precautions and/or contra-indications of medicines. 
•	Prescribing wrong medicines or wrong combination of medicine.

PharmaPlus® Mobile Application provides healthcare professionals an easy to understand and user friendly Application of instant prescribing information when and where needed.",Medical,NAZNEEN ANWAR,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/pharmaplus/id1468657260?uo=4,5.0,6,pharma
435487213,PME - Pharma Market Europe,"PME is a monthly print and digital title written by experienced journalists and high-profile pharma and healthcare experts. The magazine provides insights and offers solutions to the issues that keep industry leaders awake at night.

From the latest developments in cancer treatments and the strategies behind them to new marketing and commercialisation models and the regulations that underpin the fabric of the sector – PME's got it covered.

PME is a trusted source for decision makers and influencers in pharma and healthcare who, through the practical and accessible content, have the knowledge to tackle whatever comes their way.

Keep up to date wherever you are with pharma company CEO interviews and strategic articles on industry hot topics, including market access, publication planning, regulation, digital developments, medical education, CME, marketing, country reports, emerging market reviews, conference reports, R&D, therapy area insights, drug updates, joint working with healthcare providers, generics, biotechnology, clinical trials, diagnostics, mHealth, patient perspectives, healthcare at home, careers, plus the latest local and global news.

If you are researching a topic area, or simply want to re-read thought provoking articles from previous issues then simply download our archived editions.

PME is also available in print and in digital form via www.pmlive.com/register (free registration). Plus, sign up to receive daily or weekly pharmaceutical news updates from our website at www.pmlive.com",Medical,PM GROUP WORLDWIDE LIMITED,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/pme-pharma-market-europe/id435487213?uo=4,2.0,3,pharma
568941038,RxMediaPharma,"RxMediaPharma® Mobile, online hizmet sunan interaktif bir ilaç bilgi kaynağıdır. Kullanıcılarına okunması kolay, kullanıcı dostu ara yüzü aracılığıyla güvenilir bilgi sağlar.

RxMediaPharma® aşağıdaki modülleri içermektedir:
Müstahzarlar
Etkin Maddeler
Endikasyonlar
Firmalar
Sözlük
Laboratuvar Verileri
Farmakolojik Grup Yapısı
ATC Sınıflandırma Sistemi
Sorgulama
e-Kitaplar
ICD-10
Sağlık Uygulama Tebliği (SUT)
Yeni Müstahzarlar
Gelecek Fiyatlar

Türkiye'de 20.000'den fazla serbest eczane, aile sağlığı merkezleri, muayenehaneler ve hastanelerin yanı sıra Sağlık Bakanlığı, Sosyal Güvenlik Kurumu (SGK), ilaç firmaları ve akademik kuruluşlar tarafından kullanılmaktadır.

Bu üstün nitelikleri ile RxMediaPharma®, tüm sağlık profesyonellerinin doğru ve hızlı kararlar almalarında önemli bir yardımcıdır.

----------------------------------------------

RxMediaPharma® Mobile is an online interactive drug information resource. It provides easy-to-read, in-depth, authoritative information for consumers via its robust, user-friendly, interactive software.

Used by many hospitals and over 20,000 retail pharmacies and medical clinics in Turkey as well as government and Social Security Institution (SGK), pharmaceutical manufacturers and academic institutions, RxMediaPharma® helps healthcare professionals.",Medical,GEMAS Genel Muhendislik Mekanik Sanayi ve Ticaret A.S.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/rxmediapharma/id568941038?uo=4,3.66667,3,pharma
6459233734,Rx2GO - PharmaChoice,"As part of maintaining a healthy life, PharmaChoice is proud to introduce an iOS Smartphone Application.
The application allows you to manage your prescription profile and order your prescriptions quickly and easily using iOS Devices.
Have your prescription profile at your finger tips any time you need it. At the emergency room, walk-in clinic, doctors office, everywhere!
Features:
Quick Refills: Refill your prescriptions by typing your phone number and prescription number(s).
Profile Login: Login using a card number and PIN issued to you by your pharmacy. See your current prescription profile on your device. Place order by simply clicking the check-box next to your prescription.
7 x 24 Ordering Capability. Order from anywhere including while you are on vacation",Medical,PharmaChoice RxHealthMed RxtoGo GetMyRx,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/rx2go-pharmachoice/id6459233734?uo=4,0.0,0,pharma
981908705,Pharma Games,"""Application for training purposes in the framework of a pharmacist competition.
Laboratoire Bioderma trains and rewards its retailers thanks to this educational application including:
- Questions about skin conditions, merchandising and products
- Picture uploads of products and testimonies
- Message center

Retailers score points individually for every quiz and challenge. Participants with the highest monthly and overall yearly score win incentives and a chance the win the big final.
Each participant has to register through their pharmacy's login details and create their profile with a chosen username and password.""",Health & Fitness,LABORATOIRE BIODERMA,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/pharma-games/id981908705?uo=4,5.0,4,pharma
6449676019,AmeriPharma Specialty Care,"Introducing the AmeriPharma Specialty Care app, personal pharmacy connection at your fingertips, designed to streamline your healthcare experience. This free, HIPAA-compliant app is a game-changer in secure healthcare communications.

With the AmeriPharma Specialty Care app, you can:

• Directly Communicate with Your Pharmacy: Send secure messages to your pharmacy team instantly and get your questions answered without having to call.

• Complete Signature Requests: Bid farewell to paperwork! Use our digital platform to complete signature requests quickly and conveniently.

• Access Educational Materials: Knowledge is power! Access a wealth of educational materials to help you understand your medications and conditions better.

• And Much More: We're always adding new features to improve your experience!

AmeriPharma Specialty Care is all about convenience, security, and speed, ensuring that managing your health is as simple as a tap on your screen. Download today and experience the new standard in pharmacy communications.

Note: This app is intended for use by AmeriPharma Pharmacy patients only. Join thousands of satisfied patients and make the switch to secure, digital communications with AmeriPharma Specialty Care app. Your health. Your pharmacy. Your app.",Medical,"Harper's Pharmacy, Inc",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/ameripharma-specialty-care/id6449676019?uo=4,5.0,4,pharma
1672141494,Panthera PharmaTrac,Panthera Logistics PharmaTrac is a healthcare-based Proof of Delivery application solely used for delivery services.  Please contact Panthera Logistics for more information.,Business,"All Med Express, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/panthera-pharmatrac/id1672141494?uo=4,4.33333,6,pharma
1638514214,PSP APP,"PSP Pharmacy Online Shop in Georgia. 

Users in Georgia can buy pharmacy products in this app, which will be delivered to them. 
Application has category pages, product page, cart, checkout. 
Users can both do guest checkout and as well they can create profile, where they can track order statuses, manage addresses and profile information.",Shopping,PSP PHARMA LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/psp-app/id1638514214?uo=4,3.61,100,pharma
1513240731,RxVantage for Reps,"This new app gives Premium and Enterprise users a central place to manage their entire RxVantage account on any mobile device.  We’ve redesigned the app to optimize it for iPhone and iPad and make it faster and easier for you to complete your most important tasks to better serve your customers.

RxVantage connects healthcare providers to the precise life science experts they need, when they need them, to improve patient care. The app helps life science experts to better serve providers by making it easy to book meetings, respond to practice requests, and communicate with practice staff, from anywhere. 
* Instant push notifications for available appointments with your target practices
* View all customers in your territory
* View practice calendars and schedules
* Book and confirm meetings online
* Access to your target practice’s rules and preferences
* Receive reminders and practice requests
* Collaborate with your teammates and exchange appointments
 
The app is free to all RxVantage Premium and Enterprise users.",Business,RxVantage LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/rxvantage-for-reps/id1513240731?uo=4,1.52632,95,pharma
1511983570,Ibnsina Pharma,"Welcome to Ibnsina Pharma mobile application, your gate to ISP digital services
The Application is designed to be user-friendly and compatible with different mobile interfaces. This product is part of a program created to serve our customers and deliver all our services through digital platforms. through this Application; you can create sales orders, monitor your transactions, and view the most recent governmental publications. you can reach these features from the web portal or the mobile application.",Business,IBNSINA PHARMA,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/ibnsina-pharma/id1511983570?uo=4,4.2,5,pharma
1481843263,IQVIA Study Hub,"The IQVIA Study Hub app supports your clinical trial journey by providing a platform to interact with study team members, view upcoming visits, complete eDiaries, track study progress, access study related documents and tap into 24/7 support. Study Hub may also securely collect data from certain approved connected devices used in your clinical trial. If the trial requires and is configured to collect data from Apple Watch, Study Hub uses Apple HealthKit to collect heart rate data so that the primary investigator or study personnel can review and monitor it.
 
Contact your study assistant with questions or concerns related to your clinical trial participation. 
 
Like the app? Have challenges or concerns you’d like to raise? We always appreciate feedback. We actively monitor the app store reviews and continually work towards addressing your needs.",Business,IQVIA Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/iqvia-study-hub/id1481843263?uo=4,3.45946,37,pharma
665157377,Contract Pharma,"Contract Pharma devotes more editorial coverage to contract services and outsourcing than any other publication. In the nine editorial issues in 2012, we published more than 700 editorial pages devoted to outsourcing. Contract Pharma is the advertising market share leader for contract services and outsourcing providers to the Pharmaceutical and Biopharmaceutical industries. Since it’s debut in 1999, Contract Pharma has been dedicated to covering the changes and developments of the outsourcing industry, as new business models and a pharma industry in crisis generate new opportunities for sponsors and providers.

This application is powered by GTxcel, a leader in digital publishing technology, provider of hundreds of online digital publications and mobile magazine apps.",News,RODMAN PUBLISHING CORP.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/contract-pharma/id665157377?uo=4,0.0,0,pharma
1025327772,PolyPharma,"Poly-pharmacology of molecular structures: use structure activity relationships to view predicted activities against biological targets, physical properties, and off-targets to avoid. Calculations are done using Bayesian models and other kinds of calculations that are performed on the device.",Productivity,"Molecular Materials Informatics, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/polypharma/id1025327772?uo=4,0.0,0,pharma
1324796990,STAT News,"STAT delivers fast, deep, and tough-minded journalism about health, medicine, life sciences and the fast-moving business of making medicines. We take you inside academic labs, biotech boardrooms, and political backrooms. We cast a critical eye on scientific discoveries, scrutinize corporate strategies, and chronicle roiling battles for talent, money, and market share. We examine controversies and puncture hype. Follow our reporting and reporters on the go; read exclusive stories or save them for later.",News,"BOSTON GLOBE MEDIA PARTNERS, LLC",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/stat-news/id1324796990?uo=4,3.85,20,pharma
1450718866,كبسولة,قم بإدارة إحتياجات صيدليتك من جوالك من مواد دوائية وغيرها ومن جميع المذاخر في محافظتك العراقية .. تعرف على الأسعار والمواد المتوفرة وآخر العروض والبونصات لحظة بلحظة,Shopping,Capsula for marketing private limited liability,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/%D9%83%D8%A8%D8%B3%D9%88%D9%84%D8%A9/id1450718866?uo=4,4.13401,97,pharma
6459478635,Coop BioPharma,"Móvil Coop, servicio de acceso fácil y seguro para realizar transacciones.

Móvil Coop es un servicio que le permite a los clientes de la Cooperativa acceso fácil y seguro a sus cuentas desde su dispositivo móvil. Para poder comenzar a usar este servicio solo necesita bajar el app y acceder al mismo utilizando los credenciales de su usuario de Home Banking. Si usted no está inscrito en el servicio de Home Banking, debe inscribirse antes de comenzar a usar Móvil Coop.

Lo que puede realizar u obtener con este servicio:
- Información de balances y detalles de todas sus cuentas
- Información de balances y detalles de todos sus préstamos
- Información de balances y detalles de todas sus certificados
- Información histórica de todas sus cuentas y préstamos
- Información de balances y detalles de sus tarjetas de crédito
- Información de sus tarjetas de débito
- Transferencias entre sus cuentas
- Transferencias a otras cuentas pre configuradas
- Pago de préstamo
- Pago de facturas de comercios
- Pago de tarjeta de crédito
- Información histórica de pago de facturas de comercios
- Información de cheques con suspensión de pagos
- Información de las sucursales y cajeros automáticos de la cooperativa
- Ayuda para dirigirle a la sucursal que más le convenga

Al igual que en el servicio de Home Banking, toda la información, balances y transacciones mediante este servicio es actualizada en línea, al momento.
Para su tranquilidad, al igual que en el servicio de Home Banking, todas las transacciones son realizadas en un ambiente de seguridad (SSL) con soporte de 128 bits. Esto significa que la data presentada y ofrecida se somete a algoritmos de encripción antes de ser intercambiada.",Finance,"Cooperativa De Ahorro Y Credito De La Industria Biofarmaceutica"" ""Biopharma Coop""",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/coop-biopharma/id6459478635?uo=4,0.0,0,pharma
1228813923,NSF Pharma,"NSF Pharma is a must have app for any Pharma executive looking to:
· Stay up to date on the latest industry regulations and news. And get access to our Legislation and Guidance guide. Be in the know!
· Access a wealth of free resources to help you make better business decisions – webinars, audio white papers, videos and much more.
· Get a snapshot of your company’s health with our self-assessment quizzes.  Do you have gaps in your quality systems?  Not sure, take the quiz and find out.
· Directly contact an NSF expert to help with any business issues, large to small – Guaranteed response within 48 business hours.
· Access training information and book on to our courses.",Business,NSF International,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/nsf-pharma/id1228813923?uo=4,5.0,3,pharma
1586071844,Long Châu - Chuyên gia thuốc,"FPT Long Châu - Chuyên gia thuốc

Nhà thuốc FPT Long Châu là ứng dụng được phát triển bởi chuỗi Nhà thuốc FPT Long Châu, trực thuộc Công ty cổ phần bán lẻ kỹ thuật số FPT – thành viên Tập đoàn FPT. Chúng tôi luôn cam kết đem đến những giải pháp chăm sóc sức khỏe cộng đồng với chất lượng hàng đầu và giá cả hợp lý.

Cùng khám phá những tiện ích mà FPT Long Châu mang lại:

1. Mua sắm dễ dàng và tiện lợi
Mua sắm hàng ngàn sản phẩm chất lượng, đa dạng về chủng loại, nguồn gốc rõ ràng với giá cả hợp lý. 

2. Tư vấn miễn phí với Dược sỹ chuyên môn cao và nhiều năm kinh nghiệm
Dược sỹ trực tuyến tư vấn chu đáo trên từng đơn.
Hướng dẫn sử dụng thuốc chuyên nghiệp, tận tâm và hoàn toàn miễn phí.

3. Tích điểm - Đổi quà và hàng ngàn ưu đãi khác
Tích lũy điểm thưởng trên từng đơn hàng.
Đổi quà nhanh chóng trên ứng dụng và nhận ưu đãi hấp dẫn mỗi ngày.

4. Giao hàng tận nơi và nhanh chóng trên toàn quốc
Miễn phí giao hàng tận nơi trên toàn quốc. 
Trạng thái đơn hàng được cập nhật liên tục giúp người dùng dễ dàng theo dõi hành trình đơn hàng.

5. Chuyên thuốc theo đơn bệnh viện
Nhà thuốc cung cấp đầy đủ thuốc theo đơn các bệnh viện lớn trên toàn quốc. 
Hỗ trợ đổi trả sản phẩm trong vòng 30 ngày kể từ ngày mua hàng.

Quý khách hãy an tâm mua sắm những sản phẩm chất lượng, giá tốt tại Nhà thuốc FPT Long Châu nhé!
—————
TẢI ỨNG DỤNG NGAY & TRẢI NGHIỆM MUA SẮM ONLINE TIỆN LỢI
Chúng tôi luôn sẵn sàng hỗ trợ các vấn đề liên quan đến bảo mật tài khoản, rủi ro giao dịch, tư vấn giải đáp thắc mắc & khiếu nại qua:
* Hotline: 1800 6928 (08h00-22h00)
* Lưu ý quan trọng: Thông tin trong ứng dụng chỉ mang tính tham khảo, không thay thế lời khuyên, chẩn đoán hay điều trị y tế chuyên nghiệp. Luôn tham khảo ý kiến bác sĩ/chuyên gia y tế đủ trình độ bên cạnh việc dùng ứng dụng và trước khi đưa ra bất kỳ quyết định liên quan đến sức khỏe của bạn.
* Chính sách nội dung và miễn trừ trách nhiệm: https://nhathuoclongchau.com.vn/chinh-sach-noi-dung",Medical,FPT LONG CHAU PHARMA JOINT STOCK COMPANY,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/long-ch%C3%A2u-chuy%C3%AAn-gia-thu%E1%BB%91c/id1586071844?uo=4,4.60947,169,pharma
1235498852,uSummit,"uSummit is an event management platform that centralizes event materials, helps gather competitive intelligence, and synchronizes teams in a simple, easy-to-navigate app. 

Some key features of this applications include:
• Your own personal agenda
• Ability to schedule rooms for customer 1:1s or internal meetings
• Polling, quiz, and question-and-answer features to encourage audience engagement
• Surveys to obtain audience feedback
• Chat boards and discussion threads 
• Note-taking features with ability to share those notes with other attendees
• Access to event resources that can also be linked to your agenda",Productivity,TIP Medical Communications,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/usummit/id1235498852?uo=4,4.125,16,pharma
1453506616,DUPHAT,"DUPHAT has grown tremendously since our modest beginnings back in 1995 and has quickly established itself as the unique Pharma event for the Middle East and North Africa markets with some of the top 100 global Pharma companies branding it as the 'must-attend’ event for the Pharmaceutical industry in the region.
DUPHAT has over the years attracted pharmaceutical companies from across the globe and supported the quickly expanding industry in the region. After 22 years of success, we have dedicated 2017 to a specialized exhibition for the manufacturing sector: DUPHAT-TECH.
 Duphat is committed to providing complete solutions to the pharmaceutical industry, by representing the entire Pharma value Chain in one place with its three distinct segments.
DUPHAT showcases downstream activities from finished formulations-both patented & generics
DUPHAT OTC-Improvement in lifestyle has led to an increase in consumption of health-related consumer products which are increasingly sold in pharmacies. Non-Prescribed medicines, Nutrition, Dermo-Cosmetic Products, Mother & Baby Products, Oral Healthcare, personal hygiene are some of the areas that are gaining market share by DUPHAT supports this sector.
DUPHAT TECH which brings together upstream and midstream pharmaceutical manufacturer from R&D processing and packaging machineries, ingredients/APIs, quality control to medical coding, labeling storage & logistics.
DUPHAT Thus, endeavors to provide complete solutions to the pharma industry from manufacturing to supply to the end consumer.",Business,INDEX TRADING COMPANY LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/duphat/id1453506616?uo=4,1.0,1,pharma
1375324234,Flashcard Pharmacology,"Flashcard Pharmacology is an essential resource designed for first and second year Medical students studying pharmacology.  PA students, Pharmacy students and Nursing students will find it useful as well. 

How Flashcard Pharmacology is different from other study resources is
that the user can test their pharmacology knowledge in multiple ways.

In Test mode, users can select one or multiple classes of drugs.  From there users can test their knowledge on various characteristics of drugs such as Mechanism of Action, Adverse Reactions, Kinetics, etc.  The testable characteristics vary depending on the class of drugs.  From there, users will be given information regarding a specific characteristic regarding a drug and the user will then select from a list of drugs which one is the correct answer.  

There are no other pharmacology resources that allow users to do this.  Our database contains over 2000 flashcards that users can test their pharmacology knowledge on.

In addition, Flashcard Pharmacology contains a full drug
directory with information about each drug at your fingertips!

Users can also access the Autonomic Nervous System (ANS) supplement
which contains information and tests on ANS function.

Flashcard pharmacology is regularly updating info and looking for interested students who would like to be a part of our team.  If you have any questions about our app please email us at:
flashcardmed@gmail.com",Medical,Edward Rippe,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/flashcard-pharmacology/id1375324234?uo=4,3.58333,12,pharma
6447413870,PharmaSUG,"Everything you need to know about the annual PharmaSUG conference.  Login instructions, including a link to download the app, are sent to attendees via the email address they used to register for the event.",Business,PharmaSUG,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/pharmasug/id6447413870?uo=4,0.0,0,pharma
1498735945,PharmaCompass,"PharmaCompass’ Mobile App offers the easiest way for business to business (B2B) users to connect with partners to accelerate drug development activities using their mobile phones.

Professionals can use the app to connect seamlessly with companies that can offer active pharmaceutical ingredients (API), finished dosage formulations (FDF), excipients and/or contract services to develop drug products.

With over 1.5 million users, PharmaCompass is the leading platform for professionals to place orders with business partners to accelerate their drug development activities and also to gather market intelligence.

FEATURES:
Discover companies and products
- Connect with the people in the companies that are in the best position to offer the right solutions
- Find information on the relevant products (e.g. regulatory filings, price trends, patents etc.) and companies

Stay up-to-date on business opportunities
- Access / Post enquiries onto one of the largest on line pharmaceutical marketplaces
- Find the latest news from top news sources
- Enable notifications to receive updates on the topics of your interest

Other Features:
- With off-line access, users can easily read their favorite trends and opportunities
- Share PharmaCompass' app, latest trends and opportunities with others

Get the PharmaCompass mobile app – the right way to connect with the latest pharma & biotech business information at your fingertips.",Business,LEPRO PHARMA COMPASS OPC PRIVATE LIMITED,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/pharmacompass/id1498735945?uo=4,0.0,0,pharma
1546258576,LiveRep (Pharma CRM),"We have found a big gap between medical representatives and medical companies, and we aim to fill this gap with our system. Using our service will let you manage the medical representative performance on coverage of visits, products, targets and requests anywhere and anytime. The app can work online and offline.

Mainly Features:
- Real-time & accurate information
- Decrease time consumed
- Track the coverage, target and visit frequencies.
- True evaluation of market share
- Accurate analysis for product line
- Know history of orders & requests
- Quick & cheap communication
- Analysis Physician's feedback
- Live Share recent news of your competitors
- Save all Physician Location and it's routes by Google Maps.
- Smart Cycle Planing save wasting costs by invalid-false visits.
-Track New,Pending and Submitted visits.

You can download it free",Productivity,Paula Mansour,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/liverep-pharma-crm/id1546258576?uo=4,0.0,0,pharma
580137177,Scan_Pharma,"Grâce à cette application vous obtiendrez en direct toutes les
informations sur les médicaments de votre armoire à pharmacie.
SCANNEZ LE CODE DATAMATRIX ET RETROUVEZ :
Toutes les informations du produit concerné sans ambigüité
(base de données sur les médicaments exhaustive)
La date de péremption du médicament
Le nom de marque du médicament référent en cas d’un
générique.
Ainsi, en scannant tous les produits de votre armoire à pharmacie,
vous serez alerté quotidiennement des dates de péremption.
De même, lors de votre visite chez le médecin, vous aurez la liste
de tous vos médicaments à portée de main dans votre smartphone.",Medical,RESIP,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/scan-pharma/id580137177?uo=4,0.0,0,pharma
1437791464,MyPharmaSpace,"Skinite besplatnu aplikaciju MyPharmaSpace na svoj pametni telefon i pridružite se zajednici.

MyPharmaSpace platforma je centralno mjesto za komunikaciju, povezivanje s kolegama, razmjenu mišljenja, komentiranje aktualnih tema, ali i zabavu i razonodu - sve na jednom mjestu, u jednoj mobilnoj aplikaciji.

MyPharmaSpace inovativna platforma namijenjena je svima u farmaceutskoj zajednici. Platforma nudi zabavan sadržaj i aktualnosti iz područja svjetske i lokalne farmaceutike. Budite u toku s aktualnim zbivanjima i u kontaktu s farmaceutskom zajednicom kao podrškom Vašem svakodnevnom radu.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------------

MyPharmaSpace platforma je centralno mesto za komunikaciju, povezivanje sa kolegama, razmenu mišljenja, komentarisanje aktuelnih tema, ali i zabavu i razonodu - sve na jednom mestu, u jednoj mobilnoj aplikaciji.

MyPharmaSpace inovativna platforma namenjena je svima u farmaceutskoj zajednici. Platforma nudi zabavan sadržaj i aktuelnosti iz oblasti svetske i lokalne farmaceutike. Budite u toku sa aktuelnim dešavanjima i u kontaktu sa farmaceutskom zajednicom kao podrškom vašem svakodnevnom radu.",Health & Fitness,Salveo d.o.o.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/mypharmaspace/id1437791464?uo=4,5.0,2,pharma
1585895991,Pharma Line,"PharmaLine is a center training courses based application , contain academic & training  courses  for the universities students",Education,Mohamed Rifaat,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/pharma-line/id1585895991?uo=4,3.5,4,pharma
806130416,AboutPharma,"ABOUTPHARMA AND MEDICAL DEVICES è da 10 anni il punto di riferimento dei professionisti della Sanità e della Farmaceutica.
Magazine autorevole per l’informazione a 360° nel panorama Healthcare, è un’inseparabile guida per tutti coloro che operano nel settore.
96 pagine mensili di approfondimento organizzate in Aree tematiche.

copia singola 4,49 euro
abbonamento annuale 34,99 euro

La tua app sarà automaticamente scaricata nell'Edicola. Il costo dell'abbonamento verrà addebitato sul tuo account iTunes. Se l'abbonamento non viene cancellato almeno 24 ore prima della scadenza, sarà automaticamente rinnovato. Il rimborso non è possibile. Riceverai comunque le nuove uscite fino alla scadenza dell'abbonamento.
Privacy Policy: https://www.aboutpharma.com/privacy-policy/
Terms of Use: https://www.aboutpharma.com/about-education/",Medical,HEALTH PUBLISHING AND SERVICES S.R.L.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/aboutpharma/id806130416?uo=4,0.0,0,pharma
1502809014,Bento: Food Delivery in Cayman,"Hello, Cayman Islands! Hungry? Need essentials? Bento's here for you!

Whether it's food, pharmacy items, pet products, or package deliveries, Bento is your ultimate solution in the Cayman Islands. From satisfying your cravings to delivering everyday essentials, we've got you covered.

WHAT CAN YOU ORDER WITH BENTO?

• Delicious Food: Enjoy a variety of cuisines—Caribbean, Italian, Japanese, Mexican, and more! Craving sushi, pizza, or burgers? Bento delivers it all.
• Pharmacy Essentials: Health and wellness items delivered straight to your door.
• Pet Products: Treat your furry friends with food, toys, and other pet essentials.
• Package Delivery: Send or receive packages conveniently through our reliable delivery service.

WHY BENTO?

• EXPANDED SERVICES: Bento goes beyond food. Whether it's a quick snack or urgent pharmacy items, we're your all-in-one delivery app.
• FIND YOUR FAVORITES FAST: Browse the best restaurants, stores, and services in the Cayman Islands.
• REAL-TIME TRACKING: Track your order from confirmation to delivery in real time.
• SECURE PAYMENTS: Safe and easy payment options you can trust.
• LOCAL FOCUS: Supporting Cayman Islands businesses and creating a stronger, more connected community.

HOW TO USE BENTO?

1. Download the Bento app.
2. Browse restaurants, stores, and services.
3. Select your items and add them to your cart.
4. Choose delivery or pickup.
5. Pay securely and track your order live.

ENJOY A BETTER DELIVERY EXPERIENCE
Bento is designed to make your life easier. With a fresh new app design, it's even simpler to explore options, place orders, and get what you need. From healthy meals to indulgent treats, urgent pharmacy items, or sending packages, Bento does it all.

ABOUT US
Bento is a homegrown technology company connecting the Cayman Islands through seamless delivery services. Starting with food, we've grown to deliver much more—making daily life more convenient while empowering local businesses.

Feeling hungry? Need something delivered? Bento is your go-to app in the Cayman Islands.

Download Bento now and experience effortless delivery.
Visit bento.ky to learn more.",Food & Drink,Bento Ltd.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/bento-food-delivery-in-cayman/id1502809014?uo=4,4.64255,1424,pharma
6447249578,Fill the Pill,"Step into the world of pharmaceutical production with Fill the Pill, the addictive simulation game that lets you create medicine capsules from scratch. 

Start the game by stacking empty capsules on a platform, then carefully fill them with the necessary powder to create the perfect dose. Use a spatula to divide the powder into equal volumes, creating capsules that are precise and reliable.

With soothing ASMR and a satisfying feeling of completion, Fill the Pill is both fun and therapeutic. But the work doesn't stop there. Once your capsules are filled, you'll need to close the caps and transfer them to medicine bottles for use.

Experience the rush of manufacturing your own medicine and seeing it through to completion. With multiple stages to navigate and hundreds of capsules to fill, Fill the Pill is the perfect game for anyone looking for a simulative experience that's as interesting as it is relaxing.

Download Fill the Pill now and see how far you can take your pharmaceutical production skills!",Games,3A YAPIM VE YAZILIM DANISMANLIK LIMITED SIRKETI,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/fill-the-pill/id6447249578?uo=4,0.0,0,pharma
1468859352,ALL PharmaSee ปรึกษาเภสัชกร,"ALL PharmaSee -Free online counselling service with pharmacists, bringing a healthy lifestyle to your home.


ALL PharmaSee - Telepharmacy application providing online counselling service from eXta Plus pharmacists. This trusted and reputable application allows all users to attain good health conveniently and easily - like having pharmacists in the comfort of your home - for any health-related issues such as common illnesses and guides in taking medicines and health supplements.



Users can chat or video-call eXta pharmacists 24/7 via ALL PharmaSee with additional in-app features such as:


- Telepharmacy service certified by Thai Pharmacy Council
- Free 24/7 online counselling service with a pharmacist
- Specialised counselling service for topics such as oral contraceptives
- Ordering health products such as vitamins, food supplements, medical devices and common medications with home delivery service
- Location searching for nearby eXta Plus pharmacies",Medical,Orbit X Company Limited,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/all-pharmasee-%E0%B8%9B%E0%B8%A3-%E0%B8%81%E0%B8%A9%E0%B8%B2%E0%B9%80%E0%B8%A0%E0%B8%AA-%E0%B8%8A%E0%B8%81%E0%B8%A3/id1468859352?uo=4,0.0,0,pharma
1513011883,Al Mutawa PH,"Discover the future of personal health and beauty shopping with Al Mutawa Ph, your trusted companion for wellness, skincare, and everyday essentials in Kuwait.

Al Mutawa Ph is redefining how you shop for pharmaceutical and cosmetic products by offering a unique, personalized experience tailored to your needs. From skincare and cosmetics to baby care, vitamins, and fragrances — everything you need is just a tap away.

Enjoy a smooth and secure shopping experience with fast delivery across Kuwait, 24/7 accessibility, and exclusive in-app offers. Whether you're restocking essentials or exploring new beauty trends, Al Mutawa Ph helps you shop with confidence.

Stay connected, shop smarter, and experience wellness on demand — only with Al Mutawa Ph

Key Features:
•  Create an Account: Register quickly and securely to start shopping with Kuwait’s trusted pharmacy app.
•  Profile Management: Update your personal details and delivery address with ease.
•  Seamless Ordering: Enjoy a smooth, hassle-free experience at one of Kuwait’s leading online pharmacies.
•  Smart Search: Instantly find items from our wide personal health and beauty pharmaceutical shopping product range.
•  Explore Categories: Browse health, wellness, and pharmacy essentials categorized for easy access.
•  Exclusive Offers: Stay updated with the latest deals and discounts in Kuwait.
•  Order History: Track and manage your past purchases anytime.
•  Wishlist: Save favourite products to your wish list for faster reorders.
•  Customer Support & FAQs: Get answers to your questions with dedicated support and frequently asked questions.
•  24/7 Access: Shop Heath care products anytime — we’re always open, across Kuwait.




لننطلق إلى جولة في مستقبل الصحة، الجمال، والعناية الشخصية مع المطوع؛ وجهتك التي تثق بها للحصول على ما يلبي احتياجات للعافية، العناية بالبشرة، وأساسيات حياتك اليومية في الكويت.

تعيد المطوع تشكيل مفهوم تسوقك المنتجات الصيدلية ومستحضرات التجميل، وذلك من خلال تقديم تجربة مفصلة بشكل شخصي لتلبي احتياجاتك بفعالية. من منتجات العناية بالبشرة ومستحضرات التجميل إلى مستلزمات العناية بالرضع، الفيتامينات، وحتى العطور، كل ما تبحثين عنه على بعد لمسة شاشة.

يمكنك الاستمتاع بتجربة تسوق سلسة وآمنة، مع توصيل سريع يغطي كافة مناطق الكويت، وعلى مدار 24 ساعة، بالإضافة إلى العروض الحصرية عبر التطبيق. سواء كنت ترغبين في تجديد مخزونك من الأساسيات، أو كنت تستكشفين خيارات جديدة في عالم التجميل، سوف تساعدك المطوع على التسوق بثقة.

ابقي على اطلاع، تسوقي بذكاء، واحصلي على منتجات العافية الشهيرة – فقط مع المطوع.

مميزات أساسية
•	إنشاء حساب: يمكنك إنشاء حساب بسرعة وبشكل آمن للبدء في التسوق من تطبيق الصيدلية الذي يحظى بالثقة في الكويت.
•	التحكم في الصفحة الشخصية: يمكنك تحديث بياناتك الشخصية وعنوان التوصيل بكس سهولة.
•	استكشاف الأصناف: يمكنك تصفح منتجات الصحة، العافية، والأساسيات من المنتجات الصيدلية التي تم توزيعها بحسب الصنف، لمضان سهولة الوصول إليها.
•	عروض حصرية: يمكنك البقاء على اطلاع بأحدث العروض والتنزيلات في الكويت.
•	سجل الطلبيات: يمكنك مراجعة وإدارة طلبياتك السابقة في أي وقت.
•	قائمة المنتجات المرغوبة: يمكنك حفظ منتجاتك المفضلة في قائمة المنتجات المرغوبة الخاصة بك للقيام بتجديد الطلب بشكل أسرع.
•	خدمة العملاء والأسئلة الأكثر شيوعاً: يمكنك الحصول على إجابات لاستفساراتك، من خلال الدعم المخصص والاطلاع على الأسئلة الأكثر شيوعاً.
•	في متناول يدك على مدار 24 ساعة: يمكنك تسوق منتجات الرعاية الصحية في أي وقت – فنحن متواجدون طوال الوقت، وفي كافة أنحاء الكويت.",Shopping,ALI ABDULWAHAB ALMUTAWA COMMERCIAL COMPANY,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/al-mutawa-ph/id1513011883?uo=4,4.66165,399,pharma
970830246,GXP OnScene®,"Crisis/event preparation and planning; communication between ground personal and aerial support; locate personnel as situations evolve, and provide direction to new personnel arriving on scene.

BAE Systems’ GXP OnScene is a companion App to your site's GXP OpsView or GXP Xplorer  server.  It provides tactical, real-time personnel coordination and geospatial imagery capabilities to responders as they arrive on the scene of a crisis or event. Fusing mobile app, desktop, and server technology, GXP OnScene provides a graphical grid overlay on top of up-to-date, personalized maps to field users via their smartphone or tablet. Teammate locations display as named markers on the map using the device GPS. Functionality provides those in command of the situation with a simple tool to coordinate and direct the responders in real time, eliminating ambiguity from updates and instructions.

*** Continued use of GPS running in the background can dramatically decrease battery life. ***",Productivity,BAE Systems Information Solutions Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/gxp-onscene/id970830246?uo=4,4.2,10,GxP
788801913,GXP Xplorer Snap,"Take a picture and upload important information anytime, anywhere. Report events from the field as they happen.

BAE Systems’ GXP Xplorer Server companion app, GXP Xplorer Snap, allows users in the field to quickly create photographic reports that automatically capture the date, time, and geo-location from a hand-held mobile device, along with user-defined notes. Reports immediately upload to a connected GXP Xplorer Server for discovery and download by others in the field using GXP Xplorer Mobile and analysts onsite using GXP Xplorer through a Web browser.",Productivity,BAE Systems Information Solutions Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/gxp-xplorer-snap/id788801913?uo=4,5.0,1,GxP
6740335305,Sure GxP Agent by SterlingBio,"SureGxP by SterlingBio is a free AI agent for referencing regulatory, compliance and GxP guidance in clinical trials.  This is an experimental early release for evaluation only.  It is a free app with ads.",Business,SterlingBio Corp,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/sure-gxp-agent-by-sterlingbio/id6740335305?uo=4,5.0,1,GxP
1499984118,Mobile Workforce,"VSoft Mobile Workforce is a field service class product (FSM). Its main business benefit is centered around managing field employees and contractors. The application ensures secure online access to sensitive data (addresses, documents, etc.) required to be able to pay a visit / conduct survey research in the field. 

With the help of web panel managers can easily plan, coordinate and keep track of field activities by sending tasks to designated field agents, while those can instantly report back via image capture, filled in surveys, task status reports and notes with GPS logs once the task is completed.  As such VSoft Mobile Workforce adds transparency into field activities and improves overall performance of field workforce.

The solution is highly configurable, both on system and operational level, that allows for a high level of customization. It integrates into existing software ecosystems through public API and interacts efficiently with 3d side systems, - CRMs, ERP etc.",Business,VSoft S.A.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/mobile-workforce/id1499984118?uo=4,0.0,0,GxP
6444507947,温图验证,为医药生产及经营企业提供GxP验证服务，通过APP进行验证报告与温湿度布点批量扫码关联，查看验证对象实时动态温湿度验证数据。,Utilities,"XianHua Telecom Tchnology CO.,LD",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/%E6%B8%A9%E5%9B%BE%E9%AA%8C%E8%AF%81/id6444507947?uo=4,0.0,0,GxP
1485300815,GXPetroleum,"Access your account information anytime and anywhere at your convenience.

Key Features:
- Check the latest fuel prices
- Check your EFT details
- View your latest invoice details
- View sales history and other reporting data",Business,"PDS Solutions, LLC",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/gxpetroleum/id1485300815?uo=4,5.0,9,GxP
1671573453,Cayoo Next,"Cayoo ist die optimale Software, um die Kommunikation und Informationsverteilung in Kliniken, Pflegediensten & Co. zu verbessern. Mit Cayoo kannst du im Team SOPs und wichtige Nachrichten teilen – jederzeit und überall, on- und offline. Die Cayoo App verbessert den Austausch zwischen verschiedenen Teams, sodass alle User immer und überall auf dem neuesten Stand sind.
Bilder und Videos helfen Dir die Standards, die in deinem Berufsalltag relevant sind, besser anzuwenden. So erhöht sich deine Sicherheit und auch die der Patient:innen.
Erweitert wird Cayoo durch den Cayoo Messenger. Dieser wurde speziell für das Gesundheitswesen entwickelt.",Medical,SOPHIA GmbH & Co. KG,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/cayoo-next/id1671573453?uo=4,0.0,0,GxP
485357017,GoodRx: Prescription Coupons,"Get the medicine and healthcare you need with GoodRx. Find coupons and discounts for prescription drugs, including GLP-1 medications like Ozempic, Mounjaro, Wegovy, and more. Access reliable telehealth services and perks when buying medication. Save money on your meds with free digital coupons that can help you save more than health insurance or Medicare. GoodRx is NOT insurance. Medication tracker, pill reminder, and more - enjoy an Rx app that brings complete virtual care to the palm of your hand. 

Our free prescription discount finder has everything you need. GoodRx has a personal medication tracker, custom pill reminders and rewards on medicine. Get healthcare benefits like Rx discounts on medicine, senior care, or triage services. Doctors care about our prescription drug savings app that is trusted by millions.

Enjoy everything from prescription medication reminders to Rx savings coupons for a complete mobile health care app without insurance. Get to know your medication list with our pill tracker & drug guide. Price check prescriptions easily. Save money with mobile Rx coupons & find a doctor on our personal healthcare app.

Become your own healthcare advocate & download GoodRx today to save money on medication!

GoodRx Features:

Digital Drug Coupons at Over 70,000 Pharmacy Locations
- Safeway Pharmacy
- CVS Pharmacy
- Walmart Pharmacy
- HEB Pharmacy
- Walgreens Pharmacy
- Rite Aid Pharmacy
- Target Pharmacy
- Vons Pharmacy
- Kroger Pharmacy
- & more

Medication App with Prescriptions Up To 80% Off
- Coupons let you save more on your prescription dugs
- Rx savings solutions: Look up drugs and find savings on your medicine
- Check Rx pharmacy prices & redeem digital coupons to claim your prescription discount
- Medication discount finder to use at local pharmacies like Safeway, CVS, HEB, or Walmart Pharmacy
- Healthcare app with discounted meds & patient assistance programs
- Visit your pharmacy or Rx discount location to save on medication
- Our health app offers discounts to save on pet medication


Medication Reminder & Free Pill Tracker
- Pill reminder: Make refills easy thanks to alerts with our medication reminder
- Medication tracker: Get a free drug guide to help manage medications
- Pill tracker: Monitor prescription medications with our medication reminder

My Health Care Tool
- Medication list & drug guide for your prescriptions, including GLP-1 medications like Ozempic, Mounjaro, Rybelsus, Victoza, Saxenda, Zepbound & Wegovy
- Medicine tracker to help with daily prescriptions
- Virtual care with online medical professionals
- No Medicare, Medicaid, or health insurance needed – easily find doctors care
- Find telehealth care & understand your prescription list & medication
- Medication delivery & pickup available anywhere

GoodRx Care services include

- Refills on birth control medication
- Urinary Tract Infection
- Erectile Dysfunction
- Short term medication refills
- Triage services

Prescription Discount Finder Trusted by Millions
- Digital coupons made easy for everyone
- Our medication app shows the Rx pharmacy with savings on drugs, including prescriptions like Ozempic, Tretinoin, and Vyvanse
- Healthcare professionals across the country use our coupons app to help patients save money
- Featured by: The New York Times, PBS, ABC News, Forbes, CNN, Good Morning America, The LA Times & more!

Upgrade to GoodRx Gold to earn rewards for additional discounts, benefits, and offers. Get exclusive pricing and reliable mobile health care with GoodRx Gold.

By downloading GoodRx, you agree to be bound by our Terms Of Use. Read more at http://www.goodrx.com/terms-of-use

Please visit https://www.goodrx.com/consumer-health-data-privacy-notice to read our Consumer Health Data Privacy Notice for additional information about our handling of consumer health data",Medical,"GoodRx, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/goodrx-prescription-coupons/id485357017?uo=4,4.84155,677336,medication
573916946,Medisafe Medication Management,"Never forget to take your meds and pills again with the MUST HAVE pill reminder ranked #1 by pharmacists and physicians in independent tests.

Now in the U.S.: See crucial drug-to-drug interaction warnings about how your meds might conflict, as well as easily import your meds and prescriptions using Health Records on iPhone from more than 100 hospitals and health systems in the US. 

Be safe with your meds - Improper medicine use and dosage tracking leads to:
• 50% of patients not taking medicines as prescribed
• 125,000 deaths a year (one every 4 minutes)
• 700,000 hospital visits a year
• 44 out of 100 prescriptions never picked up at the pharmacy

With Medisafe you won't put yourself or your loved ones at risk by missing a dosage -- or taking a double dose because nobody tracked. 

This is the MUST HAVE med app seen on Fox TV, ABC, Mashable, Inc. Magazine, Los Angeles Times, Boston Globe, Life Hacker, Fast Company, TechCrunch, and many more.

Here's why:
CLEAN & SIMPLE: Visual and easy medical manager to handle drug reminders.
HEALTH APP INTEGRATION: Keeps track of your measurements and syncs them to HealthKit app: blood glucose, blood pressure, weight, pulse, temperature and in the US, medications from health records where available.
REPORT SHARING: See your progress report and send it to the doctor or nurse as a visual informative PDF.
FAMILY INTERACTION: Synchronizes the family's medicine pillboxes to one place, in real time. Manage your entire family from one account!
MEDTONES: Various Medtones to make Medisafe playful and a great addition to your day: have Darth Vader, Dr Evil, Austin Powers, Elsa or your Nagging Mom remind you about your meds.
REMINDERS: Reminds you to take medication doses on time every time, even if your device is asleep. Medisafe has timezone support too! No need to worry while traveling, your reminders are always on time.
REFILL REMINDER: Rx refill reminds you when you need to restock your prescriptions.

Pharmacists rank Medisafe #1 out of 461 apps they've tested, and MyVCM recognizes Medisafe for HIPAA privacy ""best practices in managing security and compliance.""

Medisafe does not provide medical advice, diagnosis or treatment. Always seek the advice of your physician or other qualified health provider with any questions you may have regarding your medications or a medical condition.

Terms of Use: https://www.medisafeapp.com/terms-and-conditions/
Privacy Policy: https://medisafeapp.com/privacy-policy/

More info:
FAQs: https://www.medisafeapp.com/help/
Pharmacists Rank Medisafe #1: http://bit.ly/2nTjmsI

Contact us: support@medisafe.com  

Thanks,
Medisafe Team",Medical,MediSafe Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/medisafe-medication-management/id573916946?uo=4,4.71061,95129,medication
330545327,Psych Drugs & Medications: Psychiatric Meds Guide,"Want to learn about psychotropic medications quickly and easily?  Then check out this free app!

With Psych Drugs, you can learn important and useful information about various psychotropic medications such as antidepressants, antipsychotics, mood stabilizers, and anti-anxiety medications. 

Some major classes of psych drugs include: SSRIs, TCAs, MAOIs, second generation (atypical) antipsychotics, benzodiazepines, and meds for insomnia, anxiety, depression, ADHD, alcohol dependence, opioid dependence and nicotine addiction, etc…

For each medication, you will find:

- Generic name
- Brand name
- Class
- Indications
- Dosage forms
- Maximum daily dose for adults
- Maximum daily dose for children
- Half-life
- Side effects

This useful app is ideal for medical and mental health professionals, psychiatric residents, medical students, psychology students, therapists, counselors, and of course curious lay people who just want to familiarize themselves with psychotropic medications.

App Features:

- Scroll alphabetically or use the A-Z side panel.
- Find a drug quickly via search bar function.
- Tap on the drug to learn about it.
- Save your favorites with a touch of a button.
- Share drug info with a friend via email.

Great reviews by our loyal users:

""Was a good, informative, useful app for mental health workers.  Since update...Now it is excellent!""

""Best ever! This app opened my eyes to more things!""

""Awesome! Love this app!""

""Really neat app for people taking psych meds and going into the medical field.""

""I work in mental health and it's so easy to just slide through an alphabetical list and get a quick and dirty run down on the med.  Great app!""

Legal disclaimer: Please understand that the intended use of this application is as an educational aid and does not cover all possible uses, actions, precautions, side effects, or interactions of any of these medications. This information is not intended as medical advice for individual problems or for making an evaluation as to the risks and benefits of taking a particular medication.  The information here should not be used as a substitute for a consultation or visit with your psychiatrist, family physician or other health care provider.  You should consult with a licensed physician for answers to any questions you may have about these or other medications.  This application provides the information content on an 'as is' and 'as available' basis.  No warranty is expressed or implied that this application is a comprehensive source of information on any topic of health or otherwise.  In no event shall the creator of this application be liable in any manner for any direct, incidental, consequential, indirect or punitive damages arising out of your access, use or inability to use this application, or any errors or omissions in the information on this application.  This application reserves the right at any time and from time to time to add, change, modify, update, or discontinue, temporarily or permanently, this application (or any part thereof) with or without notice.  This application shall not be liable to you or to any third party for any addition, modification, suspension or discontinuance of this application.",Medical,Michael Quach,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/psych-drugs-medications-psychiatric-meds-guide/id330545327?uo=4,4.27857,140,medication
1281037910,PocketRx - Refill Medications,"Join thousands of patients using the #1 app for community pharmacists. Easily manage your medications and refills while improving your health with up-to-date medical news on your condition. Stay connected to your local community pharmacy to learn about store events like flu shots, vaccinations and promotions.

Our App Features:
Medication Refills: Easily refill your prescriptions on the go at any time in 30 seconds or less
Patient Profile: Access a history of your medications and never forget a Rx # again
Refill Reminders: Never run out your medications with these helpful reminders
Medication Reminders: Flexible reminders to help you never miss taking a medication
Co-Pay Coupons: Save up to $450 on top brand medications
Medication Info: Get detailed info on your medications including side effects, ratings and more
Health News: Keep informed on the latest about your condition or medication with pharmacist approved news, videos and articles",Medical,Digital Pharmacist Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/pocketrx-refill-medications/id1281037910?uo=4,4.65892,12434,medication
599471042,Drugs.com Medication Guide,"The easiest way to lookup drug information, identify pills, check interactions and set up your own personal medication records. 

Key Features

Complete Drugs A – Z listings
Fast search, accurate suggestion engine and the most comprehensive database of drug information available online.

Pill Identifier
Identify any meds simply by entering an imprint, shape or color. Database updated daily.

Interactions Checker
Provides a list of interactions that may occur when different drugs are taken at the same time. Also checks food interactions automatically.

Personal Medication Records
Add your medications to instantly assemble relevant medical information in a simple, easy to read personalized format. Access in-depth consumer information, FDA alerts, drug interactions, plus food, allergy and medical condition interactions. An invaluable tool for medication management and adherence.

Discount Card
Save up to 80% on your pharmacy prescriptions with our free drug discount card, accepted at over 63,000 pharmacies nationwide.

Q & A
Ask a specific question about your medication. Search on thousands of questions and answers.

Health Professionals
Quick access to all the tools you know and trust. 

Many more helpful tools. Quickly redo your recent searches. Try the Symptom Checker. Lookup specialised databases for side effects and dosage information. Not quite sure how to spell a drug name? Use the phonetic search. 

Drugs.com does not provide medical or treatment advice. Always consult with a physician.

Follow us on Twitter @drugscom for tips and updates.

About Drugs.com

Drugs.com is the most popular, comprehensive and up-to-date source of drug information online. Providing free, peer-reviewed, accurate and independent data on more than 24,000 prescription drugs, over-the-counter medicines & natural products. Drugs.com is a multiple Webby Award nominee and attracts more than 24 million U.S. visitors per month.

App Support

If you have any feature requests, suggestions or you simply need help, please visit http://www.drugs.com/apps/support/ and our responsive support team will prioritize your request.

Terms and Conditions are available at https://www.drugs.com/support/terms.html.",Medical,Drugsite Trust,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/drugs-com-medication-guide/id599471042?uo=4,4.8239,8785,medication
337974028,Drugs & Medications,"* Voted #1 Medication App for iOS by Doctors @ HealthTap #AppRx2014! http://t.co/sOrmepZIFm
---
* #1 paid medical app in multiple countries since 2009
* Top 5 paid medical app in as many as 46 countries since March 2010!! 
* Top 100 app in many as 68 countries!!
* Top medical apps featured in iTunes Rewind
* Featured as ""What's Hot"" in multiple countries multiple times
***********************************************
NEW: Try our latest app : MedWords medical dictionary!
***********************************************
* Thousands of drugs and more new features and improvements 
*  Online Pill Identifier!!!! 
* Why buy 2-3 apps when you only need to buy one with the most features!
-----
The top prescription drugs are now available via iPhone!  Perfect for anyone that pharmacists, nursing, physicians and students.

NEW FEATURES:
NEW: Improved UI interface
NEW: 2x more drugs
NEW: Improved Search
IMPROVED: Online Pill Identifier
Adding search for common misspelling of some drugs
IMPROVED: Adding more Canadian, Australian, UK names
IMPROVED: Updated FDA links
IMPROVED: Partial Word Search, no need for the full drug name!
IMPROVED: Listing for common misspelled drugs to improve searching
IMPROVED: Updated FDA labels for download
IMPROVED: FAQ Help Link
IMPROVED: Improved content with more information
IMPROVED: More drug classifications such as - Brand name and generic names

FEATURES
=========
- Over 10000 drugs
- Alphabetized Index (Highly requested)
- Support for Landscape mode for FDA Label
- NO INTERNET REQUIRED for Description, Usage, ContraIndications, MORE!
- Now including Drug Manufacturer info
- Now including Route of Administration and Drug Form
- Now including the unique NDC# 
- More drug names from other countries!!
- Addition of Drug Manufacturer in the Main page
- FDA SafetyWatch for the latest FDA press releases
- Detail information regarding their usage
- Ability to save favorites
- Advanced Search capability by name or by keyword
- Email capability
- Improved Search Capability to search for any keyword
- Each listing has the brand name and generic name
- FDA label for available for most drugs and is retrieved directly from the FDA.

----
FDA labels require an internet connection and contain the following:
* Description
* Clinical pharmacology
* Dosage
* Contraindications
* Warnings
* Adverse Reactions
* Drug interactions
* NonClinical Toxicology
* More!
---

* Want to search for diabetes drugs? no problem!
* Need to search for ACE inhibitor drugs? Yep!
* Looking for ADHD drugs -got that! 

Missing a drug? Let us know - we'll add it!
***********************************************
A proud supporter of Kiva Lending to alleviate poverty. Join our lending team and go to our website to vote on where we lend to next!
***********************************************
Visit our website at www.kavapoint.com 
Follow us on www.twitter.com/kavapoint
***********************************************

LIMITATIONS
** NOTE: Downloading FDA information is available with internet access

***********************************************
We are looking to make this a 5 star app
-- We will be adding more drugs soon!
-- Email us if you find a drugs you would like included
-- Please email us with feedback!!! 
***********************************************
Try our Other apps!
- MedWords Medical Dictionary
- On Call Notes
- ICU Pearls
- Pet Health
***********************************************

DISCLOSURE:
Always check the label on medications you are taking and consult your pharmacist or physician regard drug and medication use and side effects. The information contained in this app comes from various sources and may be inaccurate in time.

FEEDBACK
Send us your feedback for what you want in the next release!",Medical,KAVAPOINT,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/drugs-medications/id337974028?uo=4,4.0,49,medication
1019069079,Complete - Medication Tracker,"Please see Uses and Important Safety Information including BOXED WARNING for HUMIRA (adalimumab) at www.humira.com/important-safety-information.

Please see Uses and Important Safety Information including BOXED WARNING for RINVOQ (upadacitinib) at www.rinvoq.com/important-safety-information.

Please see Uses and Important Safety Information for SKYRIZI (risankizumab) at www.skyrizi.com/important-safety-information.

Please see the Full Prescribing Information for HUMIRA at www.rxabbvie.com/pdf/humira.pdf, RINVOQ at www.rxabbvie.com/pdf/rinvoq_pi.pdf, and SKYRIZI at www.rxabbvie.com/pdf/skyrizi_pi.pdf.

Please see the Savings Card Terms & Conditions for HUMIRA at www.humira.com/humira-complete/cost-and-copay#hcsctac, RINVOQ at www.rinvoq.com/resources/save-on-rinvoq-costs#saving-cards-t-m, and SKYRIZI at https://www.skyrizi.com/skyrizi-complete/save-on-skyrizi-costs#tandcs.

The Complete App features personalized injection and symptom logging, medication reminders, and goal setting to support and encourage you throughout treatment. Your Complete App keeps you in the know of what HUMIRA, RINVOQ, and SKYRIZI can do for you.

CUSTOMIZED INJECTION LOGGING & TRAINING
• Keep track of when and where you inject either HUMIRA or SKYRIZI on your body.
• View your injection history by date with details. Tap on a specific date to see injection times, sites, and notes. 
• Personalize how you rotate injection sites in a chronological order. 
• Use in-app videos, training kits, and more to review injection training from your doctor.

DOSE TRACKING FOR RINVOQ PATIENTS
• Make it easier to stick to your treatment plan and track monthly progress with the RINVOQ dose tracker.

DOSE REMINDERS & MEDICATION TRACKERS
• Tools to help manage your medication through this free app. Set reminders and enable push notifications so you never miss a dose.

CALENDAR & ACTIVITY LOG
• View your injection or medication schedule, symptom history, and a body diagram of injection locations.

SYMPTOM TRACKING
• Keep a log of your symptoms to discuss at your next doctor visit. This may help you have more productive discussions about your treatment.

ACCESS MORE COMPLETE RESOURCES
• Request resources to support you throughout treatment, like a Savings Card that may help eligible patients lower prescription cost.
• Connect with a dedicated Nurse Ambassador*, there to provide support and help answer questions. 
• Submit receipts for reimbursement on eligible out-of-pocket expenses through the Complete Prescription Rebate.
*Nurse Ambassadors are provided by AbbVie and do not work under the direction of your health care professional (HCP) or give medical advice. They are trained to direct patients to their HCP for treatment-related advice, including further referrals.



CUSTOMIZED GOAL TRACKING FOR RINVOQ PATIENTS
• Set personal goals to focus on something personally meaningful to work toward. Personal goals may help motivate and keep you on track with your prescribed treatment plan.

Additional Information
If you’re taking HUMIRA, SKYRIZI, or RINVOQ, you may want help starting and staying on track with your treatment plan. The Complete App can help by providing resources that allow you to set reminders, track symptoms, and create personal goals that can support and encourage you throughout your treatment journey.

If you have any questions or concerns with the Complete App, or you need to report medication side effects or adverse events, call 1.800.4HUMIRA (1.800.448.6472) for HUMIRA, 1.866.SKYRIZI (1.866.759.7494) for SKYRIZI, and 1-800-2RINVOQ (1-800-274-6867) for RINVOQ.

This app is intended for the exclusive use of U.S. residents 18 years of age and older. The Complete App is not intended to provide treatment decisions or replace the care and advice of a licensed healthcare provider. All medical analysis and treatment plans should be performed by a licensed healthcare provider.

US-MULT-250195",Medical,AbbVie Inc,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/complete-medication-tracker/id1019069079?uo=4,4.64863,3142,medication
311096766,Drug Infusion - IV Medications,"This app is for educational purposes of learning simple conversions between Dose, Concentration and IV Rate. 

Download the Best Drug Infusion Calculator for the iPhone, iPod and iPad!

From the developers of ""Instant ECG"" the electrocardiogram interpretation guide,  ""Drug Infusion"" is an intravenous medication drip rate calculator.

Drug Infusion was designed specifically for the ICU nurse or anesthesia provider as a quick reference to ensure accurate calculations for dose, concentration or IV rate.

Drug Infusion offers both weight based and non-weight based calculations with unit conversion flexibility.

Designed by anesthesiologists, this IV Med Drip Rate Calculator is quick and easy to use to double check your math.",Medical,iAnesthesia LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/drug-infusion-iv-medications/id311096766?uo=4,2.8125,16,medication
6449972006,Medication List & Drug Guide,"Easily find information about different medications in the Drug Guide, ensure medication safety by cross-checking for potential interactions using the Interaction Checker, discover possible diagnoses with the Symptom Checker, and conveniently save frequently referenced information using the Bookmark feature. The content is carefully curated and regularly updated by certified clinicians, ensuring its reliability and accuracy.
The information provided in this application MUST NOT be regarded as a replacement for a professional medical advice. All of the medical decisions you make SHOULD BE ADVISED BY A QUALIFIED DOCTOR who is able to take all of your conditions into account.

KEY FEATURES:
-Drug Guide - access comprehensive information about various medications, including precautions, side effects, and potential drug interactions.
-Interaction Checker - effortlessly verify the safety of medication combinations by checking for potential drug interactions, helping to prevent adverse effects and ensure patient safety.
-Symptom Checker - identify possible diagnoses by selecting symptoms and answering a few straightforward questions.
-Bookmark - save frequently referenced information for convenient and swift access.

*******
Premium access

To access all the premium features and content, you need to subscribe or pay once for lifetime access. The cost of the purchase is charged to your iTunes account.
Subscriptions automatically renew and are billed at the rate and period you choose based on your subscription plan. User accounts are charged for auto-renewal within 24-hours prior to the end of the current period.
Subscriptions may be managed and auto-renewal may be turned off in iTunes Account Settings after purchase. Any unused portion of a free trial period, if offered, will be forfeited when the user purchases a subscription to that publication, where applicable.

Privacy Policy: https://thinkaboutapps.com/policy
Terms of Use: https://thinkaboutapps.com/terms",Medical,Thinkabout LTD,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/medication-list-drug-guide/id6449972006?uo=4,4.57346,211,medication
1352848484,Hero: Medication Manager,"Goodbye pill box, hello Hero: the new way to manage your meds! 
 
Hero is the first end-to-end medication management service that liberates caregivers and loved ones from sorting pills, remembering doses, tracking refills, and more.
 
The Hero mobile app is a virtual med management assistant designed to schedule and track even the most complex regimen, manage a loved one’s meds remotely, receive missed-dose and refill notifications, and get personalized insights on medication adherence habits. Connected to Hero’s smart dispenser –– an award-winning device that automatically sorts and dispenses up to a 90-day supply of 10 different medications –– the app helps manage every pill stored in your dispenser, plus up to 10 additional meds outside of your device.
 
Whether you’re caring for a loved one or managing your own meds, Hero’s app brings peace of mind to the whole family, with access to:
- Alerts if a dose was missed or if any medications are running low
- Unlimited adjustments to your medication schedule at any time 
- Real-time adherence tracking with personalized insights
- Safety and security monitoring for your Hero smart dispenser, including passcodes, daily pill limits, etc.
- And more!
 
Remember, the Hero app requires an active Hero subscription and a connected smart dispenser. It does not work as a stand-alone application. To become a Hero member, please visit herohealth.com.",Health & Fitness,"Hero Health, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/hero-medication-manager/id1352848484?uo=4,4.71156,8331,medication
662170995,Meds & Pill Reminder MyTherapy,"MyTherapy is the world's fastest-growing, free pill reminder app. Millions of people use MyTherapy to take the right medication at the right time.

MyTherapy supports you in sticking to your personal medication plan. You will receive reminders about the previously set intake times. If you want to, you can record measurements, symptoms and doctor visits in the integrated patient diary.

● EASY SETUP: Search our medication database or simply type in your specific medication to create your customizable reminders.

● RELIABLE REMINDERS: Easily receive reminders to take your tablets or dietary supplements regularly.

● NEW PACKAGE AND RECIPE REMINDER: We can remind you of your next packs and follow-up prescriptions in a timely manner using your confirmed intake.

● BLOOD PRESSURE AND WEIGHT CONTROL: If you want, we will remind you of 20+ measurements and allow you to record them directly in MyTherapy.

● SYMPTOM AND PAIN DIARY: Document your well-being to identify patterns and check whether your medications are working properly

● MONTHLY OVERVIEW: By using the app, you automatically maintain a patient diary, e.g. as a basis for discussion for your next doctor's visit.

PARTICULARLY RELEVANT: Digital companion for people with special illnesses

- ADHD (Attention Deficit/Hyperactivity Disorder)

- Asthma

- IBD (chronic inflammatory bowel disease)

- COPD (chronic obstructive pulmonary disease)

- Diabetes (Diabetes Mellitus Type 1 and Type 2)

- Heart disease (e.g. high blood pressure, CHD, atrial fibrillation, ...)

- HIV

- MS (Multiple Sclerosis)

- Psoriasis / psoriasis

- Rheumatism (e.g. rheumatoid arthritis, ...)

- Thyroid disease

- ...

● INCREMENT SITE DOCUMENATION: People who inject drugs should change their injection sites regularly. With MyTherapy it's very easy.

● PROVEN EFFECTIVENESS: Clinical studies with Charité - Universitätsmedizin Berlin demonstrate a positive influence on adherence to therapy and well-being.

● PRIVACY & SECURITY: Trust is good but control is better. That's why we have ourselves certified externally, e.g. according to ISO 13485 and ISO 27001.

● EXCELLENT APPLICATION: First place in the German Health Award from the news channel N-TV and the German Institute for Service Quality (09/2923).

Further information can be found at https://www.mytherapyapp.com

*Some features are currently only available in Germany.

**Further information regarding the exact terms and conditions can be found at https://www.shop-apotheke.com/",Medical,smartpatient GmbH,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/meds-pill-reminder-mytherapy/id662170995?uo=4,4.81453,6443,medication
863327251,Pill Reminder Medication Alarm,"Download today and enjoy the peace of mind that comes with never missing a dose again!

With our user-friendly interface, you can easily manage all of your medications in one place, ensuring that you never miss a dose again. Our app is perfect for anyone who struggles to take their medication on time or has to take multiple medications each day. It's also ideal for women who use contraceptives and want to make sure they never miss a dose.

Customize your medication schedule by entering the name of each medicine, the interval between doses, the time of the first dose, the photo and much more. 

With Pill Reminder, you can:

* Schedule all your meds in one easy-to-use app;
* Customize your pills with colors, photos, and notification sounds;
* See the time of your next dose at a glance;
* Receive notifications to remind you to take your medications;
* Track medications that you take as you need;
* See all your intake history.

Pill Reminder - the must-have app for anyone who needs help remembering to take their medication on time. 

Upgrade to the full version to remove ads and add an unlimited number of medications to your schedule.

Read our Privacy Policy and Terms of Use at http://aplicativoslegais.com.br/politica-privacidade/pill-reminder-en.html.",Medical,Aplicativos Legais LTDA - ME,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/pill-reminder-medication-alarm/id863327251?uo=4,4.57946,4235,medication
1527707108,PillBox: Medication Reminder,"Take your medicine on time!
 
Having received a doctor's appointment, we often forget that recovery depends on proper medication. And if you take several pills? And if you need to take pills several times a day, at certain times on certain days of the week? Observing diet and not confusing one pill with another?
 
The best way to clearly follow the recipe is to use a mobile application which you can set up for taking pills on a schedule in a minute, using this pill reminder alarm app. Taking medicine and with a pill reminder will become your indispensable assistant at a time when health requires special attention.
 
Start a new course, take into account your activities and daily regimen, types of drugs and how they are administered. Accurate reminders to take pills will help take pills on time, prompt you to take it before or after meals, show progress. Ideal for continuous medication.
 
Advantages of the application:
 
– Easy navigation
 
It is easy to track the medication via time and days in the calendar of tablets 
 
– Clear adherence to the medication schedule

Flexible settings allow you to accurately integrate the pill in a convenient calendar and not miss the moment you need to take your medication
 
– Simple progress tracking
 
You will always see how many tablets you have taken and how many are left in your pillbox.
 
–  Quick setup of repeat courses
 
The medication tracker remembers which tablets you took and on what route.
 
– Detailed dosage regimens and dosages.
 
Set up your medications strictly in accordance with the doctor's prescriptions – up to a milligram, milliliter or drops.
 
– Customized notification sounds
 
A reminder to take your medicine will pop up on your phone with a beautiful sound, and help you not confuse this important notification with others.
 
PREMIUM IN THE APP
- Subscription automatically renews unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24-hours before the end of the current period
- Account will be charged for renewal within 24-hours prior to the end of the current period, and identify the cost of the renewal
- Subscriptions may be managed by the user and auto-renewal may be turned off by going to the user's Account Settings after purchase
- Any unused portion of a free trial period, if offered, will be forfeited when the user purchases a subscription to that publication, where applicable
- Private Policy - https://wachanga.com/privacy
- Terms of Use - https://wachanga.com/terms",Medical,Wachanga LTD,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/pillbox-medication-reminder/id1527707108?uo=4,4.54941,344,medication
688804491,IV Medications Gahart,"Trusted for over 45 years, Intravenous Medications contains everything needed for the safe and effective administration of IV drugs. Updated annually, this comprehensive resource contains detailed monographs that include dosage, administration, contraindications, precautions, interactions, antidotes, and more. This app helps nurses, nursing students, and health professionals avoid errors by using the built-in calculator to determine precise dilution and rate of administration. Download this app to see how it will build confidence and help you provide better patient care with its intuitive, quick-access format. 

Features of Intravenous Medications include:
• 400+ detailed generic and trade name IV drug monographs
• Annual updates
• New monographs featuring recently FDA approved drugs
• Helpful calculator and charts for dilution and rate of administration
• Black Box Warnings highlighting critical information
• Blue-screened text call attention to important circumstances that may not warrant Black Box Warnings.
• Life-stage dosage variances for geriatric, pediatric, infant, and neonatal patients
• Updated drug interactions, precautions, alerts, and patient teaching instructions for all IV drugs
• Dilution and dosage charts within monographs provide quick access to essential clinical information
• Advanced Search help you find terms fast
• “Favorites” for bookmarking important entries
• Personalize your app with notes and highlights

FREE 14-DAY TRIAL: WHAT TO EXPECT
• First-time users can access Unbound's complete IV Medications mobile app free for 14 days
• After 14 days, your iTunes account will be charged $49.99 for a one-year subscription unless you have turned off auto-renew at least 24 hours before the free trial ends.
• To manage your subscriptions, open Apple's “Settings” app and tap on the “iTunes & App Store"" entry. Tap your Apple ID at the top of the screen and login. Tap subscriptions, then tap the subscription you wish to manage. 
• NOTE: If you choose not to purchase a subscription, content will no longer be viewable after the free trial period. 

iTunes automatic renewal feature: Your subscription automatically renews unless auto-renew is turned off 24 hours prior to the conclusion of your current 12 month period. Your iTunes account will automatically be charged the current renewal rate ($49.99) within 24 hours prior to the end of the subscription period. This will ensure you receive all updates and continued web access for the following year. If you choose not to renew, you will be able to use the app, however will not receive updates. 

Authors: Shelly Rainforth Collins, PharmD, BCGP

Publisher: Elsevier

Powered by: Unbound Medicine

Unbound Privacy Policy: www.unboundmedicine.com/privacy
Unbound Terms of Use: https://www.unboundmedicine.com/end_user_license_agreement",Medical,"Unbound Medicine, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/iv-medications-gahart/id688804491?uo=4,4.62697,126,medication
382300394,CVS Caremark,"The CVS/caremark™ app lets you refill mail service prescriptions, track order status, view prescription history and more. You must have CVS/caremark prescription benefits to use the app: If you’re not sure, check your health insurance plan information to confirm.

Features include:

•	Refill mail service prescriptions without registering or signing in (Easy Refill)
•	Submit new mail order prescription
•	See number of refills due and orders in progress without signing in
•	Check order status
•	Renew or request new mail service prescriptions
•	Check drug costs and coverage
•	View prescription history
•	Find a pharmacy in your network
•	View your member ID Card (if provided by plan design)
•	Add your member ID Card to your Apple Wallet (if provided by plan design)
•	Identify unknown pills 
•	Check for potential drug interactions
•	Update account information; shipping and billing information, manage family access, and reset password
•	Touch ID sign in for easy access to your account and key app features


If you already use Caremark.com, your existing username and password will also work on the app. If not, you can register directly on the app and use your new username and password on the website.

** We're here to help you get the prescriptions you need when you need them. If you like this service, please take a moment to review our app.**",Medical,CVS Caremark,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/cvs-caremark/id382300394?uo=4,4.41965,46930,medication
347073471,MPR Drug and Medical Guide,"MPR has provided over 36 years of confidence at the point of care. The MPR app is your all-in-one drug information reference accessible anytime, anywhere, and trusted by more than 800,000 healthcare professionals. The MPR app also features time-saving calculators and treatment charts that allow you to quickly make better care decisions.

Features:
 
New Redesign: The MPR app is easier to use than ever. Conveniently access all the drug data and news that is most important to you.
 
myCME: Earn FREE CME/CE within the MPR app. myCME provides relevant education that positively impacts clinical performance and patient outcomes. 

Generic-Brand Guide. Quickly search thousands of brand name and generic drugs to find their equivalent.

Medical Calculators - 100+ medical calculators simplify complex formulas, scores, & drug classifications. 

Clinical Charts - Over 150 clinical charts provide quick product comparisons,  treatment algorithms & guidelines. 

Clinical Cases: Participate in weekly and monthly quizzes from DermDx, OrthoDx and more!
 
• Quick Search function for drug information by brand name, generic name, disease/condition, or company
• Curated daily news on drug therapy and hot topics in medicine, customizable to your scope of practice
• Breaking news notifications on safety alerts & recalls related to your practice
• Automatic, real-time updates to prescribing information & news
• Favorites feature for easy access to your most frequently used drug info and tools
• No Internet connection is needed to access prescribing information and tools!

Silver and Gold level members have access to premium news content such as:
 
Oncology News
Pain News
Dermatology New
Endocrinology News
Gastroenterology News
Hematology News
Infectious Disease News
Neurology News 
Oncology Nurse News
Ophthalmology News
Psychiatry News
Pulmonology News
Nephrology and Urology News
Rheumatology News
Cardiology News

Download and sign up today for a free one-month trial. 

Payment will be charged to your iTunes Account at confirmation of purchase, or at end of free trial where applicable. The subscription automatically renews unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24-hours before the end of the current period. Your account will be charged the amount (listed above) for renewal within 24-hours prior to the end of the current period. Subscriptions may be managed and auto-renewal may be turned off by going to your Account Settings after purchase. No cancellation of the current subscription is allowed during the active subscription period. Any unused portion of a free trial period, if offered, will be forfeited when the user purchases a subscription, where applicable.

Privacy Policy - https://www.haymarketmediaus.com/haymarket-media-inc-privacy-policy/

Terms of Service - https://www.empr.com/termsandconditions/",Medical,Haymarket Media Inc,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/mpr-drug-and-medical-guide/id347073471?uo=4,4.7952,5630,medication
1188929364,EveryDose: Medication Reminder,"EveryDose is the easiest way to stay on track with your medications -- for free! Features include medication reminders, health info and tips, progress sharing, and much more.

HELPFUL MEDICATION REMINDERS
We won't let you miss a dose! Our reliable medication reminders help you stay on track with your daily medication routine.

•	Easily schedule reminders for medications, vitamins and supplements 
•	Customizable scheduling options include daily, as needed, specific days and more
•	Quick actions allow you to act on your med reminders without opening the app
•	Adjust the frequency of notifications to meet your needs

STAY ORGANIZED WITH A VIRTUAL MEDICATION LIST
Medication schedules can be complex. Keep an up-to-date, accurate medication list on your mobile device at all times.

•	Easily add medications, vitamins and supplements from our comprehensive database 
•	Share your medication list with loved ones or caregivers with the touch of a button
•	Mark medications as taken, skipped or snoozed throughout the day to stay on track
•	View your medication history, including taken and skipped doses

DRUG INTERACTION ALERTS AND MED INFO
Stay safe and informed. We'll alert you if a newly-added medication has a potential interaction with your existing drug list, and we'll provide you with need-to-know info about your meds.

•	Drug-to-drug interaction alerts help to prevent medication errors
•	Our med info leaflets provide you with must-know info about your medications
•	Food info helps you learn which foods or beverages to avoid with your specific meds

PROGRESS SHARING
Managing your health is not a solo adventure! Add friends and set up progress sharing to keep your loved ones in the loop with your health.

•	Add friends within the app to send them progress report emails
•	Schedule monthly or weekly progress reports for your EveryDose friends, or send them one-off reports at times of your choice

GET PREMIUM FEATURES WITH EVERYDOSE PLUS
To upgrade to enhanced features, you can subscribe to EveryDose Plus, our paid subscription. EveryDose Plus includes:

Multiple Profiles
•	Track medications for up to 5 additional profiles
•	Get separate reminders for each profile
•	Choose a different color theme for each profile

Health Journal
•	Keep a log of 13 different health metrics, like blood pressure, blood glucose, weight, and more
•	Get reminders when it’s time to log your health metrics 
•	Visualize your health data in chart format and set up automated reports 
•	Connect to Apple Health for seamless data syncing

Refill Reminders
•	Keep track of the number of pills remaining for your meds
•	Set a refill reminder to nudge you when it’s time to refill your prescription

Personalization Features
•	Make the app yours with 6 different color themes
•	Choose from 30 profile avatars
•	Customize your medication reminders to include the med name

Subscription Pricing and Terms:
For access to the EveryDose Plus premium features, we offer an auto-renewing monthly subscription at $9.99/month and an auto-renewing annual subscription at $69.99/year. The annual subscription comes with a 14-day free trial available to first-time subscribers only. 

Payment for EveryDose Plus will be charged to the credit card connected to your iTunes Account when you subscribe. Subscriptions automatically renew unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24 hours before the end of the current period. Manage your subscription by going to the My Subscription section of the app or the Subscriptions section of the App Store. Any unused portion of a free trial period, if offered, will be forfeited when you purchase a subscription, where applicable.

Questions? Email us at support@everydose.ai.

Thanks for trying EveryDose! Our mission is to make your daily medication routine easy, so you can focus on the things that matter the most.",Medical,"Groove Health, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/everydose-medication-reminder/id1188929364?uo=4,4.76159,4182,medication
816347839,Pill Reminder - All in One,"Pill Reminder is an easy-to-use and reliable app that helps you remember to take your medications at the right time. It allows you to create any type of recurring reminders (every X hours, at specific times, daily, weekly, monthly, every X days, etc). It also tracks the remaining quantity of each medication and shows a refill alert when supplies are running low.

It has everything you need:

• Mark Medications as Taken or Missed
• Reschedule Medications
• Refill Reminders
• Add PRN (as needed) Medications
• Calendar
• Reminders for Medical Appointments
• Email Reports to your Doctor
• Multiple User Support
• Critical Alerts Support

By remembering to take all your medications at the right time, you are taking control of your own health.

With this Pill Reminder app, you'll never forget to take your medications.


RECURRING REMINDERS
• Repeat every X hours (e.g. From 8 AM to 8 PM, every 4 hours)
• Repeat at specific times (e.g. 9:15 AM, 1:30 PM, 8:50 PM)
• Repeat every half hour (e.g. From 10 AM to 2 PM, every 30 minutes)
• Repeat on selected days of the week (e.g. Every week only on Mondays and Fridays)
• Repeat every X days, weeks or months (e.g. Every 3 days, Every 2 weeks)
• Repeat daily for 21 days and then take 7 days off (Birth Control)

MAIN FEATURES
• User friendly interface
• If you took your medication early or late, you can reschedule the next doses for that day
• Get alerts to refill your prescriptions before they run out
• Can be used with any medication, supplement, vitamin, pill or birth control that follows a regular schedule
• Mark a medication as ""Taken"" directly from the lock screen or notification banner
• Ability to add PRN (as needed) medications
• Keep track of the medications you have to take throughout the day 
• Pre-Alarms: Be notified prior to the actual time
• Auto-Snooze: Automatically repeat the alarm up to 5 times at regular intervals (e.g. 1 min, 10 mins, 30 mins) until you take action
• Add notes for reference
• Mark medications as Taken or Missed to avoid double doses
• Get alerts when medications are about to expire
• Email your medication list or administration history to your doctor
• Add reminders for medical appointments
• Add photos to each medication for easy identification
• Multiple user support. Add medications for yourself, family members, or others you care for
• Ability to search the FDA Drug Database for your medications (Available in the US only)
• Has a calendar to view all reminders by month
• Backup and restore all data on the same device or multiple devices
• 33 built-in alarm sounds

GENERAL
• Critical Alerts support
• VoiceOver accessibility support
• Dark Mode (Available in iOS 13 and later)
• Automatically adjusts to the font size selected on the device
• Notifications are local. No internet connection required
• App doesn't need to be open to receive notifications
• Universal App, full native support for iPhone and iPad

FREE VERSION
• In the free version, you can add unlimited medications but only 2 reminders
• Full version with unlimited reminders is available as an In-App Purchase
• One-Time payment. No monthly or annual fees",Medical,Sergio Licea,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/pill-reminder-all-in-one/id816347839?uo=4,4.72146,25153,medication
365191644,Dosecast: My Pill Reminder App,"Having trouble taking medications? Make it simple for yourself, Dosecast assists you in keeping track of all of your prescriptions and ensures that you never forget to take your medications, vitamins, or supplements.




It can be challenging to keep track of a bunch of medications - let us take care of that for you! From medications to vitamins to birth control pills - get a reliable app that keeps you informed.






Dosecast understands how challenging it can be to keep track of all your medications and take them consistently. We keep track of your medications and manage your refills so you don't have to. We offer a reliable app that keeps you updated on everything from medications to vitamins to birth control pills.



The FREE edition is an excellent tool for people who want to make their lives easier. However, if you're looking for something more, you should check out the PRO edition, which offers some extra features.





Don't just take our word for it - Dosecast, a versatile Pill Reminder & Medication Tracker App, has been favourably featured in major publications such as:


• The New York Times
• Reader's Digest
• Real Simple
• And many more





We've been around since 2010, so we've been reliably helping loyal users for years. Come join the family and see what all the hype is about.




With the Dosecast FREE Edition, you can get reliable notifications:




• Dose reminders on your phone, tablet, or wearable device
• The option to take, skip, or postpone doses (think “snooze” button)
• Nagging pings (in case you miss a dose), both visual and audio
• Calibration across time-zones





You can also set up flexible scheduling.




• To be on a daily, weekly, or monthly schedule
• To be used for every “X” days or weeks
• At intervals (in hours, days, or weeks) since the last dose
• To prevent dangerous overdoses, by setting a max daily-dosage





Customizing your medication:




• Medication Information such as names, dosages, directions, notes, and expiration dates.
• Utilize smart silencing to prevent notifications during sleeping hours.
• Set a treatment end date to track the medication schedule.
• Ensure privacy with no registration required and no personal information collected.
• Medication information is encrypted when in transit for added security in the public.







Dosecast PRO Edition comes with a 7-day free trial:




• Multi-Device Cloud Sync allows for seamless data syncing across unlimited devices
• Ability to review the dose history and compliance
• Keep a log of the dates and times of all medication actions
• Accurately highlights late and missed doses
• Conveniently review and email medication history
• Multi-person collaboration feature allows for assigning medications to different people or pets
• Medications can be sorted by person, time, name, or type.





Additionally:




• Set quantity tracking and refill alerts to keep track of remaining medication quantities
• Get refill alerts when supplies are running low
• Track the number of refills left and receive notifications when no refills are left
• Access to a massive drug database when setting reminders, pre-populating med names, types, amounts, strengths, and routes.
• Link doctors and pharmacies, track which doctors prescribed which meds, and match pharmacies and prescription numbers to each med.
• Personalize medication photos, take your own photos, and identify your meds more easily.
• Choose from multiple drug types such as tablets, capsules, injections, inhalers, drops, sprays, ointments, and patches.







Download Dosecast now and try it out for free.",Medical,"Montuno Software, LLC",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/dosecast-my-pill-reminder-app/id365191644?uo=4,4.05485,237,medication
988894598,SingleCare Rx Pharmacy Coupons,"Paying for prescriptions shouldn’t be painful. Join the millions saving billions with SingleCare, the prescription savings card that saves you up to 80% at the pharmacy! 

Create a free account and get an extra $3 off your next eligible refill, plus earn additional bonus savings throughout the year.
 
Prescription drug prices are rising. Life-saving medications can cost thousands of dollars. If you can’t afford your medications (or simply want to save big on prescriptions), use the SingleCare app to get free coupons that work at all major pharmacies. Whether it’s insulin for diabetes or an asthma inhaler, you can find a free coupon using the SingleCare mobile app or on SingleCare.com.

SingleCare is a prescription savings card (aka a “coupon card”) that provides discounts on 10,000+ prescribed drugs for a sign-up price of $0. It’s always 100% free to use the card. Whether you’re insured, underinsured, or uninsured, you qualify for a reduced rate on prescriptions with SingleCare and our accurate drug pricing tool helps you find low prices on thousands of FDA-approved medications.

Stop overpaying for your prescriptions and start using our free Rx coupons at your local drugstore. 

Try SingleCare in 3 simple steps:
1. Search for your prescriptions on the free SingleCare app
2. Compare discounts at nearby pharmacies and get a free coupon card
3. Show your coupon card at the pharmacy counter to save up to 80% on your medication

Remember, you can always use the card again for your next refill!

SingleCare Features: 

$0 User Fee:
• With a prescription from a medical professional, you can get SingleCare prescription savings cards for free.
• All customers at participating pharmacies can use our prescription drug coupons
• It doesn’t matter if you’re a doctor, nurse, patient, pharmacist—if you take medication, we have coupons for you.
• There are no strict eligibility requirements or limited-time offers.

Loyalty Program:
• Sign up for our free loyalty program providing access to lower cost medication.
• Receive an extra $3 off your next eligible prescription fill when you join!

Easy Refills:
• Reuse coupon cards on every refill.

Prescription Discount Finder:
Enter your zip code on the app to find a participating pharmacy near you. We partner directly with thousands of major pharmacies nationwide, including:
• CVS
• CVS Pharmacy at Target
• Walmart
• Walgreens
• Kroger
• Albertsons
• Rite Aid
• Longs Drugs
• Sav-On Pharmacy
• Fry’s
• Harris Teeter
• Wegmans
• H-E-B
• Meijer

More ways to save:
1. Ask for a prescription - To use our coupons, a medical care professional must prescribe the medication. You can still save money on vitamins, natural health supplements, and over-the-counter medicine as long as you have a script for it!
2. Go generic - Generic meds are cheaper than brand names. Ask your healthcare provider if a generic version of your prescription is available.
3. Buy in bulk - Fewer refills = fewer copays. Fill a 90-day supply instead of a 30-day supply to save more in the long run.
4. Shop around - Enter the drug name and dosage on our app, and enter your zip code to compare costs at local pharmacies. If you don’t see your exact med on the app, you can still take our prescription drug discount card to the pharmacy and they can look up if there is a SingleCare offer available.

SingleCare has been featured on CNN, Wall Street Journal, Business Insider, Healthline, Yahoo! Finance and Bustle. Start saving on your prescriptions today!

By downloading SingleCare, you agree to be bound by our Terms and Conditions found at https://www.singlecare.com/terms-and-conditions.",Medical,SingleCare Services LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/singlecare-rx-pharmacy-coupons/id988894598?uo=4,4.82875,22044,medication
1455690574,Hims: Telehealth for Men,"Hims: Telehealth for convenient, quality care 100% online. Get access to best-in-class treatment for men's health concerns like hair loss, sexual health, weight loss, mental health, and skincare.

Hair Growth: Regrow hair and stop hair loss with clinically proven prescription ingredients.

Sexual Health: Improve your sexual health with personalized treatment and effective medications for erectile dysfunction, premature ejaculation, and other sexual health concerns from the comfort (and privacy) of home.

Weight Loss: Prescription weight loss personalized to your lifestyle, eating pattern, health history, and goals so you can lose weight and keep it off.

Mental Health: Manage stress, ease anxiety, and get depression help with trusted medication and professional support.

Skincare: Put your best face forward with treatments for acne, wrinkles, and signs of aging.

With the app you can enjoy the benefits of telehealth from anywhere. Get questions answered quickly (responses typically within 24 hours), manage your shipments, access exclusive men's health content, and more.

Feel great through the power of better health, with Hims.

Please note: Content in the Hims app is for informational purposes only and does not constitute medical advice. Consult with a healthcare provider for any questions about your treatment, medical condition, or need for medical advice.",Medical,"Hims, Inc. (CA)",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/hims-telehealth-for-men/id1455690574?uo=4,4.79692,65249,medication
1516844582,Body Temperature App For Fever,"Estimate your body temperature, log and track your data, making it easier to spot potential fever symptoms—all without a thermometer!

Knowing your temperature is crucial for maintaining well-being and taking the best care of yourself, so stay proactive about your health by monitoring your body temperature with our app. With just a few simple steps on your mobile device,  you can track  your body temperature trends and take proactive steps towards your health goals.


But wait – there's more: 


• Find out, track and log your body temperature with ease.

• Log and easily export your body temperature data and more into PDF to share with your doctor.

• Easily measure wrist temperature with the Apple Watch app and save your data in our app. (requires Apple Watch 8 or newer)

• Use your phone’s camera to estimate your heart rate and then easily log your data afterward.

• Track, log, and export your symptoms and medications effortlessly.

• Monitor the heat index based on location to safeguard yourself against heat-related conditions that could pose health risks.

• Add family members and monitor the body temperature of each.

• Discover how weather conditions can influence your body temperature using our widget.



Whether you're at home or on the go, managing your health has never been easier.

The Body Temperature App for Fever is free to download and utilize. However, users can opt for a subscription to access additional features. Your subscription will automatically renew and you’ll be billed based on the plan you choose. You can cancel your subscription at any time in the App Store.

Disclaimer: For wellness use only. The App is intended to improve your awareness of general wellness. The App can't be used for diagnostics or medical purposes. The App does not diagnose, treat, mitigate or prevent any disease, symptom, disorder or abnormal physical state. Always seek a health care professional or emergency services if you believe you may have a medical issue.

Terms of use: https://aboutmeapps.com/terms-of-use/

Privacy policy: https://aboutmeapps.com/privacy-policy/",Medical,"AboutMe Apps, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/body-temperature-app-for-fever/id1516844582?uo=4,4.75323,19808,medication
661829386,Talkspace Therapy and Support,"Talkspace is the most convenient and affordable way to improve your mental health. Get matched with a licensed therapist in your state from the comfort of your device, and message via text, audio, and video. 

Our subscription service provides high-quality mental health care to anyone ages 13 and up, and has already been used by over 1 million people. See what they have to say at love.talkspace.com. 


HOW DOES TALKSPACE WORK? 

Tell us your preferences for therapy, and match with one of our therapists in your state the same day. Send your therapist unlimited text, audio, picture, or video messages from anywhere, at any time — you’ll hear back at least once a day, 5 days per week. 


IS TALKSPACE COVERED BY INSURANCE?

Yes! Talkspace partners with health plans and companies across the U.S. to make therapy more affordable and accessible than ever before. Share your insurance info or employer during checkout to see if you’re eligible for coverage. 


IS TALKSPACE EFFECTIVE? 

Talkspace has been shown to be as effective as face-to-face therapy. In one recent study, 81% of participants felt Talkspace is as effective or better than in-person therapy. In another, individuals who used Talkspace for only 2 months significantly improved symptoms of depression and anxiety. Talkspace has been featured in The Wall Street Journal, CNN.com, Business Insider, and more. 

For more research data, visit research.talkspace.com. 
For more of our press coverage, visit talkspace.com/online-therapy/press/


WHO ARE THE TALKSPACE THERAPISTS?

The Talkspace provider network has thousands of licensed therapists across the 50 U.S. states who have been vetted and accredited according to NCQA standards. They have experience treating the most common mental health issues, including depression, anxiety, substance use, stress, relationships, PTSD, and more.


IS TALKSPACE SECURE?

Your safety and security are our #1 priorities. Our technology is protected using banking-grade encryption and externally audited in compliance with the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA). For more information, find our complete Privacy Policy at talkspace.com/public/privacy-policy.


CONNECT WITH US!

We’re always happy to connect with users and receive feedback.
Email us: support@talkspace.com 
Check out our website: talkspace.com 
Follow us on Twitter: twitter.com/Talkspace 
Follow us on Instagram: instagram.com/talkspace
Like us on Facebook: facebook.com/Talkspacetherapy",Health & Fitness,Groop Internet Platform inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/talkspace-therapy-and-support/id661829386?uo=4,4.81323,38133,medication
1455648231,"Tracker, Reminder - CareClinic","CareClinic is an award-winning clinically-studied All-in-One Health Tracker App that simplifies managing your own and your dependent's health. Enable intelligent Trackers and Modules that make managing your treatment or health goals simple, easy, and quick!

Take control of your well-being: Build healthy habits, stay accountable, and act on insights.

1000’S of SIMILAR 5-STAR REVIEWS:
""I love this App! It lets me journal my thoughts and helps with my med reminders. I can't recommend it enough to anyone looking to build healthy habits!""

As a self-care wellness app and symptom tracker, it includes all must-haves such as a medication tracker & other health reminders. Set reminders for your meds & pills and also reminders to record your symptom severity, measurements, to engage in physical activity, and eat correctly. Add your care team to let them monitor your progress remotely, or monitor the well-being of your loved ones!

Trackers included:  Track medication (prescription and birth control), vitamins, supplements (such as iron, vitamin C), chronic conditions, symptoms diary, environmental factors, nutrition, physical activity (including yoga, steps, exercises), daily vitals & measurements, therapies, sleep, & notes. Automatically discover correlations & triggers through reports.

Modules included: Care Teams, Reminders, Goals, Streaks, Appointments, Care Plans (regimens for different people or goals), Conditions (comorbidities), Labs & Reports, Immunizations (Vaccines), Exercise library, Medication library

REASONS FOR YOU TO TRY US

1. CUSTOMIZABLE REMINDERS
- Schedule medication (pill reminders, refill reminders, vitamin reminders or supplement reminders) with tapering doses
- Appointment reminders for checkups, assessments
- Immunization reminders for follow-up shots

2.  HEALTH DIARY & CHECK-INS
- Built-in DB of medications, symptoms, supplements, exercises, measurements (with units) for quicker check-ins
- Pre-set measurements like Weight, Sleep, Blood Pressure, Energy, Productivity, Mood, Pain, Pulse & Temperature, more
- Include photos as part of your check-ins

3. MONITOR PROGRESS IN CHARTS, LOGS & CORRELATIONS
- See what works and what doesn't
- Export & share progress

4. INTEGRATIONS
- Apple Health, Siri, Fitbit, Shortcuts, Badges, Wearables, Apple Watch
- Appointments sync with mobile calendar

5. CARE TEAMS
- Share data remotely or Monitor family, kids & seniors remotely
- Nudge dependents to stay on track
- Store contact information centrally for reference

6. CARE PLANS
- Add medication with photos! No typing needed
- See Drug & Supplement interactions, Synergistic effects between supplements (stacking!), Dose warnings
- It's not just a medication list! add Drugs, Minerals, Nutrition (Food & drinks with calories & macronutrients), Therapies (CBT, Mindfulness), Fitness (your entire regimen)

7. CUSTOMIZABLE
- Turn off unnecessary modules and trackers to simplify the app further
- Or turn them all ON and track symptoms, goals, habits, headaches, migraines, disease, more
- Localized measurement units, date formats, timezones, languages
- Syncs with Desktop Web App
- Built-in DB of common labs & reports like genomic labs, blood tests, more
- Biometric security for privacy

More than a medication management app or pill organizer, it is a complete health planner:
Essential for chronic illness or health symptoms: Mental Health (ADHD, Depression, Anxiety), Chronic Pain, Cancer, Fibromyalgia, IBD & IBS (Bowel Movements), Diabetes, Rheumatoid Arthritis, Multiple sclerosis (MS), Flu, COPD, Epilepsy, Psoriasis, Fibromyalgia, IPF, PMDD, other disorders. Track pregnancy & baby symptoms, Headaches, Mood, Urine, Stool, Symptom diary, PMS, Food allergies, gut health, GI Symptoms, pain tracker, pain log, pain journal",Health & Fitness,CARECLINIC SOFTWARE INC.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/tracker-reminder-careclinic/id1455648231?uo=4,4.30103,2136,medication
444811704,Davis Drug Guide For Nurses,"The medical information that nurses need - when, where, and how they need it!

Davis's Drug Guide for Nurses, Nineteenth Edition, always puts safety first, emphasizing the medical information nurses need to know to administer medications competently and safely. Today's most comprehensive nursing drug guide contains well-organized monographs for thousands of generic and trade name drugs reflecting the latest FDA approvals and changes.

The NINETEENTH EDITION - Life-saving guidance, at a glance :
• Over 5,000 drug monographs covering trade names and generics.
• Organized by generic drug names, with an index that includes generic and trade names, classifications, combination drugs, and herbals.
• Drug-drug, drug-food, drug-natural product interactions.
• Cross-referencing of drugs.
• Herbal content.
• Pedi, Geri, OB, and Lactation cautions.
• IV administration sections.
• REMS (Risk Evaluation and Mitigation Strategies).
• Pharmacogenomic content.
• Canadian-specific content.
• Audio pronunciations for drug names.
• Appendices and much more!

APP FEATURES :
• Take personalized notes throughout the app's drug monographs, color code them; even include images.
• Search gets you the content you need in a flash.
• Bookmarks return you to your most used content with ease.

Try before you buy with a 14-day FREE trial. After that it's only $38.99/year for access and continuous content updates.

Privacy Policy - https://www.fadavis.com/privacypolicy

Terms of Service - https://www.fadavis.com/Termsofuse",Medical,"Atmosphere Apps, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/davis-drug-guide-for-nurses/id444811704?uo=4,4.81079,7970,medication
1143476433,IV Medications Elsevier,"""Try before you buy"" - Download the FREE App, which includes sample content. In-App purchase required to unlock all content.

For nearly 50 years - #1 IV drug handbook to safely administer more than 400 intravenous drugs! Drug monographs for 16 newly approved drugs by the FDA include the most current information

**Selected for Doody’s Core Titles® 2024 with ""Essential Purchase"" designation in Pharmacology**

Find the essential information you need to safely administer more than 400 intravenous drugs! For nearly 50 years, Elsevier’s Intravenous Medications: A Handbook for Nurses and Health Professionals has been a trusted resource for complete, accurate drug information in a concise, quick-access format. New to the 2025 edition are 16 monographs of the most recent IV drugs to be approved by the FDA, in addition to updated drug uses, interactions, precautions, alerts, and patient teaching instructions for all current IV drugs. Known as the #1 IV drug handbook on the market, this annual publication is ideal for use in critical care areas, at the nursing station, in the office, and in public health and home care settings.

KEY FEATURES
- Detailed monographs on more than 400 IV drugs provide an impressive breadth of coverage that goes well beyond any comparable drug reference.
- Individual monographs include the drug name, phonetic pronunciation, usual dose, dilution, compatibility, rate of administration, actions, indications and uses, contraindications, precautions, interactions, side effects, antidote, and more.
- Additional drug monographs are provided on the Evolve website.
- Highlighted Black Box Warnings make it easy to locate information on medications with serious safety risks.
- Blue-screened text calls attention to special circumstances not covered by Black Box Warnings.
- Dosage and dilution charts within monographs provide quick summaries of essential clinical information.
- Life-stage dosage variances are highlighted for geriatric, pediatric, infant, and neonatal patients.
-  Convenient, A-to-Z format organizes all drug monographs by generic name, allowing you to find any drug in seconds.
- Mobile app allows you to search, bookmark and see recent topic history and conveniently fits in your pocket.
- NEW! Drug monographs for 16 newly approved drugs by the FDA include the most current information.
- NEW! Updates on drug uses, interactions, precautions, alerts, and more are included throughout the guide to reflect changes to existing medications.
- NEW! Best practices guidelines for the preparation and administration of injectable drugs are provided from the National Coalition for IV Push Safety.

Content licensed from printed edition ISBN-10: 0443120994
Content licensed from printed edition ISBN-13: 9780443120992

SUBSCRIPTION :
Please purchase a yearly auto-renewing subscription to receive content access and available updates.

Yearly auto-renewing payments- $49.99

Payment will be charged to your iTunes Account at confirmation of purchase. Subscription automatically renews unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24-hours before the end of the current period. Subscription may be managed by the user and auto-renewal can be disabled at any time by going to your device “Settings” and tapping “iTunes & App Store”. Any unused portion of a free trial period will be forfeited when you purchase a subscription, where applicable.

If you have any questions or comments, email us any time: customersupport@skyscape.com or call 508-299-3000

Privacy Policy - https://www.skyscape.com/terms-of-service/privacypolicy.aspx
Terms and Conditions - https://www.skyscape.com/terms-of-service/licenseagreement.aspx

Author(s):Shelly Rainforth Collins, PharmD
Publisher:Elsevier Health Sciences",Medical,Skyscape Medpresso Inc,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/iv-medications-elsevier/id1143476433?uo=4,4.63767,69,medication
1098936460,Medication Tracker & Reminder,"Medication Tracker is a simple medication reminder app for the elderly. 

Receive timed notifications with the name, dosage, reason for and characteristics of the medication. All the info you need, right from the lockscreen - No need to open the app.

Key Features:
- Simple to use
- Effortless and quick way to track medications
- Makes finding your pills easier

The app was designed in consideration of the elderly who often have many medications. Medication Tracker makes it easier to remember to take medications and to find the correct one.",Medical,Michael Tram,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/medication-tracker-reminder/id1098936460?uo=4,0.0,0,medication
1623878709,Hers: Women’s Healthcare,"Hers: Your one-stop for women’s healthcare and self-care telemedicine. Get access to best-in-class treatments and support for:

Hair Growth: Say hello to thicker, fuller hair with proven prescription ingredients for hair growth, custom treatments prescribed by licensed healthcare providers, and top-of-the-line hair care products.

Mental Health: Get the mental health support you need for anxiety relief, stress relief, and dealing with depression through 100% online telemedicine consultations and medication management.

Weight Loss: Prescription weight loss that puts you first. A weight loss plan through Hers is personalized to fit your lifestyle, eating pattern, health history, and goals to help you lose weight and feel like yourself.

Skincare: For stubborn acne, minimizing fine lines and wrinkles, or just upgrading your skincare regimen.

With the app you can enjoy the benefits of telemedicine from anywhere. Get questions answered quickly (responses typically within 24 hours), manage your medications, access exclusive health and wellness content, and more.

Feel great through the power of better health, with Hers.

Please note: Content in the Hers app is for informational purposes only and does not constitute medical advice. Consult with a healthcare provider for any questions about your treatment, medical condition, or need for medical advice.",Medical,"Hims, Inc. (CA)",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/hers-womens-healthcare/id1623878709?uo=4,4.57207,6805,medication
1213141301,Nurx: Birth Control Delivered,"Get personalized healthcare from Nurx! Receive prescriptions for birth control, acne treatment, rosacea and anti-aging, migraine care, PrEP for HIV prevention, herpes medicine and more — and home tests for STIs and HPV.

The Nurx app is one of the most convenient and affordable ways to take care of your personal healthcare needs. We deliver your treatment to your door, billing insurance if you have it and keeping things affordable if you don’t. Our goal is to help you stay on top of your health in a way that’s private, convenient, affordable and... just better.

HOW IT WORKS
1. Share your health history, at your convenience
2. Nurx medical team reviews & prescribes, if appropriate
3. We deliver to your door for free, in discreet packaging

WHAT IT COSTS
• We bill insurance for your medication or tests, and offer transparent pricing for those without insurance.
• Medication starting at $0 with insurance or $15/month without insurance.
• Save on transportation and time away from work. We provide care at your convenience and deliver for free.

IN THE NEWS
""A game-changer for birth control""-ELLE

BIRTH CONTROL
Get a birth control prescription anytime, from anywhere. Our medical team prescribes online, then we deliver to your door, with automatic refills and free delivery. Choose from the pill, ring, patch, or shot. For certain patients who receive supported medications, the Nurx app now supports healthy habit assistance features using Apple CareKit.

ACNE, ROSACEA, ANTI-AGING TREATMENT + EYELASH SERUM
The Nurx medical team provides personalized treatment for acne and rosacea, with prescription topical and/or oral treatments. We bill insurance (if you have it) for your medications, deliver them to your door, and provide ongoing care. We prescribe retinoid cream to treat fine lines, wrinkles, uneven pigmentation and dark spots. You can also get an eyelash growth serum prescription for healthier lashes.

MIGRAINE + HEADACHE TREATMENT
Connect with specially trained medical providers for diagnosis and/or treatment of migraines and chronic headaches. Share your health history and submit a short video exam, then a provider will review and (if appropriate) write a treatment plan with prescriptions delivered. Migraine treatment includes one year of care, with follow-up assessments and prescription adjustments if needed.

MENTAL HEALTH
Get a personalized treatment plan for anxiety and depression medication, plus ongoing support on your schedule.

HERPES TREATMENT
We prescribe and deliver the antiviral medication valacyclovir to people with oral or genital herpes who have already been diagnosed. We offer prescriptions for outbreaks or for daily prevention.

STI, HPV HOME TESTS
Our home test kits let you test for sexually transmitted infections, or screen for cervical cancer. Depending on your test, a member of our medical team will be in touch to walk you through your results and prescribe treatment or connect you with care if needed.

PrEP FOR HIV PREVENTION
Nurx is the most convenient way to order PrEP. Do the required testing from home, no lab visit required. We make PrEP affordable by connecting you with payment assistance.

EMERGENCY CONTRACEPTION
The morning-after pill prevents pregnancy when taken up to 5 days after sex. We'll help you get emergency contraception — Plan B or Ella — in the mail or fulfilled at a pharmacy near you.

PRIVATE MESSAGING WITH TOP PROVIDERS
Everyone on the Nurx medical team is certified and licensed. You'll receive judgment-free quality care, and as a patient you can message our medical team any time with questions about your medication or tests. Nurx is HIPAA-compliant.

Nurx is currently available in these states: AL, CA, CO, CT, FL, GA, KY, IA, IL, IN, LA, MA, MD, ME, MI, MO, MT, NJ, NY, NC, OH, OR, PA, RI, SC, SD, TN, TX, UT, VA, WA, WI and WY. Nurx is only available to people age 13 and older, depending on state law. Home tests not available in NY and herpes treatment not available in WA.",Medical,"Thirty Madison, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/nurx-birth-control-delivered/id1213141301?uo=4,4.63485,24913,medication
1059591124,Round Health,"Round makes it easier to remember to take your medicine, so you can worry less, live healthier, and be happier.
 
This simple, beautiful app organizes all of your medications and vitamins in one place. 

It provides subtle, persistent reminders that go beyond awkward phone alarms. By helping you set “reminder windows” tailored to your medicine and schedule, Round accommodates life’s unpredictable distractions and removes the stress of staying healthy.

Round features:
・Simple and intuitive interface to viewing all of your medications and vitamins
・Complex scheduling of various doses and schedules
・Tracking and taking of as-needed/PRN medications
・Apple Watch App and Complications
・Refill reminders for medications
・Persistent push notifications that remind you even if you forget or miss the first one
・Streak counting and historical viewing of previous days and months
・Refill tracking and reminders
・Specialized flow for birth control packs
・User accounts for backup and syncing between devices


We love user feedback! If you have any questions, ideas or complaints at all reach out to us at feedback@roundhealth.co or @roundhealthco on Twitter.",Medical,"CIRCADIAN DESIGN, INC.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/round-health/id1059591124?uo=4,4.54303,14686,medication
470475342,RxSaver Prescription Discounts,"Save up to 80% on your prescriptions with RxSaver™. RxSaver finds you Rx coupons instantly for pharmacies near you. RxSaver is free to use. No membership or sign in required. Get discounts and lower your out-of-pocket costs. Start saving today. 
___________________________
 
It’s your medication, only cheaper. Prescription medications are pricey, and you deserve to know what you’ll pay at the pharmacy before pick up. RxSaver™ lets you search for your name brand or generic drug in seconds and finds you the best prices at nearby pharmacies. 

Using RxSaver is as easy as 1-2-3.
1. Enter your medication in the app
2. Get free Rx coupons to use at your pharmacy
3. Save on your medications… Now you’re an RxSaver!

Why Use RxSaver?
RxSaver has helped over 7 million people save up to 80% on prescription drugs.* RxSaver is LegitScript Certified and accredited by the Better Business Bureau, with a rating of A+. RxSaver has been featured in media outlets including Forbes, MSNBC, US Weekly, The View, Inside Edition, and The Doctors, among others.

*Savings calculated based on the pharmacy cash price. On average, fourteen percent of RxSaver prescription purchases receive savings of 80% or more. 
 
Where is RxSaver Accepted?
RxSaver coupons are accepted at all major U.S. pharmacies including: Walgreens, Walmart, CVS, Costco, Rite Aid, Kmart, Sam’s Club, Kroger, Albertsons, Duane Reade, HEB, Hy-Vee, Meijer, Publix, Randall’s, Safeway, and more. No matter where you fill your prescription, RxSaver can help you save money off the retail price of your Rx medication.

How Much Does RxSaver Cost? 
RxSaver is free to use. There are no membership fees or sign in required. 

How Does the RxSaver App Work?
It’s simple and easy. Just install the app, search for your medication on the home screen, edit the dosage as needed, and get the coupon you want. Using the “Save Med” button you can keep your rx medication information handy for quick price checks anytime. 

Can I Use Rx Coupons With Insurance or Without Insurance?
RxSaver can be used by anyone who is insured, underinsured, or without insurance coverage. If the RxSaver coupon offers a better price than your insurance co-pay, simply use the coupon instead of your insurance for the prescription. Lower your out-of-pocket costs.

RxSaver is NOT INSURANCE. RxSaver coupons cannot be combined with federal/state-funded health care programs like Medicaid or Medicare.

Can I use RxSaver at the pharmacy drive-thru? What about delivery?
You can use RxSaver for home delivery, drive-thru, and curbside pick-up from your local pharmacy. Just call ahead to give the pharmacist the coupon information over the phone, or read the codes at the drive-thru. RxSaver also allows you to compare prices between your local pharmacy and online pharmacies with free home delivery. 

Do RxSaver Coupons Work on Refills?
RxSaver coupons never expire and you can keep the coupon on file at the pharmacy for all your refills. However, prescription prices can change from time to time. Searching for your medication through the RxSaver app is the best way to see up to date coupon prices.

How is the RxSaver App Different from Rx Discount Cards?
Paper rx discount cards can get lost, but the RxSaver app is always free and easy to access on your device. The RxSaver app is a digital rx discount card that is always available when you need it. The RxSaver app offers instant rx coupons on demand. 

Does RxSaver Work For Rx Pet Meds?
If your pet needs medication, you don’t have to pay full-price! RxSaver offers free coupons for pet medications that have human equivalents, which can be easily filled at local pharmacies. Ask your vet before filling your pet's next prescription.

Please visit https://www.goodrx.com/consumer-health-data-privacy-notice to read our Consumer Health Data Privacy Notice for additional information about our handling of consumer health data.",Medical,"RxSaver, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/rxsaver-prescription-discounts/id470475342?uo=4,4.83681,24315,medication
1172429469,myVCA,"myVCA is your tailor-made guide to raising a healthy and happy pet. 
 
· 24/7 Live Chat with Licensed Veterinary Professionals
· Get health care and medication reminders
· Quickly book appointments 
· Order pet food, treats, and more
· Access personalized pet care information
 
Not a VCA client? Find a hospital near you at vcahospitals.com/find-a-hospital. Learn more about CareClub at VCACareClub.com.",Medical,VCA ANTECH Inc,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/myvca/id1172429469?uo=4,4.89614,24390,medication
490524922,iCare · Medication Reminder,"「iCare」 is an essential living app to remind you taking medcines on time, multiple reminders everyday, support notification center widgets, help you to find pharmacies and hospitals nearby immediately. 

It could be used to remind you taking Vitamins and Fruits as well ^_^

= Lovely Feature =
1.Powerful reminder:multi-cycle daily reminders, custom reminder cycles, ""The Pill"" cycle, to meet the requirements of all medication
2.Notification widgets: quick records medication timeline in notification center
3.Friends and relatives' medication: support Wechat、SMS and phone call to remind your friends and relatives
4.Family medicine: record medicine validity and doctor's advices
5.Location search: help you to find pharmacies and hospitals nearby immediately

Proudly by Clover",Health & Fitness,iDaily Corp.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/icare-medication-reminder/id490524922?uo=4,4.16667,18,medication
1593714498,MedZoomer Courier App,"With the MedZoomer Courier App, MedZoomer Couriers will always know how much money they are earning and have instant access to their most current balance. In addition, MedZoomer couriers will have real-time access to all of the scheduled deliveries he or she needs to make, a history of past deliveries, the ability to chat with the dispatcher, analytics, and frequently asked questions.",Business,Medzoomer LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/medzoomer-courier-app/id1593714498?uo=4,2.71429,42,medication
1502063556,Max - Pill reminder,"Hey there, health champs! It's me, Max, your pill-popping pal. Let's grow those healthy habits together with my friendly reminders!

[How to use Max:]
▸ Fetch your reminders! You can set personalized schedules—daily, on specific days, or at intervals.

▸ When Max's ""Woof Woof"" alarm sounds, chow down on your meds and hit the ""taken"" button.

▸ Max automatically records the medicine name and time, crafting a pawsitively awesome health journal.

▸ If there's no response to the timely push notification, Max will bark up your phone again.

[Recommended for:]
▸ From conception to 16 weeks of pregnancy
Folate plays a major role in cell creation. Running low on folate could lead to underweight pups, premature births, and a stunted growth spurt for the little ones. Don't gobble it all up at once, though—it might cause a tummy tumble. Max suggests a daily dose with his ""Pill Paws"" alert to keep things steady.

▸ Office pups glued to screens
If those peepers are feeling ruff every time you blink, fetch an eye drop prescription at the clinic. For severe cases, set Max's ""3-Hour Howler"" alarm on his reminder app to keep those peepers lubed up. Adding some lutein to the mix is a real tail-wagger, too.

▸ Diabetic dogs on meds
Did you know 1 in 10 adults is a diabetic doggo? Those taking diabetes meds might run low on Vitamin B. It's like the secret sauce for energy production in our bodies, so Max's reminder pack always includes this woof-tastic nutrient.

Stay barking healthy with Max's tail-wagging reminders!",Medical,Artify Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/max-pill-reminder/id1502063556?uo=4,4.7797,6954,medication
294754639,Glucose Buddy Diabetes Tracker,"RANKED #1 DIABETES APP FOR OVER 10 YEARS. 
- Track blood sugar, medication, A1C
- Log weight
- Track carb intake through our food database

Ranked #1 Diabetes iPhone Application by Manny Hernandez, Founder of TuDiabetes.com

As seen on American Diabetes Association's Forecast Magazine, NYTimes, Wired Magazine, DiabetesMine.com, MedGadget.com, Mendosa.com, Diabetes Health Magazine, JDRF Newsletters and MobiHealthNews. 

FEATURES:
- Easily log blood glucose, medication, meals, in one entry 
- Track trends in your blood sugar, insulin, weight, A1C, and more!
- Comprehensive 12-Week Diabetes Education Plan featuring 5-minute lessons perfect for learning on the go
- Meal IQ will help you make better food choices and better understand how your food impacts your blood sugar
- Add notes to your entries for future reference
- See changes in your blood sugar and carb intake on an hourly basis
- Log your meals using our extensive food database
- Automatically track your steps, walks, and other cardio activities
- Export your data into printable PDF reports and CSV files you can take to your healthcare provider
- Supports glucose units mg/dL and mmol/L
- Integrates with Dexcom (Devices & Apps -> Dexcom)
- Integrates with Apple Health App (Devices & Apps -> Apple Health Data)

Unlock additional features by subscribing to Premium! Features include:
- Automatic A1C calculator so you always know your long term management
- Custom tags to make logging easier for you
- Entry filter for better insights into your blood sugar
- Advanced graphs so you can easily identify trends in your glucose and medicine intake
- Report date range flexibility  
- No ad experience
- Complimentary premium access to top health and fitness apps such as Fitness Buddy for gym and home workouts, Calorie Mama for automatic calorie counting, and so much more!

Medical disclaimer: The content found within the Glucose Buddy app is provided for informational purposes only and is not intended as a medical device, or as a substitute for the medical advice of a trained physician.

We offer auto-renewable subscriptions with the following specifications:
- Subscriptions are for a 1 month or 12 month duration
- Subscriptions are $14.99 USD for 1 month or $39.99 USD for 1 year 
- Payment will be charged to your iTunes account at confirmation of purchase
- Account will be charged for renewal within 24-hours prior to the end of the current period. Subscription will auto-renew for the same price charged at start of subscription
- Subscription automatically renews unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24 hours before the end of the current period
- Subscriptions may be managed by the user and auto-renewal may be turned off by going to the user's Account Settings after purchase
- No cancellation of the current subscription is allowed during active subscription period
- Any unused portion of a free trial period, if offered, will be forfeited when the user purchased a subcription to that publication
- Our privacy policy and terms of use: https://www.azumio.com/page/privacypolicy

Medical disclaimer: The content found within the Glucose Buddy app is provided for informational purposes only and is not intended as a medical device, or as a substitute for the medical advice of a trained physician. 

Note: Continued use of GPS running in the background can dramatically decrease battery life. 

The Glucose Buddy app integrates with the Agamatrix Jazz Wireless 2. This medical device has regulatory clearance in the US only. 

Privacy policy and terms of use: https://www.azumio.com/page/privacypolicy",Medical,Azumio Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/glucose-buddy-diabetes-tracker/id294754639?uo=4,4.8307,24140,medication
420447115,Baby Breastfeeding Tracker,"Baby Nursing, the easy-to-use app that helps you track your baby’s nursing progress, growth, diaper changes, doctor’s visits, and more. Just some of what you’ll get in this FREE app:

• Track your nursing progress in real time with our easy-to-use timer.
 
• See detailed and useful info on your nursing progress: most recent nursing, daily averages, cumulative totals, and graphs. We even help you calculate how much you’ve fed your baby!

• Add photos, sound, and video to see how your baby grows and develops.

• Track your location to know where you’ve fed your baby - home, work, at your mom’s, etc.

• Record your baby’s height, weight, and head size, then see them all on our comprehensive growth chart.

• Record your baby’s daily happenings, milestones, and special moments.

• Back up your data to make sure you never lose it.

• Sync your data with your spouse, nanny, or childcare provider. 


Baby Nursing is the easy, satisfying way to stay on top on your baby’s progress and enjoy all the special moments!",Medical,"Sevenlogics, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/baby-breastfeeding-tracker/id420447115?uo=4,4.29617,1982,medication
955183607,PlushCare: Online Doctor,"SEE A TRUSTED, WORLD CLASS ONLINE DOCTOR 

Get diagnosed and prescribed medications online. Major insurances accepted. Cost effective & convenient. Nationwide.
 
With over 300,000 users and counting PlushCare is a leading virtual primary care provider. Our physicians come from the top 50 U.S. medical schools and are licensed and U.S. board-certified. You can see our online doctors via phone or computer 365 days a year, including weekends and holidays for medical care and online treatments, including online prescriptions. Our physicians can treat over 3,500 medical conditions online and are committed to creating a stress free environment with positive patient outcomes.
 
97% of conditions are treated on the first visit. If the online doctor is unable to treat you, the appointment is free.
 
Our patients have consistently rated our medical care at close to 5 out of 5 stars across the most popular review platforms.

HERE’S WHAT PLUSHCARE PATIENTS ARE SAYING
 
""I'm a busy guy with work often finding myself out of area. I've used PlushCare a couple of times and couldn't be happier. Doctors are always nice and professional and appointments are easy to get.""

""Outstanding service. Both my husband and I used the service. It's so much easier than going and sitting in an emergency room or clinic with other people and their germs. A great way to be checked out!""

HOW DOES A VISIT WITH A PLUSHCARE DOCTOR WORK?
To book an appointment simply select a time and preferred doctor from our booking page. Then enter your insurance information (if applicable), create an account, select your preferred pharmacy, and at your appointment time, video chat with the doctor of your choice via smartphone or webcam.
 
During your online consultation the online doctor will ask about your medical history as well as any current medications and supplements you may be taking. They will want to hear about your symptoms and together you will create a treatment plan.
 
WHAT DOES PLUSHCARE COMMONLY TREAT?
PlushCare offers virtual primary care for ongoing conditions, and virtual urgent care for non-emergency conditions. Our physicians have treated over 3,500 medical conditions online.

PRIMARY CARE FOR:
Acne
Anxiety
Asthma
Back pain
Depression
Diabetes
Erectile dysfunction
Hair loss
High blood pressure
High cholesterol
Thyroid conditions
Insomnia
And many more...
 

URGENT CARE FOR
Allergies
Bronchitis
Colds
Dental infections
Diarrhea
Ear pain
Flu
Headache/migraines
Nausea
PEP
Pink eye
Pneumonia
Rash
Sinus infection
Strep throat
Tonsillitis
UTIs
Vaginitis
Yeast infections
And many more...
 

COMMON ONLINE PRESCRIPTIONS OUR DOCTORS WRITE
Antibiotics (Amoxicillin, Penicillin, Augmentin)
Antiviral medications (Acyclovir, Valtrex)
Antidepressants (Prozac, Sertraline, Trazodone, Zoloft)
Antipsychotics  (Olanzapine)
Birth Control (Apri, Yaz)
PrEP (Truvada, Descovy)
Diuretics (Bumex, Demadex)
Pain Killers (Naproxen, Voltaren)
High blood pressure medication (Amlodipine, Propranolol, Valsartan)
Diabetes medication (Metformin, Diabeta)
And many more...
 

WHAT IS PLUSHCARE’S PRESCRIPTION POLICY?
Our online doctor's can write a refill or initiation prescription on all medications not classified as controlled substances for 90 days. It is important to note that our doctors are highly trained physicians and will defer to their best medical judgement during your appointment
 
CAN I USE MY INSURANCE AND HOW MUCH WILL MY VISIT COST?
PlushCare accepts insurance from major insurance providers. Insured patients will pay their typical office visit copay. The average insured patient pays less than $25. 
 
We also accept patients without insurance. This is much more affordable than an in-person urgent care or primary care uninsured appointment.

CAN MY CHILDREN SEE A PLUSHCARE DOCTOR?
Yes. PlushCare has friendly & experienced pediatricians on staff.

For more information, you can visit our FAQ page at support.plushcare.com",Medical,"Accolade, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/plushcare-online-doctor/id955183607?uo=4,4.89328,132092,medication
313401238,UpToDate Lexidrug,"UpToDate® Lexidrug™ is the preferred drug reference app, providing industry-leading drug information and tools that support safe and effective medication and therapeutic decisions.

View the latest clinical information updated daily by our unparalleled multidisciplinary editorial team that continually reviews the most current evidence available. Used and trusted by pharmacists, physicians, nurses, advanced practice nurses, dentists, and students as an invaluable referential resource.

Easily access Lexidrug content directly in the app without needing to download databases onto your device. Our mobile packages are designed to support a variety of roles, offering quick access to expert content and capabilities, including:

•	In-depth drug databases with detailed dosing support
•	Comprehensive monographs with adverse reactions information
•	Hundreds of medical calculators
•	Interactive drug interactions checker
•	Ability to store database content for offline use


New individual users will receive a one-month free trial to the UpToDate Lexidrug Hospital Pharmacist package. At the end of the free trial, users will automatically be billed a subscription fee of $29.99 per month via their iTunes Account for continuing access. To avoid being charged, users must cancel their free trial at least 24 hours before the end of the trial period. Users can manage settings, cancel subscriptions, or turn off auto-renewal anytime during the subscription period via iTunes Account Settings. 

Any unused portion of a free trial period, if offered, will be forfeited when the user purchases a subscription to that publication, where applicable.",Medical,"Lexi-Comp, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/uptodate-lexidrug/id313401238?uo=4,3.0375,160,medication
1227402276,Actions: To Do List Organizer,"Keep on top of everything in your head, whether it’s movies to watch or the details of your next big project. Designed for busy people who live by making lists to stay on track at work and home, the digital card based design is a clutter-free way to visualise everything that needs doing.

Collect your thoughts in a calm interface with simple natural language like “Water the plants every Saturday” then let Actions take care of reminding you automatically.

–––FEATURES–––

• Create Action Cards to note things you do not want to forget.
• Type naturally like “Post status report every second Friday” and Actions takes care of the scheduling, reminders and notifications.
• Drag and drop your Action Cards into custom Lists to organise them intuitively
• Colour code each list to further personalise your productivity system
• Use the Schedule to see all of the Actions coming up
• Swipe on Action Cards to complete them, delete them and set reminders.
• Add free-form notes to Action Cards for extra details like phone numbers
• Get push notifications, you can quickly choose reminders for the Morning, Afternoon, Evening or custom times
• Create repeating actions with advanced rules like “Call Sam every second Tuesday in June”
• Automatically and securely sync all of your Actions to the cloud instantly
• To keep your lists manageable, Actions will automatically suggest Action Cards that should be rescheduled or deleted
• Use the iOS Share extension to bring lists from other apps into Actions easily
• Use Siri to manage your actions for hands-free productivity!

Actions is a sophisticated app for getting things done, but it’s even more powerful if you have Timepage. With Timepage installed, your calendar events will automatically appear in the Schedule screen in Actions so you can see everything in context.  In Timepage, you can see scheduled actions alongside your events. Master your calendar events and your to-dos with the ultimate productivity app duo!


–––MEMBERSHIP–––

Actions is a membership service with a free trial. Download the app free to try it out without restriction or registration.  After the trial period you can choose to purchase a membership which allows unlimited use across all of your devices.

Without an active membership, you can still use the app in read-only mode.

• Unlimited access on all your devices.
• Both monthly and annual options available.

Price may vary by location. Subscriptions will be charged to your iTunes Account at confirmation of purchase. Your subscription will automatically renew unless automatic renewal is turned off at least 24-hours before the end of the current period. Your account will be charged for renewal within 24-hours prior to the end of the current period. You can manage your subscriptions and automatic renewal status in Account Settings after purchase. Any unused portion of the free trial peri​od will be forfeited when you purchase a subscription.

Privacy Policy: https://bonobolabs.com/privacy
Terms of Service: https://bonobolabs.com/terms


–––QUESTIONS?–––

If you’ve got a question or something isn’t working quite right, you can contact us directly from the Menu > Help > Contact Support.
Got a feature idea?  Let us know at https://bonobo.canny.io/actions


–––THANK YOU–––

We have put thousands of hours into creating Actions. We read every single one of your reviews. If you enjoy using Actions please take a minute to leave us a nice review, thank you!",Productivity,Bonobo Pte Ltd,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/actions-to-do-list-organizer/id1227402276?uo=4,4.64364,9468,medication
485247638,Pill Monitor: Drug Minder,"Let Pill Monitor remind you taking pills on time.

Pill Monitor is designed to manage any of your pills/medications, don’t miss taking pills again because of so many things to do or bad memory. Taking pills on time and on same time everyday will be good for your health, Pill Monitor will remind you when it’s time.

Key Features:

⁃ Schedule reminder of your pill.
⁃ Customer reminder time, repeat date and dosage of pills.
⁃ Remind you on time no matter if you are operating this app or not.
⁃ Choose to take, skip or snooze pills when it reminds.
⁃ Chose snooze time if you are not convenient to take pills.
⁃ Check your current reminders and upcoming reminders.
⁃ Eleven different reminder sounds for you to choose for each pill.
⁃ Comprehensive manage your pills’ info: side effects, recommend dosage, units, form, rx number etc.
⁃ Add photos to each pill.
⁃ Keep, add, edit, or delete your pills taken history.
⁃ Add note to pill taken entries.
⁃ No internet connection needed.
⁃ Email pills taken logs to your Drs.
⁃ Migrate Data to pro version by Settings module.
⁃ Supports Apple Watch version.
⁃ Supports Wifi backup & restore.
⁃ Supports Dropbox backup & restore.

If you have any question or suggestion, please send email to our support userfeed@vip.tom.com.",Medical,倩 赵,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/pill-monitor-drug-minder/id485247638?uo=4,3.78571,84,medication
1585858911,Ro,"Welcome to Ro—healthcare designed to help you feel and be your best. 

Through Ro you can connect with Ro-affiliated US-licensed healthcare professionals, 100% online. Get world-class treatments and products for sexual health, fertility, skincare, weight management, and more.

The Ro app puts you in control of your healthcare discreetly and conveniently–whether you’re seeking treatment for erectile dysfunction or hair loss, weight loss or acne, or another health goal that will help you live a more fulfilled life. Download the app today and discover all Ro has to offer to improve your overall health and wellbeing. 

- Reliable, secure, and discreet care—all in one place. 
- High quality customer care, 24 hours a day. 
- Curated content and support through your care journey. 
- Easy access to our entire collection of over-the-counter offerings for everything from daily supplements to hair care products—and much more.
- Real-time order tracking, from the pharmacy to your home. 
- Regular treatment updates: From notifications when your order ships to when you receive a message from your Ro-affiliated provider.",Medical,Roman Health Medical LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/ro/id1585858911?uo=4,4.77281,5414,medication
1157755105,Hospital Dash - Game,"Saving lives: what a beautiful and THRILLING thing to do! Come and become a real HERO in this CHALLENGE against time. Would you help a really busy nurse that has just started working at this new hospital to SCREEN all kinds of PATIENTS and take care of them? Get in real ACTION while you experience this amazing adventure!

You will be responsible for taking care of several patients with different diseases, from a very annoying dirty ear to a serious case of frozen heart, you are the key to their CURE! Watch out for patients with high blood pressure and muscle pain and become a great NURSE!

Be careful: patients will be paying for your services. So you have to take real good care of them!

HIGHLIGHTS
• Lots of different diseases to DIAGNOSE and TREAT
• Manager game that gets trickier level by level
• Minigames spread all over the game for you to have so much fun
• Improve MEDICAL EQUIPMENTS and become even more efficient

It’s an EMERGENCY! Come and play now to save many many lives!

Disclaimer: While this App is completely free to play, some additional content can be purchased for real money in-game. If you do not want to use this feature, please turn off in-app purchases in your device's settings.

Like our page on Facebook and be the first to know about our upcoming games and updates! http://fb.com/tappshq",Games,TPG TECNOLOGIA DA INFORMACAO LTDA,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/hospital-dash-game/id1157755105?uo=4,4.56712,797,medication
1628460004,Human Health: Chronic Illness,"Developed alongside patients, parents, and medical experts at top US hospitals and universities, Human Health is the trusted app for tracking your symptoms and treatments. Use it for yourself or a loved one to gain personalized insights into how your health is changing over time, and easily share this data with your provider to ensure you get the care you deserve.

Say goodbye to endless forms and medical binders. Human Health organizes your health history once, so you can share it effortlessly anytime.

SYMPTOM TRACKER & HEALTH JOURNAL
With over 1,700 symptoms (and more added daily), you can easily monitor how your symptoms change over time and get personalized insights to help you understand what works for you. Attach photos and notes to your symptoms to provide more detailed information to your provider.

MEDICATION REMINDER & TREATMENT PLAN
With over 100,000 treatments in our app - including medications, supplements, therapies, lifestyle changes, and assistive devices, you can create flexible treatment plans that suit your individual needs. Track your medication and treatment adherence alongside your symptom data for deeper insights.

MENTAL HEALTH TRACKER & MOOD JOURNAL
Log mental health symptoms like anxiety, depression, and mood swings. Create journals to track your mental health and see how different interventions impact your well-being.

PROVIDER-READY HEALTH REPORTS
Generate a free 3-month health summary for doctor visits, or upgrade to customize reports for greater flexibility - so you can focus on what matters in your appointments.

ORGANIZE EVERYTHING IN ONE PLACE
Store lab results, scans, and medical records alongside your symptom and treatment data in one app, so you never have to search through scattered information again. Use the timeline feature to see a full summary of your medical history. 

PARENTS & CARERS
Create multiple profiles in Human Health to easily track your own symptoms and treatments, as well as those of the people you care for.

YOUR PRIVACY, OUR PRIORITY
- Your data is encrypted and protected
- You control who sees your health information
- We never sell your personal data
- Delete your data anytime

For more information: https://humanhealth.zendesk.com/hc/en-us
Privacy policy: https://humanhealth.zendesk.com/hc/en-us/articles/17643897206681-Our-Privacy-Policy
For more support: support@human.health

Any insights provided by Human Health do not constitute medical advice. Remember to always consult your doctor before making any medical decisions.

Licence agreement: http://www.apple.com/legal/itunes/appstore/dev/stdeula",Medical,Human Operations Pty Ltd,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/human-health-chronic-illness/id1628460004?uo=4,4.57576,198,medication
1448776934,Medication Tracker - Reminder,"Medication Tracker & Reminder helps you easily manage medications with reminders, track health metrics, and stay organized—for yourself or your loved ones. 

Highly rated by users and featured by Apple in ""Apps We Love Right Now,"" this app is more than just a pill reminder. It’s a complete health journal, medication tracker, and wellness companion—developed by the team behind the award-winning Sprout health apps that have been trusted by families since 2010. Seamlessly log medications, record vital health metrics, and gain meaningful insights to share with your doctor—all private and securely stored and synced with your iCloud.

KEY FEATURES

Never Miss a Dose 
• Personalized, reliable reminders help prevent missed or double doses—keeping you and your loved ones safe and on track.

Track Health Metrics with Ease 
• Monitor blood pressure, glucose, heart rate, weight, symptoms, and more. Visual charts highlight trends so you can better manage changes in health.

Caregiver & Family Sharing 
• Securely share health data, schedules, and activity updates with caregivers or family members—receive real-time alerts when medications are taken and schedules are completed.

Doctor-Ready Reports 
• Generate a detailed medication and health summary PDF from your data entered into the app to support productive medical visits and make informed decisions.

Quick Logging with Siri & Widgets 
• Save time with home screen widgets and voice commands. Log meds and check health stats in seconds.

Create Multiple Profiles
• Manage health profiles for the whole family—perfect for parents, caregivers, and anyone tracking multiple health needs.

Private by Design 
• No account required. Your data stays on your device, syncing privately via iCloud. We never sell or share your information.

All-in-One Health Tracking
• Customizable medication reminders tailored to your schedule 
• Comprehensive tracking for blood pressure, glucose, heart rate, weight, symptoms, and pain 
• Insightful charts and summaries to spot health trends over time 
• Secure sharing with family and caregivers, including real-time activity updates 
• Fast logging with Siri and home screen widgets 
• Support for multiple health profiles in a single account 
• Dark Mode for comfortable viewing at any time

Essential Tools for Managing Conditions Like:
• Diabetes (Type 1 & Type 2) 
• Hypertension (high blood pressure) 
• Heart conditions 
• Chronic illnesses 
• Pain
• General health tracking and wellness

Auto-Renewing Subscriptions, Payments and Cancellation 
If you choose to purchase a Premium subscription, payment will be charged to your Apple ID at confirmation of purchase. Subscriptions automatically renew unless canceled at least 24 hours before the end of the current period. Your account will be charged for renewal within 24 hours before the current period ends. You can manage and cancel your subscription anytime through your App Store account settings.

Terms of Use and Privacy Policy: https://sprout-apps.com/privacy-policy.html

Please note: This app does not provide medical advice, diagnosis, or treatment. Always consult your healthcare provider for any medical concerns.

About Sprout
At Sprout, we create intuitive tools to support individuals and families through every stage of life—whether you're managing health, pregnancy, baby care, or fertility. Explore our family of top-rated apps and make informed decisions with confidence every day.

Need help? Contact us at support@sprout-apps.com.",Medical,Med ART Studios LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/medication-tracker-reminder/id1448776934?uo=4,4.62554,681,medication
301427093,Davis's Drug Guide - Nurses,"Davis’s Drug Guide for Nurses delivers everything you need to administer medications safely across the lifespan.

Includes EXCLUSIVE DrugGuide.com access, regular updates, dosing calculators, Drug of the Week, and more!

DAVIS DRUG GUIDE FEATURES: 
• 1,700+ monographs — covering 5,000+ trade name and generic medications 
• Audio pronunciations — to learn new drug names
• Pill images — to visually confirm drug forms 
• Regular updates — featuring new FDA approvals and prescribing changes
• Critical safety alerts and warnings 
• Highlighted Risk Evaluation and Mitigation Strategies (REMS) 
• Pharmacology, Natural & Herbal, Canadian, and Combination Rx indexes 
• Canadian-specific content, including Canadian trade names and drugs specifically approved for use in Canada
• Ideal for courses in nursing programs covering medications, drug administration and preparation for NCLEX-RN & NCLEX-PN exam. 
• Trusted companion for practicing nurses, physicians & pharmacists.
• Now includes Routine Pediatric and Adult Immunizations appendix which incorporates the most recent recommendations.
• Adverse side effects are now listed in order of most frequent, life threatening and frequent, life threatening, and other side effects.
• A streamlined presentation of the nursing implementation and family teaching sections in the monographs.

EXCLUSIVE UNBOUND MEDICINE FEATURES
• Free access to the DrugGuide.com website (after purchase)
• IV calculators for drips and dosing — fully integrated
• Highlighting and note-taking within entries 
• “Favorites” for bookmarking important entries 
• 'Drug of the Week' Alerts
• Enhanced Search to find Rx medications quickly 

Authors: April Hazard Vallerand, PhD, RN, FAAN; Cynthia A. Sanoski, BS, PharmD, FCCP, BCPS 
Publisher: F.A. Davis 
Powered by: Unbound Medicine

TRIAL / SUBSCRIPTION DETAILS
• New users can access the complete Davis Drug Guide app free for 14 days.
• After 14 days, your iTunes account will be charged $39.99 for a one-year subscription unless you have turned off auto-renew in Account Settings at least 24 hours before the free trial ends.
• At the end of the one-year period, your subscription will automatically renew unless auto-renew is turned off in Account Settings 24 hours prior to the renewal date.
• If you choose not to renew, you will still be able to use the app but will not receive medication updates.

Unbound Medicine Privacy Policy: https://www.unboundmedicine.com/privacy
Unbound Medicine Terms of Use: https://www.unboundmedicine.com/end_user_license_agreement",Medical,"Unbound Medicine, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/daviss-drug-guide-nurses/id301427093?uo=4,4.85852,8319,medication
1296471956,Blood Pressure Tracker BPMate,"Blood Pressure Tracker is a blood pressure app that helps you track and monitor your blood pressure at your convenience. You can log your BP, pulse, weight, blood glucose, blood oxygen, and more. There is also a spot for notes, so you can add whatever additional information you need, like how you are feeling that day that may have an effect on your blood pressure, like tired, stressed, anxious, etc.

The Blood Pressure App also allows you to track your medications. Search from a list of medications, add notes, and include your dosage. This allows you to keep your list of medications with you whether it is for yourself, a loved one or healthcare professional. You can export this list of medications through a report and send to anyone.

This blood pressure app has an unlimited history and will calculate your average for you as well. Keeping track of your blood pressure over a period of time is the best way to ensure good health. Each log will also display the date and time to ensure you know when exactly you took the measurement. Blood Pressure Tracker also syncs with Apple Health to log your blood pressure and pulse data directly to the Health app!

The app also allows you to view graphs and generate custom reports. The graphs allow you to spot trends and the PDF reports allow you to share your data with anyone. You can send via text, email and more. 

Blood Pressure App is your companion app to help you against hypertension! Using a blood pressure app tracker has been shown to be effective in managing blood pressure.",Medical,App Sub 1 LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/blood-pressure-tracker-bpmate/id1296471956?uo=4,4.67394,14255,medication
944362852,CVS Specialty,"Please Note: This app is for CVS Specialty® patients only. You must have a CVS Specialty prescription in order to use this app

Your health is our greatest priority. That’s why at CVS Specialty, we make it easy to manage your prescriptions at home or on the go.
 
With the CVS Specialty mobile app, you can:
· Order refills
· Choose to pick-up your prescriptions at any CVS Pharmacy® where allowed by law, or have them delivered to another location of your choice. 
· Track your order status
· Make fast and easy payments
· Communicate with your CareTeam using the Secure Messaging feature. Ask a question and get answers from CareTeam members trained in your condition. All messages are secure and confidential
You can sign-in securely through iPhone’s Touch ID or FACE ID (iPhone X).
 
We’re always just a tap away.  CVS Specialty – specialty medications with personalized support.

We release updates to this app regularly and base our roadmap on your feedback.",Medical,CVS Pharmacy,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/cvs-specialty/id944362852?uo=4,4.4695,1853,medication
998560520,Blink Health Lowest Rx Prices,"Blink Health is the App for Amazingly Inexpensive Prescription Drug Prices™. Just pay in the app to save, then pick up at a pharmacy nearby. Or get free delivery.


SAME MEDICATION, WAY LOWER PRICES
Prescription drugs don’t have to be outrageously expensive. By removing the middlemen, Blink Health can offer you the exact same FDA-approved medication, at way lower prices — including the guaranteed lowest prices on generic drugs. 

Here are all the details on our Price Match Guarantee on generic drugs: https://blinkhealth.com/price-match-guarantee

FREE PICKUP AT LOCAL PHARMACIES OR GET FREE DELIVERY
Blink is free to use and is accepted at 35,000 US pharmacies, including major chains like Walmart, Kroger, Costco, Safeway, Albertsons, Osco, Harris Teeter, Smith’s, Giant and many more. Most neighborhood drug stores also accept Blink. Or have your medication delivered free.


NOW PRESCRIBING ONLINE
Blink connects you with board-certified doctors to help you get prescribed online for select medications in as little as 24 hours. You can get started in 5 minutes from the comfort and privacy of your own home. Restrictions apply. See website for full details.

FEATURED IN THE MEDIA
We’ve been featured on NBC Nightly News, The New York Times, Fox News, The Today Show, CBS This Morning, Fortune Magazine, and many others, and have received awards for both our apps and our service. 

TRUSTED BY DOCTORS + THE BBB
We are also recommended by doctors around the country to help their patients save on medications. We have an A+ rating from the Better Business Bureau (BBB), and we are verified by the National Association Boards of Pharmacy®’s (NABP®) dot-pharmacy program: https://nabp.pharmacy/initiatives/dot-pharmacy/  As always, your doctor or medical professional will need to provide a prescription in order for you to fill at the pharmacy.

HUMANS FIRST™
Blink is committed to lowering Rx prices for all Americans. The more people who join the Blink Health Nation, the better we can negotiate our overall prices. Our patients save an average of $70 per prescription.*

OUR CUSTOMERS SAY IT BEST:

“You know about things being too good to be true? Blink Health is that exception. It is too good and it is true.“ — Ray S, Texas

“Blink certainly saved me this week! A $280.00 Rx quickly became $19.90! Thank you, Blink!” — Kaye W, South Carolina

“I am a diabetic and without Blink there is no way I could afford all my meds. Now I can purchase what I need and still buy food for my family.” — Mary B, Texas

“We use this for customers in our pharmacy who can't afford certain medications or are paying out of pocket. 99% of the time there is a significant savings!” — Eve P, Florida

LOWEST RX PRICES, EVERY DAY™ 
Blink is not insurance, and there are no commitments. From losartan to omeprazole, rosuvastatin to venlafaxine, finasteride to sildenafil (active ingredient in Viagra), atorvastatin to duloxetine to gabapentin, or any of the other 15,000 medications available, just search for your Rx and get a discount on the meds you need, when you need them.

WHAT THE PRESS SAYS:

“Will save you money and is worth checking out.” — New York Magazine

“The company is changing lives in just a few easy steps.” — Fox New York

“A cure for high drug costs.” — Financial Times

“An e-commerce based solution to one of America’s most persistent and controversial medical problems: The staggering cost of prescription drugs.” — Fortune

VISIT US AT: https://blinkhealth.com
SUPPORT: https://blinkhealth.com/contact-us/
TERMS OF USE: https://blinkhealth.com/legal/terms-of-use

*Blink is not insurance. Any savings claims made by Blink are based on U.S. retail prices without prescription drug coverage. $70 average savings based on survey of 465 customers.",Medical,Blink Health Core Ltd,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/blink-health-lowest-rx-prices/id998560520?uo=4,4.42303,799,medication
1269187117,Spotlight,"Spotlight by Scene Health (previously emocha Health) puts your health front and center to help you kickstart better medication management. For life.

Easy-to-use, fun, and free!

Log into Spotlight by Scene Health to:
+ Receive daily medication reminders
+ Submit video check-ins and report side effects or symptoms
+ Get access to a care team of pharmacists, nurses, and health coaches, every day
+ Track your personal progress

Validation & Awards:
+ We're backed by science, our approach has been proven in over 18 research papers
+ CB Insights recognized Scene as a top 150 company in digital health
+ Fast Company recognized Scene as a top 10 most innovative company in health

About Scene Health:
Scene Health helps patients take every dose of medication properly to improve their health. We’re a diverse team of designers, technologists, researchers, nurses, coaches, and pharmacists committed to helping people with chronic and infectious diseases get better faster. Our CDC-endorsed model has been embraced by hundreds of customers across the healthcare landscape, including health departments, health systems, and health plans.

Since 2014 we’ve supported patients with a range of conditions, including asthma, diabetes, hypertension, hepatitis C virus, tuberculosis, and HIV. We’ve also helped employers keep their workplaces and communities safe through outbreak symptoms monitoring. We’ve proven that with the right knowledge, tools, and support, improved health and better outcomes are possible.",Medical,emocha Mobile Health Inc,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/spotlight/id1269187117?uo=4,4.21053,19,medication
847597596,Medication Reminder & Refills,"MedicaApp reminds you to take your medications at the right time, and organizes medical scripts for you and the people you care for.

This is what you just need to take your overwhelming meds on time. You will love its ease, functionality, gorgeous graphics, and subtle animations. Download the awards-winning medication reminder and medical scripts manager app!

Awarded 5 times by prestigious names including the United Nations... all those cannot be wrong!

FEATURES

• Beautiful, easy, and user friendly medication reminder
• Diverse medication scheduling: Hourly, Daily, Weekly, and Monthly
• Support for 17 medication types with gorgeous images
• Capturing medication images with camera
• Recording doctor's medical instructions in audio 
• Usable medication reminders with notifications and badges
• Doctor followup appointment reminders 
• Tracking medication taking history
• Customizable reminder settings
• Many more...

PREMIUM

When you upgrade to premium, you get...

• Unlimited number of patients to care for
• Unlimited number of scripts to manage
• Access to full settings (custom reminder tones, followup reminder times,...)
• No ads

Throw your pillbox and old fashioned medical watch, and get MedicaApp to have peace of mind.

This is the pill reminder app you were looking for. Download now and never forget a medication again!

---

Facebook
https://www.facebook.com/MedicaApp

Twitter
https://twitter.com/MedicaApp",Medical,Irwaa for Software Application & Information Technology,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/medication-reminder-refills/id847597596?uo=4,4.26335,262,medication
395545555,CVS Health,"Staying healthy. Saving time. Spending less. The CVS Health® app makes them all easier. Here’s how: 

Checking out. Easier.
• Save with ExtraCare® and pick up prescriptions with a single scan (just tap “In-Store”).

Saving money. Easier.
• Get app-only deals and access all of your offers and rewards when you link your ExtraCare® card. 
• Make sure you never miss a deal by opting in to notifications. Get prescription and order updates too. 
• Plan out your shopping and saving with the weekly ad for your local store.

Getting prescriptions. Easier. 
• Scan your barcode for faster prescription pickup once you attach a payment and signature.
• Pay for your medications and have them delivered.
• Order refills, check their status and see your prescription history.
• Check drug interactions and information. 

Caring for your health. Easier.
• Schedule vaccines for you and your family at a nearby CVS Pharmacy® or MinuteClinic®.
• Video chat with a health care provider 24 hours a day, 7 days a week.
• Find a nearby MinuteClinic® for general care and clinical services. 
• View wait times and schedule a clinic visit (restrictions apply). 
• Check available health care services and insurance coverage.

Printing photos. Easier. 
• Order prints and more from your device and online albums for same-day pickup (select stores and products). 

Privacy Policy: https://www.cvs.com/retail/help/privacy_policy
WA Consumer Health Privacy Policy: https://www.cvs.com/retail/help/WA_consumer_health_privacy_policy

Please note: Continued use of GPS running in background can decrease battery life.",Shopping,CVS Pharmacy,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/cvs-health/id395545555?uo=4,4.72308,1514736,medicine
1099445683,Heart's Medicine: Time to Heal,"From the creators of Delicious and Fabulous comes a new game that will make you fall in love! GameHouse introduces Heart’s Medicine Time to Heal – a time management game that combines the action of hospital games with a captivating love story! 

It’s a romantic medical drama like you haven’t seen before in Grey’s Anatomy, ER or General Hospital! Role play as the aspiring surgeon Allison Heart in one of the best simulation games yet, and battle feelings between a blooming love with Daniel, Head of the Hospital, and Connor, an old flame. Just like a real love story, our drama is not without its twists and turns! When Daniel suddenly has a terrible accident, Allison rushes to save his life! This is where Heart’s game begins.

Become a doctor in this hospital simulation game!
Take care of patients and perform virtual surgery in this surgery simulator game. Heart’s Medicine is a thrilling online RPG game that brings the doctor’s office to life! Whether you’re in search of kids doctor games for girls or life simulation games, you’ll enjoy this one!

Develop your time management skills and save lives!
If you’re a fan of online time management games then you’ll LOVE Time to Heal! This time game has it all – challenging levels, stimulating storyline, exciting role playing and much more!

Be part of a whirlwind romance!
Can’t get enough of romantic love stories? Time to Heal is one of the most moving love games online. 

Enjoy the 2nd Season of Heart’s Medicine:
- Help Allison heal patients and enjoy light-hearted moments with lots of fun game characters
- 60 story levels, plus 30 challenge levels
- 18 never-before-seen mini-games – these cool games will entertain you for months!
- Guest-starring Delicious’ Emily – run the hospital diner and get a taste of the award-winning cooking games
- Collect trophies & diamonds to get decorations for the new hospital wing and more features!

Ready for a true love game that takes playing doctor to a whole other level? It’s game time!

Subscribe to Gamehouse Original Stories for unlimited access to all the best story games!

More about GameHouse Original Stories subscriptions:
- You can subscribe to play this game and all other GameHouse Original Stories games without Ads.
- GameHouse Original Stories offers a choice of one subscription: monthly
- Monthly subscriptions will be charged at $9.99/month*
- You will be able to access unlimited stories for the duration of your subscription
- Payment will be charged to your iTunes Account at confirmation of purchase
- Subscriptions automatically renew unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24 hours before the end of the current period
- Account will be charged for renewal up to 24 hours prior to the end of the current period
- Subscriptions may be managed by the user, and auto-renewal may be turned off by going to the user's Account Settings after purchase
- No cancellation of the current subscription is allowed during the active subscription period
- Any unused portion of a free trial period, if offered, will be forfeited when the user purchases a subscription to that publication, where applicable

* Prices are equal to the value that ""Apple's App Store Matrix"" determines is the equivalent subscription price in $USD

By using GameHouse Original Stories, you agree to our Terms of Service and Privacy Policy.

Terms of Service: https://www.gamehouseoriginalstories.com/static/terms-of-service.html
Privacy Policy: https://www.gamehouseoriginalstories.com/static/privacy-policy.html",Games,Gamehouse LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/hearts-medicine-time-to-heal/id1099445683?uo=4,4.72929,11200,medicine
1442290209,MyNM by Northwestern Medicine,"See your medical records, schedule a visit, message your care team, find a healthcare professional, and more with the Northwestern Medicine app for iOS.   

The MyNM app is a secure app for patients powered by MyChart. With MyNM, you can: 

Manage Your Health: 

• See your health information and lab results 
• Securely message your physician and care team. 
• Schedule new appointments 
• Request prescription refills 
• View statements and pay your bill 
• Track your health and fitness when enrolled in self-tracking programs. 

Find Care 

• Search healthcare professionals by specialty, insurance carrier, language preferences and more. 
• View profiles for over 4,000 Northwestern Medicine physicians. 
• See nearby Northwestern Medicine locations, including Emergency Departments and Immediate Care Centers. 

Access Visitor Resources 

• View parking and transportation options 
• Access hospital maps and view on-site amenities 
• View nearby hotels and lodging",Medical,NORTHWESTERN MEMORIAL HEALTHCARE,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/mynm-by-northwestern-medicine/id1442290209?uo=4,2.69694,2059,medicine
722804810,Gopuff - Food & Drink Delivery,"Thousands of items – delivered faster than you’d ever expect. Gopuff is your personal teleportation device, bringing you everything you need in as fast as 15 minutes. From groceries and alcohol to home care products and more, Gopuff has you covered. We cut out the middleman, so what you see on Gopuff is what you get. That means no substitutions, no markups, and no service fees.

From early ‘til late, we’ll take care of your weekly groceries, daily meals, and even your midnight cravings. With many locations operating 24/7, you can order and get back to relaxing, no matter what time of day. Simply open the app, tap on what you want, and find it at your door in as fast as 15 minutes. Why so fast? Because of our strategically placed Micro Fulfillment Centers, we are able to complete your order within minutes of you placing it.

The best part? New customers get 50% off their first order with code: WELCOME. Max discount $20. T&C apply. 

KEY FEATURES
- Lightning fast delivery
- Real-time tracking
- Contactless delivery
- Flexible payment options
- Access to Insane Weekly Deals

GROCERIES MADE EASY
- Unbeatable pricing on 300+ fresh grocery items
- Get high-quality meat and seafood delivered straight to your door
- Add your EBT card and shop SNAP-eligible products at unbeatable prices 

YOUR FAVORITE ITEMS
- Shop big-name brands and local favorites, without the markups
- Prepare for your next party – Cheese and charcuterie, paper towels, cleaning supplies, and more delivered in no time
- With over 500 micro-fulfillment centers, we’re able to deliver your favorite products in over 1000+ cities**
- Seamlessly check out with your preferred payment method – credit card, debit card, Apple Pay, Venmo, or SNAP EBT

JOIN THE FAM FOR EXTRA SAVINGS & FREE DELIVERY
- Gopuff FAM members get even “lower than low” prices on everyday essentials like $2 organic eggs, milk, paper towels, and more. FAM members save an average of $25 per month ($300/year)
- Discover Insane Weekly Deals of up to 60% off dropping every Monday, exclusively for members
- Gopuff FAM members pay $0 delivery fees on every order, any time of day

SHOP YOUR FAVORITE BRANDS
- Lay’s, Reese’s, Tito’s and more. Find local and well-known names all across Gopuff to order what you want
- Starbucks is now available 24/7 for select Philadelphia areas. Coffee lovers can now order their favorite lattes and specialty beverages on Gopuff
- BevMo! customers can enjoy unparalleled liquor and wine selection delivered in as fast as 15 minutes by Gopuff in California, Arizona and Washington

AWESOME CUSTOMER SERVICE
- No bots here! Our Gopuff Customer Service representatives are human
- We hope to deliver your order just right, but just in case it’s not exactly what you expected, you can always give our team a call
- Get what you need, how you expect it. We got you covered

FIND GOPUFF NEAR YOU
Gopuff has hundreds of micro-fulfillment centers, plus BevMo! and Liquor Barn Stores. We also serve 1,000+ cities. Find us in Los Angeles, San Francisco, New York City, Philadelphia, Chicago, Austin, San Diego, Houston, Seattle, Miami, and many more across the United States!**

Download Gopuff today, join the FAM, and get everything you need delivered to your doorstep – in as fast as 15 minutes.

* Beer, wine, liquor, and fresh groceries available in select markets. Must be 21 to purchase alcohol. Please drink responsibly.

** Gopuff is not available in all markets–but you never know. Want us where you are? Find us on social @gopuff or visit gopuff.com for more.",Food & Drink,GoPuff LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/gopuff-food-drink-delivery/id722804810?uo=4,4.79277,232547,medicine
1202829925,Heart's Medicine Hospital Heat,"Enjoy this game for FREE – or unlock ALL GameHouse games with unlimited play and no ads by signing up for a GameHouse Subscription!

Your favorite doctor Allison is back in a gripping hospital time management game that you'll never forget! And neither will she...   

- PLAY THE EAGERLY AWAITED SEQUEL to Heart's Medicine - Time to Heal and join your favorite doctor on a breathtaking new adventure
- BECOME A DOCTOR in 60 captivating time management levels and 30 extra challenge stages
- DISCOVER 23 MINI-GAMES and perform special treatments, like filling lungs with oxygen, focusing readouts and removing negative emotions
- WITNESS A MEDICAL DRAMA filled with romance, friendship, drama, and life-changing decisions
- UPGRADE THE HOSPITAL by completing levels and earning new equipment across 6 heated chapters
- CATCH UP WITH THE CAST and find out what's been going down with all your favorite characters from Little Creek Hospital
- COMPLETE SPECIAL CHALLENGES and collect diamonds to decorate Allison's apartment
- ENJOY MANY EXTRAS like competing against your friends in an endless level

Ready to find out what drama Heart's Medicine - Hospital Heat will bring our beloved doctor? 

This season picks up right after the previous compelling adventure. Things finally seem to have calmed down at Little Creek Hospital... 

But not for long! When Allison receives a phone call from her mother, she doesn't know what to think. She hasn't seen her mom in over 20 years! Why would she contact Allison after all this time? And what could she want? With no other choice than to face her past, in order to discover her future, will Allison have the strength to cope with everything that’s happened and all that is yet to come? There's only one way to find out... 

Help Allison face her tragic past in this fiery hospital time management game!   

Try the first few levels for free! The full complement of levels can be unlocked with an in-app purchase.

Follow Allison on Facebook:
https://www.facebook.com/heartsmedicinegame/

Enjoy more GameHouse Original Stories, and try our other games:
- Heart's Medicine - Time to Heal
- Delicious - Emily's Christmas Carol
- Delicious - Emily's Message in a Bottle
- Fabulous - Angela's High School Reunion
- Fabulous - Angela's Fashion Fever
- Dr. Cares - Pet Rescue 911
- Mary le Chef - Cooking Passion

Subscribe to Gamehouse Original Stories for unlimited access to all the best story games!

More about GameHouse Original Stories subscriptions:
- You can subscribe to play this game and all other GameHouse Original Stories games without Ads.
- GameHouse Original Stories offers a choice of one subscription: monthly
- Monthly subscriptions will be charged at $9.99/month*
- You will be able to access unlimited stories for the duration of your subscription
- Payment will be charged to your iTunes Account at confirmation of purchase
- Subscriptions automatically renew unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24 hours before the end of the current period
- Account will be charged for renewal up to 24 hours prior to the end of the current period
- Subscriptions may be managed by the user, and auto-renewal may be turned off by going to the user's Account Settings after purchase
- No cancellation of the current subscription is allowed during the active subscription period
- Any unused portion of a free trial period, if offered, will be forfeited when the user purchases a subscription to that publication, where applicable

* Prices are equal to the value that ""Apple's App Store Matrix"" determines is the equivalent subscription price in $USD

By using GameHouse Original Stories, you agree to our Terms of Service and Privacy Policy.

Terms of Service: https://www.gamehouseoriginalstories.com/static/terms-of-service.html
Privacy Policy: https://www.gamehouseoriginalstories.com/static/privacy-policy.html",Games,Gamehouse LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/hearts-medicine-hospital-heat/id1202829925?uo=4,4.78146,9115,medicine
409625068,Instant Heart Rate: HR Monitor,"Most accurate and easy-to-use heart rate app
- Used in heart research at UCSF!
- Get your heart rate in less than 10 seconds
- Check your stress levels
- See trends and insights

Just featured in Apple's new TV Ad “Strength” - use your iPhone to find out your heart rate in less than 10 seconds! 

You DON’T need a dedicated heart rate monitor to get your pulse, download Instant Heart Rate today and use your camera’s flash to see how healthy you are!

With over 35 million users, the award-winning Instant Heart Rate app is all over the web.

Featured in: CNN, The New York Times, Chicago Tribune, The Guardian, and many more.

#1 Heart Rate app in United States
#1 Heart Rate app in Japan
#1 Heart Rate app in United Kingdom
#1 Heart Rate app in Australia
#1 Heart Rate app in Germany
#1 Heart Rate app in France
#1 Heart Rate app in China
#1 Heart Rate app in Russia
#1 Heart Rate app in Canada
… and many more.

Instant Heart Rate is continuously rated as the world’s best mobile heart rate measurement app and is trusted by Stanford’s leading cardiologists for use in clinical trials.

---------------------

* Place the tip of your index finger on the iPhone’s camera, and in a couple of seconds, your pulse will be shown!

* Instant Heart Rate detects a color change in your finger tip each time your heart beats and uses an advanced algorithm to show you your heart rate.

* A real-time chart will show you every heartbeat, similar to pulse oximeters used in hospitals.

---------------------

MAIN FEATURES:

√  Heart rate measurement  

√  Heart Rate Activity Zone Calculator

√  Pulse waveform graphs

√  Real-time photoplethysmogram (PPG) graph
 
√  Continuous or Auto-Stop mode 

√  Unlimited data storage and tags
 
√  Export data for registered users
 
√  StandUp test for fatigue and fitness testing

√  Sharing to Twitter and Facebook

√  Apple Health App Support (Instant Heart Rate Settings -> Health App Sharing)

-------------------------

Upgrade to Premium to receive unlimited access to Premium Programs and Playpen Freeplay workouts, HD videos, dynamic and motivational audio, workout email summaries with tips and advice on healthy living, priority support, and more through renewable iTunes subscription.

We offer auto-renewing subscriptions with the following specifications:
- Subscriptions are 1 month or 12 months long
- Subscriptions are $9.99 USD per month or $59.99 USD per year.
- Payment will be charged to iTunes Account at confirmation of purchase
- Subscription automatically renews unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24-hours before the end of the current period
- Account will be charged for renewal within 24-hours prior to the end of the current period, and identify the cost of the renewal
- Subscriptions may be managed by the user and auto-renewal may be turned off by going to the user's Account Settings after purchase
- No cancellation of the current subscription is allowed during active subscription period
- Any unused portion of a free trial period, if offered, will be forfeited when the user purchases a subscription to that publication.

Our Privacy Policy and Terms of Use: http://instantheartrate.com/privacy-policy-and-terms-of-use

NOTE: Make sure that your fingertip completely covers the camera lens. Press gently, since pressing too hard reduces blood flow in your finger and it's harder to get a result. Make sure that your fingers are not cold. This app is for recreational and fitness use only!


* NOT INTENDED FOR MEDICAL USE, FOR FITNESS USE ONLY

""Continued use of GPS running in the background can dramatically decrease battery life.""
 
From our heart to yours,  

Instant Heart Rate Team",Health & Fitness,"Bodymatter, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/instant-heart-rate-hr-monitor/id409625068?uo=4,4.86013,227358,medicine
1229980792,Heart's Medicine - Doctor Game,"Discover a world of games in our exclusive app GameHouse Original Stories. You can choose to play with ads, purchase them individually or take out a subscription.

Become a doctor in this romantic medical story driven time management drama game with aspiring hospital intern Allison Heart!

Heart's Medicine - Doctor's Oath is an intense medical drama tied to a time management game that’ll move you to tears. It's a different take on the dash game and is related to Emily Delicious cooking time management games. This heart's Medicine game has a gripping storyline, beautiful music, amazing artwork and animation, cool addictive gameplay and an insane amount of heart. No you run your hospital as virtual doctor! Help diagnose, operate and treat patients today!

If you love to play doctor games, story-driven cooking games, dash / food games and restaurant games with great storytelling then this time management game is for you!

- In this game you experience the life of a doctor as you rush to find a cure for an unknown disease and often need rush to operate now!
- Your search for a cure and the game will take you through eight exciting new hospital wards with fun time management game levels, from the Clinic to the Laboratory.
- Play the full game with no extra charges, thanks to our free-to-play games model. 
- More time management game levels to play than ever before! Enjoy 400+ game levels, with more game levels to come!
- So many extras! Unlock the games story scenes, level up your doctor character to earn helpful bonuses, and get the game upgrades your craving for
- Like other Heart's Medicine games you can party with Oliver and his guinea pig friends, Punky and Olive.
- Master new mini-games like a true doctor, all in medical style.
- Diagnose patients and earn hearts to level up your score
- Additional game levels will be added in the future, giving you even MORE of the game you love!

Follow Allison as she begins her last rotations as an intern at Queensburrow Bridge Hospital, on her path to graduating as a fully-fledged doctor! Unfortunately, things never go smoothly for Allison, and this game is no exception. Dr. Ermey, the lead physician during her clinic rotation, seems to have it in for her, and threatens to fail her. Allison ends up watching her chances of becoming a doctor shrink by the minute, desperately searching for a solution, but unable to find one. Are you ready for this hospital adventure?
However, everything gets put on hold when a patient with a mysterious disease and fever is admitted to the hospital. Several doctors end up becoming infected themselves, including Connor, Sophia… and Dr. Ermey. When the CDC quarantines Queensburrow, it’s a race against time for Allison and the other doctors to find a cure before more deaths occur. 
In this game your assistance will be invaluable to Allison as she tries to beat the clock and find a cure in time! This game wil let you experience love, intense game action, realistic time management drama, crazy funny story moments and the beauty of celebrating life which is unique for these kind of games.

For all fans of cooking games, romance games, story games, food games, time management restaurant games, Heart's Medicine - Doctor's Oath is a whole new exciting experience.

*NEW!* Enjoy all GameHouse Original Stories with a subscription! As long as you’re a member, you can play all of your favourite story games. Relive past stories and fall in love with new ones. It’s all possible with a GameHouse Original Stories subscription. Subscribe today!

By using GameHouse Original Stories, you agree to our Terms of Service and Privacy Policy.
- Subscription Terms: https://api.gamehouseoriginalstories.com/renderer/legal/subscription-terms
- Terms of Service: https://www.gamehouseoriginalstories.com/static/terms-of-service.html
- Privacy Policy: https://www.gamehouseoriginalstories.com/static/privacy-policy.html",Games,Gamehouse LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/hearts-medicine-doctor-game/id1229980792?uo=4,4.69309,10394,medicine
1440687165,myPennMedicine,"The myPennMedicine app offers Penn Medicine patients easy, secure access to your personal medical records. An on-the-go connection to the information you need most: test results, referrals, prescribed medications and refill requests, appointment scheduling and more including syncing your Apple Health compatible tracking device to myPennMedicine. You can also communicate with your care team through secure messaging in the myPennMedicine app. Learn more at myPennMedicine.org.
 
Penn Medicine hospitals are ranked among the top hospitals in the country by U.S. News & World Report and recognized as among the Philadelphia region’s best health care. Learn more at PennMedicine.org.",Medical,The Trustees of the University of Pennsylvania,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/mypennmedicine/id1440687165?uo=4,4.70986,3495,medicine
1036175909,APPatient,"Welcome to APPatient™, the end-to-end patient engagement app created for Modernizing Medicine® patients and providers.

APPatient™ is a mobile, fully-functional patient engagement app that can help both patients and providers save time. Patients can access telehealth and information, and push notifications can keep them up to date on primary medical concerns.  Practices with Premium Patient Connect can take advantage of 24-hour online check-in, expediting intake paperwork. It can also help providers treat patients on the go.

APPatient Patient Benefits:

- Chat allows you to communicate with your healthcare team.
- Request prescription refills from your phone.
- Access your medical records on the go.

APPatient Provider Benefits:

- Allows patients to access their healthcare records directly.
- Communicate with patients.
- Access patient information stored in EMA® from your phone.
- Lab and test results can be accessed by patients.
- Use your existing Patient Portal username and password to log in. 

For log in assistance, please contact your physician’s office.",Medical,"Modernizing Medicine, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/appatient/id1036175909?uo=4,4.12453,15177,medicine
711449645,Boiron Medicine Finder,"Boiron's Homeopathic Medicine Finder helps you choose the best homeopathic medicines to relieve your symptoms. In three easy clicks, find your recommended medicine, its purpose and dosage, and other useful lifestyle tips. In addition, you can quickly find the nearest Boiron retailer location, download coupons, and learn more about homeopathy.",Medical,"Boiron, Inc",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/boiron-medicine-finder/id711449645?uo=4,4.5838,358,medicine
1203051672,Deployed Medicine,"Deployed Medicine is an innovative learning service developed to supplement the medical education and training of U.S. military personnel, although some of the medical content could be broadly applied for use by civilian medical providers. The information contained in this app is designed to serve as a supplementary resource to reinforce prior training, and to help you deliver high quality trauma care in deployed settings.

The medical content currently focuses on tactical combat casualty care (TCCC) training for combat medical personnel, and includes topics, such as hemorrhage control, airway management, hypothermia, pain control and care of wounds and splinting etc. TCCC focuses of providing the information you need to know to assess, treat and stabilize a patient at the point of injury.

Additional content will be added over time to cover a broad range of military trauma training resources ranging from the most basic training, suitable for non-medical military personnel, and more advanced material for doctors, nurses and physicians assistants.

Features:

• Pocket Guides offer short and compact learning modules.
• Videos from peers teach you “how-to” perform a skill in under 3 minutes, and other information.
• Podcasts provide key updates from experts.
• Reference Repository contains important reference materials or the “why” behind the techniques and information being taught.
• The app is designed to work online and offline to accommodate use in the field and while traveling abroad.
• In app alerts will keep you up-to-date and connected to the latest information.

The Deployed Medicine app was created by a multidisciplinary team of medical, learning and software engineers in close collaboration with U.S. military experts. All medical content contained in this app was reviewed and approved by the Committee on Tactical Combat Casualty Care, which is composed of trauma experts from across the U.S. Army, Navy, Air Force and Marines.

The Deployed Medicine app is a research and development effort sponsored by the Defense Health Agency in Falls Church, Virginia.",Medical,Allogy Interactive LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/deployed-medicine/id1203051672?uo=4,5.0,4,medicine
1381440520,Weill Cornell Medicine,"If you are already a patient of a Weill Cornell Medicine physician, log in to the app using your Weill Cornell Connect account and take advantage of these helpful features:
• Communicate with your physician: Get answers to your medical questions directly on your device.
• Manage your appointments: Schedule your next appointment, or view details of your past and upcoming appointments.
• eCheck-in: Save time and conveniently check-in electronically for your upcoming appointment.
• Access your test results: View your results and your physician's comments within days.
• Request prescription refills: Send a refill request for any of your refillable medications
• Bill Pay: View and pay your bill quickly and securely.
• Review your health summary: View a convenient summary of important information in your health record.

*Healthkit*
With your permission, the app can connect to the Apple Health App and obtain health information that can be shared with your healthcare providers.

We do not share your health information with Apple Health or other third-party applications.",Medical,Weill Medical College of Cornell University,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/weill-cornell-medicine/id1381440520?uo=4,3.38095,42,medicine
519076558,Blood Pressure Tracker SmartBP,"SmartBP® is a blood pressure app that enables you to log, monitor, evaluate, and share BP reports using iOS devices and Apple Watch. In addition, SmartBP connects with Apple Health. With your health information at your fingertips, you can now take a more active role in your own health. For those with prehypertension or hypertension, SmartBP can assist in monitoring progress, identifying trends, and managing all your blood pressure and heart measurements, ultimately aiming to enhance your overall heart health and blood pressure. SmartBP is a smarter way to manage your blood pressure measurements and track your progress.

Disclaimer: 
1) SmartBP al­lows you to record, track and an­a­lyze trends in your blood pres­sure. You can ei­ther man­u­al­ly en­ter your records or use a blood pres­sure mon­i­tor to sync with SmartBP through Apple Health. SmartBP alone does not mea­sure blood pres­sure. You need a sep­a­rate blood pres­sure mon­i­tor to mea­sure blood pres­sure.

2) SmartBP is NOT a substitute for a doctor or professional healthcare or advice. Any health related information provided is for informational purposes only and should not be used to replace the advice of healthcare professionals.

3) SmartBP Cloud Sync is not a replacement for backing up your health data. While we strive for the highest data security, no measures can ensure 100% protection. Regular data backups are the user's responsibility.

For information on how to use the app, visit our website 
* Video: www.smartbp.app
* FAQ: www.smartbp.app/faq 

Features- 

- Log your systolic, diastolic blood pressure, pulse rate and weight. Body mass index (BMI), pulse pressure (PP) and mean arterial pressure (MAP) is automatically calculated. You can manually enter measurements or seamlessly sync them with a supported Bluetooth BP monitors such as:
* A&D 
* Omron 
* Beurer
* Transtek

- Quickly add notes (e.g. before dinner) and measurement information (e.g. sitting, left arm) using tags. 

- Store and access all your blood pressure measurements anywhere and anytime using Apple HealthKit. Avoid manual data entry and reduce errors by automatically uploading blood pressure measurements to HealthKit by auto-syncing with SmartBP. The following Blood Pressure Monitor Apps can connect to HealthKit (check for compatibility with different models): 
* A&D 
* Omron 
* QardioArm
* iHealth
* Withings

- Share your blood pressure information with your doctor, healthcare provider or family using email, text message (SMS), Apple HealthKit. Create blood pressure reports in PDF format with blood pressure data, charts and stats and share with your doctor or healthcare provider. 

- View 7, 14, 30 day summary grouped by daily AM/PM averages and tags. Create, share and print summary PDF reports and CSV file.

- Print PDF reports or charts directly

- Analyze your progress through clear graphs and statistics (including mean and variability). Filter data using tags to assess lifestyle changes or medication effectiveness. Compare tagged graphs side by side and observe systolic vs. diastolic blood pressure correlations.

- Track your Heart Rate trends

- Sync ECG records

- Back up your health data and access it on all your mobile devices with SmartBP Cloud.  This is an optional service. We do not sell your health data.

- Sync directly between iPhone and iPad through Bluetooth or WiFi without sharing on the cloud.

- Back up blood pressure data by exporting to Dropbox, and Drive, or import from CSV files into the app.

- Protect your data with TouchID, FaceID or Pin keypad protection.

- Set medication reminders & track effectiveness.

- Intuitive color coded data to identify normal, prehypertensive, stage I and II hypertension. These limits can be modified. Categorize your records based on 2017 ACA/AHA, 2023 ESC/ESH or create your own custom categories.

- Create multiple user profiles and manage them from a single app/device.

- US and international height and weight units supported.",Medical,"Evolve Medical Systems, LLC",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/blood-pressure-tracker-smartbp/id519076558?uo=4,4.50241,47425,medicine
1436498146,Heart's Medicine - Season One,"Enjoy this game for FREE – or unlock ALL GameHouse games with unlimited play and no ads by signing up for a GameHouse Subscription!

Go back to the beginning of Allison Heart's epic story to become a doctor

Assist med school student Allison Heart as she starts her career as a doctor in a hospital in small-town America! A game that follow the story of a girl who becomes an unwitting hero.

Sharpen your medical skills in Heart’s Medicine – Season One, the prequel to the exciting hospital game Heart’s Medicine - Time to Heal. Work alongside Doctor Heart as she goes from inexperienced girl to expert surgeon at Little Creek Hospital. Feel the adrenaline rush as you try to diagnose, treat, operate on and cure all patients in time. Can you keep up with this fast-paced time management story game?

As a little girl, Allison watched her father die. Then, a few years ago, Allison assisted at the scene of a horrible accident. That’s when she realized she had to go to medical school. Now she’s back at Little Creek Hospital, a hometown girl ready to start her dream job as a doctor. But then the dream meets the reality of hospital life…

Not all patients are easy to handle, not all diseases are treatable and not all dreams come true. What’s crucial is that Allison learns to accept her duties as a doctor. She will need to concentrate on the injuries and health of her patients, doing what she can to ease their suffering. Luckily, she has a lifeline in the form of great colleagues, who are more than willing to help her on her way.

Besides the emergencies she faces as an intern, Allison will also need to navigate the choppy waters of the romance game. Not one, but TWO handsome doctors vie for her attentions. Will this lead to complications?

- Complete the amazing Heart’s Medicine series on your mobile device!

- Get to know the talented doctors of Little Creek Hospital

- Heal patients through 60 levels and an extra 30 challenge levels

- Play exciting interactive mini games

- Enjoy a riveting story full of love, friendship and drama

- Be part of a story game that over 10 million girls have loved

Try the first few levels for free! Then choose to unlock the full game with an in-app purchase, or subscribe for a free trial of our subscription plan!

*NEW!* Enjoy all GameHouse Original Stories with a subscription! As long as you’re a member, you can play all of your favorite story games. Relive past stories and fall in love with new ones. It’s all possible with a GameHouse Original Stories subscription. Subscribe today!

More about GameHouse Original Stories subscriptions:
- You can subscribe to play this game and all other GameHouse Original Stories games without Ads.
- GameHouse Original Stories offers a choice of one subscription: monthly
- Monthly subscriptions will be charged at $9.99/month*
- You will be able to access unlimited stories for the duration of your subscription
- Payment will be charged to your iTunes Account at confirmation of purchase
- Subscriptions automatically renew unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24 hours before the end of the current period
- Account will be charged for renewal up to 24 hours prior to the end of the current period
- Subscriptions may be managed by the user, and auto-renewal may be turned off by going to the user's Account Settings after purchase
- No cancellation of the current subscription is allowed during the active subscription period
- Any unused portion of a free trial period, if offered, will be forfeited when the user purchases a subscription to that publication, where applicable

* Prices are equal to the value that ""Apple's App Store Matrix"" determines is the equivalent subscription price in $USD

By using GameHouse Original Stories, you agree to our Terms of Service and Privacy Policy.

Terms of Service: https://www.gamehouseoriginalstories.com/static/terms-of-service.html
Privacy Policy: https://www.gamehouseoriginalstories.com/static/privacy-policy.html",Games,Gamehouse LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/hearts-medicine-season-one/id1436498146?uo=4,4.84863,5477,medicine
312094746,Harrison's Manual of Medicine,"**Features the latest, 20th Edition Content**

The most trusted brand in medical content delivered on a concise, easy-to-navigate platform. 

Derived from the best-selling internal medicine reference in the world, Harrison's Principles of Internal Medicine, this popular reference delivers fast, to-the-point guidance on the clinical problems seen in everyday practice. The Manual also includes abundant quick reference tables, plus concise text―providing rapid access to bedside information when decisions need to be made quickly. This feature-rich summary guide covers all diseases and conditions commonly seen in inpatient general medicine, so you can be sure to find invaluable content directly to your workflow and practice.

Harrison's Manual of Medicine for Mobile + Web features:
• Latest 20th edition 
• Quick reference tables, and charts
• Highlight and make notes within any entry
• Detailed diagnostic guidelines
• Up-to-date treatment recommendations
• Improved index for more straightforward navigation on your device
• Universal Index and Full Text Searches guarantee you find topics quickly 
• 'Favorites' for bookmarking notable entries
• Includes access to full contents and features on companion website

Editors: J. Larry Jameson, MD, PhD; Anthony S. Fauci, MD; Dennis L. Kasper, MD; Stephen L. Hauser, MD; Dan L. Longo, MD; Joseph Loscalzo, MD, PhD

Publisher: McGraw Hill Education/Medical

Powered by: Unbound Medicine

Unbound Medicine Privacy Policy: https://www.unboundmedicine.com/privacy
Unbound Medicine Terms of Use: https://www.unboundmedicine.com/end_user_license_agreement",Medical,"Unbound Medicine, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/harrisons-manual-of-medicine/id312094746?uo=4,4.6292,89,medicine
1021593933,Medicine Dictionary,"Medicine Dictionary and Drug Guide by Farlex gives you free, instant access to in-depth information on 4,000+ prescription drugs and over-the-counter medications in a comprehensive drug dictionary trusted by doctors, nurses, and healthcare professionals. Includes clear, detailed entries covering:

Generic and brand names 
Side effects
Interactions 
Drug class
Administration 
Treatment methods
Contraindications
Off-label uses
Chemical makeup 
Patient monitoring
+ much more…

FEATURES:

* Search 4,000+ prescription and over-the-counter medications in a comprehensive drug guide you won't find anywhere else.

* Save unlimited bookmarks and quickly view the terms you need to access fast. 

* Use native voice search to look up a word just by saying it. (With supported devices)

* See search suggestions as you type and always find what you're looking for.

* View your recent searches.

* Perform advanced searches, including ""Starts with,"" ""Ends with,"" ""Contains,"" and ""Wildcard.""

* Adjust font size.

* Share definitions via social networks, email, and text. (With supported devices)

User-friendly, comprehensive, and authoritative: Medicine Dictionary and Drug Guide by Farlex is the perfect free drug guide for doctors, nurses, and healthcare consumers. This is NOT a preview or a trial version, and there is no ""locked"" content. Open the app on your iPhone or iPad and immediately access all content — no subscriptions required!

How do we do it?

TheFreeDictionary.com - Farlex apps have been downloaded tens of millions times across multiple platforms, with top ratings after hundreds of thousands of reviews. We work with the best publishers to bring together trusted content in the most comprehensive, authoritative dictionary apps on the market. Our flagship app is The Free Dictionary (TFD), powered by TheFreeDictionary.com. Find our other apps by searching ""Dictionary by Farlex"" in the App Store.",Medical,"Farlex, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/medicine-dictionary/id1021593933?uo=4,4.63734,841,medicine
509740792,Touch Surgery: Surgical Videos,"Prepare for surgical cases or learn new procedures & test your knowledge with Touch Surgery anytime, anywhere.
Our multi-award winning surgical training platform for doctors and surgeons has been researched by world leading institutions and published in peer reviewed journals. 

Touch Surgery is integrated into over 100 residency programs in the US and is endorsed by the AO foundation, American Association for Surgery of the Hand (AASH), British Association of Plastic, Reconstructive and Aesthetic Surgeons (BAPRAS) and The Royal College of Surgeons of Edinburgh.

FEATURES:

- Step by step simulations of surgical procedures 
- Prepare for procedures anytime, anywhere!
- Explore our entire library straight to your smartphone
- Experience surgical cases with state-of-the-art 3D graphics
- Master new techniques from top physicians
- Free to download and use, with over 150 free procedures to choose from. Purchasable procedures are also available

WHAT OUR USERS ARE SAYING:

“Great app for learning! Easy to use and realistic simulations!”
“Brilliant Amazing and informative app. Easy to sign up and get stuck into the modules.”
“I really like this app! I like how realistic it is and just how real it is.”
“A 5 star rating is not enough”
“This app is a life saver!”
“is indisputably the BEST app of its kind!!!”

WHY DOWNLOAD:

This innovative app provides a user-friendly platform that helps medical professionals from all backgrounds  train effectively for procedures. The 3D simulations and surgical content have been developed in collaboration with leading surgeons and academic institutions worldwide to ensure the utmost accuracy and validity. The platform is the largest and fastest growing community of surgeons learning and rehearsing operations digitally. 

The interactive simulations and virtual patients teach specific techniques for all phases of medical and surgical procedures. This practical approach helps improve engagement for a deeper level of understanding, and has been proven to yield better results than more traditional methods.

Physicians, nurses and healthcare professionals can train and test their knowledge of surgery with clear and informative content at every step of a procedure. They can master specific exercises or freshen up on their skills before an operation.
With the largest database of over 150+ simulations across multiple surgical specialties, including Orthopedics, Ophthalmology, Plastic, Neurosurgery, Oral, Vascular and many more, this mobile app is the most comprehensive tool for medical professionals.

Considered as hosting “the best surgical simulations” by TopOrthoApps and “an integral tool for surgeons across the world to learn, and rehearse operations” by MedGadget.
Featured in BBC News, TechCrunch, Mashable, T3 Wired, Bloomberg, The Guardian, FT, Breast Cancer Care, Tech City, TecMundo.",Medical,Digital Surgery Ltd,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/touch-surgery-surgical-videos/id509740792?uo=4,4.80633,6795,medicine
1193214096,Doktor.se - Trygg vård direkt,"Doktor.se erbjuder dig och din familj snabb och trygg vård dygnet runt direkt via mobilen eller surfplattan.


• Öppet alla dagar i veckan
• Logga in med BankID
• Läkare • Hudspecialister
• Psykologer
• Sjuksköterskor
• Barnmorskor
• Fysioterapeuter
• Dietister
• Starta ditt ärende på 10 sekunder!

Det här kan Doktor.se hjälpa till med

Doktor.se kan hjälpa dig med en stor mängd besvär online via din mobil eller surfplatta. Vår personal kan hjälpa dig med bedömning, råd och behandling av dina besvär. Detta är exempel på besvär som vi kan hjälpa vuxna och barn med:

• Hudbesvär (T ex utslag, blåsor, klåda, akne)
• Allergier
• Förkylning
• Hosta
• Feber
• Urinvägsinfektion
• Munsår
• Insektsbett
• Ögonbesvär
• Förstoppning
• Underlivsbesvär
• Könssjukdomar
• Preventivmedelsrådgivning
• Graviditets frågor
• Fobier
• Sömnsvårigheter
• Stress
• Ångest
• Tennis armbåge
• Sjukintyg/VAB-intyg
• Reseintyg

Hur fungerar Doktor.se?

Ladda ner appen Doktor.se och logga in med mobilt BankID. Detta för att identifiera dig själv och ge oss rätt till att ge dig vård. I appen väljer du vilket besvär ärendet gäller för att vi ska kunna koppla ihop dig med rätt vårdpersonal via chatt, samtal eller video. Du är igång med ditt ärende på bara 10 sekunder!

Fysisk vård

Doktor.se har över 20 fysiska vårdcentraler i hela landet. Om vi inte kan hjälpa dig digitalt så hjälper vi dig att komma i kontakt med den fysiska vården för utredning och behandling.

Mer om Doktor.se?

Hos oss jobbar legitimerad erfaren vårdpersonal som alla jobbar på fysiska vårdcentraler eller sjukhus när de inte hjälper patienter på Doktor.se. Doktor.se kan hjälpa dig med bedömning, råd och behandling vid många olika besvär. Vid behov får du en remiss för vidare vård. Vi skriver också ut sjukintyg från och med den åttonde dagen du är sjuk och en vecka framåt om läkaren bedömer detta som skäligt.",Medical,Doktorse Nordic AB,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/doktor-se-trygg-v%C3%A5rd-direkt/id1193214096?uo=4,4.75528,425,medicine
1481222956,WVU Medicine,"Looking for a status update on a family member or friend being seen in the Emergency Department, or having a surgical procedure? Want an alert when it’s time for your appointment? The WVU Medicine app can do all that – and more:

* Check the real-time status of a family member or friend being seen in the Emergency Department.
* Check the real-time status of a family member or friend undergoing a surgical procedure.
* Check your waiting room status and get notified when it’s time to be seen.
* Provide feedback about your experience.
* Check Wait Time(s) for WVU Medicine Urgent Care clinics.",Health & Fitness,"West Virginia United Health System, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/wvu-medicine/id1481222956?uo=4,4.68898,254,medicine
334265345,UpToDate,"INDIVIDUAL OR INSTITUTIONAL SUBSCRIPTION REQUIRED. 
UpToDate® registrants and individual subscribers can answer their clinical questions anytime, anywhere by downloading this App for iOS onto their iPad®, iPhone®, or iPod touch®.

UpToDate is the leading clinical decision support resource with evidence-based clinical information – including drug topics and recommendations that clinicians rely on at the point of care.

UpToDate has been the subject of over 30 research studies confirming that widespread usage of UpToDate is associated with improved patient care and hospital performance.

UpToDate App for iOS Features: 
• Persistent login
• Easy search with auto-completion
• Earn and track free CME/CE/CPD credit
• Bookmarks and history
• Mobile-optimized medical calculators
• Print and email topics or graphics to patients and colleagues

We would love to hear your feedback. Please remember, we cannot reply to your comments in the App Store. If you have a question, please contact us at customerservice@uptodate.com. Thank you!

iPad, iPhone and iPod touch are trademarks of Apple Inc, registered in the US and other countries.",Medical,UpToDate,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/uptodate/id334265345?uo=4,3.77083,480,medicine
512153051,Journal Club: Medicine,"The Journal Club Team reviews the top articles in internal medicine, putting landmark trials at your fingertips. Written by physicians, Journal Club's article reviews are distilled into bite-size morsels that clinicians can digest quickly. Think of it as CliffsNotes for medical research. We do the hard work reviewing the literature so that you can focus on what's most important: caring for your patients.

A few reviews:
• “Amazing! I’ve been trying to put a list like this together for years!”
• “In a class by itself! As a med student I love having instant access to these landmark studies with navigation treatment options.”

Features:
• Concise PICO-structured bottom lines
• Physician-written and peer-reviewed major points
• Sort trials by name, date, specialty, and disease
• Star your favorites for quick access
• Easily share summaries with colleagues
• Instantly sync for new summaries
• Powered by Wiki Journal Club

Article summaries contain:
• Bottom line
• Major points
• Design
• Population
• Interventions
• Outcomes
• Criticisms
• Funding
• Links to PubMed and full text

More information online:
wikijournalclub.org
journalclubapp.com",Medical,David Iberri,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/journal-club-medicine/id512153051?uo=4,4.30246,162,medicine
655783752,Amwell: Doctor Visits 24/7,"High-quality, affordable medical care is in the palm of your hands — and on-demand — with Amwell.

Amwell is the best way to see a doctor from home or on-the-go. Our telehealth app connects you to board-certified, experienced medical providers. High-quality healthcare is now available, 24/7, with on-demand service or scheduled appointments, often with next-day availability.

Amwell brings healthcare home through the power of telemedicine so you can feel better faster.

AMWELL IS EASY AS 1 -2 -3
1. Download the app
2. Choose the type of visit
3. Choose your provider

No more driving to the doctor or sitting in waiting rooms. With Amwell, quality medical providers are available 24/7, to help you feel better faster.

AMWELL DOCTORS HAVE SEEN IT ALL
Our experienced clinicians can provide the care you need quickly. Common patients concerns include:
• Urgent Care: bronchitis, sinus & respiratory infections, sore throat, diarrhea, cold/flu, gout, strep throat, urinary tract infections, pink eye, hypertension, migraines, pneumonia
• Therapy: depression & anxiety, ADHD/ADD, bereavement, trauma, couples therapy, stress, divorce, sleep disorders
• Psychiatry: anorexia, bipolar disorder, panic attacks, PTSD, OCD, psychosis, insomnia, substance abuse
• Nutrition: weight concerns, food allergies, meal planning, high blood pressure, pediatric nutrition, digestive disorders, pregnancy diets
• Lactation Consulting: breastfeeding help

AFFORDABLE PRICES FOR SERVICES YOU NEED
We believe quality healthcare should be accessible and affordable. That’s why before insurance, Amwell costs:
• $79 or less for urgent care
• $99 starting cost or less for online therapy
• $269 initial online psychiatry visit, follow-up visit starting at $99
• $70 or less for nutrition counseling visits
• $129 initial breastfeeding support visit, follow-up visit $75

Have health insurance? Many major carriers cover Amwell visits. To check if yours does, simply enter your health insurance information to see the price you will pay for your visit. It’s that easy.

PATIENTS AGREE - AMWELL IS EASY & CONVENIENT
We couldn’t have said it better ourselves … take their word for it!

• “[The visit] took 20 minutes and prescription has been called in. The same process with my local doctor would’ve taken 2 to 3 hours between drive time, wait time, visit, and returning back to work.”
• “I honestly have to say this is one of the best new services I have ever used…I was able to download the app, pick a doctor, and “see” the doctor right from my iPhone.”
• “The whole process is easy to set up, within minutes we were connected to a video conference with a medical professional who was very thorough but more important, really took the time to listen.”

100% SECURE & CONFIDENTIAL
We take your privacy very seriously. Your visit with the doctor is confidential and HIPAA compliant.

AWARDS AND RECOGNITION
• Most Popular Mobile Telehealth Platform of 2014-2016 – App Annie
• Best Telemedicine App of 2016 – Healthline
• First telehealth service awarded accreditation by the American Telemedicine Association

CONNECT WITH US
To learn more or get your questions answered, please reach out to us!
• Web: www.amwell.com
• Facebook: www.facebook.com/amwellpatient
• Twitter: www.twitter.com/amwell
• Email: support@americanwell.com

Please note that telehealth is not for emergencies. If you’re having a medical emergency, call 911.

Any customer review may be used in marketing materials such as emails, fliers, blogs, or other promotional assets. Publishing a review is considered a grant of permission to share the review outside of the App Store. The review will be published anonymously.

If you use Apple Health, you can choose to share your health information with the doctor during your video visit, such as heart rate, blood pressure, body temperature, blood glucose levels, weight, nutritional information, and respiratory rate.",Medical,American Well Corporation,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/amwell-doctor-visits-24-7/id655783752?uo=4,4.88635,48516,medicine
646540641,Osmosis: Medical School Notes,"Discover a more effective way to study for medical school — with your smartphone! Take your learning on the go with the Osmosis mobile app, your ultimate study buddy, designed to help you confidently ace lectures, clinicals, and board exams.

Spend less time studying and gain the confidence to become the best clinician you can be with our game-changing material on topics ranging from anatomy to physiology, pathology, pharmacology, and clinical practice.

Start your 7-day free trial to enjoy our most loved features on your mobile and desktop devices, including:
-Thousands of concise, animated videos that help you quickly understand complex concepts. Plus, the option to add them to shareable playlists or download them for offline viewing and on-the-go learning.
-Thousands of flashcards, powered by spaced repetition for maximum retention. 
-Thousands of rigorously reviewed, board-style questions. Plus, additional recall questions that come with detailed answer explanations to help you learn the “why” behind answers. 
-A daily practice quiz that helps you stay sharp and a quiz builder that lets you decide exactly what to test your knowledge on.
-Thousands of high-yield notes and dozens of OMM notes with done-for-you summaries that help you visualize and master topics at a glance. Print these resources or download them for offline viewing.
-Easy-to-follow decision-making trees that help you develop clinical skills.
-Professional development content to help you become the best clinician you can be.
-Full access to Osmosis on both your laptop and smartphone.

No two students learn the same way. That’s why Osmosis from Elsevier empowers you to customize your experience with your choice of playlists, quizzes, flashcards, and more. Our science-backed learning techniques keep you engaged and boosts your retention. The platform also offers comprehensive coverage from foundational sciences to 8 core clerkship specialties (Internal Medicine, Family Medicine, Neurology, Obstetrics and Gynecology, Pediatrics, Psychiatry, Surgery, and Emergency Medicine), giving you all the tools you need to excel in your specific program.

Prepare to ace your boards with our board exam preparation tools for tests like USMLE® Step 1 and Step 2, COMLEX-USA® Level 1 and Level 2, PANCE®, and NCLEX-RN®. And track your learning progress with our insightful analytics feature, which helps you identify any weaknesses you may want to work on.

Osmosis isn’t only for students; working healthcare professionals also use our platform to stay sharp and brush up on their knowledge.

No matter who you are, you can benefit from our proudly intersectional approach to health education, which celebrates diversity and cultivates inclusive healthcare.

Download Osmosis and start your free, 7-day trial today.

*Before using this app, please read and agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy.

EULA https://www.apple.com/legal/internet-services/itunes/dev/stdeula/",Education,"Knowledge Diffusion, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/osmosis-medical-school-notes/id646540641?uo=4,4.80279,3372,medicine
1082300408,Klara – Patient communication,"Thousands of healthcare teams across more than 40 specialties connect with and care for their patients using Klara’s secure messaging and telemedicine solution because it’s convenient and accessible to patients with no login, password, or download required—ever. With Klara, practices grow by providing patients with the convenient experience they demand while making their operations more efficient.

Customer support is available in-app or by email at support@klara.com.

FOR PROVIDERS
(Patients, see below)

With Klara, you can:
1. Provide your patients with excellent care no matter where they are through secure messaging and video visits
2. Communicate directly with patients, team members, and external providers
3. Whatever you’re sending — messages, documents, photos, or eForms — it’s all secure and HIPAA-compliant
4. Respond to texts, voicemails, website messages in one central place
5. Assign messages to your colleagues for quick responses
6. Send eForms for patients to fill out digitally
7. Automate routine patient outreach to patients before and after their appointments, including reminders, pre-visit instructions, post-visit follow-up, etc.
8. And more!

You need a Klara account to use this app. Sign up for a free demo on our website.


FOR PATIENTS

Download the Klara app to connect with your doctor and other healthcare providers over secure messaging and video visits. You can also access Klara by going to patient.klara.com and entering your mobile phone number.
Your healthcare provider must use Klara for you to use this app. If they’re not already using Klara, ask them to sign up today!",Medical,Klara Technologies Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/klara-patient-communication/id1082300408?uo=4,4.70882,12353,medicine
6462593274,iHeart-Pulse Rate Monitor App.,"iHeart - Health at your fingertips

*Important
iHeart is not a substitute for medical advice, diagnosis or treatment. The app is not a medical device and users should always seek the advice of a medical professional before making any medical decisions

Main benefits of the app:

-Heart rate tracking: Track your heart rate in real time and generate a visual table for you to help you better observe heart rate changes

-Daily check-in: Record your daily health check-in, track your habits, help you maintain a regular schedule, and develop a healthier lifestyle.

-Blood pressure and blood sugar log: Support manual recording of health data (such as blood pressure, blood sugar), view history and generate simple charts to facilitate your tracking of daily habits.

-Activity tracker: Develop healthy habits with our habit tracker

The app requires iOS 14.0 or later

Disclaimer: This app is only for manual recording of health data and does not provide any diagnosis or treatment advice. If you have any questions, please consult a professional doctor.

Download iHeart now and start your health journey!

About subscription:

You can cancel your subscription at any time

If you purchase on an annual basis, your iTunes account will be deducted. Unless you disable auto-renewal, renewal will be automatically charged to your account within 24 hours prior to the end of the current subscription. You can turn off auto-renewal at any time by going to your Account Settings in the AppStore after purchase.

Payment and Subscription Terms:
Choose from the following subscription options for unlimited access to all features
• Weekly Subscription
• Yearly Subscription

Manage your subscription directly from your iPhone
Subscriptions can be managed by the user and auto-renewal can be turned off by going to Account Settings
- Open the Settings app
- Tap your name.
- Tap Subscriptions.
- Tap the subscription you want to manage.

Privacy Policy: https://remhopte.com/privacy
Terms of Use: https://remhopte.com/term
Contact Us: kkheartmail@proton.me",Health & Fitness,REMHO PTE. LTD,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/iheart-pulse-rate-monitor-app/id6462593274?uo=4,4.73606,6278,medicine
1486908462,UAB Medicine,"The patient portal can be used to:

• Communicate with your health care providers
• Request renewals for currently prescribed medications
• View results of select lab work or other tests
• View and/or download portions of your medical record
• View clinical visit summary
• View your active medication list, allergies, immunizations and more
• View your upcoming appointments
• Connect health management apps to your health record

Signing Up

Registering for the patient portal is easy and begins with a short form you can complete online.
Just visit our Self Enrollment page at uabmedicine.org/me and follow the instructions provided.


Registration Step-by-Step

Once your health care provider confirms your email address and initiates the sign-up process, you will receive an email with instructions on how to create your myUABMedicine account. If you do not receive your email invitation, please call UAB Guest Services at 205.934.CARE (2273).

Step 1: Watch your email inbox for the invitation. You must create your myUABMedicine account within 90 days of receiving the invitation or you will need to request a new invitation. If you do not want to create a myUABMedicine account, just delete the email.

Step 2: In the email invitation you receive, click on the link provided. The link in the email invitation will take you to a page with quick steps on how to get started.

Step 3: Next you will be asked to verify your information. You will need to verify your date of birth and answer a security question.

Step 4: From there you will be taken to the Sign-Up page where you will create a unique username and password. You will need to check the box to accept the Terms of Use and select ""Create Account.""

Step 5: Your information will then be placed in the portal and you may begin interacting with your UAB providers.

Step 6: To access the myUABMedicine Patient Portal in the future, just visit uabmedicine.org/me and click on the login button.",Medical,UAB Health System,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/uab-medicine/id1486908462?uo=4,2.80952,42,medicine
1487196388,Nebraska Medicine,"Nothing is more important than you and your family’s health. That’s why we created the Nebraska Medicine app, making it easy to manage your health care needs on the go. 

Features include: 
- View wait times at our Immediate Care Clinics 
- Schedule an appointment with providers you’ve previously seen 
- Get reminders about upcoming appointments 
- With permission, easily switch to a family member’s profile 
- Message a member of your care team 
- See test results 
- Pay your bill 
- Search for a new doctor, and view their patient ratings 
- Find a location 
- ""Track My Health"" using Apple HealthKit to pull health-related data from your personal devices right into the Nebraska Medicine app.",Medical,The Nebraska Medical Center,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/nebraska-medicine/id1487196388?uo=4,4.67892,1333,medicine
1451878715,Dribbleup - Sports & Fitness,"The Official Dribbleup Sports & Fitness App

Connect your Soccer, Basketball, Baseball, Tennis Racket, Weights, Strength Ball, and Boxing Gloves!

New live and on-demand workouts every day with all your Dribbleup smart equipment.
Using state-of-the-art technology, Dribbleup tracks your equipment to guide you through live and on-demand workouts.

Dribbleup integrates with the Apple Health app.",Health & Fitness,DribbleUp Inc,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/dribbleup-sports-fitness/id1451878715?uo=4,4.68637,35666,medicine
1526098139,Happy Clinic: Hospital Game,"DOZENS OF INTENSE CHALLENGES await in quirky hospitals across the world, where the equipment is as unique as the climate. It's up to YOU to improve each hospital and guarantee the best care possible!



As a young nurse work to ASSIST DOCTORS in treating various diseases and illnesses, PREPARE MEDICINE and tools, ASSIGN PATIENTS to treatment or diagnostics, RESEARCH SAMPLES at laboratories, and engage in other exciting activities. YOUR DREAM HOSPITAL AWAITS!
 
BUILD YOUR RESEARCH HEADQUARTERS and help the professor to discover new medical devices that expand gameplay and turn your hospital into an unstoppable healthcare juggernaut.  
 
THIS FUN HOSPITAL GAME FEATURES: 
• HOURS OF ENTERTAINMENT in the time-management genre 
• UNLOCKABLE MEMORIES that reveal a dramatic story about the nurse’s life 
• ADDICTIVE LEVELS and unique locations 
• IMPROVE AND DECORATE the research center to expand your gameplay options 
• TREAT PATIENTS with a wide variety of medicine and equipment you've researched
• COLLECT and GET TO KNOW patients from around the world
• TRY ENDLESS MODE for endless fun
• EXPERIENCE UNIQUE and fun events in your research center
 
JOIN IN and experience A UNIQUE, FUN and CASUAL Hospital Simulator!
 
FOLLOW US for new updates, contests, and more! 
On Facebook 
https://www.facebook.com/HappyClinicGame 
On Instagram 
https://www.instagram.com/happyclinicgame/ 
 
Got some TROUBLE with the game, QUESTIONS or IDEAS?
Contact us here!  
https://www.nordcurrent.com/support/?gameid=19 
Privacy / Terms & Conditions 
https://www.nordcurrent.com/privacy/",Games,Nordcurrent UAB,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/happy-clinic-hospital-game/id1526098139?uo=4,4.42898,24633,medicine
597917484,LiveHealth Online Mobile,"Speak with board-certified doctors, licensed therapists, psychiatrists and more through live video on your smartphone, tablet, or computer. LiveHealth Online is an easy and convenient way to get the care you need whether you’re at home, at work, or on the go! Download the app and sign up to get started. 
    •	24/7 virtual urgent care with board-certified doctors for the whole family. 
    •	Counseling and talk therapy with licensed therapists. 
    •	Scheduled consultations with psychiatrists. 
    •	Primary care, dermatologists, dietitians, lactation consultations and other benefits may be available depending on your health insurance.",Medical,American Well Corporation,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/livehealth-online-mobile/id597917484?uo=4,4.90435,82489,medicine
1334019160,Alltid öppet,"Med appen Alltid öppet kan du som patient boka Videomöte med Läkare, Tandläkare, Sjuksköterska, Barnmorskemottagningar, Ungdomsmottagningar och för psykosocialt stödsamtal. 
Alltid öppet ger också stöd för bokning av mottagningsbesök med Läkare, Sjuksköterska och möte för psykosocialt stöd hos Region Stockholms vårdverksamheter.
Du även söka vård via chatt på flertalet enheter inom regionen.
Region Stockholms vaccinations kampanjer bokas även via Alltid Öppet",Medical,Stockholms Lans Landsting,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/alltid-%C3%B6ppet/id1334019160?uo=4,0.0,0,medicine
1152807572,Carby Health,"Great healthcare should be easy and accessible for everyone. That's why Carbon Health helps you get care that doesn't end when you leave the clinic. Our easy-to-use app allows you to book appointments, message your provider, view your health history, and manage your prescriptions — all in one place.
 
With Carbon Health’s mobile app, you can:
 
- Book a virtual or in-person appointment that fits your schedule 
- Get care for your body and mind, whether it's urgent or preventive
- Find a provider that prioritizes you
- Message your care team
- View medical records — including lab results, prescriptions, care plans, X-rays, and more!
- Follow through on your care plan with personalized, easy-to-complete tasks
- Reference upcoming milestones like booking an in-clinic follow up appointment through our health checklists
- Participate in personalized chronic condition programs, including diabetes management (and soon hypertension and asthma)
- Get provider recommendations based on your connected-device health data, including continuous glucose monitoring

To access your medical information, you will need to be a patient of Carbon Health. Join today at https://carbonhealth.com/.

Some of the benefits we offer:
- No membership fees
- Coverage through most insurance plans 
- Telemedicine across the United States
- Timely appointments for COVID-19 antibody and travel testing
 
Have feedback or need help? Select Contact Support within the app.",Medical,"Carbon Health Technologies, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/carby-health/id1152807572?uo=4,4.79452,15987,medicine
1441948105,1177,"I 1177-appen får du inspiration och information om hälsa och sjukdomar, regler och rättigheter och var du kan hitta vård på 1177.se.

Du kan logga in med BankID eller Freja eID Plus för att till exempel:

•	Läsa din journal
•	Se aktuella och uthämtade recept
•	Boka, omboka eller avboka tid
•	Be om förnyat recept
•	Se information om ditt högkostnadsskydd

Du kan ringa 1177 för sjukvårdsrådgivning dygnet runt.",Medical,Inera AB,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/1177/id1441948105?uo=4,0.0,0,medicine
576405449,WikEM,"WikEM is an online wiki and database of emergency medicine knowledge to assist physicians with their daily practice. The content is continuously updated from WikEM.org allowing for rapid reference of key information.  The content is available offline with this mobile application. WikEM is intended for clinicians only and not directly for patients.

In app subscription purchases:
*The in-app purchase unlocks personalized lists and favorites for 1 year

• Payment will be charged to iTunes Account at confirmation of purchase
• Subscription automatically renews unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24-hours before the end of the current period
• Account will be charged for renewal within 24-hours prior to the end of the current period, and identify the cost of the renewal
• Subscriptions may be managed by the user and auto-renewal may be turned off by going to the user's Account Settings after purchase
• Any unused portion of a free trial period, if offered, will be forfeited when the user purchases a subscription to that publication, where applicable

WikEM terms of use: wikem.org/wiki/WikEM:Terms_of_Use",Medical,OpenEM Foundation,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/wikem/id576405449?uo=4,4.82456,4452,medicine
645948529,Figure 1 - Medical Cases,"Figure 1 is transforming healthcare by bringing together millions of healthcare professionals to view, share, and discuss real-world patient cases. With thousands of valuable cases - from the common to the rare - education and collaboration happens in real-time and is always centered around the patient. Figure 1 helps HCPs keep their fingers on the pulse of medicine, empowering better patient diagnosis, treatment, and outcomes globally.
 
With Figure 1, you can:

◦ View, share, and discuss real-world medical cases in real-time
◦ Get insights and up-to-date perspectives from the experts on the medical cases that matter
◦ Test your medical knowledge through case collaboration and in-app quizzes",Medical,"Figure 1, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/figure-1-medical-cases/id645948529?uo=4,4.7111,1350,medicine
538436293,DISCOVER Magazine,"Take an exciting adventure with DISCOVER magazine as it reports captivating developments in science, medicine, technology, and the world around us. Spectacular photography and refreshingly understandable stories on complex subjects connect everyday people with the greatest ideas and minds in science.

Every issue of DISCOVER delivers the latest news, theories, and developments in the world of science, compelling stories and breakthroughs in health, medicine, and the mind, environmental issues and their relevance to daily life, cutting-edge technology and its impact on our future, thought-provoking articles from award-winning editors, opinion makers, Nobel laureates, and renegade scientists.

DISCOVER subscriptions available:
- Single issue purchase = ($5.99 USD), non-auto renewing
- Annual Subscription, 6 Bi-monthly issues = ($19.99 USD), automatically renewed until cancelled

When purchasing through iTunes your account will be charged at confirmation of purchase. 
Account will be charged for renewal within 24-hours prior to the end of the current period, and identify the cost of the renewal.
You can turn off auto-renewal at any time from your iTunes account settings.  
No cancellation of the current subscription is allowed during active subscription period.
Any unused portion of a free trial period, if offered, will be forfeited when the user purchases a subscription to that publication, where applicable.


Privacy Policy:
https://www.kalmbach.com/privacy/

Terms of Use:
https://www.kalmbach.com/termsofuse/",News,Kalmbach Publishing Co.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/discover-magazine/id538436293?uo=4,1.46809,47,medicine
1280251409,Medicine Shoppe Pharmacy,"The Medicine Shoppe app allows you and your family to securely communicate with 2,500 independent pharmacies nationwide.  Refill your prescriptions with one click, get refill reminders, get discounts at your local pharmacy, get savings on brand drugs  and access Pharmacist written pages that help you understand your condition or medications.

Our App Features:
HIPAA secure
Easily refill your prescriptions at your local independent pharmacy
Access a history of your medications and Rx numbers
Set reminders when to refill your medications
Set reminders when to take your medications
Save up to $450 on top brand medications with co-pay coupons
20,000 pharmacist written pages on conditions and medications
7,500 pharmacist videos about medications and side effects",Medical,"MEDICINE SHOPPE INTERNATIONAL, INC",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/medicine-shoppe-pharmacy/id1280251409?uo=4,4.6942,1586,medicine
1465940207,Keck Medicine myUSCchart,"Keck Medicine of USC is committed to patient health, safety and access. Through this app we offer 24/7 access to your medical records. Use this app to send secure messages to your physician, access test results and request prescription renewals and appointments from your smartphone.
We are a team of more than 500 physicians at a leading academic medical center keeping you healthy, on track and doing the things you love. If you are a patient of Keck Medicine of USC and need assistance in accessing the patient portal, please call (877) 621-8014. For immediate assistance in scheduling an appointment, please call (800) 872-2273.

Please note that this myUSCchart should not be used for urgent medical matters.",Medical,Keck Hospital of USC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/keck-medicine-myuscchart/id1465940207?uo=4,1.79412,34,medicine
437564871,RxLocal,"Manage your medication and save time by downloading our easy-to-use app. Need to manage your family's medication? We've got you covered there too; just add them to our app to save even more time.

Order refills, view medication profiles, view our contact options, and don't miss a dose by setting medication reminders directly in our app.",Medical,"PioneerRx, LLC",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/rxlocal/id437564871?uo=4,1.81392,1940,medicine
854712766,Quiz of Medicine - Med School,"Quiz of Medicine features thousands of questions for over 400 drugs in various categories.

There are six quiz types in this app; Brands, Generics, Brands/Generics, Indications, Categories, and Assorted. 

Quiz Types: 
Brands - In this mode you will pick the brand that's associated with the generic mentioned in the question. 

Generics - In this mode you will pick the generic that's associated with the brand mentioned in the question. 

Brands/Generics - In this mode you will pick either the brand or generic that's associated with the generic or brand mentioned in the question. 

Indications - In this mode an indication will be given in the question and you must pick the medicine that pertains to it. 

Category - In this mode you will pick either the brand or generic that's associated with the drug category/class mentioned in the question.

Assorted - In this mode there will be random questions picked from the quiz types mentioned above. 

*In the Indications and Category quiz mode you'll be able to switch back and forth between seeing the brand or generic for each medicine listed with the click of a button. This way you can answer these questions by only seeing the brands OR generics if you want.

The information within this app was verified with various highly reputable sources. This app can be used for studying, refreshing your memory, and/or preparing for certification exams. You can also tweet your score at the end of any quiz. Enjoy!

8-Bit Avrin Apps",Medical,Avrin Ross,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/quiz-of-medicine-med-school/id854712766?uo=4,5.0,6,medicine
1015991271,Medical Dictionary by Farlex,"Medical Dictionary - Healthcare Definitions and Terminology is a free, iOS medical dictionary app that gives you instant access to more than 180,000 medical terms, over 50,000 audio pronunciations, and 12,000 images, all from authoritative sources, including McGraw-Hill, Houghton Mifflin, Gale, Elsevier, and more.

Whether you’re a practicing physician, nurse, med student or just plain curious, this free medical dictionary app can help you find clear, in-depth definitions of medical terminology right on your iPhone or iPad. Search from across multiple disciplines - Our medical dictionary app compiles more than a dozen medical dictionary and encyclopedia sources, and includes entries on: 

Anatomy
Physiology
Dentistry
Diseases
Drugs
Nursing
Ophthalmology
Pathology
Treatments
Tests and procedures
Medical research topics
Alternative Medicine
+ much more…

FEATURES:

* Search 180,000+ medical terms and definitions.

* Access over 40,000 entries available anytime offline. 

* Browse 1,000s of medical abbreviations and acronyms. 

* Study more than 4,000 over-the-counter and prescription drugs in our medication guide.

* Add unlimited bookmarks. 

* View your recent searches.

* See search suggestions as you type.

* Perform advanced searches, including ""Starts with,"" ""Ends with,"" ""Contains,"" and ""Wildcard.""

* Listen to 50,000+ audio pronunciations for both American and British speakers in 'online mode.'

* Share definitions via social networks, email, and text (with supported devices). 

User-friendly, Comprehensive, and Authoritative: Medical Dictionary - Healthcare Definitions and Terminology is the perfect free medical app for doctors, nurses, medical education students, and health care consumers. This is NOT a preview or a trial version, and there is no ""locked"" content. Open the app on your iPhone or iPad and immediately access all content — no subscriptions required!

How do we do it?

TheFreeDictionary.com - Farlex apps have been downloaded tens of millions times across multiple platforms, with top ratings after hundreds of thousands of reviews. We work with the best publishers to bring together trusted content in the most comprehensive, authoritative dictionary apps on the market. Our flagship app is The Free Dictionary (TFD), powered by TheFreeDictionary.com. Find our other apps by searching ""Dictionary by Farlex"" in the App Store.",Medical,"Farlex, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/medical-dictionary-by-farlex/id1015991271?uo=4,4.76501,6213,medicine
1337867960,UAB Medicine Wayfinder,"The UAB Medicine Wayfinder app has interactive indoor and outdoor maps that use a special positioning system to help you get around the hospital and clinics using turn-by-turn walking directions. We are committed to making your experience with us an exceptional one, and hope this app helps you get around the facilities more easily. 

Ways to use UAB Medicine Wayfinder:
Get directions to your destination before leaving home
Search for your doctor or destination and get detailed walking directions from where you are standing
Find the closest coffee or snack shop
Locate a cafeteria or restaurant
Pinpoint the nearest restroom
Get directions back to the parking garage
Find a gift shop
Locate a UAB Medicine pharmacy

We hope you find this app helpful during your visit with UAB Medicine. We welcome your feedback. Thank you for entrusting us with your health care needs.",Navigation,"Connexient, LLC",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/uab-medicine-wayfinder/id1337867960?uo=4,2.66667,24,medicine
545501431,Medicine Arabic Dictionary,"- 100% FREE Medicine Dictionary with sound from English to Arabic and Arabic to English.

قاموس الطب العربي مع الصوت

- Arabic Medicine Dictionary has 65,000 words with sound.

- Search the English word and it will display its Arabic translation.

- Search the Arabic word and it will display its English translation.

- Listen the Arabic and English sounds of searching words.

- Type your own text and listen it both in English and Arabic.

- Select the English voice accent from USA, UK, Australia, South Africa and Ireland.

- Select the Arabic voice to listen offline and online.

- Set the voice speed to listen words slowly or fast for both English and Arabic.

- Change the voice pitch for both English and Arabic.

- ""Search Options"" feature that help to search the word ""Starting"" with searching word or ""Ending"" with searching word or ""Containing"" the searching word.",Medical,Muhammad Riaz,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/medicine-arabic-dictionary/id545501431?uo=4,4.59999,35,medicine
350347587,Medicine Central,"ABOUT MEDICINE CENTRAL
Medicine Central is an integrated mobile and web reference built specifically for physicians, residents, students, and nurse practitioners that includes 5-Minute Clinical Consult, Davis’s Drug Guide, McGraw-Hill’s Diagnosaurus®, Pocket Guide to Diagnostic Tests, and PubMed access. 

With four trusted references, Medicine Central delivers comprehensive content on the essentials of diagnosis, treatment, and follow-up for more than 1,000 diseases and disorders in a quick-read format directly to the point of care.

Included in Medicine Central:  

5-MINUTE CLINICAL CONSULT 
5-Minute Clinical Consult (5MCC) is a best-selling app that features details on over 1,000 medical conditions and 200 pediatric conditions with evidence-based treatment recommendations in a proven, rapid-access format. 5MCC also includes dermatology images, algorithms for step-by-step patient management, patient teaching points, and more.

DAVIS’S DRUG GUIDE 
Davis’s Drug Guide is a 5-star app that delivers up-to-date, comprehensive, and practical information on over 5,000 trade name and generic drugs. This best-selling resource contains everything you need to provide premium care to your patients including information on dosing and administration, safety, interactions, and much more. 

MCGRAW-HILL’S DIAGNOSAURUS
Diagnosaurus allows you to quickly search over 1,000 differential diagnoses by organ system, symptom, disease, or you can view all entries. The valuable ""See Related DDx"" feature within each listing helps you consider alternative diagnoses and quickly link to those entries.

POCKET GUIDE TO DIAGNOSTIC TESTS 
Pocket Guide to Diagnostic Tests provides evidence-based information on the selection and interpretation of more than 450 common laboratory tests. This quick-reference tool includes laboratory tests, diagnostic imaging, therapeutic drug monitoring, microbiology tests, and the use of tests in differential diagnosis. 

Prime PubMed
Quickly search the complete PubMed database on your smartphone and tablet. Results contain abstracts, citations, and links to available full text articles which can be easily shared with classmates and colleagues. Additionally, Prime PubMed Search contains a powerful, exclusive feature called Grapherence™ which delivers a new way to visually explore the interrelationship and relevance of medical literature.


FEATURES 
• Cross Links for fast navigation between resources
• Frequent updates and new editions when they’re published
• Browse the full PubMed journal database 
• Citations and abstracts from the latest medical journals
• Highlight and make notes within any entry
• Full Text Search – find topics fast across all references  
• ‘Favorites’ for bookmarking important entries 
• Web access and updates for one year 

DRUG AND CONTENT UPDATES
• After initial Medicine Central purchase you will receive updates for one year
• After one year, you can purchase updates for an additional year, at the discounted rate of $99.99. If you do not choose to purchase, you can continue to use the product but will not receive updates.
• This app will automatically renew annually at the current renewal rate ($99.99) and charged to your iTunes account at confirmation of purchase, unless auto-renew is turned off 24 hours prior to the conclusion of the one-year subscription period.
• Subscriptions may be managed by the user and auto-renewal may be turned off by going to the user's Account Settings after purchase.


Publishers: Wolters Kluwer; F.A. Davis; McGraw-Hill
Powered by: Unbound Medicine

Unbound Privacy Policy: www.unboundmedicine.com/privacy
Unbound Terms of Use: https://www.unboundmedicine.com/end_user_license_agreement",Medical,"Unbound Medicine, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/medicine-central/id350347587?uo=4,4.95413,109,medicine
592158838,ERG 2020,"PHMSA (U.S. Department of Transportation Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety Administration)'s 2020 Emergency Response Guidebook provides first responders with a go-to resource to help deal with hazmat accidents during the critical first 30 minutes.

The ERG contains an indexed list of dangerous goods and the associated ID number, the general hazards they pose and recommended safety precautions. For example, if emergency responders arrive at the scene of an overturned tractor trailer displaying a DOT hazmat placard, they would use the guide to identify the material associated with the placard and get guidance on how to respond accordingly. 

The 2020 version of the ERG includes general revisions, reorganized general information pages, protective distance mapping updates, and the new ability to share data links through URLs. Updated every four years, the ERG is available free to public safety agencies in all states and territories through designated state coordinators’ offices.  PHMSA has partnered with the National Library of Medicine to provide this free application as well as a version of the ERG in its Wireless Information System for Emergency Responders (WISER) application.",Reference,National Library of Medicine,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/erg-2020/id592158838?uo=4,4.11538,52,medicine
301866347,Taber's Medical Dictionary,"*25th edition content with over 75,000 terms*

Used by tens of thousands of health professionals worldwide. Purchase includes access to the updated Tabers.com website

ABOUT TABER'S MEDICAL DICTIONARY:
Find the critical medical information you need quickly and easily, wherever you need it. Taber’s is the leading medical dictionary used by health care professionals today. 

Taber’s Medical Dictionary now contains over 75,000 terms, 1,300 photos, 33,700 audio pronunciations, 130 videos, and 600+ Patient Care Statements from the latest edition. Taber’s goes beyond the in-depth definitions and provides nutrition and alternative therapy, medical abbreviations, symbols and units of measurement, immunization schedules and more.

Plus, you’ll have access to the full dictionary, illustrations, audio pronunciations, and more at the official Tabers.com website. 

FEATURES:
• 75,000+ in-depth definitions 
• 1,300+ high-quality images and 130+ videos 
• Over 33,700 audio pronunciations
• Often searched appendices with Medical Abbreviations,Laboratory Values, Alternative Medicine, Acronyms, and more 
• Enhanced Search helps you find topics quickly
• Favorites for ‘bookmarking’ important entries
• Highlight and make notes within any entry

Editor: Donald Venes, MD, MSJ, FACP
Publisher: F.A. Davis
Powered by: Unbound Medicine",Medical,"Unbound Medicine, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/tabers-medical-dictionary/id301866347?uo=4,4.66504,1027,medicine
335364882,Walgreens,"It's your Walgreens - shop and manage your prescriptions.

Prescriptions
• Refill in a snap by scanning your barcode
• Track order status for you and your family
• Stay on track with Pill Reminders to help you manage medications day-to-day
• Get FREE prescription and general health advice 24/7 from a pharmacy expert in a live chat

Walgreens Find Care®
Find the right care, right when you need it. Connect with doctors and healthcare providers from your phone or in person at participating locations.

Shop & Savings
• Shop for all your essentials and get your qualifying pickup order in as little as 30 minutes.* 
• Earn Walgreens Cash rewards as a myWalgreens member and clip personalized, exclusive deals just for you* 
• Easily clip coupons and save even more with our Weekly Ad
• Scan products in-store to clip coupons and save at checkout
• Find your nearest store, and view store and pharmacy hours

Photo
• FREE Same Day Pickup for faster photos—print from your phone or tablet
• Personalize your Photo Cards and Gifts, and create custom Wall Décor for your home

Earn Walgreens Cash rewards when you set and meet myWalgreens health goals. Automatically track your progress by allowing Walgreens to sync with the Apple Health.


iOS Permissions:
How the app uses device permissions
• Location: Find nearby stores and enable in-store savings
• Photos: Access pictures you’ve taken that you want to print or share
• Camera: Take photos and use features that require scanning
• Microphone: Speak to a healthcare provider over the phone or video, or to search for products and coupons using your voice
• Apple Health app: Connect with Health app to track and share health and fitness information


The Walgreens App is free to download, but specified rates from your wireless provider and other fees as noted in your Walgreens account agreement(s) still apply.

*See Walgreens.com for details and restrictions.",Shopping,Walgreen Co.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/walgreens/id335364882?uo=4,4.83221,6132979,pharmacy
1149449468,Chewy - Pet Care & Pharmacy,"This one’s for the pets. Shop all the things that keep your pet happy and healthy with Chewy, the trusted destination for pet parents. With 3000+ brands of food and supplies, and 24/7 help from pet experts, your pet’s happiness is our #1 priority. Unlock high quality and low priced products, Autoship delivery, free 365-day returns and more. Food shop and pharmacy — no matter what you need, Chewy has you covered.

Download and discover something for every pet. Dog, cat, fish, reptile, horse or wildlife — all pets are supported on the Chewy app. Find everything your pet needs today.

SHOPPING FOR EVERY PET
The shopping app that’s built to make your pet parenting life easier. Shop top brands, exclusive deals and the best of each season for your pet.

Shop by Category - Search or shop by category to discover the best products for your pet.

3000+ Brands - Browse thousands of trusted brands, ensuring you have the best selection possible.

Today’s Deals - Shopping app deals, for every pet. Find the best savings of the day on everything from food to treats, toys, supplies and apparel.

Holiday Shop - Calling all party animals! Celebrate the holiday season with costumes, toys, seasonal treats and more.

PHARMACY & VET SUPPORT
Pet health, made easy. Get veterinary and pharmacy support with Chewy’s expansive health services and products.

Trusted Pet Pharmacy - Care for your pet with America’s most trusted pharmacy, carrying over 4000+ top-quality medications and 600+ veterinary diet products. Now including compounded medications.

Rx Approvals - Share your pet and veterinary info and we’ll confirm your prescription directly with your vet before shipping.

Connect with a Vet - Get timely advice from our licensed veterinary team and leave with a personalized consult report.

Symptom Tracker - Share your pet’s symptoms and receive quick advice on what to do next.

Medicine Reminders - Add your pet’s current medications and we’ll remind you on when to refill based on the frequency you need.

AUTOSHIP & SEAMLESS HOME DELIVERY
Veterinary prescription, pet food, or fun toys — get fast, easy and hassle-free deliveries with Chewy.

Manage Autoship - What your pet needs, on repeat. Schedule your Autoship delivery at checkout and change as needed. No fees or commitments, just happy pets.

Super Savings - Get extra savings off your first Autoship order and 5% off future deliveries.

Shipment Tracker - Follow their favorite box from our door to yours with our in-app shipment tracker.

PET COMMUNITY
Trusted by pet lovers, and supported by pet experts. Learn, receive help, share your voice and give back with our app. No one pet-parents alone with Chewy.


24/7 Support - Real pet experts are here for you 24/7 to support all pet parents.

Sharing - Send fellow pet lovers items you like with a text, email or social post while you shop.

Shopping App Reviews - Read what other customers are saying about products and leave your own reviews.

Pet Adoption - Find pets to adopt near you through Chewy’s network of shelters and rescues.

Food shop, pharmacy, vet advice and more. No matter what you’re looking for — Chewy is here to make pet parenting easier.",Shopping,"Chewy, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/chewy-pet-care-pharmacy/id1149449468?uo=4,4.91363,1004742,pharmacy
338137227,Walmart: Shopping & Savings,"Save money. Live better. 

The Walmart app is the easiest way to shop for everything on your list, including fresh groceries, household essentials, the latest tech and a lot more. Plus, our convenient pickup, delivery and shipping options make it a breeze to get your order exactly when you want it, whether you’re shopping in-store or on the go.
 
Convenient ways to get your items: 

Pickup 
Swing by the store to collect your order curbside—we’ll even load your car. 

Delivery 
From a local store straight to your door. For those need-it-now moments, choose Express delivery to get your order in as little as one hour.* 
*Restrictions and fees apply. 

Shipping 
Fast two-day shipping, dropped off by FedEx or UPS. Eligible orders over $35 ship free! 

Even more time-saving features you’ll love: 

Store maps 
When you’re in-store, open the app to find items fast. 

Real-time order tracking 
Get live order updates sent straight to your phone and track order status any time from the homepage. 

Reorder your essentials 
Quickly and easily fill your cart with frequently purchased items. 

Shopping lists 
Create, share and add to lists to prepare for any occasion. 

Walmart Pay 
Easily check out using all your payment methods. Just tap ""Pay” and we’ll recommend how to split your total to make the most of your cards and balances. 

Curbside check-in 
Check in with the app when you’re ready to pick up your order and we’ll bring it out to you. 

Barcode scanner 
Scan items to check prices and build lists. 
 
Pharmacy 
Refill, transfer, manage and pick up your family’s prescriptions. Plus, schedule vaccinations, locate testing sites and more. 

Walmart+ members—our app is the easiest way to get the most out of your membership. App-exclusive features for Walmart+ include: 
Scan & go 
Use your phone to shop in-store and check out contact-free. 

Member prices on fuel 
Get up to 10¢ off every gallon at 14,000+ locations nationwide**— including Exxon and Mobil stations! 
**Fuel discount varies by location and station, subject to change",Shopping,Walmart,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/walmart-shopping-savings/id338137227?uo=4,4.81975,14388138,pharmacy
508852374,Rite Aid Pharmacy,"REFILL PRESCRIPTIONS

● From your prescription history, by scanning your prescription barcode, or entering in your prescription number

● Add and manage family member prescriptions all in one place


TRANSFER PRESCRIPTIONS

● Easily transfer your prescriptions to any Rite Aid Pharmacy


RITE AID REWARDS

● Convert your Rite Aid Rewards points to BonusCash

● Track your points balance

● View your BonusCash transaction history

● Browse, search, scan for, and clip Digital Coupons

● Save your Rite Aid Rewards Account to your Apple Wallet


STORE LOCATOR

● Locate the Rite Aid store nearest to you

● View store and pharmacy information and services

● Select your store for future reference


WEEKLY CIRCULAR

● Browse the weekly circular for your area",Shopping,Rite Aid Hdqtrs. Corp.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/rite-aid-pharmacy/id508852374?uo=4,4.60328,84359,pharmacy
1148770146,Publix Pharmacy,"The Publix Pharmacy app makes it even easier to manage prescriptions. New time-saving features are just what the doctor ordered. 
*Quick refills 
*Easy account setup 
*Multiple prescriptions/patient management 
*Prescription status, order history & details 
*Prepaid pickup & curbside pickup, delivery, and drive-thru at select locations 
 
Scan to refill. 
Use your camera to scan the bottle. Request refills in a snap. 
 
Be our guest. 
Find a Publix Pharmacy, transfer prescriptions, and refill quickly without an account. 
 
Switch it up. 
Getting started with us is easy. Transfer all your existing prescriptions to a nearby Publix Pharmacy. 
 
One-time easy account setup. 
Just scan a recently filled Publix prescription bottle or enter the number from the label. We'll fill in your account details. 
 
Log in to access more features. 
When the doctor calls in your next prescription, it will automatically appear in your app. Just log in to your account to see important details, get helpful notifications, and set reminders. 
 
Just a tap away. 
Tap to view which prescriptions are ready for refill, in progress, or ready for pickup. 
 
Pay in advance. 
You’ll be notified when prescriptions are ready, then pick up and go. 
 
More choices. 
Receive medications from prepaid pickup & curbside pickup, delivery, or drive-thru at select locations. 
 
Care for the whole family. 
Add minors under 13 to your profile, and pets too. Members can also share profiles with others to allow access to prescription details and order history. 
 
The perks are endless. 
All patients’ prescription cards are neatly organized in one place.  
 
Your feedback matters to us. Please contact the Publix Customer Care team with questions, suggestions, or concerns. 
 
Phone: 
1.800.242.1227 
Monday – Friday: 8 a.m. – 7 p.m. (EST) 
Saturday: 9 a.m. – noon (EST) ",Medical,Publix Super Markets Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/publix-pharmacy/id1148770146?uo=4,4.91097,12266,pharmacy
382497397,Sam's Club: Pickup & Delivery,"Sam’s Club. Discover all the perks of being a member with the app. Download today!

Save time and shop easier every day with the Sam’s Club app. Make the most of your membership with easy online shopping for everything from everyday essentials to premium products. With a Sam’s Club Membership you can conveniently shop for fresh groceries, savory snacks, pharmacy prescriptions and more.

Hate waiting in line? Thanks to Sam’s Club you can skip the checkout line in the club with convenient Scan & Go™ shopping. Simply shop, scan and pay all in the app. Or schedule your order for Curbside Pickup at a time that works for you. Just drive up and get on with your day! While you’re there, save time at the pump. Pay directly in the app for your fuel, at member’s-only prices. Join and see how Sam’s Club makes it easy for you to do more with your day.

Sam’s Club also has you covered with prescription management, transfers and refill requests all available in the app. Plus, schedule immunization appointments and more health services. Conveniently get what you need most without having to leave the app.

Your Sam’s Club membership is filled with perks that help you spend less time shopping and more time doing the things you love.

Download today and get started!


So many benefits!

Premium quality at members-only prices.

· Exclusive Member’s Mark™ brand brings amazing value to help you live your best life.

· Everything you need from home essentials and groceries to snacks and medications.

· Party prep? Cookout celebration? Sam’s Club has you covered.


Fast & easy ways to shop.

· Skip the checkout line when you shop the club with the Scan & Go™ app feature.

· Get fresh Delivery from Club right to your doorstep. You choose same-day, next-day or fastest Express service. And free for Plus members on eligible $50 purchases.*

· Drive up and let us load your order with Curbside Pickup. Free for Club members on eligible $50 orders and always free with Plus.*

· Shop in the app 24/7 and ship products directly to your home.*


In-app Pharmacy.

· Easily transfer prescriptions directly in the app.

· Purchase and refill prescriptions.

· Track prescriptions for the whole family, including your pets.

· Schedule immunizations at your club Pharmacy. Walk-ins also welcome!


Download the app and get the most from your membership today.

*Terms and fees may apply. See SamsClub.com/TermsAndConditions for details.",Shopping,Walmart Stores Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/sams-club-pickup-delivery/id382497397?uo=4,4.90355,4188307,pharmacy
535509415,Costco,"It's easy to save time and money while on the go, with the Costco Mobile App! We've improved our mobile app, to make it easier for members to access the incredible values found only at Costco.

DIGITAL MEMBERSHIP CARD: Access your membership card from the home page of the app. Use your membership card to enter the warehouse and at checkout.
 
SHOP: Browse Costco.com’s unique and expanded selection, which offers thousands of items not found at your local warehouse. Enjoy having items delivered straight to your door!
 
SAVINGS: Conveniently receive the latest Warehouse Savings right on your own device.

GAS PRICES: Just tap the locator pin on the map to view current gas prices.
 
PHOTOS: Order metal prints, acrylic prints or photo mugs directly from the app.  Have them delivered to your door or pick them up at select Costco locations.

SPECIAL EVENTS: View the Special Events happening at your local Costco and set reminders for upcoming events.

PHARMACY: Order prescription refills & check status on prescriptions. Get refill reminders, track your medications, manage family accounts, transfer prescriptions, and find a Costco pharmacy.
 
TRAVEL: Shop Costco Travel for great deals on vacation packages, hotels, cruises, rental cars, theme parks and more!
 
BUSINESS CENTER: Stock up on everything from Restaurant Supplies to Office Essentials, and keep your business running smoothly and efficiently.
 
SHOPPING LIST: Keep track of the items you want to pick up on your next trip to Costco.
 
WAREHOUSE INFO: See details about your nearest Costco warehouse, including regular and holiday hours, services provided, driving directions and gas prices.
 
FEEDBACK: Visit our app feedback page and help provide important feedback for Costco, because your opinion matters!",Shopping,Costco Wholesale Corporation,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/costco/id535509415?uo=4,4.85593,965638,pharmacy
893334296,CenterWell Pharmacy,"The new CenterWell Pharmacy™ mobile app makes it easier to keep track of your prescriptions. The new app has the same easy-to-use features, plus upcoming features focused on you.
 
1. Simplified refill ordering
 
2. Easy prescription transfers
 
3. Check your order's status at a glance
 
 
COMPLETE MEDICATION LIST
- Stay organized with a full list of all your prescriptions filled at CenterWell Pharmacy, including those you no longer need and medication for your dependents.
 
 
QUICK REFILLS
- Easily refill your prescriptions as soon as you sign in, straight from your home screen.
 
 
PRESCRIPTION DETAILS
- View important details about your prescriptions, such as available refill dates, doctor information, images of your meds, and related educational videos.
 
 
ORDER STATUS
- Know where your order is once it’s processed with color-coded order status messages.
 
 
SHIPMENT TRACKING
- Track shipments once they’re shipped to estimate when your medication will arrive.
 
 
SNAP-TO-FILL
- Submit a photo of your current prescription label to easily fill your prescription at CenterWell Pharmacy.
 
 
TRANSFERS
- Quickly transfer your current prescriptions to CenterWell Pharmacy by viewing your prescription drug claims information from Humana.
 
 
SPECIALTY MEDICATIONS
- Request a refill of an existing CenterWell Specialty Pharmacy™ prescription and order it at the same time as all your other medication.
 
 
AUTO-REFILLS
- Automatically receive your next set of refills so you’re sure to have your medication on time. NOTE: auto-refills are not available for Medicare customers.
 
 
PAYMENT OPTIONS
- Change or update your credit card information and make payments securely from the app.
 
 
PREFERENCES
- Set or update your preferences, such as how you want to be communicated (by phone, email or text) or if you’d like to receive an alert when your total charge is over your price limit.
 
 
SHOP PRODUCTS
- Shop over-the-counter (OTC) products with the Health and Wellness credit that may be part of your Humana member benefit. NOTE: available to Medicare customers only.
 
 
Download the CenterWell Pharmacy mobile app now to manage all your mail-delivery medications with ease!
 
Note: The CenterWell Pharmacy mobile app is available only to Humana members.
 
For issues with this app, please email cwpmobilefeedback@centerwell.com.",Health & Fitness,Humana Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/centerwell-pharmacy/id893334296?uo=4,4.70197,179349,pharmacy
1358191105,Photo Print: CVS Quick Prints,"◉ Print your photos to CVS and pick up in an hour!

The fastest and easiest way to print photos. Download now for free.
Order photos from your phone, pick up and pay at CVS or Target stores in 1 hour. No registration, no login and no credit card required! 

◉ Print photos in 5 easy steps!

1.Select photos from your iPhone or iPad

2.Crop and resize photos as you wish

3.Choose size and quantity of photos

4.Submit your order to CVS or Target store near you

5.Check your order status and pick up them in 1 hour 

◉ 100% PROFESSIONAL QUALITY PHOTO PRINT SATISFACTION GUARANTEED ◉

Every photo ordered via Quick Photo Print will be printed to highest quality Kodak paper by CVS and Target. You can check the quality of photos before pickup and ask for a reprint for free if you are not 100% satisfied. 

Quick Photo Print FEATURES:

◉ Choose photos from your photo folders, camera roll, favorites, selfies etc.

◉ Or select photos from your Facebook and Instagram account
 
◉ Preview each photo before submitting

◉ Zoom, crop or resize each photo

◉ Set size and quantity per photos

◉ 4x6, 6x8 and 8x10 prints for standard camera roll photos

◉ 6x6 and 8x8 square prints for Instagram photos

◉ Optimized photo upload in the background, no waiting time at all!

◉ See estimated pickup times for the stores before submitting the order

◉ Submit to your orders over 10.000+ CVS and Target Stores

◉ Get notified when your orders are ready

◉ Pickup photos in 1 hour or less at selected CVS and Target store. 

Download Quick Photo Print now and enjoy convenient, fast, and professional quality photo printing service!

If you have any problem or feedback please contact us within the app or send an email to support@quickprints.co. We always reply to every email and provide a solution within 24 hours.

By using Quick Photo Print, you agree to the terms of use. These terms can be found on the help menu within the app.",Shopping,"PlusMinusOne, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/photo-print-cvs-quick-prints/id1358191105?uo=4,4.82359,68109,pharmacy
422306980,Harris Teeter,"- Mobile Pay is now accepted in store
- 3 ways to shop online: Pickup, Delivery, or Ship products directly to your home
- Leverage Start Your Cart to add to list or cart for 'Buy Again' and 'Recent Items'
- Add to list or cart for My Specials, Weekly Ad, and Savings Alerts
- Scan items in your pantry and add to list or cart
- Add order notes/select preferred substitutions
- Check-In via app with ""On my way"" or ""I'm here""
- Purchase HT Plus Membership
- Access digital receipts for in store and online purchases
- Same day delivery and pickup options
- View your VIC card and enroll in e-VIC for personalized savings
- View Savings to clip e-VIC digital coupons
- View Fuel Points
- Shopping lists improvements
- Link your VIC card for Together in Education (TIE) contributions
- Refill and transfer prescriptions to your pharmacy, schedule vaccine appointments",Shopping,The Kroger Co.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/harris-teeter/id422306980?uo=4,4.49054,14635,pharmacy
1448996015,Picta x CVS Photo,"Minute photo: CVS Printing photos at CVS just got easy: download our app for free and start photo printing your mobile photos today! 
Choose your photos, your print size (4x6, 5x7, square …), and quantity.
Order prints directly on your phone and select your nearest CVS store for same-day pickup.
THE EASIEST AND FASTEST WAY TO CVS PHOTO PRINT PHOTOS
Order prints on your phone in seconds, pick up and pay at CVS photo in 1 hour*! Turn your great moments and unforgettable memories into fabulous photo prints and gifts with minute photo print
HOW TO PRINT PHOTOS FROM YOUR PHONE
1. Select minute photo from your iPhone or iPad 
2. Select the size & quantity of each cvs photo, or create custom magnets or cards
3. Crop & zoom each picture easily in app
4. select your cvs photo print store
5. Follow your cvs photos order status in real time and pick your order up in store in less than one hour at cvs photo print
PRODUCTS & FEATURES
- Professional-quality photo printing services, printed on glossy photo paper in multiple sizes: choose from 4x6 cvs photos, 5x7 prints, or 8x10 enlargements Also available, square prints in 6x6 or 8x8 (perfect for Instagram photos)
- Personalized cvs photos gifts for all occasions: Magnets, Greetings cards, Christmas cards & invitations
- Fast & safe photo transfer with cvs minute photo print
- A cvs photos gallery that organizes your mobile cvs photos by date taken
- Our cvs photos products are manufactured exclusively in the United States
WHERE CAN YOU PRINT CVS PHOTOS ?
PRINT PHOTOS AT CVS PHOTO PRINT using our enhanced CVS store locator. Choose your local CVS photos store or your friends & family one can enjoy your prints in 1hr. No need to wait in store to upload your photos at the cvs photo center anymore or use your home photo printer. Plus when you pickup your photos in-store, you will benefit from CVS' unique service and only pay in store! 
ABOUT CVS
We are dedicated to changing the way you are printing your photos with this cvs minute photo app. If you have any questions about this photo printing app or about family photo prints, contact us at minute-photo@pictarine.com.
Our photo printing app is one of the best apps in the US among cvs photo app, walgreens photo app and walmart photo app
*Estimated order pickup times will be displayed at CVS photo app checkout. Most of the time photo printing is less than an hour.
Running errands. Easier.
• Pay for your prescriptions in app and choose to have them delivered once they're ready at the pharmacy.
Saving money. Easier.
• Get app-only deals and access all of your offers when you link your ExtraCare card.
• Opt in to notifications so you never miss a deal. Receive photo and Rx updates too.
• Pre-shop local store sales with myWeekly Ad.
• Enjoy free 2-day shipping on app orders (restrictions apply).
Refilling and picking up prescriptions. Easier.
• Order refills and track them on the go.
• Scan a barcode in the app for easier, private pickup. Turn landscape to sign.
• View your prescription history.
• Check for drug interactions and information.
Printing photos. Easier.
• Order prints from your phone or Facebook for same-day pickup (select stores and products).
Family health care. Easier.
• Find a nearby MinuteClinic® walk-in clinic.
• View wait times and hold a place in line (restrictions apply).
• Check services and insurance.",Utilities,Pictarine Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/picta-x-cvs-photo/id1448996015?uo=4,4.86423,151177,pharmacy
1397887982,Brookshire's,"We've enhanced your Brookshire's app to make shopping online and in store even easier.Features include:

• Clip digital coupons with ease.
• Order groceries for Curbside pickup.
• Access your existing shopping lists or quickly create new lists on the go.
• Search, save and share your favorite recipes. Add ingredients to your shopping lists.
• Product Scanner: Scan product barcodes to quickly add items to your shopping list or shopping cart.
• View weekly ads, promotions, and specials.",Shopping,Brookshire Grocery Company,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/brookshires/id1397887982?uo=4,4.69073,7660,pharmacy
569266174,myCigna,"The myCigna app gives you a new and improved way to easily access your important health information. You must be a Cigna customer to use the secure myCigna mobile app. Features available are based on the coverage you have with Cigna. 

HealthKit is integrated into myCigna in order to serve the ability to customize your Find Care and Telehealth experience. 
 
ID Cards  
•    Quickly view ID cards (front and back) 
•    Easily print, email, or share from your mobile device
 
Find Care
•    Search for a doctor, dentist, pharmacy or health care facility, from Cigna's national network and compare quality-of-care ratings and costs
 
Claims
•    View and search recent and past claims
 
Account Balances
•    Access and view health fund balances
 
Pharmacy
•    View and refill your prescriptions right from your mobile device
•    Update billing and shipping preferences 
 
Coverage
•    View plan coverage and authorizations
•    Review plan deductibles and maximums
•    Find what’s covered under your plan
 
Wellness 
•    View goal activity and awards

Languages Supported
•    Spanish and English
 
About Cigna
 
More than just a health insurance company, Cigna is a global health service company--dedicated to helping the people we serve improve their health, well-being and sense of security. We make this happen through a broad range of integrated health care and related plans and services, and proven health and well-being programs that are targeted to the unique needs of our customers, clients and partners.",Health & Fitness,Connecticut General Life Insurance Company,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/mycigna/id569266174?uo=4,4.75516,135763,pharmacy
1047798731,Nimble Rx,"Stay organized and in control of your prescriptions with NimbleRx, the ultimate pharmacy companion. Whether you're looking for better prices on medications or you need a convenient way to manage your medications, arrange for prescription delivery, or schedule pickups, NimbleRx is the all-in-one solution for your prescription management needs.

Key Features:

1. Prescription Management Made Easy: Say goodbye to the hassle of keeping track of multiple prescriptions and their refill dates. NimbleRx provides a user-friendly interface that allows you to effortlessly manage your medications all in one place. Never miss a dose again!

2. Prescription Delivery and Pickup: No more waiting in long pharmacy lines or worrying about running out of medications. NimbleRx offers a convenient prescription delivery service, ensuring that your medications are delivered right to your doorstep. Alternatively, you can schedule pickups at your preferred pharmacy for added flexibility.

3. Reminders and Alerts: Stay on top of your medication schedule with customizable reminders and alerts. NimbleRx will notify you when it's time to take your medications or when refills are due, making it easy to maintain your health and adhere to your prescribed treatment plan.

4. Secure and Confidential: Your privacy is our top priority. NimbleRx employs advanced security measures to protect your personal information and medication history. Rest assured that your data is encrypted and stored securely.

5. User-Friendly Interface: NimbleRx's intuitive design ensures a seamless user experience. Navigate through your prescriptions, track refills, and set up delivery or pickup options effortlessly. The app is designed to be accessible and easy to use for ages 12+.

6. The Best Prices: Search for the best prices for new or existing medications.


Download NimbleRx today and experience the future of prescription management. Simplify your life and take control of your health with the power of technology. Say goodbye to medication mishaps and hello to peace of mind!

Visit nimblerx.com to learn more.",Medical,NimbleRx Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/nimble-rx/id1047798731?uo=4,4.86977,49705,pharmacy
1092333652,Capsule Pharmacy,"Hello Dear,

Capsule is a new kind of pharmacy. One that is smarter, friendlier, faster and hand-delivers your medication, same-day, for free.

Capsule is free to use — you only pay your copay. 

Get started with Capsule in 15 seconds. Or tell your doctor to e-prescribe your medication to Capsule. Any doctor can send prescriptions to us.

We’ll text you to schedule your free, same-day delivery. You can manage all your prescriptions from your phone. We’ll also coordinate refills with your doctor and copays with your insurance company. Chat or text with a pharmacist for any questions. 

Never worry about your meds again and enjoy the peace of mind that comes with having your health looked after. 

Love, 
Capsule",Medical,Capsule Corporation,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/capsule-pharmacy/id1092333652?uo=4,4.7575,5963,pharmacy
493390354,Kaiser Permanente,"Whether you're at home or on the go, the Kaiser Permanente app gives you a simple, secure way to manage your health — all in one place. 

Live in Washington (outside of Vancouver/Longview)? Download the Kaiser Permanente Washington app instead. 

With the Kaiser Permanente app, you can easily:
•	Email your doctor’s office or Member Services with nonurgent questions
•	Schedule, view, and cancel routine appointments and see information about past visits
•	Fill or refill most prescriptions, check the status of a prescription order, and see a list of all your medications
•	View your medical history, including allergies and immunizations, ongoing health conditions, and most lab test results
•	Choose a doctor by browsing our online doctor profiles 
•	Find facilities and pharmacies near you
•	Get care in a way that works for you — online, by phone, or in person
•	Access your digital membership card to check in for appointments, pick up prescriptions, and more
•	Get personalized reminders and health information as soon as they’re available

Allows users to integrate with the Apple Health app to:
• Enter information about their health (e.g., glucose readings), so that it can be shared with their care team
• View information about their health (e.g., glucose readings)

To get started, download the app and sign in with your kp.org account. If you haven’t registered yet, you can also create your online account in the app.",Health & Fitness,Kaiser Permanente,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/kaiser-permanente/id493390354?uo=4,4.79495,804520,pharmacy
585403789,City Market Food & Pharmacy,"Looking for a faster, easier, more rewarding shopping experience? Save time and money with the City Market app. It puts convenience, savings and rewards at your fingertips. Simply download the app, create an account and link your Value Card to access all these great benefits:

 · Create and track Pickup, Delivery and Ship orders right from the app
 · Shop an extended aisle of 1,000s of products from our trusted third-party sellers
 · Use Kroger Pay at in-store checkout – one scan applies your Value Card and payment
 · Easily build your online shopping list, and use it to shop in-store or to place your online order
 · View your weekly ads and quickly add sale items or specials to your shopping list
 · Clip digital coupons and use them to save in-store and online
 · Get Cash Back deals to earn money on items you already buy
 · Discover even more savings with exclusive promotions, personalized offers and bonus rewards
 · Refill and track the status of your City Market Pharmacy prescriptions directly from your phone or tablet
 · Check your fuel points
 · Use our locator to find the closest store or Fuel Center
 · View your purchase history and use it to easily reorder your favorite products
 · Add your Value Card to Wallet for iPhone.

To use the City Market app, you'll need a City Market digital account. You can create one and link your Value Card through the app. Don't have a Value Card? You can add a new one when you create your digital account.",Shopping,The Kroger Co.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/city-market-food-pharmacy/id585403789?uo=4,4.70809,10171,pharmacy
1251765858,Alto Pharmacy,"Alto Pharmacy makes it simple to live your healthiest life, providing an easier, more supportive, and more affordable prescription experience. We’re redefining what a pharmacy can do with same-day prescription delivery, direct access to care specialists, and support with insurance and cost savings. After more than 2 million deliveries — and more than a thousand five-star Yelp reviews — we’re proud to say we’ve built a pharmacy that people love.

The Alto app puts a full pharmacy at your fingertips, giving you control and convenience in managing your prescriptions.

SAME-DAY HOME DELIVERY
Couriers bring your medication right to your doorstep at the time that’s most convenient for you.

EASY MEDICATION MANAGEMENT
Medication bundling allows you to receive all your medications in one easy delivery, and custom reminders tell you when it’s time for your next dose.

A RETAIL PHARMACY AT YOUR DOORSTEP
Shop the Essentials store in our app to order over-the-counter pharmacy products or add them to your next delivery.

EXPERT CARE
Message an Alto pharmacist any time for the answers you need, even during nights and weekends.

SUPPORT WITH COST SAVINGS
Through price investigations, we search for ways to help you save on each prescription, including coupons, copay cards, and assistance programs.

Download our app or get started at alto.com.",Medical,Alto Pharmacy LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/alto-pharmacy/id1251765858?uo=4,4.82996,7363,pharmacy
442464896,Express Scripts,"Managing your medicine is easier when our app does it for you. 
 
The newly designed Express Scripts app lets you easily and quickly find everything you need for your medicine. It’s like having a knowledgeable pharmacist in your pocket.
 
Find a preferred pharmacy, refill your prescription and check your order status—anytime, anywhere.

Whatever you’re looking for, find it faster on the Express Scripts mobile app. 

•	Order refills for you or your family
•	Track orders
•	Start automatic refills
•	Access ID card
 
You must have an Express Scripts prescription benefit plan through your health insurance or plan sponsor to use this app. 

This app and/or some if the features described may not be available for all plans or benefit types.",Medical,"Express Scripts, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/express-scripts/id442464896?uo=4,4.75303,356607,pharmacy
595438362,Optum Specialty Pharmacy,"The Optum Specialty Pharmacy™ mobile app helps you take control of your prescriptions and treatment, wherever you are. It's there when you need it, whether you're looking for support or have a question about your prescription. With the app, you can save time managing your prescriptions, giving you more time to do the things you love.



Manage your prescriptions
• Request and schedule refills 
• Schedule delivery
• Track your order status



Keep your account up to date
• Save insurance and copay savings cards
• View and update account information, like shipping addresses
• Make payments
• View claims history



Optimize your treatment
• Manage your allergies, health conditions and medications outside of Optum
•Complete self-assessments for our clinical management program
• Get live support from a clinical care team member or pharmacist",Health & Fitness,Optum Inc,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/optum-specialty-pharmacy/id595438362?uo=4,4.67364,6551,pharmacy
1232461700,Photo Prints Now: CVS Photo,"CVS photo printing with Genuine Kodak Moments paper! Print to CVS Pharmacy or order photo prints & gifts home delivered.
 
Send photos to print at any CVS location or for home delivery:

1 Select pictures from your phone 
2 Choose print sizes 
3 Order photo prints at CVS or home delivered.

High quality photo prints ready for 1 hour pick up or delivered to your door. 

Make Lasting Memories with CVS Photo Prints & Photo Gifts: 
Use Photo Prints Now to print your memories at CVS locations. Transform treasured moments into wall decorations with large print sizes. Print photos and pick up in 1 hour at your nearest CVS store. Print Instagram, Facebook, Flickr, Dropbox & Print Google+ pictures.

Order Prints Home Delivered:
Enjoy fast delivery of photo prints & photo gifts.  Order photo prints home delivered from your phone. Get your photos delivered to your home with speedy shipping. Surprise someone you love with photo gifts and prints ordered from your phone! 

The Best CVS Photo Printing App: 
Faster than kiosks and simple to use. We use high quality Kodak paper to make a lasting archive of your life’s memories. Perfect for scrapbooking or to make a greeting card extra special. Transform your memories into the perfect printed photo masterpieces.

CVS Photo Print Sizes: 
• 4x6” Photo Prints 
• 5x7” Photo Prints 
• 8x10” Photo Prints
• 6x6” and 8x8” Square Instagram Prints 
• Canvas Prints
• Print Panels • Poster Prints
• Magnets
• Wallet Prints
• Panoramic Prints
• Bamboo Ornaments
• Photo Cards 

Print Pictures at CVS:
Trust your memories to the best photo paper, genuine Kodak moments photo paper at your favorite local CVS. After selecting your favorite memories for printing, select your size and quantity and then, simply send them to CVS to print within one hour. Use our CVS store locator to easily find your nearest CVS store. 

No subscriptions or other gimmicks. Get your phone’s pictures into print quickly and easily. 

Order photo gifts:
Surprise someone you love with photo gifts and photo products home delivered or at CVS.  

Print Panels: Print panel sizes range from 4x6 to 8x10. Options include acrylic, bamboo and wood print panels.

Photo Magnets: Add fun to any fridge with photo magnets. Create 4x6 and 5x5 magnets.

Photo Posters: Large format poster prints and photo posters are perfect college room decor or business signage. Print your design or photo on a poster.  

Wallet Prints: Create wallet prints easily. Wallet prints are perfect at gift giving time. 

Panoramic prints: Choose panoramic print for an extra long photo print.

Bamboo Ornaments: Fun sized bamboo ornaments are ready same day at CVS.

Photo Cards: Add your photo to a card design. Ideal for Christmas, Birthdays, Invitations and Save the Date. Photo cards are ready same day at CVS.

Canvas Prints: Decorate your living area with personalized canvas wall art. Print your photo on a canvas. Create canvas prints as large as 20x24 or 24x36.

Home Décor, Wall Art and Designer Prints:
Make a statement in home with wall art and designer prints. Select a design and leave the rest to us. Pick up at CVS Pharmacy. Designer prints and wall art are available on posters, print panels and canvas prints. 

Application partnership with CVS:
By partnering with CVS we’ve made it possible to print photos at CSV without using Kodak photo kiosk. Over 9600 CVS stores are available nationwide to print 4x6, 4x4, 6x6, 8x8 & 8x10 prints in 1 hour. Displaying pictures on your wall or sharing pictures with your family could never be easier.

If you have questions about Photo Prints Now or CVS photo we’d love to hear from you: support@photoprintsnow.com",Photo & Video,MEA Mobile Limited,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/photo-prints-now-cvs-photo/id1232461700?uo=4,4.84959,268276,pharmacy
1508011365,Capital Rx Pharmacy Benefits,"Delivering your pharmacy benefit plan to you, wherever you are.


Navigate your prescription benefit plan quickly and easily. Capital Rx members can search medication history, easily identify in-network pharmacies and lookup pharmacy specific information, all in one place.


Access plan information and health history for you and your family, locate the pharmacy of your choice and check prescription prices – from anywhere!


FIND THE DRUGS YOU NEED AT THE LOWEST PRICES

•	Search for medication prices at retail pharmacies or chosen mail provider
•	Compare prices and to find the lowest cost option near you
•	Search within past claims to find the current price of the drug in the same location
•	Get notified if your medication requires a prior authorization and receive suggested covered alternatives.

LOCATE A PHARMACY NEAR YOU

•	Find pharmacies based on current location or by entering a zip code
•	Easily identify in-network and out-of-network pharmacies
•	Look up hours, languages and services offered

UNDERSTAND YOUR BENEFITS WITH THE CLICK OF A BUTTON

•	Graphical view of Deductible, Out-of-pocket, and Plan spend for individual and family
•	View individual processed claims with payment, drug, and pharmacy information
•	Search for a medication on the formulary or download a PDF 

EASY TO USE DESIGN FOR AN IMPROVED EXPERIENCE

•	Display digital pharmacy ID card easily at the pharmacy
•	Integrated Face ID or Touch ID for quick and secure login
•	Select 'favorite' pharmacies that will always appear at the top of searches 
•	One touch dial to contact customer care team


FOLLOW US
LinkedIn: https://www.linkedin.com/company/cap-rx/ 
Twitter: https://twitter.com/cap_rx",Medical,Capital Rx LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/capital-rx-pharmacy-benefits/id1508011365?uo=4,2.61111,90,pharmacy
931060401,ShopRite Pharmacy App,"The ShopRite Pharmacy Mobile App lets you find pharmacies, manage your family's medications, refill prescriptions, and transfer prescriptions from one pharmacy to another using your mobile device. 

Features include:

- Refill your prescriptions by entering the Rx number or scanning the bottle using your camera phone.
- Manage the prescriptions of your entire family with a secure biometric login.
- See your prescription history.
- Transfer prescriptions from any pharmacy to your preferred ShopRite location.
- Use the GPS on your phone to find the nearest ShopRite location.
- Filter your ShopRite location search.
- Find information on a variety of health topics and medications.
- Schedule your appointments online - skip the lines!",Medical,Wakefern Food Corporation,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/shoprite-pharmacy-app/id931060401?uo=4,2.87156,109,pharmacy
573016251,BCBSTX,"The Blue Cross and Blue Shield of Texas (BCBSTX) app provides access to the Blue Cross and Blue Shield of Texas member information and resources. BCBSTX app also provides shopping information such as getting a quote and tracking an application. 
Members can: 
•	Login, register or change password 
•	Easily access coverage, claims, and ID
•	Check deductible and out of pockets amounts
•	Find an in network doctor, hospital or facility
•	Find a nearby urgent care facility
•	Estimate the costs of procedures, tests and treatments
•	View patient reviews and average wait time 
•	Search for doctors that speak Spanish
•	View medical benefits and copay levels
•	View pharmacy benefits and copay levels
•	Send ID to Apple Wallet for offline access
•	View their Explanation of Benefits
•	Log in via Touch ID
•	Share ID Card
•	Members with applicable pharmacy coverage can search for drug information and cost estimates, view and compare nearby pharmacies, and view reminders related to their prescriptions
•	Members with applicable coverage can access MDLive for virtual visits with a doctor (MDLive uses allergies and medications from your HealthKit when requesting a virtual visit)",Health & Fitness,Blue Cross and Blue Shield of Texas,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/bcbstx/id573016251?uo=4,3.98096,2574,pharmacy
1227057613,PTCB PTCE Mastery Exam,"Study for the PTCB or PTCE with 890+ exam-like practice questions and pass your exam the first time. 

Prepare for the Pharmacy Technician Certification Board (PTCB) or Pharmacy Technician Certification Exam (PTCE) with confidence using our comprehensive exam preparation tool. Whether you're a first-time test taker or recertifying, our app will help you pass your exam, guaranteed. 


Key Features:

• 890+ Exam-Like Practice Questions: Perfect your knowledge with questions that mirror the actual exam.
• Video Prep Content: Access 35+ minutes of video content to reinforce key concepts.
• Learning Flashcards: Study efficiently with flashcards designed for quick recall.
• Detailed Solutions: Understand every question with in-depth explanations.
• Quiz Mode: Test yourself with 100 tough, exam-like practice questions.
• Progress Tracking: Identify strengths and weaknesses with detailed results tracking.

Anywhere, Anytime Learning: Study on the go with our mobile app.
Guaranteed Success: Spend just 15 minutes a day and see results.
Award-Winning Tool: Recognized for its effectiveness in PTCE and PTCB exam preparation.

DOWNLOAD & STUDY FOR THE PTCB PTCE EXAM AND PASS!

Check out why we are the most recommended learning app for everyone who wants to pass on the first try! Install the free PTCB PTCE exam prep version for your pocket TODAY and start studying!

The free version includes 10 questions every single day. Get instant access to all content when you subscribe. 

SUBSCRIBE TO PREMIUM and get access to all features:

•	890+ PTCB practice questions
•	Unlimited access to ALL categories:
            -	Pharmacology
           -	Pharmacy Law and Regulations
           -	Sterile and Non-Sterile Compounding
           -	Medication Safety
           -	Pharmacy Quality Assurance
           -	Medication Order Entry and Fill Process
           -	Pharmacy Inventory Management
           -	Pharmacy Billing and Reimbursement
           -	Pharmacy Information Usage and Application
•	35+ min of video prep content for the real exam
•	Learning flashcards – Study efficiently for PTCB PTCE certification
•	Master the essential math that will be on the PTCE exam
•	Detailed solutions for each PTCB practice question
•	QUIZ - 100 tough exam-like practice questions
•	Detailed results tracking – Learn your strongest & weakest areas
•	Study for PTCE or PTCB with NO STRESS!
 

WITH PTCB PHARMACY EXAM MASTERY HARD WORK WILL PAY OFF! 

PTCB Pharmacy Exam Mastery flexible subscription options:
• 1 Month auto-renewing payment of $14.99
• 3 Month auto-renewing payment of $29.99
• 12 Month auto-renewing payment of $89.99

Start your journey to PTCB PTCE certification success today! Download our app for free and explore a limited selection of practice questions and basic progress metrics. Upgrade to Premium for unlimited access and take charge of your future as a Pharmacy Technician.

Contact Us:
Have questions or feedback? Reach out to our support team at support@hltcorp.com or call 319-246-5271
Privacy Policy - http://builtbyhlt.com/privacy
Terms of Conditions - http://builtbyhlt.com/EULA

PTCB®, PTCE®, and Pharmacy Technician Certification Exam® are registered trademarks of the Pharmacy Technician Certification Board™ (PTCB®) and administered exclusively by PTCB®. This material is not endorsed or approved by PTCB®.",Medical,"Higher Learning Technologies, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/ptcb-ptce-mastery-exam/id1227057613?uo=4,4.72539,4155,pharmacy
779622024,MyHumana,"Your health doesn't wait for you to be in front of your computer. Get the most out of your plan with a MyHumana account, and take your Humana essentials wherever you go with the MyHumana app. 

Depending on your plan, you can use the app to:

Explore coverage and benefit details the moment you need them 

Get ID cards and add them to your phone's wallet 

Find care close to you and get directions on your phone's map app 

Estimate drug prices and check for alternatives before you even leave the doctor's office 

Pay your premiums on the go Check deductibles, maximums and more",Health & Fitness,Humana Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/myhumana/id779622024?uo=4,4.41474,2686,pharmacy
1446761875,America's Pharmacy,"Fact #1: you can save up to 80% on your prescriptions. Every day. And did you know using the program is free? 

Fact #2: Did you know drug prices can vary drastically from pharmacy to pharmacy? 

Now that you know, get the instant-savings app from America's Pharmacy, the coupons that are honored by pharmacists nationwide! 

When you use the America’s Pharmacy app, you’ll find low prices on tens-of-thousands of drugs at YOUR OWN local participating pharmacy including when participating pharmacy offers $4 (or even $0!) prices on certain generics.

Get America’s Pharmacy Discounts - Free! 
◆ America’s Pharmacy is honored by pharmacists 
◆ America’s Pharmacy is recommended by doctors 
◆ You can save up to 80% on YOUR prescription at YOUR local participating pharmacy 
◆ Every America’s Pharmacy coupon is free 

Get America’s Pharmacy Discounts - Fast! 
◆ unlike other apps, we’re simple, easy, and quick 
◆ You don’t register! 
◆ Just show the app to your pharmacist to save up to 80% instantly! 

Why? Because America's Pharmacy is so easy: 
◆ You can find Your Prescription 
◆ You can select YOUR participating pharmacy 
◆ There is no registration required 
◆ You get free coupons within seconds of opening the app

No printer needed! 
You never need to print anything, just show & save!

America’s Pharmacy is 100% free to use. And every member of your family can use our app – there are even discounts for pet medications (these coupons are free to use too!). 

America's Pharmacy users say great things about our program. 

“This was more money than I saved with other cards. It might not be a lot to other people but saving an extra $83.20 per month makes a difference in a life like mine.” 

“My $1,400.00 dollar prescription was only $40.00 with coupon from Americas Pharmacy. Thank you very much. If I hadn't found this I would be doing without, very grateful. It's just unbelievable that there could be such difference.” 

“I can testify to this! I used them for my son’s prescription yesterday! It took it from $42 to $12.50... Thank you America's Pharmacy!!””

“Phenomenal discounts — so many great low prices can't beat it seriously. I love you guys.” 

When you download the America’s Pharmacy app you agree to be bound by our Terms of Use https://www.americaspharmacy.com/terms, Privacy Policy https://www.americaspharmacy.com/privacy, and Member Agreement https://www.americaspharmacy.com/member_agreement. 

Don’t wait! Save now with the America’s Pharmacy app!",Medical,MCN Group LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/americas-pharmacy/id1446761875?uo=4,4.25806,93,pharmacy
497468339,My Doctor Online (NCAL Only),"Manage care for you and your family in one convenient place. It’s simple and convenient to get personalized health reminders and information from your doctor.
The My Doctor Online app is for Kaiser Permanente Northern California members.
• Get the care that works best for common concerns, including E-visits for advice, prescriptions, and tests.
• Get timely notifications about appointments, screenings, immunizations, surgeries and procedures, pregnancy, diabetes, and more.
• See your doctor with a video visit.
• Schedule and manage primary and specialty appointments for you and your family.
• Refill prescriptions.
• View test results and other information in your medical record.
• Find doctors and medical office locations.
To get started, download and launch the app. Sign-in with your kp.org user ID and password. A Northern California member without a kp.org user ID and password can register from the app – just tap “Sign-In Help.” Once you sign-in, enable app notifications.",Medical,Kaiser Permanente,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/my-doctor-online-ncal-only/id497468339?uo=4,4.83399,84159,pharmacy
1401371704,Hy-Vee,"Grocery shopping (and so much more!) is now the easiest part of your day with the Hy-Vee app. This all-in-one supermarket app offers everything you need — from convenient grocery shopping and seasonal meal ideas to expert how-tos, shoppable premium products, and easy pharmacy refills.


The Hy-Vee app allows you to order groceries in minutes from anywhere. Enjoy the convenience of having a grocery store at your fingertips! Browse by category, explore sale items, check out products with Fuel Saver rewards, or simply type what you need into the search bar. Unlike other supermarket apps, we empower you to take control of your shopping experience. Make grocery shopping a breeze and find deals tailored to you — all while enjoying continuous improvements based on your feedback. Here are some of the features we think you’ll love:


Inspire your meals: Dive into our digital ""Discover” experience that provides delicious recipe inspiration for every occasion, from quick weeknight dinners to festive holiday dishes. Plus, discover stylish, shoppable premium cookware and get expert video tips that elevate your cooking.


Shop anytime, anywhere: Whether you’re at work, home, or on the go, order groceries and schedule pickup (in as little as two hours) or delivery. Experience the VIP treatment our employees are known for.


Find great deals: Easily spot sale items with our sale icon or browse all discounts in one convenient place. Add sale items to your cart effortlessly.


Hy-Vee PERKS rewards: Keep track of your Fuel Saver rewards and expiration dates — no need to carry your card. Just scan your PERKS card in the app!


Health made easy: Refill prescriptions, check refill status, manage family members’ prescriptions, and stay informed with the latest health recommendations — all within the app.


At Hy-Vee we believe in providing a helpful smile in every aisle and going the extra mile for you. We’re proud to serve our communities with quality products, variety, convenience, culinary expertise, and superior customer service leading you to a healthy lifestyle. Grab your groceries and let us support you in the kitchen!",Shopping,"Hy-Vee, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/hy-vee/id1401371704?uo=4,4.24293,19936,pharmacy
1537039316,"PillEye – tablet, pill counter","PillEye – Revolutionize Pill Counting
Stop manually counting pills and switch to a faster, more accurate service with PillEye. Built for pharmacists, pharmacy technicians, veterinarians, and healthcare professionals, PillEye delivers precision and efficiency like never before.

Key Features:
- Live Mode – Real-Time Counting: Instantly count over 1,000 pills using your phone’s camera. No taps, no waiting—just accurate results, instantly.
- Photo Mode – Snap and Count: Capture a single photo to count up to 500 pills with unmatched precision.
- 99.99% Accuracy: Whether you’re counting tablets, capsules, or halves, PillEye ensures every count is precise.
- History Management: Save, review, and share your pill counts seamlessly with your team.

Why Choose PillEye?
- Faster Workflow: Cut your pill counting time by at least a third, freeing you up to focus on patient care and other important tasks.
- Unmatched Accuracy: PillEye’s advanced technology guarantees over 99.99% accuracy, ensuring reliable results every time.
- Effortless to Use: With real-time and photo counting options, PillEye makes the process intuitive and hassle-free.

Stop wasting time with outdated manual counting methods. PillEye transforms your pill counting process, helping you work smarter, faster, and more accurately.

Download PillEye today and experience the future of pill counting!",Medical,Medility Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/pilleye-tablet-pill-counter/id1537039316?uo=4,2.92233,206,pharmacy
766754686,BGC Pharmacy,"Already a Brookshire’s, Super 1 Foods, or FRESH by Brookshire’s customer? Enjoy the convenience of the Brookshire Grocery Company (BGC) Pharmacy App today.

It's like having your local pharmacy on your phone with the BGC Mobile Pharmacy App! Manage all of your prescriptions and take advantage of all of the great services available at your local pharmacy, like immunizations and health screenings.

Refill Your Prescriptions:
Scan your prescription bottle or choose from a list of available prescriptions. If you run out of refills, your pharmacist will contact your doctor on your behalf! You can also set up auto-refills, and we will automatically refill your prescription before you run out of medication and notify you when it is ready to pick up via text, email, and/or phone call.

Review your Prescription History:
Get access to your prescription history. Custom filters help you find just what you are looking for. Review details about each of your prescriptions.

Manage Prescriptions for Your Family:
Do you keep track of your family's prescriptions? BGC Pharmacy App can help you can manage prescriptions for your entire family and pets. 

Transfer all your Prescriptions:
Do you have prescriptions at more than one pharmacy? Transfer your medications to your BGC Pharmacy App to keep them all in one place.

Don’t forget your Pet:
You can fill your pet's medications, including heartworm prevention at BGC Pharmacy today. We have low cost generic medications and special compounding too.

Locate a pharmacy near you:
Find your local pharmacy using your phone's GPS or choose from a list of available pharmacies.",Lifestyle,Brookshire Grocery Company,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/bgc-pharmacy/id766754686?uo=4,2.25342,146,pharmacy
571088532,BCBSIL,"The Blue Cross and Blue Shield of Illinois (BCBSIL) app provides access to the Blue Cross and Blue Shield of Illinois member information and resources. BCBSIL app also provides shopping information such as getting a quote and tracking an application. 

Members can: 
•	Login, register or change password 
•	Easily access coverage, claims, and ID
•	Check deductible and out of pockets amounts
•	Find an in network doctor, hospital or facility
•	Find a nearby urgent care facility
•	Estimate the costs of procedures, tests and treatments
•	View patient reviews and average wait time 
•	Search for doctors that speak Spanish
•	View medical benefits and copay levels
•	View pharmacy benefits and copay levels
•	Send ID to Apple Wallet for offline access
•	View their Explanation of Benefits
•	Log in via Touch ID
•	Share ID Card
•	Members with applicable pharmacy coverage can search for drug information and cost estimates, view and compare nearby pharmacies, and view reminders related to their prescriptions
•	Members with applicable coverage can access MDLive for virtual visits with a doctor (MDLive uses allergies and medications from your HealthKit when requesting a virtual visit)",Health & Fitness,Blue Cross and Blue Shield of Illinois,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/bcbsil/id571088532?uo=4,3.50799,1126,pharmacy
596011949,HungerStation,"HungerStation is the first delivery app in the Kingdom, providing all your needs from over 55,000 restaurants and stores, including food, groceries, pharmacy items, flowers, and more, across more than 102 cities in Saudi Arabia.

All you need to do is to download the app and follow the simple steps below:
-Add your location details
-Choose a restaurant or store you like
-Add your favourite items from the menu to your basket
-Complete your order by choosing your payment method, whether it's cash or card

New user? Enjoy unlimited free delivery for one year on over 35,000 restaurants and stores with HPlus.",Food & Drink,HungerStation LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/hungerstation/id596011949?uo=4,4.391,157337,pharmacy
984044296,Rappi - Deliveries in Minutes,"TRY RAPPI TODAY

Get everything delivered in minutes. Discover the app that makes life simpler.

Rappi brings you the best selection of food, groceries, liquor, convenience items, pharmacy essentials, flowers, and so much more. With over 200,000 restaurants and stores in 300+ cities across Latin America, Rappi connects you with the best products in your city.

WHAT CAN YOU ORDER?

- Your favorite meals: Pizzas, burgers, bowls, sushi, and much more.
- Rappi Turbo for ultra-fast, 10-min deliveries: Over 8,000 everyday products and meals brought to your door in minutes.
- Groceries: Fresh items from top brands, handpicked by experts and delivered to your door.
- Pharmacy: Everything you need to take care of yourself, anytime.
- Liquor and convenience: Drinks, snacks, and more for your next gathering with friends or family.
- Pet care and gifts: Treat your furry friends or find the perfect gift from thousands of options.
- RappiFavor: Need a concierge? We'll pick up, buy or deliver anything for you. Quick and reliable task-based deliveries are here to help.
- Rappi Bank & Rappi Card: Credit card with no annual fees, cashback perks, and 24/7 support.
- Rappi Travel: Plan your next trip with exclusive deals on flights and hotels.

WHAT'S NEW WITH RAPPI

- Follow your friends: See their favorites, share recommendations, and connect over what you enjoy.
- Top recommendations: Discover local foodie picks from influencers, celebrities, and foodies across 9 countries.
- Exclusive offers just for you: Enjoy personalized discounts and offers, all in one place and tailored to your interests. 
- Rappi Turbo has more: More products, more categories, and now lower prices. Plus, you can now get your entire grocery list delivered in minutes.
- More precise searches: Find exactly what you’re looking for with AI-powered search.
- 24/7 10-min delivery stores: More Turbo stores are open around the clock. Order what you need, whenever you need it.
- And so much more: Update the app to explore all the latest features!

HOW IT WORKS

Browse everything the app has to offer, choose what you need, and get it delivered to your door in minutes with real-time tracking. Want it later? Schedule your delivery for the perfect time.

WHERE WE DELIVER

Rappi is available in Argentina, Brazil, Chile, Colombia, Costa Rica, Ecuador, Mexico, Peru, and Uruguay—connecting you with the best your city has to offer.

DOWNLOAD RAPPI AND REDEFINE HOW YOU EXPERIENCE YOUR CITY.",Food & Drink,Grability Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/rappi-deliveries-in-minutes/id984044296?uo=4,4.61414,78253,pharmacy
1281732791,My Community Pharmacy,"The My Community Pharmacy app allows you and your family to securely communicate with 2,500 independent pharmacies nationwide.  Refill your prescriptions with one click, get refill reminders, get discounts at your local pharmacy, get savings on brand drugs and access Pharmacist written pages that help you understand your condition or medications.

Our App Features:
HIPAA secure
Easily refill your prescriptions at your local independent pharmacy
Access a history of your medications and Rx numbers
Set reminders when to refill your medications
Set reminders when to take your medications
Save up to $450 on top brand medications with co-pay coupons
20,000 pharmacist written pages on conditions and medications
7,500 pharmacist videos about medications and side effects",Medical,Digital Pharmacist Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/my-community-pharmacy/id1281732791?uo=4,4.71429,2639,pharmacy
393507802,One Medical,"One Medical is reimagining the doctor’s office. Our app makes it easy to get primary care for your body and mind right from your phone. Need to schedule an appointment with your doctor? Request a prescription renewal? Get answers to a medical question in the middle of the night? With One Medical, your doctor’s office is at your fingertips, 24/7.

Here’s some of what you can do in our app:

• Schedule an in-office or remote visit in a state where we have offices
• Get 24/7 on-demand care nationwide with Treat Me Now and Urgent Video Chat at no extra cost
• Receive reminders for upcoming visits and service recommendations
• Send and receive secure messages with a provider
• Request prescription refills and renewals
• Access your health records and care plans
• Sync your data with Apple Health
• Manage bills, copays, and insurance
• Find offices close to where you live, work, and travel

Only One Medical members can access the app. Download the app and join One Medical today.

About One Medical

We’re a membership-based primary care practice designed around your needs and your life. We accept most major health insurance plans, including Medicare. Our providers take the time to get to know you and work with you on your health goals, so you feel seen, heard, and cared for. We have primary care offices in many U.S. cities and offer 24/7 on-demand virtual care, so exceptional care is always within reach — from preventive care and mental health to illnesses and injuries.

All One Medical patients enjoy:

• Compassionate providers who take time to listen
• Appointments that start on time
• Drop-in lab services at One Medical offices
• Referrals to top specialists when needed

Learn more about membership at onemedical.com or ask your employer if One Medical is one of your employee benefits.",Medical,"One Medical Group, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/one-medical/id393507802?uo=4,4.92502,46780,pharmacy
433457624,Florida Blue,"Florida Blue members & Florida residents, download the Florida Blue app today. View your digital ID card, find care near you, check your benefits & more! Florida Blue is an independent licensee of the Blue Cross Blue Shield Association.
 
Making the most of your health plan has never been easier!

· Make a premium bill payment
· Compare drug & medical care costs
· Check your deductible & covered services
· See your HSA or FSA balances, if applicable
· View your claims
· Connect with us for help
· And more!",Health & Fitness,Blue Cross and Blue Shield of Florida,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/florida-blue/id433457624?uo=4,4.81154,27268,pharmacy
1450835575,LIFE Pharmacy,"The Official LIFE Pharmacy app for online shopping, prescriptions, vouchers and more!

The LIFE Pharmacy application makes your life easier by allowing you to have all connected services available on a single application. Here’s how it works:

Prescription Upload:
Conveniently scan and upload your prescription so that your closest LIFE Pharmacy can deliver your prescription straight to you!

Order Products:
Simply type or take a picture of the products you want to purchase and our team will arrange for them to be delivered to you from your closest LIFE Pharmacy.

Online Shopping:
Shop healthcare products with ease with quick delivery at your doorstep.

Vouchers:
Earn reward vouchers when you shop at LIFE Pharmacy by purchasing selected items. Use these vouchers on your next visit to LIFE by redeeming them against a wide range of products in our Pharmacy.

Feedback:
Send us your feedback, questions, concerns or even products you are searching for, directly through the app so that we can contact you back and assist you with your query!",Shopping,LIFE HOME HEALTH CARE (L.L.C),https://apps.apple.com/us/app/life-pharmacy/id1450835575?uo=4,4.72527,1143,pharmacy
652894861,Food City Pharmacy Mobile App,"The Food City Pharmacy Mobile App lets you find Food City Pharmacies, manage your family's medications, refill prescriptions, and transfer prescriptions from one pharmacy to another using your mobile device. Features include:
• Refill your prescriptions by entering the Rx number or scanning the bottle using the camera on your phone
• Manage the prescriptions of your entire family with a secure biometric login
• See your prescription history
• Transfer prescriptions from any pharmacy to your preferred Food City location
• Use the GPS on your phone to find the nearest Food City location
• Find information on a variety of health topics and medications",Medical,K-VA-T Food Stores Inc,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/food-city-pharmacy-mobile-app/id652894861?uo=4,4.74802,2405,pharmacy
6473449658,OTC Health Solutions,"It's easy to access and manage your OTC Benefit from anywhere with the OTC Health Solutions app.  Get simple, secure access to your health and over-the-counter (OTC) benefits and use them at nearby CVS stores or online.

- Take control of your benefits with real-time balance updates on funds and activity

- View transaction history for benefits used and track order status

- Easily find CVS stores where you can use your benefits in store, or order online

- Shop on your own terms with convenient CVS in-store, online, and home delivery options",Health & Fitness,CVS Pharmacy,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/otc-health-solutions/id6473449658?uo=4,3.98884,5735,pharmacy
321367289,Medscape,"Your Go-To Medical Resource for Immediate Clinical Answers

With Medscape, you get free access to the latest medical news, expert commentary, clinical tools, drug and disease information, CME/CE activities, and more—all in one place.

AI-Driven Solutions to Transform Your Practice
Scribe: Real-time transcription and summarization of patient visits.
Dialer: Call patients using your office number from anywhere.
AI Search: Get instant, expert answers to complex medical questions.


Essential Clinical Tools
450+ medical calculators organized by specialty.
Drug Interaction Checker, Pill Identifier, and step-by-step procedural videos.
Up-to-date prescribing and safety info on 9,200+ drugs, herbals, and supplements.


Stay Informed & Connected
The latest FDA approvals, conference news, and clinical trial data.
Expert insights across 30+ specialties.


Medscape Original Podcasts, including This Week in Cardiology.
Free CME/CE credits & ABIM MOC points with an Activity Tracker.
Network with peers via Medscape Consult and MedscapeLIVE! events.
Medscape is the Leading Online Destination for Healthcare Professionals.

Have feedback? Email us at medscapemobile@webmd.net.",Medical,WebMD Health Corporation,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/medscape/id321367289?uo=4,3.6267,1326,clinical
353404314,CliniCalc Medical Calculator,"CliniCalc is a comprehensive tool for medical professionals, making it easy to perform complex calculations and remember scores, scales, classifications & more with high quality images. CliniCalc gives you the answers you need, when you need them. 
Do you remember the CHADS2 Score for atrial fibrillation patients, or recall the details of the Glasgow Coma Scale? Medical professionals often need to remember a wealth of complicated calculations. 
No matter what you need to know, whether it’s a classification, formula, scale or anything else, CliniCalc’s streamlined navigation makes finding what you need simple and lightning fast.
Store your favorite formulas, find the most recently used, search for specific calculations using keywords and short descriptions. You’re only ever seconds away from finding the answers you need. 

CLINICALC – BENEFITS

• Hundreds of relevant formulas, scores, classifications & scales
• Store your favourite formulas, view recently used & search using keywords quickly
• Detailed background information for each formula 
• High quality images to help you with accurate classifications
• Universal support for US and SI units, with easy switching

FORMULAS, SCORES & CLASSIFICATIONS 

• Here’s just a small sample of the valuable information you’ll have access to when using CliniCalc:
• Anesthesia – ASA, Bromage, Cormack, Goldman, ABCD, APACHE, Parkland, CAM-ICU, SAPS
• Cardiology – CC/AHA ASCVD, CHADS, EuroSCORE, GRACE, HAS-BLED, Killip, PROCAM, QT-c, TIMI
• Emergency Medicine – 4T Score, CATCH, Canadian CT Head Rule, DIC, Dose Calculator, Glasgow Come Scale
• Gastroenterology – Child-Pugh, Glasgow, Harvey Bradshaw, MELD, NAC Calc, PELD, Ranson’s
• Hematology – DIC Score, Iron Deficit, ANC, Reticulocyte Index
• Nephrology – Cockcroft, GFR calculators, MDRD, Water Deficit & RIFLE
• Neurology – AMTS, Catch Rules, Dermatome Map, Hunt-Hess, NIHSS, WFNS
• Pediatrics – Age, Target Height, APGAR; Pediatric GCS, Tube Size, Westley Croup Score
• Pulmonology – CURB-65, MRC, GOLD, Spirometry, SMART-COP, BODE
• Miscellaneus – NNT, Odds, Sample Size, Two-Way Table, Corrected Ca, Units conversions

GET THE COMPLETE DATABASE OF FORMULAS, SCORES & CLASSIFICATIONS TODAY! 

This app is intended for educational purposes only, and is not intended to diagnose, treat or cure any disease. No clinical decisions should be made based on this app. 

CliniCalc uses elements from the open source project “MedCalc for iPhone” governed by the Apache 2.0 and Creative Commons licenses.",Medical,Medicon Apps,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/clinicalc-medical-calculator/id353404314?uo=4,4.75393,1081,clinical
720853854,eClinicalMobile,"eClinicalMobile® allows providers to access the system anywhere through their smart phone. The screen has been optimized for easier viewing and to load quickly on these handheld devices. Users are able to access schedules, write prescriptions, and access encounters with the peace of mind that the data is encrypted and hosted on a secure gateway. 
eClinicalMobile provides user name and password as part of the log-on security function. Once logged in, icons are displayed for ease of use in choosing your function.

Functions include:
Checking schedules
Telephone and web messages
e-Prescribing
Viewing patient encounters
Examining lab results
Charge capture at the point of service

eClinicalWorks® understands the daily juggling act that providers deal with trying to balance their life outside of the office. eClinicalMobile allows you to be in contact with your staff and have access to the vital information that resides on your computer without having to go into the office. The product offers access to your patients’ information with a tap of the screen enabling you to provide your patients the best care possible and in a timely manner.",Medical,eClinicalWorks LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/eclinicalmobile/id720853854?uo=4,2.37312,1994,clinical
1001640662,MDCalc Medical Calculator,"Join the millions of medical professionals who use MDCalc daily to support clinical decision making at the bedside. Since 2005, MDCalc has been the leading medical reference for the most relevant, up-to-date and widely-used clinical calculators that support evidence-based patient care. Registration is free and takes less than 30 seconds for full, unlimited access.

MDCalc clinical decision support is created exclusively by board-certified physicians for use by physicians, physician assistants, nurse practitioners, pharmacists, and medical students. The simple yet sleek app provides access to 550+ easy-to-use clinical decision tools including risk scores, algorithms, equations, formulas, classifications, dosing calculators, and more.

With a new enhancement, clinicians can now earn AMA PRA Category 1TM CME credits by simply reading the clinical content for 150+ calculators. The app will keep track of the CME credits earned in a personal dashboard, where users can also redeem credits for certificates and access their receipts for easy documentation. In order to redeem CME credits, users will need to sign up for a paid CME plan.

Unique features, ideal for the busy practicing clinician:

• Works offline and in limited connection settings. (CME tracking requires a connection.)
• Fast and easy search and filter to discover new calculators.
• Customizable lists for quick access: favorites, recently used, your specialty.
• Auto-syncing between the website and app.
• Quick toggle between US and SI units.
• Error warnings and normal values to help avoid mistakes and improper inputs.

Our exclusive “MDCalc Method” for selecting tools - including in-depth appraisal and validation of evidence AND clinical relevance - results in only the highest-quality tools to help you make better decisions and be more efficient in your workflow. And our network of academic and practicing physician experts create easy-to-digest content to reinforce decision making and support training:

• Insights and advice from the EBM creators (e.g. Dr. Phil Wells’ on the Wells’ Criteria).
• Expert content by specialists on use cases, pearls & pitfalls, results interpretation and more.
• Synopses of the evidence from the original and validation research.

From iMedicalApps in 2016: “The evidence based medicine (EBM) components of the medical app are what really set MDCalc apart from its peers... The MDCalc app gives brief summaries of the critical studies concerning the medical calculator, links to the studies on PubMed as well as “pearls/pitfalls”, “next steps” and expert commentary from the authors of the calculators.” - iMedicalApps “MDCalc app, the best online medical calculator is now an app”

MDCalc clinical decision tools support 35+ specialties including cardiology, critical care/ICU, emergency medicine, endocrinology, gastroenterology, hematology, hepatology, infectious disease, internal medicine, nephrology, neurology, obstetrics, oncology, orthopedics, pediatrics, primary care, psychiatry, pulmonology, surgery, urology, and more! Here are some examples of the tools:

* Calculators that include CME content

» Creatinine Clearance (Cockcroft-Gault Equation)
» CHA2DS2-VASc Score for Atrial Fibrillation Stroke Risk
» Calcium Correction for Hypoalbuminemia
» MELD Score (Model For End-Stage Liver Disease) (12 and older)
» HAS-BLED Score for Major Bleeding Risk
» CHADS2 Score for Atrial Fibrillation Stroke Risk
» HEART Score for Major Cardiac Events *
» SIRS, Sepsis, and Septic Shock Criteria *
» Fractional Excretion of Sodium (FENa)
» Mean Arterial Pressure (MAP) *
» Wells’ Criteria for Pulmonary Embolism *
» Wells’ Criteria for DVT",Medical,"MDCalc Ltd., Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/mdcalc-medical-calculator/id1001640662?uo=4,4.91596,50462,clinical
392489854,Prognosis: Your Diagnosis,"With Prognosis, you can improve your ability to diagnose and immediately manage key clinical presentations associated with a disease, having access to relevant facts and succinct explanations behind the underlying diagnostic and management rationale.  

Prognosis is designed for practicing physicians, medical students, nursing professionals and other healthcare practitioners who love medicine and want to thrive as world-class decision makers. After all, practice makes perfect; and practice can be fun!  

Our catalog offers cases spanning a wide range of medical specialties, all which can be played in minutes. Each case is also accompanied by a concise yet comprehensive discussion of the diagnostic reasoning, as well as and key learning points for you to take home.  

Prognosis cases are based on the actual clinical experiences of more than 200 physicians across 33 specialties. 

New cases are released every week, often in keeping with global endemic and epidemic trends, to help you brush up on the clinical skills that are the need of the hour!

- Best App for Health & Well Being - World Summit Awards, 2012 (https://www.worldsummitawards.org/winner/prognosis-your-diagnosis/).
- 'Dr House for Doctors' - Discover Magazine (https://www.discovermagazine.com/technology/hot-science-18).
- 'One of the five best apps for doctors' - Bulletin of The Royal College of Surgeons of England, Volume: 94 Issue: 1 (https://publishing.rcseng.ac.uk/doi/abs/10.1308/147363512X13189526438558).",Medical,Medical Joyworks LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/prognosis-your-diagnosis/id392489854?uo=4,4.79922,2809,clinical
473260569,symplr Clinical Communications,"The symplr Clinical Communications and collaboration platform simplifies communication so clinicians can focus on care. One mobile (or web) application provides role-based secure messaging, voice communication, critical alert notification, and on-call schedule management. symplr Clinical Communications can also integrate with all hospital clinical systems to allow instant access to existing on-call schedules, critical and clinical teams, call center messages, critical lab results, and others. Regardless of your role or department, symplr Clinical Communications allows you to communicate the right information to the right people in real time.

symplr Clinical Communications Key Features: 
• Unlimited HIPAA-compliant secure messaging with automatic message status updates (Sent/Delivered/Read) 
• Attach high-resolution photos, audio, video and documents 
• Off-duty, auto-forward, and gatekeeping settings redirect or include others in critical messages when you’re unavailable
• User-defined groups and organization-defined distribution lists allow quick and efficient communication to multiple recipients
• Receive critical alerts from nurse call systems, PACS/labs, EHR and others directly on your mobile device
• Schedule management tool (admin only) creates real-time systemwide on-call schedules 
• Role-based communication allows you to contact who’s on-call and available right now to assist (individuals or teams) via secure text messaging or voice calls within your organization and linked organizations
• Can operate on all devices and platforms commonly found in healthcare systems – smartphones, feature phones, pagers, workstations on wheels, desktop computers and more.",Medical,"Halo Health, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/symplr-clinical-communications/id473260569?uo=4,0.0,0,clinical
931723742,ACC Guideline Clinical App,"Access the American College of Cardiology’s clinical guideline recommendations and use interactive tools such as risk scores, dosing calculators, and algorithms through the ACC’s Guideline Clinical App. The App also includes features such as customizable bookmarks, note-taking, and emailable pdfs. ACC’s Guideline App is free to both members and nonmembers. 

This app is the ACC’s mobile home for clinical guideline content and tools for clinicians caring for patients with cardiovascular disease. Current guidelines in the App include: 

• Atrial Fibrillation (AF) 
• Cardiovascular Risk (CV Risk) 
• Coronary Artery Bypass Graft (CABG) 
• Cholesterol (Chol) 
• Device-Based Therapy (DBT) 
• Dual Antiplatelet Therapy Update (DAPT) 
• Heart Failure (HF)
• High Blood Pressure (BP) 
• Hypertrophic Cardiomyopathy (HCM) 
• Lifestyle (Lstyle) 
• Non–ST-Elevation Acute Coronary Syndromes (NSTEMI) 
• Obesity 
• Percutaneous Coronary Intervention (PCI)
• Peripheral Artery Disease (PAD) 
• Perioperative Management for Noncardiac Surgery (Periop) 
• Stable Ischemic Heart Disease (SIHD) 
• ST-Elevated Myocardial Infarction (STEMI) 
• Supraventricular Tachycardia (SVT)
• Syncope 
• Valvular Heart Disease (VHD)
• Ventricular Arrhythmias and the Prevention of Sudden Cardiac Death (VA/SCD) 

Stay tuned for ongoing updates, more guideline content, and tools. 

Send feedback to the ACC directly from the App Information page or post a review in the App Store. Help us find new and better ways to deliver guideline content to clinicians.

The information, text, graphics, images, trademarks, and other materials (collectively, “Content”) that may be contained in the Guidelines Mobile Application (“App”) is presented as an educational service intended for licensed health care professionals. While the Content in the App is about specific medical and health care issues, the Content is not a substitute for or replacement of personalized medical advice and is not intended to be used as the sole basis for making individualized medical or health-related decisions.

The views and opinions expressed in the App are those of the contributing authors and editors and do not necessarily represent the views of the ACCF. The Content is not intended to present the only, or necessarily best, methods or procedures for the medical situations addressed, but rather is intended to represent an approach, view, statement, or opinion. ACCF hereby expressly disclaims responsibility for any liability arising from or in connection with the application of the Content in the App by you.",Medical,American College of Cardiology,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/acc-guideline-clinical-app/id931723742?uo=4,4.86319,614,clinical
301865751,5 Minute Clinical Consult,"** Features 2025 Update ** 

ABOUT 5-MINUTE CLINICAL CONSULT
The latest update of 5-Minute Clinical Consult (5MCC) helps you diagnose, treat, and follow up on over 1,000 medical conditions found in everyday practice. Search or browse this best-selling reference by disease or symptom, then jump to each entry to easily find just the information you need – all without an internet connection. 

UNBOUND EXCLUSIVE BONUS CONTENT 
• 200 pediatric disease topics from the latest edition of 5-Minute Pediatric Consult 
• McGraw-Hill Medical's Diagnosaurus® DDx, containing over 1,000 differential diagnoses.
• Access to the primary literature with Prime PubMed Search

5-MINUTE CLINICAL CONSULT FEATURES:  
• 1,000+ new and updated topics
• 150+ diagnostic and treatment algorithms 
• Create custom notes and highlights within entries
• Evidence-based designations for proven treatments 
• Full-color images of dermatologic conditions
• ICD-10 codes
• Advanced Search to help find terms across all indexes and full-text 
• “Favorites” for bookmarking important entries 
• Cross Links for fast navigation between resources 

TRIAL / SUBSCRIPTION DETAILS
• New users can access the complete 5-Minute Clinical Consult app free for 14 days.
• After 14 days, your iTunes account will be charged $99.99 for a one-year subscription unless you have turned off auto-renew in Account Settings at least 24 hours before the free trial ends.
• At the end of the one-year period, your subscription will automatically renew unless auto-renew is turned off in Account Settings 24 hours prior to the renewal date.
• If you choose not to renew, you will still be able to use the app but will not receive diagnosis and treatment updates.

Unbound Privacy Policy: www.unboundmedicine.com/privacy
Unbound Terms of Use: https://www.unboundmedicine.com/end_user_license_agreement

5-Minute Clinical Consult
Editor-in-Chief: Frank J. Domino, MD 
Associate Editors: Kathleen Barry MD, Robert A. Baldor, MD; Jeremy Golding, MD; Mark B. Stephens, MD, MS, FAAFP
Publisher: Wolters Kluwer

McGraw-Hill Medical's Diagnosaurus® DDx
Author: Roni F. Zeiger, MD
Publisher: McGraw-Hill Professional 

Powered by: Unbound Medicine",Medical,"Unbound Medicine, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/5-minute-clinical-consult/id301865751?uo=4,4.81994,2949,clinical
1361264072,Labcorp | Patient,"The Labcorp Patient mobile app is easy to use and has convenient features that help you manage your health. Here are just a few of the things you can do, from the convenience of your mobile device:

•  Find a lab and schedule an appointment 
•  Check in at a Patient Service Center by scanning a QR code at our kiosk or checking in from your mobile device 
•  Receive a notification when your lab test results are ready
•  View, download, and print your official lab test result report
•  View historical lab test results
•  Receive a notification when a bill is available
•  View, download, print, and pay your bills
•  Share your account with someone else 
•  Add minors to your account to manage their lab testing information
•  Manage your profile preferences
•  Reset your password
•  Log in using your Face ID or Fingerprint
•  Learn how you can participate in clinical research offered by Labcorp",Medical,Laboratory Corporation of America,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/labcorp-patient/id1361264072?uo=4,4.75502,19998,clinical
594288220,PerfectServe Clinical Collab,"PerfectServe Clinical Collaboration is an enterprise cloud-based communications platform built specifically for healthcare.  Our solution provides secure HIPAA compliant texting, an answering service, pager replacement, on-call schedules, and clinical integration with the EMR all on one easy to use platform. 

Note: You must have an account enabled on PerfectServe Clinical Collaboration before you can use this application.

Main functions of our offering include:

• Communications: Our mobile applications allow for real-time texting and voice communication between clinicians.  Multimedia messaging with photos, voice, and attachments are supported as are the ability to record and deliver voicemails when clinicians are busy with patients.

• Reliable Messaging: PerfectServe Clinical Collaboration provides a persistent and reliable messaging layer that is able to deliver time sensitive messages to users on a multitude of delivery channels.  PerfectServe Clinical Collaboration detects when a user’s device has data connectivity issues, and routes the message accordingly based on a user’s network conditions and availability.

• Directory Integration: PerfectServe Clinical Collaboration is seamlessly deployed and managed through the organizations existing Microsoft Active Directory Infrastructure.

• Call Center Integration:  The ability to send messages from the existing call center software and systems allows for rapid deployment with minimal disruption to existing call center workflow.

• On Call Scheduling: PerfectServe Clinical Collaboration has the leading on-call scheduling platform, including escalations, shared schedules, round-robin load balancing based on provider load, and more.  In addition, we are the only communications platform that provides real-time integration with Amion, QGenda, Tangiers, as well as home grown and legacy scheduling platforms.

• Phone System Integration: PerfectServe Clinical Collaboration integrates with both SIP based and legacy (non SIP based) hospital phone platforms.  We are the only communications provider that is able to support a transition strategy from legacy circuit switch PBX systems to the SIP domain. Make and receive calls on your iOS device using VoIP as an extension of the hospital phone platform.

• Clinical Integration: PerfectServe Clinical Collaboration provides Patient Centric Messaging – the ability to track all messages against a patient and have two-way synchronization with the EMR.

• Nurse Mobility: Existing nurse call systems can be mobilized for nurses through integration with room alarms as well as patient assignments.",Medical,SmartPager Systems Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/perfectserve-clinical-collab/id594288220?uo=4,2.25,76,clinical
1041998175,ClinicalKey,"INSTITUTIONAL SUBSCRIPTION REQUIRED.

Access the latest advances in clinical knowledge anytime, anywhere with ClinicalKey®- the essential resource for medical professionals.

ClinicalKey combines the speed of synoptic content with the depth of a comprehensive clinical reference tool in one intuitive solution to provide clinicians trusted information in the moments that matter most. With ClinicalKey, you can:
•	Stay abreast of rapidly expanding clinical knowledge
•	Quickly confirm diagnosis and treatment information
•	Advance critical thinking skills and research

Please note: To access our extensive content library, ensure you have a subscription to ClinicalKey from your organization.

To get started:
1.	Download the free ClinicalKey app for iOS on your iPad® or iPhone®.
2.	Follow the prompts to connect to your organization’s account.The app will ask questions to get you to the right content.
3.	Choose the method of access that is right for you:
4.	Select Access via Network if you need a quick answer and your device is connected to your organization's network.
5.  Select Access via Institution for other ways to connect.
6.	Once you have gained access, create or sign- in to your Elsevier ClinicalKey user account to save favorites and earn CME/MOC/CE/MOC/CE.

ClinicalKey®
Because you want to find a better way to help your patients

ClinicalKey combines the speed of synoptic content with the depth of a comprehensive clinical reference tool in one intuitive solution to give clinicians trusted information in the moments that matter. With the ClinicalKey, clinicians will be able to:
• Enhance patient care with trusted resources and deep insights across 30+ specialties
• Combine efficiency and confidence in your practice with access to quick answers and information that is continuously updated
• Excel in your field by building foundational knowledge and keeping up with the latest trends through full-text reference books and journals, while earning free CME/MOC/CE credit
• Stay abreast of rapidly expanding clinical knowledge
• Quickly confirm diagnosis and treatment information
• Advance critical thinking skills and research

ClinicalKey App for iOS Features:
•	Trusted Comprehensive content covering more than 30 medical and surgical specialties
•	Easy-to-scan, clinically focused medical topic synopses
•	Intuitive search with auto-suggest/
•	Easy search with auto-completion
•	Direct navigation to your favorite books and journals
•	Mobile-optimized medical calculators
•	Access to full-text books, full-text journals, guidelines, multimedia and more
•	Access via Institutional IP; individuals will not be able to earn CME/MOC/CE, save, or share content when using IP authentication. Please register for remote access via your institutional web version of ClinicalKey.

ClinicalKey Registrants (non-IP) customers will enjoy:

•	Opportunity to earn CME and fulfill MOC requirements with the American Board of Internal Medicine (ABIM)
•	Ability to favorite and save content
•	Option to print and email topics, videos or graphics
•	Earn and track free CME/MOC/CE credit
Ability to favorite and save content
Print and email topics, videos or graphics to patients and colleagues

iPad and iPhone are trademarks of Apple Inc, registered in the US and other countries.",Medical,Elsevier Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/clinicalkey/id1041998175?uo=4,2.33846,65,clinical
1351934740,Pathway – Medical Knowledge,"Pathway is the #1 AI-powered medical knowledge platform, trusted by over 1M clinicians in 10,000+ leading care centers. Built specifically for healthcare professionals, it delivers fast, evidence-based answers to clinical questions, all backed by physician-vetted knowledge and referenced to the latest peer-reviewed literature.

WHY PATHWAY?
• Find fast, evidence-based answers with AI.
• Covers 1M+ clinical topics, 40+ specialties, and 1,000+ diseases.
• Earn CME credits with every question asked and article reviewed.
• Access drug information, dosing, studies, and guidelines instantly.

EVIDENCE-BASED, AI-POWERED ANSWERS

Pathway’s AI provides concise, evidence-based answers designed to save time and support confident clinical decisions.
• Quickly navigate the latest evidence and stay up-to-date.
• Save time with AI-assisted reasoning tailored to patient care.
• Evaluate evidence quality at a glance.


AS SEEN IN
• MobiHealthNews: ""A well-designed decision support technology adapted to the realities of 21st-century medicine.""
• Physicians Practice: ""Provides easier access to important clinical information.""


WHAT USERS SAY

“Pathway replaced UpToDate for me. It’s faster, easier, and more intuitive.” – Dr. M. Taylor, Cardiologist

“None of the clinical reference tools available are as simple, efficient and to-the-point. This is the only medical app I use on a daily basis.” - Jane R., General Practitioner

“I earn CME credits while solving real clinical challenges. It’s seamless and so valuable.” – Dr. L. Chen, Family Medicine

“Pathway’s AI gives me clear, evidence-based answers in seconds—it’s a game-changer.” – Dr. R. Singh, Internist

“Perhaps the hardest part of medicine is information overload and Pathway provides the best solution to this challenge I have seen.” - Christian L., 2nd year resident


STAY CONNECTED

• Website: https://pathway.md
• Email: contact@pathway.md
• Facebook: https://www.facebook.com/pathwaymedical/
• Twitter: https://www.twitter.com/pathwaymedical/
• Instagram: https://www.instagram.com/pathwaymedical/


LEARN MORE

• Frequently Asked Questions: http://www.pathway.md/faq/
• Terms of Use: https://www.pathway.md/terms-of-use/
• Privacy Policy: https://www.pathway.md/privacy-policy/

*Pathway is intended for physicians, medical residents, medical students, registered nurses, and other licensed health professionals only.*",Medical,Pathway Medical Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/pathway-medical-knowledge/id1351934740?uo=4,4.77473,1314,clinical
6612007783,OpenEvidence,"Clinical Decision Support for Healthcare Professionals (NPI Required).

OpenEvidence is the world’s leading medical information platform for health care professionals, providing accurate and efficient answers at the point of care. Every answer on OpenEvidence is always sourced, cited, and grounded in the peer-reviewed medical literature.

Now featuring New England Journal of Medicine (NEJM) published content, NEJM multimedia content, and NEJM invited review articles authored by the world’s leading clinical experts.

• 160 medical specialties
• 1,000+ diseases and therapeutic areas
• 1m+ medical topics

Trusted by medical professionals at 10,000+ care centers across the United States.

OpenEvidence is only available for health care professionals. Users must verify their health care professional status before using OpenEvidence.

AS SEEN IN

Forbes: “OpenEvidence Keeps Doctors Up To Date On The Latest Science”

TESTIMONIALS

“I've been using OpenEvidence for the last week - it has been amazing! Able to narrow down on results quickly and find information that I wasn't able to do with Google/PubMed searches on my own.” - Dr. John Lee, MD. Physician & Faculty Member, Harvard Medical School

“OpenEvidence can be the foundational technology to power all clinical decision tools.” - Dr. Antonio Jorge Forte, MD. Director of MayoExpert, Mayo Clinic

“OpenEvidence is more up-to-date than UpToDate. And more useful regardless, since it’s interactive, and you can ask it questions, and get very specific answers about specific medical fact patterns in a patient case. It’s like having a curbside consult with a team of expert physicians, but that you can carry around with you in your pocket.” - Dr. Ram Dandillaya, MD. Clinical Chief, Department of Cardiology, Cedars-Sinai Medical Center

“I am in community practice and medical director of a community cancer center. OpenEvidence has been an incredible lifeline for daily practitioners.” - C.J., Oncologist 

“OpenEvidence is absolutely fantastic. I use it a gazillion times a day.” - J.A., Neurologist

“OpenEvidence’s efforts to make medicine more evidence-based are invaluable. The shift from judgment to calculation can reduce the level of noise currently found in medicine.” - Daniel Kahneman, Nobel Prize Laureate (In Memoriam)

“It is light years ahead of the next best medical oriented AI I have used.” - R.E.., Oncologist

STAY SHARP & UP-TO-DATE

• Find what you need, when you need it on a mobile-native platform.

• The world’s most powerful medical search engine at your fingertips.

• Discover and find exactly what you are looking for with deep search and a highly intuitive user interface that understands you and what you are asking.",Medical,OpenEvidence Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/openevidence/id6612007783?uo=4,4.93503,3109,clinical
856082326,Clinical Sense,"With Clinical Sense, you can improve your ability to appropriately manage a patient over time: from presentation, to admission, to discharge and follow-up. Assume the role of a physician navigating a plethora of challenging clinical situations and make critical medical decisions in real time.

Clinical Sense is designed for practicing physicians, medical students, nursing professionals, and other healthcare practitioners who want to learn and have fun while doing so. After all, practice makes perfect; and practice can be fun!

Our scenarios offer a wide range of medical specialties, which can be played in minutes. They are also accompanied by a concise yet comprehensive discussion of the diagnostic reasoning, including insights into the ideal management of complications that may arise.

The scenarios in this award-winning app are all based on the actual case-management experiences of more than 200 physicians across 30 specialties from all over the world.

New scenarios are released every week, often in keeping with global endemic and epidemic trends, to help you brush up on the management skills that are the need of the hour! 

Achievements:
• #1 ranked app in 40+ countries.
• Top ranked free medical app in 120 countries.
• 1,000,000+ downloads worldwide.",Medical,Medical Joyworks LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/clinical-sense/id856082326?uo=4,4.72811,217,clinical
1533201171,Anger Test (Clinical),"Evaluate your level of anger with a validated questionnaire. 

Anger is a normal emotion, but for some people it can become chronic and overwhelming not only to them but to others in their lives. 

While there is no mental illness explicitly defining clinical anger, anger starts to become concerning on a clinical level when it is interfering with your relationships and mental health. 

This test can help you determine if you are experience minimal, mild, moderate, or severe levels of clinical anger. 

If you are concerned about your anger levels, there are many effective anger management techniques that you can use to take control of your anger. Talk to a mental health professional to get started. 

Snell Jr, W. E., Gum, S., Shuck, R. L., Mosley, J. A., & Kite, T. L. (1995). The clinical anger scale: Preliminary reliability and validity. Journal of Clinical Psychology, 51(2), 215-226.",Medical,Inquiry Health LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/anger-test-clinical/id1533201171?uo=4,4.69944,183,clinical
523220194,Mayo Clinic,"The Mayo Clinic app connects you to the No. 1 hospital in the nation, as ranked by U.S. News & World Report*.
 
The Mayo Clinic app gives you practical, helpful tools to manage your health on the go. Your care journey is now more seamless, secure, and accessible. Track your health information, schedule appointments, and complete check-in questionnaires at your convenience. You'll get easy access to your appointment itinerary, important reminders, campus maps, and medical records.
 
Receive your daily dose of health news and advice from top doctors, dietitians, fitness experts, and more. You can also search for reliable, research-backed answers to your questions about diseases, symptoms, and health procedures. Plus, you can request an appointment with world-class experts in top-ranked specialties.
 
Favorite features:
•	Make appointments at your convenience.
•	Check your appointment itinerary.
•	View test results.
•	View radiology images and exams.
•	Access and pay your bills.
•	Communicate with your care team in a secure messaging system.
•	Get Express Care Online within an hour for common ailments that don't require an in-person visit (available in select regions).
•	Send your health data from Mayo Clinic to the Apple Health app.
•	Daily health insights, fitness videos, recipes, and wellness tips.

* Mayo Clinic, Rochester, Minnesota",Medical,Mayo Clinic,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/mayo-clinic/id523220194?uo=4,3.31294,2812,clinical
807467406,USMLE Clinical Anatomy Quiz,"This clinically-relevant anatomy app is based on the concepts and full-color images in Moore's Clinically Oriented Anatomy. 

This app is a powerful portable tool for learning gross anatomy, studying clinical anatomy during clerkships, residents pimping students, and reviewing for other dental and allied health professionals. Organized using the regional approach of the acclaimed Clinically Oriented Anatomy textbook, the app features: images; descriptions of structures; clinical correlations from the book's famous ""Blue Boxes""; and information on muscle attachments, innervations, and main actions.

This is the anatomy review resource for everyone: undergraduate, graduate, and professional level students; surgical residents; and practicing clinicians. 

Install the free version today and jump start your studying! This version includes a limited amount of flashcards.

Subscribe today and get access to: 
• 340+ full-color anatomic renderings
• Detailed diagrams, illustrations & clinical photos
• Each image includes structures for identification with detailed explanations
• Additional information on muscle attachments, innervations & main actions
• Unlimited access to web app
• Created by experts in the medical field 

Whether you are studying anatomy for premedical courses, USMLE, medical board exams, or just for fun, this invaluable learning tool will help you achieve your anatomy goals. 

Get access to all questions when you subscribe:
• 1 Month: one auto-renewing payment of $9.99
• 12 Months: one auto-renewing payment of $39.99 

This app offers two auto-renewing subscription options to help you pass your exam.

-Payment will be charged to iTunes Account at confirmation of purchase
-Subscription automatically renews unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24-hours before the end of the current period
-Account will be charged for renewal within 24-hours prior to the end of the current period, and identify the cost of the renewal
-Subscriptions may be managed by the user and auto-renewal may be turned off by going to the user's Account Settings after purchase
-Any unused portion of a free trial period, if offered, will be forfeited when the user purchases a subscription to that publication, where applicable

These prices are for United States customers. Pricing in other countries may vary and actual charges may be converted to your local currency depending on the country of residence. 

Our Customer Success Team is available from 9am to 5pm, Monday - Friday (except on major holidays). Call us at 319-246-5271 and email us at support@hltcorp.com with any questions.

Privacy Policy - http://builtbyhlt.com/privacy
Terms of Conditions - http://builtbyhlt.com/EULA",Medical,"Higher Learning Technologies, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/usmle-clinical-anatomy-quiz/id807467406?uo=4,4.15596,109,clinical
618318388,ACP Clinical Guidelines,"The American College of Physicians (ACP) produces evidence-based clinical practice guidelines, which means that the guidelines follow a rigorous development process and are based on the highest quality scientific evidence. Internal medicine physicians and other clinicians can now access these clinical recommendations in virtually any setting via the ACP Clinical Guidelines app. Available for free, the ACP Clinical Guidelines app includes recommendations from ACP’s clinical practice guidelines and guidance statements. Users can conveniently access clinical recommendations and rationale, summary tables, algorithms, and high value care advice for all currently active ACP guidelines in an easy to read and interactive mobile format. 
 
ACP is a national organization of internists —physician specialists who apply scientific knowledge and clinical expertise to the diagnosis, treatment, and compassionate care of adults across the spectrum from health to complex illness. ACP is the largest medical-specialty organization and second-largest physician group in the United States. Its membership of 133,000 includes internists, internal medicine subspecialists, medical students, residents, and fellows. The mission of the ACP is to enhance the quality and effectiveness of health care by fostering excellence and professionalism in the practice of medicine.",Medical,American College of Physicians,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/acp-clinical-guidelines/id618318388?uo=4,3.0,12,clinical
1169487026,AMBOSS Medical Knowledge,"Your study and clinical companion. Get fast, reliable answers to clinical questions while studying, preparing for exams, or managing patients. 

IMPRESS YOUR ATTENDING & PROVIDE EXCELLENT PATIENT CARE WITH AMBOSS

- Find the answers you need with the AMBOSS Knowledge app. It works offline so you can use it in the hospital and on the go. 
- Interpret key clinical findings on diagnostic images with image overlays. 
- Stay on top of every patient with evidence-based patient-care tools, such as diagnostic flowcharts, acute management checklists, drug dosing, clinical calculators, warning signs, and more.
- Make quick decisions confidently, so you can spend more time with your patients.

ACE YOUR MEDICAL SCHOOL EXAMS 

- Be prepared for every exam (in-house, USMLE® Step, or NBME® Shelf exams) with expertly-created high-yield content that covers the entire USMLE® content outline. 
- Connect your Anki flashcards to the AMBOSS library and remember everything you learn. You’ll get pop-up explanations of medical terms and images right there in your Anki decks. Now available on mobile.
- The library content is designed for quick and easy access so you can find the relevant info you need in seconds. And if you want to dive deeper for a more thorough understanding of the topic at hand, all you need to do is click.
- Succeed on Shelf exams and honor clinical rotations with the Clerkship Survival Guides and clinical content. 
-  The AMBOSS Qbank app is the ideal way to apply your knowledge and become a top-tier test-taker with its learning features. It is available as a separate app. Once downloaded, both AMBOSS apps integrate seamlessly with each other for a complete studying experience. 

*AMBOSS users score higher on exams and perform better in the hospital. Learn more here. 

GETTING STARTED 

- Create your account at amboss.com/us
- Download the AMBOSS Medical Knowledge Library app.
- Once that’s done, you’ll have 5 days to explore the platform for FREE.
- When your 5-day free trial is up, choose the membership that’s right for you and become part of the AMBOSS medical community.

IN CASE YOU NEED HELP

If you have any questions, check out our Help Center or get in touch and we’ll be happy to assist.
support.amboss.com/hc/en-us

Terms and Conditions: https://www.amboss.com/us/terms
Privacy Policy: https://www.amboss.com/us/privacy",Medical,AMBOSS GmbH,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/amboss-medical-knowledge/id1169487026?uo=4,4.92013,12082,clinical
921339941,Firstline - Clinical Decisions,"Healthcare organizations worldwide rely on Firstline to deliver customized, interactive guidance directly to the point of care, making it easy for healthcare providers to choose the best treatment for their patients.

Features:
• Customizable for any hospital or healthcare organization
• Antimicrobial stewardship guidelines
• Infection Prevention & Control protocols
• Antimicrobial formulary information
• Pathogen information including local antibiogram data
• Messaging system with push notifications
• Integrated calculators
• Surveys and forms
• Cloud-based, rapid updates
• Works offline",Medical,Spectrum Mobile Health Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/firstline-clinical-decisions/id921339941?uo=4,4.89688,640,clinical
329470520,CORE -Clinical Orthopedic Exam,"CORE is your portable, expert reference tool for diagnosing musculoskeletal and orthopedic disorders. The Clinical Orthopedic Exam offers you a robust database of over 400 clinical tests with descriptions on how to perform them, video demonstrations, diagnostic properties and links to supporting medical references. Click “…More” to learn why you should download this powerful resource App today!

******
“CORE has set the standard for a clinical exam app. The most striking feature of this app, in addition to the vast collection of tests and videos, is actually the “properties” tab.  For every test, data is presented regarding the sensitivity, specificity, likelihood ratio, accuracy and other relevant statistical tests based on primary literature references.  These lists are incredibly complete. This is a feature that I have not seen replicated by any other orthopaedic reference.""
  - TopOrthoApps.com (Mobile App Reviews for Orthopaedic Surgeons - Featured by AAOS)

******
“CORE app for the iPhone is a wonderful reference for many clinicians, including, but not limited to, physical therapists, athletic trainers, orthopaedic surgeons, nurses, primary care physicians, and emergency room physicians. The app is user friendly and easy to navigate. The authors have undoubtedly put many hours of work into this application and it shows. I would recommend this to all clinicians who perform orthopedic examinations.""
  - Journal of Orthopaedic & Sports Physical Therapy (JOSPT), April 2011 (Book Reviews)  

******
“CORE is a great addition to the burgeoning collection of medical applications on the iPhone...If their first application is any indication, it seems we will have more to celebrate in the future. ...excellent application for doing the musculoskeletal portion of the physical exam. ....stress how this is a great medical application for primary care physicians. All primary care physicians know how important a strong musculoskeletal physical exam can be, as they are often the first line for presenting symptoms.”
- iMedicalApps

The physical exam is an important part of the overall evaluation, and maneuvers/special tests are often used to evaluate and diagnose the patient.

For almost every musculoskeletal ailment, there is a specific physical maneuver to perform. The results of that test indicate a positive or negative finding, providing a further clue to the diagnosis.

Often, there are several tests for each issue. Some are better for diagnosis than others. That’s where CORE comes to the rescue.

This useful little app contains over 400 medically referenced physical exam maneuvers. All the extremities are covered, as well as the spine.  You get step-by-step text and video on how to perform the examination and a quick summary of references for each exam.

CORE is the app you need for making your evidence-based, clinical diagnosis. Check out the CORE features:
* Powerful pocket reference with periodic updates of emerging research
* Almost 250 clinical tests to aid in diagnosis for musculoskeletal and orthopedic disorders
* Covers tendinous, neuropathic, ligamentous problems for each body part
* Descriptions on how to perform each test
* Video demonstrations (streaming and with audio)
* Diagnostic properties (reliability and validity)
* Links to supporting medical references 
* Reference reviews via abstracts in PUBMed
* Free updates when new tests are available in the literature, or new studies with diagnostic properties for old tests are published (No need to “buy a newer edition”) 
* Now optimized for iPad!
* Please note that STREAMING VIDEOS AND PUBMED REFERENCE REVIEW REQUIRE AN ACTIVE NETWORK CONNECTION.  You can download all the videos on your device to use independent of network connection.

Download CORE now, the ultimate pocket reference for musculoskeletal diagnosis. 
*The information in this app should not be taken as medical advice. Contact a medical provider before making any medical decisions.",Medical,Clinically Relevant Technologies,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/core-clinical-orthopedic-exam/id329470520?uo=4,2.22581,31,clinical
1394779036,Aquifer Clinical Learning,"Providing access to Aquifer virtual case-based courses for student subscribers. 

Aquifer’s virtual patient cases are developed by leading medical educators to help students acquire clinical reasoning, diagnostic, and communication skills. 

Aquifer’s case-based courses are used by over 90% of U.S. medical schools and a growing number of osteopathic, nurse practitioner, physician assistant, and international medical programs. Since our founding in 2006, over 10,000,000 virtual cases have been completed by more than 300,000 students.

Our course library covers a range of disciplines and critical healthcare topics. Courses include:

• Aquifer Addiction - also available for Continuing Education credit
• Aquifer Family Medicine
• Aquifer Geriatrics
• Aquifer Internal Medicine
• Aquifer Medical Home
• Aquifer Pediatrics
• Aquifer Radiology
• Aquifer Diagnostic Excellence
• Aquifer Culture in Health Care
• Aquifer High Value Care
• Aquifer Oral Presentation Skills

Created by educators—in close collaboration with national healthcare education organizations—Aquifer’s courses build essential knowledge and clinical reasoning skills for health professions students.

Aquifer courses are evidence-based, peer-reviewed, and continuously updated by our academic consortium, to support best practices in clinical teaching and learning. The Aquifer Consortium forms the bedrock of Aquifer, bringing together more than 200 healthcare educators across disciplines.

Aquifer is a 501 (c) (3) non-profit organization dedicated to advancing healthcare education through innovative technology.",Education,"Aquifer, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/aquifer-clinical-learning/id1394779036?uo=4,1.65278,72,clinical
775500217,NCCN Guidelines®,"The National Comprehensive Cancer Network® (NCCN®), is pleased to present the Virtual Library of NCCN Guidelines® app formatted for iPhone & iPad. This easy-to-use and convenient format will further assist health care professionals in their implementation of the NCCN Clinical Practice Guidelines in Oncology (NCCN Guidelines®), thus improving the quality and effectiveness of care provided to patients with cancer. 

NCCN is a not-for-profit alliance of leading cancer centers devoted to patient care, research, and education. NCCN is dedicated to improving and facilitating quality, effective, efficient, and accessible cancer care so patients can live better lives. Through the leadership and expertise of clinical professionals at NCCN Member Institutions, NCCN develops resources that present valuable information to the numerous stakeholders in the health care delivery system. By defining and advancing high-quality cancer care, NCCN promotes the importance of continuous quality improvement and recognizes the significance of creating clinical practice guidelines appropriate for use by patients, clinicians, and other health care decision-makers around the world.

Over the past 25 years, NCCN has developed an integrated suite of tools to improve the quality of cancer care. The NCCN Guidelines® document evidence-based, consensus-driven management to ensure that all patients receive preventive, diagnostic, treatment, and supportive services that are most likely to lead to optimal outcomes. 

The NCCN Guidelines are a comprehensive set of guidelines detailing the sequential management decisions and interventions that apply to 97 percent of cancer cases in the United States. In addition, separate guidelines relate to major prevention and screening topics and another set of pathways focuses on the major supportive care areas. 

The NCCN Guidelines provide recommendations based on the best evidence available at the time they are derived. Because new data are published continuously, it is essential that the NCCN Guidelines also be continuously updated and revised to reflect new data and new clinical information. The intent of the NCCN Guidelines is to assist in the decision-making process of individuals involved in cancer care—including physicians, nurses, pharmacists, payers, patients and their families—with the ultimate goal of improving patient care and outcomes. The NCCN Guidelines provide recommendations for appropriate care for most but not all patients; however, individual patient circumstances must be considered when applying these recommendations. 

Visit NCCN.org to learn more about the NCCN Guidelines as well as other NCCN Content.",Medical,National Comprehensive Cancer Network Inc,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/nccn-guidelines/id775500217?uo=4,3.65217,23,clinical
466952339,Sepsis Clinical Guide,"Sepsis Clinical Guide now includes access the new ESCAVO Clinical Community, a forum where clinicians can exchange ideas, ask questions and collaborate on sepsis and other clinical topics.
 
Sepsis is a serious systemic infection that can quickly lead to circulatory shock, organ failure and death if inappropriately treated. In 2017, over 2 million people were admitted to US hospitals for sepsis (#1 cause of index admissions) at a total aggregate cost to the US healthcare system of $38.2 billion dollars (#1 most expensive condition), according to an AHRQ report. Over 270,000 people die of sepsis in the US every year, more than from prostate cancer, breast cancer and AIDS combined. Despite its large toll on public health, public awareness of this condition is poor and the quality of treatment is highly variable often due to delayed recognition and treatment.

In sepsis, time is of the essence. Successful treatment hinges on prompt recognition of symptoms, correct antibiotic administration, and hemodynamic stabilization. Lack of appropriate sepsis management knowledge at the bedside leads to delayed symptom recognition, serious complications, medical errors, increased treatment costs, and avoidable morbidity and mortality. For this reason, we created this app to provide busy health professionals with essential management information based on the latest practice guidelines in a format that is easily accessible at the point of care.

The Sepsis app was developed on the ESCAVO mobile publishing platform created specifically for mobile publishing of scientific content. The platform features an intuitive user interface, search, annotation and bookmarking functions, and calculator support. All content is extensively referenced and footnoted where appropriate. 

Clinical topics covered in the Sepsis app include:
- Updated with the latest definitions, diagnostic criteria, and management guidelines including the 2016 Sepsis-3 definitions and the latest Surviving Sepsis Campaign (SSC) guidelines
- Epidemiology, risk factors and pathophysiology of sepsis and septic shock
- Common differentials and etiology, guidelines on performing appropriate H&P and workups
- Management of common causes including hospital-acquired pneumonia (HAP), ventilator-acquired pneumonia (VAP) and intra-abdominal infections
- Sepsis management bundles, early goal-directed therapy, hemodynamic management, adjunctive therapies, mechanical ventilation of sepsis-induced ARDS, and other essential management guidelines from the SSC and the American Thoracic Society (ATS)
- Antibiotic therapy including specific guidelines for the treatment of HAP from ATS and the Infectious Diseases Society of America (IDSA)
- Guidance on the prevention, recognition and treatment of Clostridium difficile based on the latest IDSA guidelines
- Information on the diagnosis and management of pediatric and neonatal sepsis including the management of pediatric fever, important differences from adult sepsis, management of sepsis-induced persistent pulmonary hypertension of the newborn (PPHN), empiric antibiotic treatment recommendations for GBS infections, interventions in pediatric septic shock, and other pediatric-specific information
- Important score calculators including the Sequential Organ Failure Assessment (SOFA), quick-SOFA, SIRS, APACHE II, Multiple Organ Dysfunction Score (MODS), the Simplified Acute Physiology Score (SAPS) II, National Early Warning Score (NEWS), the Clinical Pulmonary Infection (CPI) score, the Inferior Vena Cava Collapsibility Index, and others
- Drug administration information for the management of sepsis including antibacterial and antifungal antibiotics, the latest drugs for emerging multi-drug resistant organisms, adrenergic and other vasoactive agents, corticosteroids and diuretics
- Relevant COVID-19 management information

Recommended by:
- HealthTap.com
- MDLinx.com
- imedicalapps.com
- The ED Trauma Critical Care Blog (edtcc.com)",Medical,"Escavo, Inc",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/sepsis-clinical-guide/id466952339?uo=4,4.81579,304,clinical
599395631,Pocket Prep LCSW 2025,"Unlock 1,000 LCSW practice questions and three full-length mock exams with Pocket Prep, the leading mobile app for professional certification test prep. Whether at home or on the go, reinforce key LCSW concepts and improve retention to pass your exam confidently on the first try.

Since 2011, thousands of social workers have trusted Pocket Prep to help them succeed on the ASWB LCSW exam. Our questions are crafted by experts and align with the latest ASWB Content Outline, ensuring you're always studying the most relevant, up-to-date content.

Pocket Prep will help you feel confident and prepared for test day.
- 1,000 LCSW Practice Questions: Expert-written, exam-like questions with detailed explanations, including textbook references.
- 3 LCSW Mock Exam: Simulate the test day experience with a full-length LCSW mock test to help build your confidence and readiness.
- A Variety of Study Modes: Tailor your LCSW study sessions with quiz modes like Quick 10, Level Up, and Weakest Subject. 
- Performance Analytics: Track your progress, identify weak areas, and compare your scores with your peers.

Begin Your LCSW Licensure Journey for FREE*
Try for free and access 60* free LCSW practice questions and 3 study modes – Question of the Day, Quick 10, and Timed Quiz.

Upgrade to Premium for:
- All 1,000 ASWB LCSW practice questions
- All advanced study modes, including Build Your Own Quiz, Missed Question Quiz, and Level Up
- 3 full-length LCSW mock exams to ensure exam-day success
- Our Pass Guarantee
- Full access to all 11 Behavioral Health exams and thousands of practice questions

Choose the plan that fits your goals:
- 1 Month: $15.99 billed monthly
- 3 Months: $39.99 billed every 3 months
- 12 Months: $95.99 billed annually

Trusted by thousands of social workers. Here's what our members say:
“Highly recommend as review and exam prep. Focus on application and reasoning questions if preparing for the clinical exam.”

“This app helped me tremendously in preparing for my clinical exam. I found that the questions offered are honestly more difficult than the questions on the exam. I loved being able to build my own quizzes, and I was able to focus on the areas where I was weak. I did not use this app alone to prepare but in conjunction with other methods.”

“Practiced this for a few weeks. Got through like 900 out of the 1000 questions in the app. Passed my LCSW test today! Totally worth it. Thank you!”

“I used this app exclusively to study for the ASWB clinical exam. It was easy to use and fairly representative of the questions I saw on the actual test. And I passed the exam!”

---

LEGAL
For more information on our Terms of Use and Privacy Policy, please visit the following websites:
https://www.pocketprep.com/terms-of-service/
https://www.pocketprep.com/privacy-policy/",Education,"Pocket Prep, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/pocket-prep-lcsw-2025/id599395631?uo=4,4.70777,5010,clinical
6504471106,Heidi - AI Clinical Scribe,"Heidi is a world-class AI medical scribe that transforms how clinicians document care. By transcribing your consultations in real-time and automatically generating comprehensive clinical notes and letters, Heidi reduces paperwork and gives clinicians more time to focus on what matters most—caring for their patients.

The Heidi iOS app is a streamlined companion for clinical work on the go — letting you transcribe, dictate, and edit notes wherever you are, with secure syncing to your account. It’s built for speed and simplicity, giving you just the tools you need when you're away from your desk.


**Key Features:**

-**Stay productive, wherever you are:** Transcribe, dictate, and edit notes from your phone anytime, anywhere you work – even through calls, Wi-Fi dropouts or locked screen – with seamless background syncing to your desktop.
- **Free Multilingual Note Generation:** Accurately transcribe consultations into progress notes, referral letters, and handovers – in your patient's preferred language, with just one click
- **Quick, secure login:** Sign in effortlessly using Face ID or a 4-digit PIN – no passwords needed.
-  **Capture and upload photos:** Take clinical photos on the spot and upload them directly to your session, all while continuing to transcribe – enhancing your notes with visual context.
- **Seamless Integration:** with inbuilt connections with global EHRs like Epic, Best Practice, and Athena, you can sync your patient schedules and have your notes flow directly into the EHR for a smooth, handsfree workflow.



**Benefits:**

- **Enhanced Patient Interaction:** Spend more time engaging with patients and less time on documentation.
- **Improved Accuracy:** Leverage AI to minimize errors and inconsistencies in medical records.
- **Reduced Burnout:** Reduce your pyjama time, no more writing notes after work, reducing stress and improving job satisfaction.
- **Revenue Generating:** Connect Heidi to other workflows including billing, coding, revenue cycle and patient follow-up to not only save time but also generate revenue.

**Security and Compliance:**
Heidi adheres to the highest data privacy and security standards, including compliance with HIPAA, the NHS, GDPR, PIPEDA, APP and ISO 27001, ensuring that all patient information is handled with the utmost care and confidentiality.

Join the growing community of healthcare professionals who trust Heidi to enhance their workflow, saving time and improving patient engagement. 

Transform your practice with the power of AI – transcribe consults, generate documents, and discover a new way of working with Heidi.


https://www.heidihealth.com/legal/heidi-scribe-terms-of-use
https://www.heidihealth.com/legal/privacy-policy",Medical,Heidi Health Trading Pty Ltd,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/heidi-ai-clinical-scribe/id6504471106?uo=4,4.66667,21,clinical
1334330753,ClinicalKey Student Bookshelf,"Download the ClinicalKey Student Bookshelf app to access your personal bookshelf across all devices whenever you need it. Enhance your study experience with tools designed to build and improve your medical knowledge; making and sharing notes, highlighting key text and creating flashcards.
 
Requirements:
•  iOS 15+
•  ClinicalKey Student account
•  The app is available in the following languages: English, Spanish, French, German, Portuguese
 
How to Access:
•  Download the app for free and open it.
•  On the welcome screen, click Sign In with your CK Student email and password. NOTE: The first time you log in, you must be on your university network.
•  If you have been given a Registration ID to create your account, go to https://www.clinicalkey.com/student/register and follow the steps on-screen. You can then use your login to sign into the Bookshelf app.
•  Launch any title you want to add to your bookshelf on the CK Student website. The app will synchronise any books you have added from CK Student. NOTE: You must be online to synchronize your book collection.
 
For Support and FAQs, go to https://service.elsevier.com/app/home/supporthub/ckstudent/",Medical,Elsevier Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/clinicalkey-student-bookshelf/id1334330753?uo=4,4.68841,138,clinical
1550789010,Relias Learner,"Mobile learning for a mobile life. With the new Relias Learner app, you have the flexibility to find and take courses when it’s most convenient for you. 

By syncing with the Relias Platform, the app allows you to pick up where you left off or begin from the start using your phone or tablet. The app contains a modern design that’s easy to use, which helps you focus on what’s important – the content. 

Once you’ve finished a course, you can complete the evaluation and exam within the app and share the certificate with your supervisor. 

*This application is designed for use by Relias Platform clients and requires authorized Relias Platform credentials.",Education,"Relias, LLC",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/relias-learner/id1550789010?uo=4,2.67797,118,clinical
311852560,USPSTF Prevention TaskForce,"The Prevention TaskForce (formerly ePSS) is an application designed and developed by the U.S. Department of Health & Human Services (HHS), Agency for Healthcare Research and Quality (AHRQ), the Nation's lead Federal agency for research on health care quality, costs, outcomes and patient safety. It was developed by AHRQ to support the independent U.S. Preventive Services Task Force (USPSTF). The USPSTF is an independent, volunteer panel of national experts in prevention and evidence-based medicine.  AHRQ provides support to the USPSTF.

The Prevention TaskForce application was developed to assist primary care clinicians identify the screening, counseling, and preventive medication services that are appropriate for their patients. The Prevention TaskForce information is based on the current recommendations of the U.S. Preventive Services Task Force (USPSTF) and can be searched by specific patient characteristics, such as age, sex, and selected behavioral risk factors. When using this tool please read the specific recommendation to determine if the preventive service is appropriate for your patient. This tool is not meant to replace clinical judgment and individualized patient care. 

*Application downloads and data updates require internet connectivity",Medical,AHRQ,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/uspstf-prevention-taskforce/id311852560?uo=4,3.62687,67,clinical
1437127269,Edwards Clinical Education,"The Edwards clinical education app supports your learning objectives with educational resources focused on the ClearSight system, the FloTrac system, the Swan-Ganz catheter, the HemoSphere advanced monitoring platform, and the EV1000 platform.  You can also review education resources and tools related to hemodynamic management, hypotension and fluid management.

With a long-term commitment to improving the quality of care for surgical and critical care patients through education, Edwards clinical education meets you no matter where you are in the learning process — with a continuum of resources and tools that continuously support you as you solve the clinical challenges facing you today, and in the future. This app is intended for healthcare providers.",Medical,Edwards Lifesciences,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/edwards-clinical-education/id1437127269?uo=4,4.59999,10,clinical
1006385131,MedShr: The App for Doctors,"Developed by doctors, MedShr is the easiest and safest way for medical professionals to discover, discuss and share clinical cases and medical images. Join our community and connect with hundreds of thousands of verified doctors, healthcare professionals and medical students sharing knowledge and learning from each other in a secure private network.

MedShr’s Awards include: Facebook App of the Year for Social Good Award; The Evening Standard Startup of the Year 2018; and a World Summit Award from the United Nations.

The app has been featured on the BBC, Sky News, The Evening Standard, The Telegraph and Metro News.

“A revolution in the way Medical Knowledge spreads” *****
- Dr Tzalamouras Basilis, Interventional Cardiology Fellow

DISCOVER AND DISCUSS MEDICAL CASES & IMAGES

From ECGs, scans and X-rays to patient photos and videos, MedShr helps you find and discuss relevant medical cases with colleagues, by specialty and at all grades. MedShr is a totally secure, private network and features an easy to use in-app patient consent form and system for anonymising images. Follow clinical cases you find interesting and learn from your peers with informal and accredited case based discussion.

SHARE KNOWLEDGE WITH VERIFIED MEMBERS

MedShr is the simple way to capture, share and discuss clinical images and videos in your everyday practice. Create a case, obtain consent and start a discussion securely from your mobile. Send medical cases to colleagues, share them with the wider community, export to your e-portfolio or simply organise cases for your personal records. MedShr is safe, secure and enables you to maintain complete control over the privacy of your cases - with all members being 100% verified as doctors, healthcare professionals and medical students.

EXPAND YOUR PROFESSIONAL NETWORK

Medical students and doctors of all levels are joining MedShr to advance their learning as they connect with peers from their university, place of work and across the world. Connect and follow specialists in your field to keep up to date on their latest cases, techniques and learnings. Join groups to learn from others, share findings or just converse around complex and interesting clinical cases. Medical students, junior doctors and specialist trainees use MedShr groups as a resource for informal learning, ahead of case-based examinations and as an aid to formal learning.

MESSAGE CONNECTIONS AND COLLEAGUES

MedShr Messaging allows you to message your connections about anything from arranging to meet at a conference to sharing a link to an interesting case. To get started, tap the message bubble in the top right-hand corner of the home feed to start a new chat. Use MedShr Messaging to reach out to colleagues and build your network.

OBTAIN CPD CREDITS AND SHOW PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT

There are opportunities to learn from and reflect on cases every day. MedShr now makes it easy to request Continuing Professional Development (CPD) credits for each case that you share on MedShr. The simple process makes it easy to receive CPD credit and keep a record of your learning on the go.

HELP MAKE A DIFFERENCE TO THOSE IN NEED

Our community is providing medics in crisis zones and doctors in developing countries with quick access to second and specialist medical opinions so that they can make critical clinical decisions. With your participation, you can collaborate with like-minded professionals and be part of a new frontier in medical education.

“MedShr is a brilliant idea - smartphones connect doctors, making it possible for aid workers to get an instant medical diagnosis” ***** - Rohan Silver, Evening Standard

For support, suggestions and feedback, please contact us at info@medshr.net",Medical,MedShr Ltd,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/medshr-the-app-for-doctors/id1006385131?uo=4,4.50462,216,clinical
1079272170,Clinical Practice Guidelines,"Access the Endocrine Society’s Clinical Practice Guidelines at the point of care and use interactive tools such as risk calculators, diagnosis and treatment algorithms, and medication charts.  The app allows users to bookmark important pages, take notes on key information, and share the PDF with colleagues.  The Endocrine Society develops clinical practice guidelines on a variety of topics related to endocrine conditions; the app currently includes the Society’s guidelines on diabetes and obesity.",Medical,The Endocrine Society,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/clinical-practice-guidelines/id1079272170?uo=4,4.82782,424,clinical
361811483,Calculate by QxMD,"From the developer of 'Read by QxMD', 'The ECG Guide' and 'Pedi STAT' comes 'Calculate', a next-generation clinical calculator and decision support tool, freely available to the medical community.

""We recommend medical users try the free Calculate by QxMD first...""
-from iMedicalApps review ""The best free Medical Calculator apps for the iPhone""

'Calculate' highlights tools which impact clinical practice either by simplifying diagnosis, clarifying treatment options or displaying prognosis.

Helping you make decisions, not just calculate numbers...

Features

• Developed by a collaboration of clinician experts from diverse backgrounds
• Point-of-care tools in the areas of cardiology, internal medicine, primary care, nephrology, hematology, hepatology, gastroenterology, emergency medicine, oncology, orthopedics, critical care/ICU, ENT, radiology, rheumatology, mental health, respirology, neurology, pediatrics, infectious disease, neurosurgery, general surgery, vascular surgery, and obstetrics.
• Converts recent research publications into practical handheld tools - knowledge translation at its best 
• Automatically adapts to your clinical practice
• Unique ‘Question Flow’ technology gets you answers, fast
• Detailed references with PubMed & Read integration
• Comprehensive and insightful results
• Elegant design and intuitive interface
• SI and Imperial units

More than 200 unique calculators and decision support tools

While too extensive to list them all, here is a small sampling of included content:

Guide treatment

• Determine cardiovascular risk using ACC/AHA, Framingham, Gupta and VQI Cardiac Risk Index
• CHADS2 & CHA2DS2-VASc to guide treatment in atrial fibrillation
• Understand bleeding risk in atrial fibrillation using HAS-BLED & OBRI
• TIMI risk score in ACS
• CIWA in alcohol withdrawal
• Rule of 9s & Parkland formula in burns
• Water deficit in hypernatremia 
• Timing of surgery with Aortic Stenosis Risk Score
• Risk stratify pneumonia (CURB-65, PORT)
• NIH Stroke Scale in acute stroke
• Imaging in possible subarachnoid hemorrhage with Ottawa SAH Rule

Determine Prognosis

• Cirrhosis (MELD, Child-Pugh)
• Chronic Kidney Disease (Kidney Failure Risk Equation)
• Heart failure
• Lymphoma (NCCN-IPI, IPI24, R-IPI)
• Myelodysplastic Syndrome (IPSS-R, WPSS)
• Myeloma (ISS, R-ISS)
• Hemodialysis
• COPD (Bode)
• Pancreatitis (BISAP, Ranson's)
• Cardiac surgery (Euroscore II, Cleveland Clinic, Mehta)
• Critical care (APACHE II, SOFA)
• Neurologic outcome (DRAGON, CAM-ICU, modified Rankin, FOUR score, Hunt & Hess)

Calculate

• Ideal body weight, BMI and BSA
• Due date and gestational age
• Extensive formula used in echocardiography and invasive hemodynamic monitoring
• Kt/V in dialysis patients
• eGFR with CKD-EPI, MDRD & Schwartz
• A-a gradient

Classify

• Angina (CCS)
• Congestive heart failure (NYHA)

Screen

• Diabetes
• Breast cancer

Reduce and predict perioperative complications

• WHO Surgical Safety Checklist
• Predictive models for cardiac surgery, vascular surgery and coronary angiography
• Postoperative Respiratory Failure Risk score

Manage

• Head, neck, ankle and knee injuries (NEXUS, Ottawa ankle/knee, Canadian C-spine and CT head rules)
• DVT and PE (PERC, Wells, PESI)
• Pulmonary nodules
• TIA (ABCD2)

Stage

• Lung cancer
• Renal cell carcinoma
• Head & neck cancers

Understand

• TTKG in hypokalemia and hyperkalemia
• Dermatomes

Diagnose

• Heparin Induced Thrombocytopenia
• Infective Endocarditis
• ARDS
• Autoimmune Hepatitis
• Sleep disorder (Epworth Sleepiness Scale)

And much, much more...

Researchers, contact us to see your research in our app at contact@qxmd.com

Founded my medical professionals, QxMD Software is dedicated to creating high quality, point-of-care tools for practicing health care professionals. Recognized as a leading developer of free medical software for mobile devices, QxMD develops content in cooperation with expert physicians from their respective fields.",Medical,WebMD Health Corporation,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/calculate-by-qxmd/id361811483?uo=4,4.78728,5021,clinical
1423485924,Visualmed: Clinical Trials,"Visualmed is the go-to app for clinicians, medical students, and healthcare professionals who want to stay updated with the latest clinical evidence—without spending hours digging through dense research papers.

With over 1500 clinical trials summarized into clear, impactful visual abstracts, Visualmed makes complex research fast to understand and easy to remember. Whether you're preparing for rounds, studying for exams, or making evidence-based decisions in real time, Visualmed brings trusted trial data right to your fingertips.

Key Features:
1500+ clinical trials across all major specialties

Visual abstracts that highlight study design, intervention, outcomes, and conclusions

Search and filter by condition, trial name, or specialty

New trials added daily to keep you current

Sleek, mobile-optimized interface for fast access anywhere

Subscription: Visualmed Pro
Accessing Visualmed requires a Visualmed Pro subscription.

Choose your plan:

$4.99/month

$29.99/year – save nearly 50% with the annual plan!

Visualmed Pro gives you unlimited access to all current and future trials, along with full access to every visual abstract.

Promotional Text / Call-to-Action
Visualmed: Clinical Trials. Simplified.

Join thousands of physicians and students using Visualmed to stay sharp and save time.
Subscribe to Visualmed Pro for full access to over 1500 visual abstracts—plus new trials added daily.

$4.99/month
$29.99/year (Best Value – 50% Savings!)

 Fast to read. Easy to remember. Always accessible.

Download Visualmed and take the evidence with you.",Medical,Usama Nasir,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/visualmed-clinical-trials/id1423485924?uo=4,4.38298,141,clinical
1066779582,5 Minute Clinical Consult 5MCC,"5-Minute Clinical Consult (2019) - A best seller for over 25 years, delivers fast up-to-date guidance on 900+ medical conditions on your mobile device. Exclusive bonus features include 200 pediatric topics, images, 42 built-in calculators and 200+ interactive flowcharts

FULL DESCRIPTION:
The 5-Minute Clinical Consult 2019  is a practical, highly organized resource for clinicians in primary care, family medicine, emergency medicine, nursing, and pediatrics. It provides rapid access to guidance on diagnosis, treatment, medications, follow-up, and associated factors for more than 540 diseases and conditions. Designed to deliver maximum clinical confidence as efficiently as possible allowing you to focus your valuable time on giving your patients the best possible care.

Written by esteemed internal medicine and family medicine physicians and published by the leading publisher in medical content:

* Get quick access to all-new topics, including Advance Care Planning, Geriatric Care, and Medical Marijuana.
* Find the answers you need quickly thanks to an intuitive, at-a-glance format, with concise, bulleted text; hundreds of diagnostic and therapeutic INTERACTIVE algorithms 
* ICD-10 codes, DSM-5 criteria; and much more.
* Make confident decisions aided by current evidence-based designations in each topic.
* Includes bonus content from 5MinuteConsult.com, but you can access this valuable, evidence-based content using mobile workflow tool easily integrated at the point of care.
* Differential diagnosis support from an expanded collection of algorithms.
* Current evidence-based designations highlighted in each topic
* Thousands of images to help support visual diagnosis of all conditions
* Guidance on laboratory test interpretation from Wallachís Interpretation of Diagnostic Tests

Based on: 27th Edition
Author: Mark B Stephens MD, MS, FAAFP;Frank J Domino MD; Robert A Baldor MD, FAAFP; Jeremy Golding MD, FAAFP
Publisher: Wolters Kluwer Health | Lippincott Williams & Wilkins
ISBN-13: 9781496374622

SPECIAL FEATURES:
Locate a disease, symptom or medication in the fastest possible manner:
- Use ""Spotlight Search"" from Home screen
- Tap and Hold launch icon to open Last Topic, History, Favorites ..
- Navigate using multiple indices
- History to open frequently visited pages
- Bookmarks 

NEVER FORGET ANYTHING:
Mark topics with relevant information:
- Rich-text notes 
- Voice memos
- Annotations with scribble, doodle or text
You choose the method to note this regardless of the context you are in to ensure that the important facts are available whenever you access the topic, whether it is tomorrow or six months from now.",Medical,Skyscape Medpresso Inc,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/5-minute-clinical-consult-5mcc/id1066779582?uo=4,4.0,16,clinical
1505694717,Science 37 Clinical Research,"Use our participant app to participate in study visits, complete trial assessments, communicate directly with the study team, and more — access to everything you need is in one convenient place.

With the Science 37 platform participant app, you’ll be able to:

Complete trial assessments easily from your own device. See what tasks you have to do for the day and plan ahead when you view your upcoming tasks.

Chat directly with your study team using your preferred method, including text messaging*, phone calls, and video chats. (*May not be available for all studies.)

Track your progress throughout your time in the trial. See what assessments you’ve completed and review all of your important trial documents. 

ABOUT SCIENCE 37:

Science 37 is making the promise of virtual trials the new reality. By engaging with participants from the comfort of their own home, we provide access to participants who can never be reached by traditional site-based models. We have proven to enroll faster, retain participants at a higher rate, and reach a more representative population. Science 37 has conducted more decentralized, interventional trials than any other company, using an expansive, in-house network of telemedicine investigators and home-health nurses, who are supported by the industry’s most comprehensive, fully-integrated, decentralized clinical trial platform.",Health & Fitness,"Science 37, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/science-37-clinical-research/id1505694717?uo=4,3.81481,27,clinical
445899971,Kaiser Permanente Washington,"The Kaiser Permanente of Washington app makes it easier than ever to manage your health. Exclusively for Washington residents, the app offers quick access to virtual care, finding a doctor, exchanging secure messages with your care team, managing prescriptions, scheduling visits, paying bills, and more. Additionally, the app is integrated with Apple Health Kit.
The refreshed home page includes new navigation making it easier to find multiple ways to get care online or in-person. Quickly find care recommendations for an ongoing health concern, a new health concern, and see all care options, including 24/7 Care Chat with a provider. 
Enhanced navigation organizes the information and features you need into convenient sections:
•  Appointments – view upcoming appointments and visits and see your after-visit summaries. 
•  Messages – exchange secure messages with your care team.
•  Medications – refill or transfer prescriptions, see a list of your medications, view pharmacy wait times, or chat with a pharmacy representative. 
•  Records – access your test results, after-visit summaries, health summary, routine care reminders, and share your health record with non-Kaiser Permanente providers. Additionally, you can upload health and fitness data, including data from the “Apple Health app” when enrolled in our Care-companion programs.
•  My Plan – pay a bill, view your statements, Explanation of Benefits, Benefits Usage, and coverage documents.
•  Locations and wait times – find the nearest Kaiser Permanente medical facility, schedule a phone, video, or in-person visit, view upcoming and past visits, and see wait times for pharmacy and lab.

Sign-in to the app with your kp.org/wa user ID and password. Our latest version of the app allows you to use Face ID / Touch ID to safely sign in with additional security. 
If you don’t have a user ID and password, please register using the “Register” link on the on the sign-in screen. If you’re not a Kaiser Permanente member, visit kp.org to discover the many advantages available to members, including flexible and affordable health plans, access to virtual and in-person care, electronic health records, the convenience of an integrated network, and industry-leading online tools that let you take control of your health.",Health & Fitness,Kaiser Permanente,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/kaiser-permanente-washington/id445899971?uo=4,2.2884,794,clinical
1183950374,Dental Clinical Mastery,"Dental Clinical Mastery provides essential information and skills training to empower new and practicing dentists. Get up-to-date information and practice guidelines available to give your patients the best care possible.

Master clinical competence and career success with quick, easy access to everything you need to know! Brought to you by the makers of top-selling NBDE Mastery parts I and II apps, Dental Clinical Mastery delivers the most valuable dental practice information right when you need it.

Always be prepared with Dental Clinical Mastery’s searchable reference materials and how-to guides in your pocket!

Install the free version today and jumpstart your studying!
We have provided a free version of the content that you can try before deciding to upgrade. 

Subscribe today and get access to: 
• 170+ critical oral pathology guidelines
        • Contains useful reference charts & resources
        • Includes a complete library of searchable reference materials
•100+ oral pathology differential diagnosis generator items
        • Full-color images
        • Details on the diagnosis, description, & risk factors 
•50+ evidence-based dental trauma decision guide items
•50+ descriptions of diagnostic procedures
•25+ useful charts and resources
• Integrated FDA prescribing guidelines

Always be up-to-date with Dental Mastery as your clinical guide.

Dental Clinical Mastery’s best-practice guidelines and up to date reference information comes from clinical databases, peer-reviewed journals, and other resources, including, but not limited to:
• Evidence Updates from NIH
• Federal Drug Administration
• American Dental Association
• Centers for Disease Control and Prevention
• World Health Organization
• The clinical experience of our writers and peer reviewers

Get access to all questions when you subscribe:
• 1 Month: one auto-renewing payment of $9.99
• 12 Months: one auto-renewing payment of $39.99

This app offers two auto-renewing subscription options to help you pass your exam.

-Payment will be charged to your iTunes Account at confirmation of purchase
-Subscription automatically renews unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24-hours before the end of the current period
- Your account will be charged for renewal within 24-hours prior to the end of the current period, and identify the cost of the renewal
-Subscriptions may be managed by the user and auto-renewal may be turned off by going to the user's Account Settings after purchase
-Any unused portion of a free trial period, if offered, will be forfeited when the user purchases a subscription to that publication, where applicable

These prices are for United States customers. Pricing in other countries may vary and actual charges may be converted to your local currency depending on the country of residence. 

Our Customer Success Team is available from 9am to 5pm, Monday - Friday (except on major holidays). Call us at 319-246-5271 and email us at support@hltcorp.com with any questions.

Privacy Policy - http://builtbyhlt.com/privacy
Terms of Conditions - http://builtbyhlt.com/EULA

Written by Dr. Geoffrey Skinner DDS, A contributor to the United States National Board Dental Examination (NBDE).",Medical,"Higher Learning Technologies, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/dental-clinical-mastery/id1183950374?uo=4,4.59999,80,clinical
1068281731,AHFS Clinical Drug Information,"AHFS® Clinical Drug Information™ is your comprehensive, interactive treatment and drug therapy solution. This iOS app allows you to access your account and all the information from the AHFS CDI website!

You make critical treatment and drug therapy recommendations every day. Expediency and accessibility are essential. Now, you can quickly navigate to the information you need to reinforce your position as a trusted member of the care team.

- Designated official US compendium
- Free drug shortage information
- Real-time drug and safety updates
- Quick clinical window – fast access to the most comprehensive, evidence-based drug information
- Ability to create a user-specific favorite drugs list and add notes
- Direct links to more than 56,000 sources of supporting evidence
- In-depth, unbiased coverage of off-label uses
- Supported by 89,000 references, including published research, therapeutic guidelines, and prescribing information",Medical,American Society of Health-System Pharmacists,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/ahfs-clinical-drug-information/id1068281731?uo=4,3.0,2,clinical
1545273284,eClinicalTouch 4,"eClinicalTouch 4.0 requires EMR upgrade to V12.0.2 or above. 

eClinicalTouch 4.0 puts eClinicalWorks users on the leading edge of healthcare innovation, combining the convenience, functionality, and portability of an iPad and iPhone with the industry-leading functionality of eClinicalWorks. Medical professionals enjoy intuitive, cloud-based navigation and complete access to patient records, diagnostic tools, and data analytics. 

With secure data capture and unparalleled functionality, eClinicalTouch is your best choice for portable Electronic Health Records solutions, designed specifically with provider and nurse documentation in mind. And the information you capture automatically generates a claim on the practice management side of the comprehensive eClinicalWorks system. Experience the power, innovation, and convenience of eClinicalWorks – anytime you need it, wherever your busy schedule takes it. 

eClinicalTouch contains the most-used features of the eClinicalWorks EMR, allowing you to: 

* Enter new patient records  
* Create new encounters  
* Conduct telephone encounters  
* Conduct a Televisit from your iPad/iPhone 
* Work the office visit screen  
* View and enter Progress Notes  
* Record vital signs  
* Use the full functions of CPOE  
* Access the ICW panel throughout the app  
* Review labs, imaging, and procedure results  
* Refill prescriptions  
* Document OB flowsheets  
* Enable for voice and eClinicalWorks Scribe  
* Use the built-in camera to assist in documenting Progress Notes  ",Medical,eClinicalWorks LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/eclinicaltouch-4/id1545273284?uo=4,2.17567,74,clinical
307750844,Relax with AJ Lite,"The pace of life and change can be overwhelming. We all need to slow down sometimes, to relax, to unwind - yet after a hectic day at work, a terrible commute, or a nightmare shopping trip it may seem impossible.
 
It can be difficult to switch-off and be completely relaxed yet being able to destress and fully relax is vital for our health. 

Play the Relax App and feel the world slow down whilst you enjoy the mental health benefits:
 
  • Discover relaxation techniques.
  • Find the perfect way to unwind and de-stress.
  • Find out about therapeutic settings for ME, pain control, insomnia, post-traumatic stress disorder etc.
  • Feel empowered to deal with challenges and tough situations.
  • Prioritise self-care and have more time for yourself and the people around you.

Destress, improve your mindset, sleep better, grow your confidence and be healthier with guided meditations, mindfulness sessions and positive messages – and much more.

Mindfulness expert, coach and therapist Andrew Johnson has been helping people deal with life’s challenges with guided relaxations, meditations, self-care tools and breathing exercises for many years. 

His best-selling range of mindfulness apps have a variety of content to help you, whether you are looking for ways to reduce stress and anxiety, lose weight, improve your health & confidence, learn relaxation techniques, etc.

Key features:

  • Short meditations you can do anywhere: at work, commuting, at home, walking.

  • Inspirational sessions to help you tackle life’s challenges, to be calm and find clarity.

  • Mindfulness stories and talks to help you build better, healthy habits.

Meditations to help you feel inspired and find motivated to eat well, workout and stay healthy both in body and mind.

Relaxation techniques and tools to help you sleep better every night, to wake feeling energised and refreshed.

Breathing exercises and calming meditations for anxiety, panic attacks and stress relief.

Meditation sessions to stop anxiety in its tracks and release stress.

How do I get more?

Start your day mindfully, keep feeling positive and be inspired throughout the day with a range of guided meditations to help during tough or stressful moments. Boost your energy with a Power Nap, stay focussed to Beat Procrastination, and then drift off using a Deep Sleep meditation for a restful night.

Think of Andrew as your personal mindfulness coach, always there to help when you need him most.

Search for Andrew Johnson to unlock more daily mindfulness and guided meditation sessions.",Medical,Universal Relaxation Ltd,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/relax-with-aj-lite/id307750844?uo=4,4.34483,29,clinical
1318647337,PsychNotes: Clinical Pkt Guide,"""Try before you buy"" - Download the FREE App, which includes sample content. In-App purchase required to unlock all content.

A Davis’s Notes Title, Perfect wherever you are…in class, in clinical, and in any practice setting! This handy guide delivers quick access to need-to-know information on DSM-5 disorders and treatments, psychotropic drugs, documentation, and patient education. No other resource delivers as much information in a format that’s as easy to read, easy to access the content on your mobile device.

KEY FEATURES
* Coverage of documentation • psychiatric medications, restraints, and seclusion • DSM-5 disorders and treatments • and patient education and care
* Basic behavioral theories at a glance
* Key aspects of psychiatric and crisis interventions
* General mental status assessments and exams, with focused assessments for adult and geriatric populations, including mini-cognitive assessment instrument for dementia and rating scale for Lewy Body diseases
* Essential information on psychotropic drugs
* Client/family education tables, tips, and strategies
* Cultural considerations and assessment tool

NEW TO THIS EDITION
* Addresses important topics such as Telepsychiatry and Teletherapy and more importantly the pandemic and its effect on mental health, both on individuals as well as health care providers.
* Several new psychotropics — for tardive dyskinesia, PTSD, treatment-resistant depression, and also a new medication for schizophrenia.
* Crises that deal with Covid and PTSD as well as the military, and geriatrics in a clinical pocket companion.
* Multiaxial assessment, CAGE, self-administered patient health questionnaires 2 and 9, and many other assessment tools
* Clinical pearls throughout to provide practical on-the-spot advice
* UPDATED & REVISED! All content thoroughly reviewed, revised, and updated to incorporate the newest knowledge in the field, including new drugs and drug updates.

ISBN 13: 9781719645454

SUBSCRIPTION :

Please purchase a yearly auto-renewing subscription to receive content access and available updates.

Yearly auto-renewing payments- $29.99

Payment will be charged to your iTunes Account at confirmation of purchase. Subscription automatically renews unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24-hours before the end of the current period. Subscription may be managed by the user and auto-renewal can be disabled at any time by going to your device “Settings” and tapping “iTunes & App Store”. Any unused portion of a free trial period will be forfeited when you purchase a subscription, where applicable.

If you have any questions or comments, email us any time: customersupport@skyscape.com or call 508-299-3000

Privacy Policy - https://www.skyscape.com/terms-of-service/privacypolicy.aspx

Terms and Conditions - https://www.skyscape.com/terms-of-service/licenseagreement.aspx

Author(s): Maxine Papadakis, Stephen McPhee, Michael Rabow, Kenneth McQuaid
Publisher: The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc.",Medical,Skyscape Medpresso Inc,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/psychnotes-clinical-pkt-guide/id1318647337?uo=4,4.68687,198,clinical
6443581547,Vision Engage,"Discover a new way to participate in clinical studies with VISION Engage — your gateway to the best clinical trial experience at Velocity Clinical Research!
 
Whether you're a current participant or considering joining a study, VISION Engage brings the world of clinical trials to your fingertips. Elevate your experience with the following features:
 
Explore New Studies: Instantly access a curated list of study opportunities tailored just for you.
Build Your Profile: Keep your information up-to-date so VISION Engage can notify you when you may be eligible for a study.
Faster payments: Seamlessly receive your study stipends via the app
Manage Appointments: Never miss an important date with personalized notifications and reminders, ensuring you are always well-prepared for your upcoming visits.
Stay in Touch: Stay connected with your Velocity site through seamless, in-app communication.
Learn About Research: Navigate your clinical trial journey with ease, and gain insights into clinical trials, the diseases being studied, and more.
 
Redefine your clinical study experience with VISION Engage by Velocity. Download the app now!",Medical,"Velocity Clinical Research, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/vision-engage/id6443581547?uo=4,4.8308,4362,clinical
1249606989,"Anatomy Atlas, USMLE, Clinical","FREE RESOURCES:
* SkyscapeRX - Drug Guide for Physicians
* Little Black Book of Primary Care
* Skyscape Clinical Calculator Plus
* ICD 10-CM

Includes sample content for the following resources ** in-app purchase required to view full content **:

* Netter's Atlas of Human Anatomy, Interactive Digital version of the 7th print edition
- High-Resolution images with Pinch-Zoom
- Toggle labels ON/OFF

The only anatomy atlas illustrated by physicians, Atlas of Human Anatomy, 7th edition, brings you world-renowned, exquisitely clear views of the human body with a clinical perspective. In addition to the famous work of Dr. Frank Netter, you’ll also find nearly 100 paintings by Dr. Carlos A. G. Machado, one of today’s foremost medical illustrators. Together, these two uniquely talented physician-artists highlight the most clinically relevant views of the human body. In addition, more than 50 carefully selected radiologic images help bridge illustrated anatomy to living anatomy as seen in everyday practice.

* Ferri's Clinical Advisor
* Harrison’s Manual of Medicine
* The Washington Manual of Medical Therapeutics
* First Aid Cases For The USMLE Step 2 CK
* First Aid Q&A for the USMLE Step 1
* First Aid Q&A for the USMLE Step 2 CK
* Harriet Lane Handbook: A Manual for Pediatric House Officers
* Skyscape Labs - Written by Clinician for Clinicians
* MobileDDx Differential Diagnosis Tool
* Stedman's Medical Dictionary
* Surgery On Call - On-the-spot treatment advice on 75+ problems
* Emergency Medicine On Call - Problem-oriented approach EMERG Medicine practice 
* Internal Medicine On Call - Latest diagnostic tests and treatment options
* Pediatrics On Call -  Lab tests, Bedside Procedures, Fluids & Electrolyte and more
* Spanish-English English-Spanish Medical Dictionary



* Johns Hopkins Manual of Gynecology and Obstetrics
* CURRENT Medical Diagnosis and Treatment 


Unique time-saving features of the App:
- Search for keywords in all the resources from the home screen
- History tracks recently viewed topics
- Bookmark frequently referenced topics with Voice & Text notes",Medical,Skyscape Medpresso Inc,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/anatomy-atlas-usmle-clinical/id1249606989?uo=4,4.58824,17,clinical
1050169390,Geeky Medics - OSCE revision,"The Geeky Medics app is packed with features, including:
- OSCE Guides (200+) to prepare for the UKMLA CPSA
- OSCE Checklists (150+) to practice with others
- OSCE Stations (1000+), including AI-powered virtual patients
- Flashcards (2500+) and review cards you've created
- Questions (5000+) including UKMLA AKT and PSA question banks

Learn on the go with our comprehensive collection of high-quality OSCE guides that take you step-by-step through key clinical skills, including:
- Clinical examination
- Procedures
- Communication skills (e.g. history taking)
- Data interpretation (e.g. ECG, ABC, CXR, AXR, CTG)
- Emergency scenarios (A-E approach)
- Prescribing & documentation 
- Surgical skills (e.g. suturing)

Put your skills to the test using our collection of OSCE station scenarios that make it easy to practice with others and run a mock OSCE.

Practise your communication skills with our AI-powered virtual patients.

Access over 5000 FREE MCQs and 2500 FREE flashcards covering clinical medicine, anatomy and basic sciences. 

Revise for the UKMLA AKT or the Prescribing Safety Assessment (PSA) exam using our dedicated question banks.

Our OSCE guides cover everything you need for the UKMLA CPSA:
• Cardiovascular
• Respiratory
• Gastrointestinal
• Neurology
• Musculoskeletal
• Endocrine
• Obstetrics & Gynaecology
• Ear, Nose & Throat
• Breast examination
• Clinical procedures
• History taking
• Information giving
• Advanced communication
• Data interpretation
• Emergency management (ABCDE approach)
• Written skills
• Surgery

Unlocking all categories is an auto-renewable subscription. You will be charged on a yearly basis.

SUBSCRIPTION DETAILS
Payment will be charged to your iTunes Account at confirmation of purchase. Subscription automatically renews unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24 hours before the end of the current period. Your Account will be charged for renewal within 24 hours prior to the end of the current period and will identify the cost of the renewal. Subscriptions may be managed by the user and auto-renewal may be turned off by going to the user's Account Settings after purchase. No cancellation of the current subscription is allowed during the active subscription period.

Privacy Policy and Terms and Conditions: https://geekymedics.com/disclaimer/",Medical,Geeky Medics LTD,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/geeky-medics-osce-revision/id1050169390?uo=4,4.46774,62,clinical
1207813394,LPN Notes: Clinical Guide,"""Try before you buy"" - Download the FREE App, which includes sample content. In-App purchase required to unlock all content.

This popular, easy-to-use guide delivers the practical, clinically oriented content you need to deliver safe and effective health care in hospital and home settings and is perfect for preparing for NCLEX-PN Exam. 

Increase your confidence with the LPN Notes: Nurse's Clinical Pocket Guide. Mobile app format for on the go with NCLEX® tips - perfect for preparing for the NCLEX®-PN exam. Thoroughly revised and updated, you’ll have access to even more of the commonly-used by rarely memorized clinical information that nurses and students need.


KEY FEATURES
* Procedures Tab presents the common skills, procedures, and equipment, required to perform routine nursing tasks.
* Assess Tab provides comprehensive, system-specific information, including the skills, procedures, and tools necessary to perform an assessment on an adult patient.
* Disease/Patient Education Tab covers the most common diseases and disorders, homecare, safe medication administration practices, and safety as well as common patient education issues.
* Med-Surg & Emergency Tab presents 20 of the most commonly encountered symptoms and scenarios.
* Geri/Ob/Peds Tab now features geriatric assessment tips for 6 common marker conditions (SPICES) that could indicate increased risk for functional decline or even death.
* Life Span Tab combines geriatrics, obstetrics, and pediatrics to focus on life span considerations.
* Tools Tab includes a Spanish translator with phonetic pronunciations.
* No internet connection is required to access the content after the initial download. Find information quickly using powerful SmartSearch technology. Search part of term for those hard to spell medical terms.  

NEW TO THIS EDITION
* Easier-to-use design and layout with a table of contents.

SPECIAL FEATURES:
Locate a disease, symptom, or medication in the fastest possible manner:
- Use ""Spotlight Search"" from the Home screen
- Tap and Hold launch icon to open the Last Topic, History, Favorites
- Navigate using multiple indices
- History to open frequently visited pages
- Bookmarks 

NEVER FORGET ANYTHING:
Mark topics with relevant information:
- Rich-text notes 
- Voice memos
- Annotations with scribble, doodle, or text
You choose the method to note this regardless of the context you are in to ensure that the important facts are available whenever you access the topic, whether it is tomorrow or six months from now.

No internet connection is required to access the content after the initial download.
Find information quickly using powerful SmartSearch technology. Search part of term for those hard to spell medical terms.

Content licensed from printed ISBN 10: 0803699743
Content licensed from printed ISBN 13: 978-0803699748

SUBSCRIPTION :
Please purchase a yearly auto-renewing subscription to receive content access and available updates.

Yearly auto-renewing payments- $29.99

Payment will be charged to your iTunes Account at confirmation of purchase. Subscription automatically renews unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24-hours before the end of the current period. Subscription may be managed by the user and auto-renewal can be disabled at any time by going to your device “Settings” and tapping “iTunes & App Store”. Any unused portion of a free trial period will be forfeited when you purchase a subscription, where applicable.

If you have any questions or comments, email us any time: customersupport@skyscape.com or call 508-299-3000

Privacy Policy - https://www.skyscape.com/terms-of-service/privacypolicy.aspx
Terms and Conditions - https://www.skyscape.com/terms-of-service/licenseagreement.aspx

Author(s): Ehren Myers RN, BSN
Publisher: F.A. Davis Company",Medical,Skyscape Medpresso Inc,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/lpn-notes-clinical-guide/id1207813394?uo=4,4.66667,48,clinical
1528595748,Finch: Self-Care Pet,"Meet your new self-care best friend! Finch is a self-care pet app that helps you feel prepared and positive, one day at a time. Take care of your pet by taking care of yourself! Choose from a wide variety of self-care exercises personalized for you.

THE BEST DAILY SELF-CARE APP

Struggling with stress, mental health, or need motivation? Is self-care a chore? Finch makes self-care finally feel rewarding, lightweight, and fun. Complete quick self-care exercises to grow your pet, earn rewards, and improve mental health! People who struggle with mental health, goals, meditation, and journaling found it easier to be mindful with their self-care pet in the Finch app!

REVIEWS

- ""I’ve tried other apps for being thankful and thinking positive but never used them long. I enjoy this one because the virtual pet is really cute and it takes just a moment to be honest about I really feel.""
- ""As someone who struggles with anxiety and depression, I have tried many journaling apps and mood trackers. All of them felt like a chore, but not Finch! Even if I am not feeling like journaling or even facing my emotions, I can do so in order to help Finch.""

QUICK CHECK INS

- Start mornings with quick mood checks and energize your pet to go exploring! Choose from a variety of quick mindful habits from goal tracking and bullet journaling to mindful breathing exercises and quizzes!
- End days in moments of gratitude with your self-care pet where they'll be back from adventures to share stories with you! Destress, reflect, and recognize your positive moments.

MINDFUL EXERCISES

Strengthen your mental health by increasing resilience, productivity, and gratitude with self-care exercises! Finch helps you hit goals and sustain healthy habits with your self-care pet!

- Goal Tracker: set goals and celebrate wins you've accumulated from healthy habits.
- Bullet Journaling: guided bullet journaling prompts to clear the mind, track important moments, and practice gratitude.
- Breathing: guided breathing to calm nerves, increase focus, energize your mind, and sleep better.
- Quizzes: quick quizzes to understand your mental health by tracking your anxiety, depression, body image appreciation, and more.
- Mood Tracker: check on yourself and access mood trends to understand what has been lifting you up or bringing you down.
- Quotes: read motivational quotes to lift your mood and gain new perspective.
- Sleep: Unwind yourself for good sleep with guided breathing and next day goal planning.
- Insights: get insights on your mental health from combined analytics on your mood tracker, bullet journal tags, goal tracker, and quizzes.

SAY HI!

- TikTok: https://www.tiktok.com/@finchcare
- Discord: https://discord.gg/finchfam
- Instagram: https://www.instagram.com/finchcare/
- Facebook: https://facebook.com/groups/finchfam
- Email: support@befinch.com
- Terms of service: https://befinch.notion.site/Finch-Care-PBC-Terms-of-Service-710ffd2b56ce4bc8ac8063461a3bb96e
- Privacy policy: https://befinch.notion.site/Finch-Care-PBC-Privacy-Policy-c2e466cb17f34edd87d0c353b5742ac5",Health & Fitness,Finch Care Public Benefit Corporation,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/finch-self-care-pet/id1528595748?uo=4,4.95103,495337,healthcare
6444066770,Sharp HealthCare,"The Sharp HealthCare app is a care management app that helps Sharp patients throughout San Diego County and beyond conveniently manage their health care from a mobile device.
 
From the Sharp app home screen, you can quickly access care options, get reminders, view your recent account activity ― and easily click to your medical record and records of family members you’re authorized to view. With convenient self-services features, you can:
 
· Message your doctor
· Schedule and manage appointments
· View test results
· Refill prescriptions
· Check in for appointments
· Pay medical bills and set up payment plans
· Get price estimates for the cost of care
· Access educational resources during and after a hospital stay
· Review medications, immunization history and other health information
· And much more
 
Download the Sharp HealthCare app and sign in to your Sharp account or create a new account from the app.
 
ABOUT SHARP HEALTHCARE:
 
As San Diego's leading health care provider, Sharp is not for profit, but for people, which means all resources are dedicated to delivering the highest quality patient-centered care, the latest medical technology and superior service. Every day, approximately 2,700 affiliated physicians and 19,000 employees work to provide patients and their families with the extraordinary level of care called The Sharp Experience.
 
With four acute-care hospitals, three specialty hospitals, three affiliated medical groups and a full spectrum of other facilities and services, Sharp HealthCare makes it easy for patients to get the care they need close to home.
 
Learn more at sharp.com. This mobile medical app for patients is specifically designed for patients of Sharp HealthCare. New features and performance updates are released frequently.",Medical,Sharp HealthCare,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/sharp-healthcare/id6444066770?uo=4,3.82019,951,healthcare
1348316600,UnitedHealthcare,"It’s easy to make the most of your United Healthcare benefits and access care on-the-go with the UnitedHealthcare app†. Just sign in or create an account for secure, convenient access to your health plan.  
 
Check your benefits: 
 - See what your plan covers, including copays and out-of-pocket expenses.  
 - Track your deductible and out-of-pocket max. 
 - Follow new claims from start to finish and review old claims too.  
 - Check your health reimbursement, flexible spending, and Optum Bank HSA balances. 
 - † Pay your claims using Optum Bank HSA balances 
 
Find & price care:  
 - Search doctors, specialists, hospitals, and clinics in-network and near you 
 - † Access virtual primary care and start a virtual urgent care visit, 24/7 
 - Create favorites for your PCP provider information and commonly visited hospitals and clinics so you can find them quickly next time. 
 - † Find out how much a service or treatment might cost you before you get care.  
 
Access the info you need: 
 - See your records, including immunizations, lab results and procedures from all your providers. 
 - Use your digital member ID card from the app whenever and wherever you get care. 
 - † Save your health plan details to your Digital Wallet for easy access 
 - † Access your UnitedHealthcare UCard™ to make in-store or online purchases using benefit credit, spend earned rewards and more 
 
Prescriptions: 
 - † Fill prescriptions, review medications, and search medication info and pricing   
 
Take charge of your health:  
 - † Earn rewards by logging your activities, including tracking your steps with Apple HealthKit® integration 
 
Get help with live chat: 
 - † Ask your questions and get the answers you need from a live UnitedHealthcare advocate 
 
 - † Not all United Healthcare plans are currently supported by the app. Features and benefits will vary depending on your plan type. ",Medical,"UNITED HEALTHCARE SERVICES, INC.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/unitedhealthcare/id1348316600?uo=4,4.70723,551565,healthcare
1464601606,Solv: Easy Same-Day Healthcare,"Quality healthcare is just a click away with Solv. Easily book same-day doctor’s appointments and urgent care visits with top-rated doctors for you and your family, at home or on the go. Choose an in-person visit or video chat with a top-rated provider from the comfort of your home.

Trusted by millions across the country, Solv provides access to quick, easy, highly rated healthcare across the United States. Booking an appointment has never been easier, with access to same-day appointments with local urgent care centers, lab testing centers and more. Prefer to stay home and avoid waiting rooms? Solv also offers telehealth as well, allowing you to chat with a top-rated provider quickly and easily.

Need a COVID test or vaccine? Find and book a COVID test on Solv, or visit our directory to see vaccine locations near you.

Solv is 100% free, making access to healthcare for you and your family easier than ever. Download Solv and book an appointment today.

SIMPLE AND EASY TO USE
- Find same-day doctor appointments anytime, anywhere
- Schedule local, in-person urgent care visits or video chat with a top-rated doctor
- Book care for the entire family
- Manage your appointments, check in and complete paperwork right on the app
- Snap a photo of your insurance card and easily find providers within your network

SOLV IS TRUSTED BY MILLIONS
- High-quality care: All providers are reviewed by our team and maintain a minimum 4 out of 5 star rating.
- Broad nationwide network: We have local providers in the top 50 metro areas around the United States
- Clear, straightforward pricing: The ClearPrice initiative gives you the self-pay pricing for many common health and wellness services.

FIND TREATMENT FOR ALL OF YOUR SYMPTOMS
Our top-rated providers can diagnose, treat and prescribe medication for many issues, including:
- Headache, sore throat and stuffy nose
- Allergies, cold and flu symptoms
- Bronchitis, respiratory infections and sinus problems
- Poison ivy
- Pink eye
- Ear infections
- UTIs
- And more

WHAT SOLV USERS ARE SAYING
“This service is amazing. I truly appreciate that my local urgent care offers telemedicine. The entire process was fast, friendly, and efficient. I have been telling everyone I know about it.”

“Solv saved me hours of calling clinics and likely thousands of $$. I found an appointment at a clinic that could see me right away instead of going to the emergency room.”
--
- Our partners accept most major health insurance plans, including Aetna, Anthem Blue Cross, Cigna, Medicaid, Medicare, and United Healthcare.
- Snap a photo of your insurance card to see your benefits ahead of time.
- Telemed may not be available in certain states and is subject to state regulations.

Privacy Policy: https://www.solvhealth.com/privacy
Terms of Service: https://www.solvhealth.com/legal/tos

ABOUT US
Our mission? Making healthcare easy. Solv partners with high-quality care providers across the country to make convenient care simple, friendly and transparent for everyone, the way it should be. Founded in 2015, Solv has been featured by USA Today, the Wall Street Journal, Fortune, CNBC and more.",Medical,"HMFDF, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/solv-easy-same-day-healthcare/id1464601606?uo=4,4.88016,24802,healthcare
1527399597,PlantIn: Plant Identifier・Care,"PlantIn is always there for you!
With our care plans, you will learn how to identify a plant, how often to water your trees, or why the leaf on your flower turned brown.

We have a wide variety of features that every green thumb would fall in love with: 

► Watering Calculator

This feature will help to figure out the right amount of water your green pet needs. You just need to answer several questions regarding your plant’s conditions, and voila! 

► Light Meter

Here is another helpful tool that calculates the correct lighting level for your greens! Just click the Light Meter button and point the camera at the plant. Our AR-based technology will automatically scan the nearest environment, measure the amount of light, and tell if you need to move the plant to a brighter or shadier spot. 

► Care Plans

Plantkeeping will become even more effortless with our Personalized Care Plans. Request a plan for almost any species, from common houseplants to exotic cultivars. Your Snake plant care needs some improvements, or maybe you just got your first air plant and are not sure what to do with it? Get thorough watering, fertilization, lighting, and even pruning instructions easily and make ‘em grow!

► Care Notifications

Our users say that our plant care app helps with organizing daily routines! Keep calm – we will send your reminders to make sure that all your green pets are following their watering and fertilization schedules. Moreover, there are special weather notifications so that you will be warned in case of storms, freezing temperatures, and other unfavorable conditions that may harm your outdoor oasis.
 
► Ask the Botanist

Use this feature to get a consultation with our experienced gardening experts. Ask any questions regarding houseplant care and get custom recommendations, step-by-step guides, useful hints, and detailed instructions for your particular case.

Last but not least, we are happy to present our latest update: 

► Mushroom Identification

Our fresh mushroom identifier will become a fav feature for every single shroom hunter! While designed to identify fungi online in several taps, we have implemented a technology for offline id: no more hesitation while outdoors in lush woods. Identify edible mushrooms for delicious dinners, learn new fungi species, and use our feature to detect poisonous specimens.

PlantIn was created to provide loving care for each of your green pets, so let’s make this world greener and educate ourselves on botany together! Stay plantuned for more lifesaving info from our plant care app.

Privacy Policy: https://legal.myplantin.com/vortemol/privacy_policy.html
Terms of Use: https://legal.myplantin.com/vortemol/terms_and_conditions.html",Education,Vortemol Limited,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/plantin-plant-identifier-care/id1527399597?uo=4,4.54603,195811,healthcare
1083248251,White Noise Deep Sleep Sounds,"** Relax to the Sound of Nature ** — Apple
** Tools for Sleeping Well While Traveling ** — The New York Times 
** The Best White Noise Machine ** — Wirecutter

Say goodbye to sleepless nights and fussy babies. White Noise and Deep Sleep Sounds will lull you or your child to sleep with calming and relaxing sounds. Download the app today and sleep like a baby tonight!

White Noise and Deep Sleep Sounds helps ADULTS sleep better:
- Blocking out unwanted noises
- Forming sleep associations that cues you to fall asleep
- Helping you feel calm, relaxed, and soothed at night

White Noise and Deep Sleep Sounds helps BABIES and INFANTS get better sleep:
- “Whooshy” noises that simulate the environment of the womb
- Sleep association that cues your baby to fall asleep
- Engaging your baby’s calming reflex allows baby to sleep longer
- Blocking outside noises that wake your baby
- Creating a familiar routine that will help baby feel safe

White Noise and Deep Sleep Sounds help you STUDY, FOCUS, or MEDITATE:
- Improve focus and creativity by preventing outside distractions
- Creating a pleasant and zen like environment for meditation
- Canceling the noise around you
- Adding natural ambient background audio

Better than an actual sound machine or radio. Our sounds are professionally recorded to add the perfect background noise or ambience to your office, bedroom or nursery. Great for travel in noisy hotels, don't bother lugging around an actual sound machine when all you need is an iPhone or iPad.

Include sounds in categories ranging from sleep, meditation, ASMR, lullaby, solfeggio healing frequencies, and classical and relaxing music. Free sounds:
Air Filter
Fan
Shush (Shhh)
Baby Shusher
Vacuum Cleaner
Airplane Cabin
Driving in the Rain
Heartbeat
Cat Purring
Crickets
Lite Rain
Medium Rain
Rain on Tent
Distant Thunder
Rolling Thunderstorm
Ocean Waves
Brown Noise
Pink Noise
White Noise
Classical Piece: Gymnopedie Number 1
30+ free sounds

Enjoy soundscapes, binaural beats, and binaural recordings, which create an enhanced 3D stereo sound. Some premium sounds include:
Green Noise
Blue Noise
Box Fan
Forest at Dusk
Forest Creek
Ocean Windstorm
Ocean Waves Crashing on Rocks
Rain on Umbrella
Light Backyard Rain
Heavy Backyard Rain
Forest Birds
Forest Crickets
Lapping Lake Waves
Heavy Ocean Waves
Thunder Close
Rain & Water Sounds
Deep Healing 528 Hz Binaural Music
4 Hz, 40 Hz, and 432 Hz Binaural Music
Tibetan Singing Bowls for Meditation
Lullabies
Classical Music
Relaxing Music
ASMR
250+ more

Features:
Sleep Timer
Mix multiple sounds to create a soundscape
Play on launch
Today Widget
Plays in the background
Dark color theme
AirPlay 2

If you're a night owl or have insomnia, this app will help you maintain your circadian rhythm for a better mood. Use regularly over several weeks to obtain the best results and improve your sleep cycle. Keep a consistent bedtime at night and rise every morning at the same time. You'll feel well-rested and balanced. Compatible with most smart speakers and all Bluetooth LE speakers, headsets, and buds such as Bose or Sonos. The free version will play sounds for eight hours. Subscription is required for continuous play.

Terms and pricing:

An optional auto-renewing yearly subscription at $49.99 USD/year to provide unlimited access to the sleep sounds library and premium features while you maintain an active subscription.

Payment will be charged to the payment method connected to your iTunes Account when you confirm the subscription purchase. Subscriptions automatically renew unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24-hours before the end of the current subscription period. You will be charged for renewal within 24-hours prior to the end of the current period. You may manage your subscription and auto-renewal may be turned off by going to your Account Settings.

Terms of service: https://www.apple.com/legal/internet-services/itunes/dev/stdeula/
Privacy policy: https://kitefaster.com/privacy-policy/",Health & Fitness,"Slumber Studios, LLC",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/white-noise-deep-sleep-sounds/id1083248251?uo=4,4.80111,186884,healthcare
1180400838,K Health | Primary Care,"24/7 ACCESS TO HIGH-QUALITY MEDICAL CARE FROM YOUR PHONE. NO INSURANCE REQUIRED.    

Get the treatment you need from licensed medical providers without setting foot in a doctor’s office. Providers on the K Health platform can treat hundreds of medical conditions, from anxiety to UTIs, and prescribe medication to get you feeling better faster.

At K Health, we use advanced AI to provide better, more personalized medical care. Try it out for free by checking your symptoms: We’ll compare your case to millions of real patient records and tell you how people like you were diagnosed and treated.*

Then, you can chat with a provider to get the care you need. Pay just $49/month** for unlimited visits, $73 for a one-time virtual visit, or $449 for an entire year of unlimited visits (for a savings of $139).

With the K Health app, you can:

-Get free, clinically-proven information about your symptoms from the same AI your provider uses to make smarter medical decisions

-Chat with a medical provider about urgent medical needs 24/7 by text and video

-Make virtual appointments with a provider who can help you manage (and prevent) chronic conditions like high blood pressure, diabetes, high cholesterol, and more

-Get generic prescription medication shipped directly to your door, saving you time and money

-Stay on top of lab orders, medication management, and specialist referrals

WHAT WE TREAT 

Urgent care:
-Cold and flu
-Indigestion and abdominal pain
-UTIs 
-Headaches and migraines
-Dental pain
-Rashes

Chronic care:
-Weight management
-Anxiety and depression
-High blood pressure
-High cholesterol
-Diabetes (type 2)
-Acid reflux

... and hundreds more


*The results from the Symptom Checker are not medical advice or a diagnosis, but you can connect with a medical provider practicing on the K Health platform for diagnosis and treatment.
**Billed quarterly after the first month",Medical,K Health Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/k-health-primary-care/id1180400838?uo=4,4.67626,42106,healthcare
391062219,Zocdoc - Find and book doctors,"Zocdoc is the leading healthcare marketplace that makes it easy for patients to find and book the right doctors for them. Each month, millions of people use Zocdoc to search for in-network care and instantly book appointments online. Patients typically see a doctor within 24 to 72 hours of booking.

Download the free Zocdoc app to find and book a doctor today. 

WHAT TYPE OF CARE IS AVAILABLE ON ZOCDOC

Zocdoc aims to help every patient find and book every type of care. There are nearly 100,000 providers across more than 250 specialities available on Zocdoc— primary care physicians, dentists, eye doctors, OB-GYNs, therapists, dermatologists, and more. This also includes urgent care, imaging services, and 24/7 on-demand virtual care. Providers on Zocdoc offer virtual and in-person visits, and they accept +18,000 different insurance plans, making it easy to find in-network care.

WHY DO PATIENTS LOVE ZOCDOC

- With the Zocdoc app, patients can easily find and book the right care:
- Search by insurance and location to find nearby in-network providers
- Add your location to find doctors near you
- Filter by speciality, procedure, availability, distance, gender, and more
- Read verified reviews from other patients
- See doctors’ real-time appointment availability
- Instantly book in-person or telehealth appointments online
- Get fast access to care, typically within 24 - 72 hours
- Receive personalized appointment reminders
- Fill out your intake forms digitally, ahead of your visit 

HOW DOES ZOCDOC WORK

Search and compare the right doctors by what matters
Search by speciality or symptom along with location, availability, and insurance to see providers who are in-network. Research and compare providers by reviewing their profiles, which include professional statements, education background, photos, and verified reviews and ratings from other patients. 

Instantly book any type of care
View providers’ real-time appointment availability, select a convenient time, and click to instantly book an appointment, 24/7.

Prepare for the appointment
Save time by filling out intake forms and insurance information on Zocdoc ahead of the visit. 

Stay on top of care
Keep track of upcoming visits with appointment reminders and personalized recommendations for preventative care. View your care team and easily rebook.",Medical,Zocdoc Inc,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/zocdoc-find-and-book-doctors/id391062219?uo=4,4.86463,105635,healthcare
876080126,Motivation - Daily quotes,"Whether you're going through hard times, need an extra push to get stuff done, or like sharing inspirational quotes on social media, Motivation has you covered.

Positive reminders are one of the simplest and most powerful tools for mental growth. It’s all about keeping the right thoughts top of mind from the get-go every day, so they’re readily available on those hard days when you need them most.

Now, from iOS 14, you can think positive thoughts without even trying with the Motivation widget! Simply install the widget in your home screen and customize it from the app. You can have as many widgets as you want!

Customize the design of the quotes and share the uplifting message of the day with your friends, or use the image for Instagram or as a wallpaper.

The app includes a wide range of topics such as self-esteem, relationships, and dealing with stress, as well as a selection of carefully designed themes to choose from - updated frequently.

+ Read through Hundreds of Quotes
+ Find Motivational Books
+ Save or Share your Quotes
+ Set Motivational Reminders throughout the Day
+ Save your Favorite Quotes
+ Change Font and Colors
+ Filter Quotes by Category
+ Set a Home Screen Motivation Widget

From quotes about working out to love and family quotes, Motivation has them all! Browse thousands of quotes organized by category:


- Motivation to work harder
- Love quotes
- Motivation to train and work out
- Help for depression
- Boost your self-esteem and self-confidence
- Get over a break up
- Life lessons and sayings
- Sports quotes from athletes and trainers
- Business, money, success, and career
- Being present and mindful
- Quotes from and for women
- Philosophy from the best minds
- Quotes to be thankful for what you got
- Inspirations for joy
- Quotes from movies
- Verses from the Bible
- And much more!

And now with Motivation Premium you can:


+ Remove ads
+ Unlock all themes and categories
+ Set background photo
+ Get unlimited reminders
+ Search quotes

To get access to the Motivation Premium content and functionality, you can choose between a lifetime, monthly, and yearly auto-renewable subscription. This is a recurring transaction that will be charged to your iTunes Account at confirmation of purchase and will automatically renew unless you cancel it at least 24 hours before the end of your subscription. Renewals will be charged at the same cost within 24 hours prior to the end of the current period. You can manage your subscriptions and auto-renewal can be turned off by going to your iTunes Account Settings after purchase.


Find tons of inspiring content on our blog: https://blog.motivation.app/

Privacy Policy: https://monkeytaps.net/privacy
Terms of Use: https://monkeytaps.net/terms",Health & Fitness,Monkey Taps,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/motivation-daily-quotes/id876080126?uo=4,4.8387,995927,healthcare
895270785,MyQHealth - Care Coordinators,"Download the latest Your Care Coordinators app to get access anytime, anywhere to your health plan benefits and personal healthcare information.

With just a tap or click, get access to:

- Up-to-date benefit information
- Current claim, benefit and balance-due statuses
- Real-time health and wellness guidance
- In-network providers near you
- And so much more",Health & Fitness,"Quantum Health, Inc",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/myqhealth-care-coordinators/id895270785?uo=4,4.8048,19939,healthcare
726031617,Abide - Bible Meditation Sleep,"Transform Your Faith Walk with Abide – The #1 Christian Meditation App

Featured in Crosswalk, TechCrunch, and recommended by Pureflix!

Embark on a transformative journey with Abide, the premier Christian meditation app. Dive into a deeper connection with God, find peace in your daily life, and rejuvenate your soul with our biblically inspired meditations.


Why Choose Abide?

Extensive Library of Christian Content: Explore more than 2000 meditations, 365+ bedtime stories, and full-production kids' stories that bring the Bible to life, along with more than 50 Bible book audio guides. Immerse yourself in audio from all chapters of the NIV Bible and discover featured monthly content that brings fresh perspectives and topics to your daily practice.

Thematic Biblical Content: Our content spans a wide array of themes, from anxiety and trust to healing and worship, ensuring there's always a meditation that meets your needs.

Tailored to Your Lifestyle: Whether you have two minutes or fifteen, Abide fits into your daily routine. Our meditations are crafted to accommodate your schedule, making growth in your relationship with Jesus both achievable and enjoyable.

Sleep Better with Biblical Stories: Drift into peaceful slumber with our collection of bedtime stories, all rooted in Scripture. Allow God's Word to lull you into restful sleep so you can wake up refreshed for the day ahead.

A Community of Faith: Join millions, including Grammy award-winning artists and Christian leaders, who have found solace and strength in Abide.

User-Friendly and Enriching: Easily engage with Abide. Press play and begin your journey toward rejuvenation and peace, guided by God’s sacred Word.

Personalize Your Journey: Save your favorite meditations and stories to ""Favorites"" for easy access, and journal your thoughts in daily entries to reflect on your growth.

Custom Experience: Select background music and nature sounds to create the perfect ambiance for your devotional practice.

Apple Health Integration: Effortlessly keep track of your meditation and sleep sessions with integration into your Apple Health app.


Subscribe for Exclusive Content

Enhance your journey with our yearly subscription plan:

Over 365 Bedtime Sleep Stories: Crafted for deep, restful sleep, including a rich collection of stories for kids.
In-Depth Guides: More than 50 audio guides on specific Biblical topics.
Extended Meditations: Dive deeper with longer guided sessions.
Short Daily Devotionals: Start your day with quick, inspiring messages.
Premium Music: Over 500 calming and relaxing music tracks


Hear from Our Community:

""I’ve been using the app mostly for sleep. There are lots of different topics I love, like freedom from depression. C’mon y’all! That is good stuff, check that out! There are people that need to know about this app. It’s amazing!"" - Mandisa, Grammy Award-winning artist & American Idol finalist

""I love Abide so much! It helps me sleep. I listen to it every night."" - Isabella R.

""I absolutely love my Abide app! It keeps my eyes and ears on the Lord throughout my day. I really enjoy listening to the app in the morning as I'm getting ready for work... This is one of my absolute favorite apps!!"" - Maggie W.

""I wake before sunrise and flood my mind with Abide's blessings."" - Bruce H


Discover Your Oasis

Let Abide help connect you to God in a new way. Download Abide now and begin your journey to experiencing the peace of Christ.


Subscription Details

After the free trial, your subscription will automatically renew unless it is turned off at least 24 hours before the end of the current period. You can manage your subscription or turn off auto-renewal by going to your App Store account settings. Your account will be charged for renewal within 24 hours prior to the end of the current period. Any unused portion of a free trial will be forfeited if you purchase a subscription.

Terms: https://abide.com/terms/
Privacy policy: https://abide.com/privacy/",Reference,Guideposts Church Corporation,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/abide-bible-meditation-sleep/id726031617?uo=4,4.87308,120418,healthcare
6469513178,BalanceMe-Health AI&Self Care,"Evaluate your health with BalanceMe! Your heart rate serves as a crucial health indicator. Utilize BalanceMe, a pulse checker and heart rate monitor, to measure and assess your stress and anxiety levels. This tool allows you to track not only your heart rate but also your stress, anxiety, and mood. It's a valuable resource for analyzing stress levels and maintaining a vigilant eye on your overall health.

Before You Start Health Disclaimer
1. This application is designed for health purposes and is intended to promote health awareness and relieve stress.
2. Please avoid using this application for the diagnosis, prevention, or treatment of any medical condition. It is not a substitute for specialized medical equipment or expert medical guidance.
3. Please note that the measurement functionality is designed to measure heart rate. Other health indicators, such as blood pressure, blood sugar, and blood oxygen levels, can be logged and tracked, but cannot be measured.
4. If you have any health-related concerns, always consult a certified medical professional before making a decision or following any advice.

Measuring Heart Rate: Guide to Accurate Results Acquisition
1. Hold your phone gently, maintaining a calm and relaxed state.
2. Use your fingertip to completely cover the rear camera.
3. Stay still throughout the entire measuring process until it's completed.

Main Features:
1. Heart Rate Monitor: Track your heart rate in real-time, enabling continuous monitoring of your cardiovascular health during diverse activities.
2. AI-Powered Health Guidance: Leverage a GPT-driven health advisor offering personalized recommendations based on your health data and preferences, aiding you in making informed choices for a healthier lifestyle.
3. Blood Pressure, Glucose, and Oxygen Tracker: Track your blood pressure, blood sugar, and blood oxygen levels over time. Monitor trends in these health indicators and visualize the changes with easy-to-read charts, helping you stay informed about your health.
4. Daily Emotion and Mood Tracker: Record and analyze your daily emotions and moods to recognize patterns and triggers that may influence your overall health and well-being.
5. Comprehensive Health Reports: Generate detailed reports using the collected data, offering in-depth insights into your health trends, patterns, and potential health risks.
6. Valuable Health Tips and Insights: Access a thoughtfully curated collection of health tips and articles, delivering valuable information on sustaining a healthy lifestyle and making informed health-related choices.
7. Calming Meditation: Access guided meditation sessions to promote relaxation, alleviate stress, and improve overall mental well-being.

Subscription Options: Weekly/ Monthly/ Yearly
1. Upon confirmation of purchase, the payment will be charged to your iTunes Account.
2. You can manage your subscriptions and turn off automatic renewal in your Account Settings after purchasing.
3. If you don't opt out of auto-renewal at least 24 hours before the current period ends, your subscription will be automatically renewed.

You can use the app several times a day, especially when you wake up in the morning, go to bed, feel stressed, or exercise. BalanceMe gives you the tools to make informed decisions about your heart health. Don't hesitate to download it now!


Terms of Service: https://www.fenlakeglobal.com/terms-of-service
Privacy Policy: https://www.fenlakeglobal.com/privacy-policy",Lifestyle,Fenlake Global Limited,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/balanceme-health-ai-self-care/id6469513178?uo=4,4.55607,4352,healthcare
1451295827,Impulse - Brain Training,"100+ million downloads
4.7 worldwide rating (1 million reviews)
Apple's App of the Day in 50+ countries

You probably know that, despite aging, your brain is able to grow, learn things and form new neural connections. This process is called brain plasticity and requires regular training.

Impulse - Brain Training App offers you a great way to improve yourself by playing entertaining and challenging mind games. Our quick brain workouts along with proper physical exercising and diet may help to keep your brain clear, sharp and ready for day-to-day life challenges.

We offer a diversified range of personalized workout plans for different brain areas (e.g. memory, attention, concentration, maths, problem-solving, creativity, etc.) as well as training games. Games are challenging enough to ensure you progress over time and along with that comprehensible to any age and expertise level.

In today’s busy world a lot of people:
 • have difficulties remembering what they did a few days back;
 • often fail to remember people’s names;
 • frequently forget birthdays, anniversaries and other important dates;
 • get told off by their bosses for absent-mindedness;
 • struggle to stay focused at work;
 • get embarrassed because of poor math skills.

Relatable? Then start your positive transformation with Impulse today:
 • use your brain to full capacity;
 • make your life more productive and happy;
 • become more concentrated and focused;
 • boost your calculation skills and make friends with numbers;
 • surprise everyone with your skills;
 • keep your brain sharp till the ripe old age;
 • reduce time spent on social media and useless time-killing games.

Impulse - Brain Training offers 3-day free trial with full access to games and exercises with no interruptions or ads. If you choose to subscribe, you will be charged a subscription fee according to your country. The subscription fee will be shown in the app before you complete the payment. Payment will be charged to iTunes Account at confirmation of purchase. Subscription automatically renews unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24-hours before the end of the current period. Account will be charged for renewal within 24-hours prior to the end of the current period, and identify the cost of the renewal. Subscriptions may be managed by the user and auto-renewal may be turned off by going to the user's Account Settings after purchase. No cancellation of the current subscription is allowed during active subscription period.

Terms of Service - https://brainimpulse.me/app/tos.html
Privacy policy - https://brainimpulse.me/app/privacy_policy.html

Contact us: support@brainimpulse.me",Health & Fitness,GMRD Apps Limited,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/impulse-brain-training/id1451295827?uo=4,4.74674,737245,healthcare
1372575227,Gratitude: Self-Care Journal,"The Gratitude app is a carefully-designed self-care tool to help you focus on your mental health.

With a gratitude journal, affirmations, vision board, and daily motivation content, Gratitude provides you with all the tools and reminders you need to gain motivation and develop a healthy self-love routine in your life. 
 
To live a happy and fulfilling life, it is important for us to have good mental health and a strong sense of self-love.

And, as the app is completely private, you can always be assured that your precious journal entries, affirmations, and vision board are for your eyes only.

Here are the tools that you will find in the Gratitude app:

1. GRATITUDE JOURNAL

A gratitude journal or diary opens up your eyes to reflect on all the little blessings in your life.

In daily life, we can lose sight of what we are fortunate to have and by keeping a journal you can slowly and steadily shift your perspective to focus on what is good in your life.

The Gratitude app will send you reminders with prompts to help you build the habit of journaling.

You can also add photos to your journal entries and can record journals in your voice, build a gratitude journal streak, and access hundreds of journal prompts. 

2. POSITIVE AFFIRMATIONS

If you’ve heard about manifestation or the law of attraction, you’ve probably heard about affirmations.

Positive daily affirmations change our self-talk to focus on more loving and kind thoughts towards ourselves.

They give us the motivation we need to keep moving forward and believe in ourselves.

The Gratitude app has hundreds of affirmations that you can listen to or read, as per your need.

You can also write your own affirmations, add music, and record your voice to them.

Positive affirmations are a dearly loved tool and with this affirmations app, it is very easy for you to practice them.

3. CREATE VISION BOARDS

Another super popular manifestation tool is a vision board, also called a dream board. The vision board serves as a collage of your dreams and goals in the form of photos, quotes, and affirmations.

In the Gratitude app, we’ll help you make a great vision board using sections, goal ideas, and create a video of all your goals together with music. You can also make multiple vision boards!

4. DAILY ZEN

We understand the need for motivation and inspiration as you build a healthy routine with these self-help tools, which is why Daily Zen is an important part of the app.

Here, you will find gratitude quotes, motivation quotes, thought switch ideas, thank you cards, affirmations, blog articles, and real-life stories of people who changed their mindset with gratitude.

5. MINDFUL MINUTES

We define the Mindful minutes as the time that you spend in the Gratitude app. You can view the mindful minutes under 'All Health Data' section in the Health app provided by Apple. Currently, the app does not read any data from the health app. We don't write any data in the health app without your consent. You can turn on the mindful minutes from the profile & settings in the Gratitude app.

Privacy Policy: https://www.notion.so/Gratitude-App-Privacy-Policy-40195d1e9f51499c82dc8f7d06ab2a1c
Terms of Use: https://medium.com/@priteshsankhe/terms-and-conditions-c7a676f5d884",Health & Fitness,Hapjoy Technologies Private Limited,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/gratitude-self-care-journal/id1372575227?uo=4,4.88361,42848,healthcare
1466793305,SimplePractice Client Portal,"If you’re receiving services for behavioral health, counseling, speech pathology, occupational therapy, physical therapy, or any other wellness service by a practitioner who uses SimplePractice, this app is for you! The SimplePractice Client Portal iOS app empowers you to manage care for you or your loved ones from one secure place. Stay connected with your practitioner between appointments from the convenience of your phone. Your personal information is kept private, yet easily accessible for your convenience.

Simplify how you access care with features like:
• Passwordless login – Securely log into your Client Portal without the hassle of a username or password by setting up a passcode, touch ID, or Face ID for instant access. 
• Personalized notifications – Get push notifications sent right to your phone regarding any new messages, invoices, or documents that have been sent to you by your practitioner.
• Secure messaging – Message your practitioner directly from your phone knowing that all communication is secure and private.
• Upcoming appointments and requests – View all your upcoming appointments, and request a new appointment with your practitioner directly from the app. 
• Digital payments – Add new payment methods to pay your bills including HSA and FSA cards. You can even pay directly from the app. 
• Digital paperwork – Complete documents and questionnaires related to care on your own time. 
• Telehealth – Join virtual appointments with your practitioner directly from the app, so you never have to find a link buried in your inbox again. 
• Appointment directions – Get automatically transferred to your preferred mobile navigation app for easy directions to your practitioner’s office.
• Profile switching – Quickly toggle between any Client Portal you’re managing—whether you’re seeing different providers who use SimplePractice for practice management or are managing care for multiple individuals.

To access the SimplePractice Client Portal iOS app, you must be invited to use the SimplePractice Client Portal by your practitioner. When you first log into the app, the email you provided to your practitioner will be used to authenticate your Client Portal access. After you’ve signed up, turn on Face ID, Touch ID, or a four-digit passcode for hassle-free login. Please note: what you can see and do within the SimplePractice Client Portal app may vary, and is limited to the specific features your practitioner has enabled for your profile. 

Are you currently looking for therapy services? To find a behavioral health therapist that uses SimplePractice near you, visit www.meetmonarch.com.",Medical,SimplePractice LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/simplepractice-client-portal/id1466793305?uo=4,4.88645,16170,healthcare
938497148,VSP Vision Care On the Go,"Manage your eye care needs at any time, and from anywhere.
With the VSP Vision Care App, you can easily:

•	View your benefit coverage 
•	Access your Member ID Card
•	Find a doctor
•	Get Exclusive Member Extras
•	Shop eyewear, contacts, and plans

To get started, download the VSP Vision Care App and log in with your vsp.com username and password. Don’t have an account yet? Click create an account from the log in screen.",Health & Fitness,Vision Service Plan,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/vsp-vision-care-on-the-go/id938497148?uo=4,1.22962,601,healthcare
1463423283,Sydney Health,"Use the Sydney™ Health app to find care, share your digital ID card, and check your claims. You can understand your benefits, improve your health, and save money. Easily manage your benefits at your fingertips whenever you need them with your personalized health and wellness information all in one place.  Through integration with HealthKit, you have the option to enable sharing information from your fitness devices with this app. This may include tracking your steps, calories, sleep data, and weight management.



- Digital ID card – Your digital ID works like a paper ID, enabling you to always have access to your current ID and easily share it with your care team in person or by email.
- Chat – Use our 24/7 chat to find what you are looking for, or find more in-depth answers by chatting with a Member Services representative.
- Plan details – Understand your share of the costs, including your deductible and copay. Find out what’s covered and check your claims.
- Find care – Search for care when and where you need it. Locate doctors, labs, hospitals, and other healthcare professionals in your plan’s network. See your estimated costs before you receive care.
- View claims – Easily track your claims including the status and your costs.
- Virtual care – Routine care, prescription refills, and urgent care right from your app, whenever it works for you.
- Refill your prescriptions – You can set up automatic refills and reminders for your medications.


Download Sydney Health to your device today.



Sydney Health is offered through an arrangement with Carelon Digital Platforms, a separate company offering mobile application services on behalf of your health plan. ©2020-2023. The Virtual Primary Care experience is offered through an arrangement with Hydrogen Health.



Sydney Health options are based on each member’s plan, so some features may not be available to all members.",Medical,"Elevance Health, Inc",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/sydney-health/id1463423283?uo=4,4.82189,406697,healthcare
874656917,I am - Daily Affirmations,"How many negative thoughts have been endlessly repeating in your mind? Daily affirmations help rewire our brains, build self-esteem, and change negative thought patterns. Empower yourself by verbally affirming your dreams and ambitions. Choose from many daily intentions and set reminders to be delivered throughout the day.

Positive affirmations help make major shifts in your mindset, and they also serve as prompts and daily reminders about what you’re truly capable of, ensuring every day is an amazing day.

An affirmation is a simple but powerful statement that helps to strengthen the connection between your conscious and unconscious mind. The more you strengthen this connection, the more resilient you’ll be when you experience difficult or challenging circumstances.

As Buddha wisely said: you become what you believe. And the best way to strengthen your resilience is to practice affirmations every single day.


There are many benefits to using affirmations as part of your daily morning routine:


- They help increase your awareness of your thoughts and words, making it easier to recognize the negative and self-doubting thought patterns holding you back.
- Affirmations define your focus. When you focus your energy on the things you want, like achieving your goals, the positive, uplifting, and good, you’re creating an abundance mindset and strengthening your resolve to make it happen.
- They open you up to possibility. Too often we get stuck in the ‘impossible’ mindset, but affirmations flip this on its head. When you begin to positively affirm what is actually possible, a whole world of opportunity opens up to you.

To get access to the I am Premium content and functionality, you can choose between a lifetime, monthly, and yearly auto-renewable subscription. This is a recurring transaction that will be charged to your iTunes Account at confirmation of purchase and will automatically renew unless you cancel it at least 24 hours before the end of your subscription. Renewals will be charged at the same cost within 24 hours prior to the end of the current period. You can manage your subscriptions and auto-renewal can be turned off by going to your iTunes Account Settings after purchase.


Find tons of inspiring content on our blog: https://blog.theiam.app/

Privacy Policy: https://monkeytaps.net/privacy
Terms of Use: https://monkeytaps.net/terms",Health & Fitness,Monkey Taps,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/i-am-daily-affirmations/id874656917?uo=4,4.84793,666231,healthcare
6451237931,Health Care-Healthy Life&Heart,"Try Health Care, your all-in-one app that brings a healthy lifestyle right to your fingertips. With this revolutionary app, you can measure your heart rate, track health data trends, and effortlessly share your health reports. Stay motivated to lead a healthy lifestyle and focus on fitness. Download now for a comprehensive approach to your well-being. Your wellness journey starts here!

Disclaimer:

• This app is explicitly NOT intended for medical use. Its purpose is solely for fitness and offers general health information.
• The app should not be relied upon for diagnosing, preventing, or treating any medical condition. It is not a substitute for medical tools or professional guidance.
• Please note that the app can only measure heart rate and does not have the ability to measure blood pressure or blood oxygen level.
• If you have any health concerns, particularly related to your heart, it is crucial to consult your doctor for appropriate advice and guidance.

Usage Guide:

• Steadily hold your phone and maintain a calm state.
• Completely cover the back camera with your finger.
• Stay still throughout the entire measurement process until it concludes.

What We Provide:

√ Instant Heart Rate Monitor - Measure your heart rate effortlessly with our app anytime, anywhere, providing valuable insights into your cardiovascular health.

√ Blood Pressure and Oxygen Trends Analyzer - Stay informed about your blood pressure and oxygen levels, and take proactive steps towards a healthier lifestyle.

√ Shareable Health Reports - Share comprehensive health reports effortlessly with healthcare professionals, enabling collaborative care and better health management.

√ Fitness Focus Buddy - Achieve healthy fitness goals by utilizing our app's personalized workout plans and expert guidance.

√ Guided Meditation Coach - Find tranquility and inner peace with a variety of guided meditation sessions, promoting mindfulness and stress reduction.

√ Valuable Health Tips and Articles - Discover valuable insights and expert advice on maintaining a healthy lifestyle for optimal well-being and vitality. Unlock the secrets to a healthier you.

√ MBTI Personality Test - Discover your unique personality traits and preferences with the MBTI test, enhancing self-awareness for personal and professional growth.

Subscribe Health Care to get your ultimate access to all features
Subscription Option: 
-Weekly
-Monthly
-Yearly
- Your payment will be charged to your iTunes Account as soon as you confirm the purchase.
- You can manage your subscriptions and turn off auto-renewal from your Account Settings after the purchase.
- Your subscription will renew automatically, unless you turn off auto-renew at least 24 hours before the end of the current period.

Our mission is to empower individuals to improve heart health, thrive and embrace a fulfilling life. With Health Care, you can monitor your heart health and overall well-being on a daily basis. Start your wellness journey today!

Terms of Service: https://www.brimatrixlimited.com/terms-of-service
Privacy Policy:https://www.brimatrixlimited.com/privacy-policy",Lifestyle,Brimatrix Apps Limited,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/health-care-healthy-life-heart/id6451237931?uo=4,4.52628,3901,healthcare
1261033071,Aetna Health,"Take charge of your health and benefits in one easy place
The Aetna Health app helps you stay on top of your health. All when and where it works best for you, 24/7.

Manage your benefits

With just a few taps, you can:
• Access your ID card and save to Apple Wallet
• Track spending and progress toward meeting your deductible
• Check on your Health Savings Account, Health Reimbursement Account and Flexible Spending Account
• View your plan summary and get coverage information
• See claims and Explanation of Benefits
Connect to care
Plus, it’s easy to:
• Find in-network doctors, facilities and other providers
• Search for MinuteClinic locations and services (inside select CVS Pharmacy and Target locations)
• Schedule MinuteClinic appointments
• Talk with a doctor anytime by phone or video, and more
Keep in mind
• The app is available to most Aetna members. And the features may vary, depending on your plan.

Languages Supported
• Spanish and English",Health & Fitness,Aetna Life Insurance Company,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/aetna-health/id1261033071?uo=4,4.66937,358719,healthcare
1471631164,Mood Balance:Self Care Tracker,"Tapping into your mood, identifying how you feel, and making positive lifestyle changes is the most effective way of learning to cope with daily stress. Mood Balance is the perfect mood tracker to help you achieve this as it allows you to define, record, and explore your various moods. By doing so, you'll discover a host of stats, activities, and games all professionally designed to benefit your mental health.

Mood Balance helps you achieve relaxation through querying your feelings, their causes, and the resultant negative moods you may be experiencing. It then presents a collection of stats and stress relief games to help you understand and manage each. See Mood Balance as an emotion tracker that speaks back, or a diary that listens to your thoughts and offers genuine solutions to help beat depression and anxiety.

To activate your mood tracker, start by simply selecting how you're feeling, ranging from any emotion that matches you. Next, define the reason for this mood and save it, detailing the date and time. Now, the tracking begins. This mood tracker instantly keeps a record and starts building your personalized relief journal to provide an accurate breakdown of your mental health. You can explore weekly mood ratings, discover how often your moods change, follow your top moods, and identify the activities that cause emotional shifts. 

Next, you can start exploring an extensive collection of relaxing games designed to challenge and soothe different negative emotions. Each unique game promotes instant and effective relief while remaining entirely accessible and customizable. As you play, you can explore easy to grasp mechanics as well as a wealth of additional features to fine-tune your relaxation.

Mood Balance is the mood tracker that works with you. It does so to promote anxiety relief while guiding you to understand and forge new, more healthy habits. Download Mood Balance, start building your relaxation calendar, and become the boss of your mental health today.

PREMIUM subscription

Subscribe to Premium to enjoy exclusive content without ads!
Unlimited access to our Premium features include:
- Personal insights unlocked
- All premium activities unlocked
- All relaxing games
- No ads

The app contains the following subscription options:

Weekly with a 3-day free trial at $4.99;
Quarterly at $ 19.99;
Yearly with a 1-month free trial at $ 39.99.


- Payment will be charged to iTunes Account at confirmation of purchase.
- Subscription automatically renews unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24-hours prior to the end of the current period.
- The account is charged for renewal within 24-hours before the end of the current period.
- Subscriptions may be managed by the user and auto-renewal may be turned off by going to the user’s Account Settings after purchase.
- The cost of renewal is equal to the value that “Apple’s App Store Matrix” determines as the equivalent of the subscription price in $USD.
- Any unused portion of a free trial period, if offered, will be forfeited when the user purchases a subscription to that publication.

Privacy Policy: https://gismart.com/privacy-policy/
Terms of Service: https://gismart.com/terms-of-services/",Health & Fitness,Gismart Ltd,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/mood-balance-self-care-tracker/id1471631164?uo=4,4.32171,12474,healthcare
1603599822,"Plant Identifier, Care: Planty","Do your plants die despite your best efforts? Want to be a better plant parent? Save your plants with Planty! Watch them grow healthy and strong.

Download Planty now and Try it for Free!

Have trouble taking care of your plants? Say goodbye to your plant care problems! Here's Planty!

Planty is a plant care guide & companion app that helps you identify plants around you, find the info, and set up care reminders for any plant. Try it now for free!

Planty was developed by consulting expert botanists and hundreds of plant parents from around the world. Everything your plant needs, we've put it in Planty. 

Impressive Technological Features of Planty: 

◉  SMART PLANT IDENTIFICATION SYSTEM

The advanced artificial intelligence system allows you to identify more than thousands of  Plants, Trees, and Leaves with high accuracy in a single snap!

◉ ADVANCED DISEASE & PEST DIAGNOSIS SYSTEM

With the advanced artificial intelligence system, you can efficiently and accurately diagnose the diseases in your plant and create appropriate care solutions.

◉ CUSTOMIZABLE WATERING REMINDERS

Planty will inform you about your plant's water needs and will help you to set up a watering reminder easily.

◉ THE MOST UPDATED PLANT INFORMATION

Plant information in your pocket! Never guess your plant's needs. Just look it up on Planty!

◉ VIRTUAL GARDEN & WISHLIST

Tracking your plant's progress has never been easier - just create your virtual garden on Planty! Want to capture every lovely plant you see? Our wishlist feature has got you covered.

◉ GLOBAL PLANT REVIEWS BY OTHER PLANT PARENTS

Wondering whether a plant is a high maintenance or easy to care for? Find out what plant parents around you have to say! 

◉ TOXICITY INFORMATION

Find out about the toxicity of plants around you and keep your furry buddies safe!

◉ DISEASE DIAGNOSIS & TROUBLESHOOTING

Save your dying plant with the Disease Diagnose feature. We'll tell you about your plant's problem as well as the cure too! (coming soon!)

◉ INTELLIGENT LIGHT SCAN FEATURE

According to NASA's research, the most critical need of your plant is LIGHT! Thanks to Planty's Intelligent Light Scan feature, you can find the best location for your plant. Use our app to measure the light falling on your plant and choose an area where it can thrive! 


---Try Planty for FREE and never kill another plant! ----

If you want to enjoy unlimited access to these features, you can purchase a premium package. 

Premium packages:

1. Weekly Package
 - 3 days trial
 - 6.99$ for a week

2. Monthly Package
 - No trial
 - 9.99$ for a month

3. Annual Package
 - No trial
 - 39.99$ for a year

https://theplanty.co/terms-of-service.html
https://theplanty.co/privacy-policy.html",Education,LUNAPARK MEDYA INTERNET TEKNOLOJILERI SANAYI VE TICARET ANONIM SIRKETI,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/plant-identifier-care-planty/id1603599822?uo=4,4.70245,35312,healthcare
656872607,Teladoc Health,"Teladoc Health connects you with complete care, at your convenience and an affordable cost. You’ll find what you need to get well—like 24/7 care—alongside primary care, therapy and programs proven to keep you well.

EXPERIENCE AND EXCELLENCE
Teladoc Health has been modernizing healthcare since 2002. More than 50 million visits later, we are the leader in telemedicine. With our app, top-quality doctors and data-driven programs are just a tap away.

SEAMLESS CARE FOR ALL OF YOU
Our app brings together doctors, therapists, dietitians, nurses, coaches and self-guided programs that tend to every aspect of your well-being. If you need in-person care, we can refer you to in-network providers and care sites. But don’t underestimate us.

With a suite of connected devices, in-home lab services and prescription delivery (in some locations), we cover most common health needs. And with insurance, your copay for care could be as low as $0.

PERSONAL AND PERSONALIZED
Teladoc Health providers and coaches will get to know you. Our video and phone visits allow you to discuss your health and planning next steps together.

The app integrates with our devices and Apple Health to put data in your hands. Analyze it during appointments with your care team, or on your own on the go. Then apply what you learn about your health and your habits to find the right path to your goals. We’ll send you notifications and nudges to keep you on the right track.

OUR SERVICES INCLUDE:

24/7 CARE
On-demand appointments any time of day with board-certified physicians for:
- Colds and flu
- Pink eye
- Sore throats
- Sinus infections
- Rashes

PRIMARY CARE
Access within a week to board-certified primary care physicians and nurses who become your dedicated virtual care team for:
- Routine checkups and preventive care
- Goal-setting and a personalized care plan
- Lab orders (bloodwork)
- Checking blood pressure and other vitals
- Managing chronic conditions

CONDITION MANAGEMENT
Depending on your coverage, you may be eligible for:
- Programs to help manage conditions like diabetes and high blood pressure
- Connected devices like a blood glucose meter or blood pressure monitor
- Expert health coaching
- Health data, trends and actionable insights


MENTAL HEALTH
Licensed therapists, psychiatrists and self-guided content for help with:
- Anxiety and stress
- Depression or not feeling yourself
- Relationship conflicts
- Trauma


NUTRITION
Registered dietitians who can help with:
- Weight loss
- Diabetes
- High blood pressure
- Digestive issues
- Food allergies

DERMATOLOGY
Dermatologists who diagnose and treat common skin conditions, such as:
- Acne
- Psoriasis
- Eczema
- Rosacea
- Skin infections

Your coverage might also provide virtual access to:
- Specialist for an expert second option on surgery, a diagnosis or treatment plan
- Therapy and coaching to help with back and joint pain
- Imaging and sexual health testing referrals


CHECK YOUR COVERAGE
Sign up to see which telemedicine services are covered by your health insurance or employer.

SECURE AND CONFIDENTIAL
Teladoc Health takes your privacy seriously. Your health information is protected by federal and state laws, including HIPAA. Please see our Notice of Privacy Practices for more information on how Teladoc Health uses your health information.

AWARDS AND RECOGNITION
- Company of the Year—Healthcare Dive, 2020
- World’s Most Innovative Companies—Fast Company, 2021
- Largest Virtual Care Company—Forbes, 2020",Medical,"Teladoc, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/teladoc-health/id656872607?uo=4,4.78299,642392,healthcare
1523450136,ITFusion Misr HealthCare,"Misr Healthcare network is a third party administration company responsible for managing different types of medical coverage plans through a comprehensive network of healthcare providers within reach all over Egypt.

MHN provides a reliable customer support 24/7 for 365 days through our dedicated Hotlines in addition to our Mobile application, contact E-mails, Website or directly through our premises located at the heart of Cairo downtown.

We are pleased to take care of Members Approval requests submitted online through our automated approvals system by one of our online providers or through approval request E-mail to be handled by our approvals team. Also MHN Concierge team will make sure that members take their medical service with the maximum convenience possible.",Medical,ITFusion,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/itfusion-misr-healthcare/id1523450136?uo=4,1.0,1,healthcare
1203637303,Fabulous: Daily Habit Tracker,"Welcome to the world of Fabulous. Unlock the power of habits and routines. Prioritize your mental health, build healthy habits and improve your life one step at a time. Fabulous started as a habit tracker, but it evolved into a self-improvement, coaching, and mental health platform. Our goal is to make healthy routines an inseparable part of your life. 

How does Fabulous work?
1 - Add structure to your life - Improve your life with a healthy morning routine that provides a system for your everyday life.
2 - Create healthy habits - Use a daily planner to remember important tasks. Your habits sculpt the person you will become — choose them wisely.
3 - Focus on deep work - Learn how to tune out all the noise and concentrate on the task. 
4 - Join a community - Live challenges will introduce you to other Fabulous members worldwide embarking on the same journey as you. Find motivation by connecting with hundreds of members all across the globe. 
5 - Learn how to be grateful - Keep your gratitude journal and listen to positive daily affirmations. 

Fabulous is an all-in-one routine & self-care app for everyday life:
– Listen to the daily coaching series.
– Write your to-do list.
– Journal your thoughts.
– Do short workouts and breathing exercises.
– Listen to daily affirmations and meditation sessions.
– Keep your gratitude journal.
– Monitor your mental wellbeing.
– Use the goal-tracker to monitor progress.
 
Upgrade your planner for exciting additional features that will take the habit tracking to a new level. Achieve your health and productivity goals today with science-proven features:
– Coaching series grouped by topics: anxiety, self-love, productivity, or depression.
– Unlimited habits for your morning and evening routines.
– New Premium Journeys for better mental health, self-care, and fitness.
– Personal one-on-one coaching for better motivation and focus.
 
Top 4 reasons to try the Fabulous app: 
1 - Need the motivation to build an indestructible morning routine?
2 - Have an irregular sleep cycle and want to learn how to get a good sleep?
3 - Want to increase your energy level, so you focus the entire day?
4 - Want to improve your mental health through mindfulness so you can cope with anxiety?

Scientifically proven, morning routines are essential to a successful life. No excuses! Start changing your life today and save money using behavioral science. Install Fabulous to get personalized daily habits and achieve your goals.

Pricing in different countries may vary, and actual charges may be converted to your local currency depending on the country of residence. You can always see the exact price in the app. The subscription will automatically renew unless turned off in your iTunes Account Settings at least 24 hours before the current period ends. When you feel the Premium plan is not what you need, you can cancel your subscription at any time. 

If you have any questions, visit our website at www.thefabulous.co and click ""Contact Us"" at the bottom.

 Build and track your habits, set goals, learn how to meditate, and build healthy routines. Your journey to self-improvement and better mental health starts today!

This day will come and go. That much is certain.
Making it count? Well, that's up to you!

-------

Read our full terms and conditions and our privacy policy at: https://www.thefabulous.co/terms.html",Health & Fitness,Fabulous,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/fabulous-daily-habit-tracker/id1203637303?uo=4,4.5091,82298,healthcare
1190987663,Air Quality & Pollen - AirCare,"AirCare - the award winning app to track air quality & pollen! Featured in Forbes, BBC, NASA, Google, and awarded by the United Nations!

What's included:
- AQI - Air Quality Index: Stay safe from air pollution in any country around the world
- Pollen Tracking and Forecasts: Avoid allergies by following 5 types of pollen in the US and Europe (Tree - Birch, Grass, Ragweed, Olive, Alder)
- UV Index Tracking and Forecasts: Don't get sunburn on the beach, know when to seek shade
- Fire Hotspots - Know where NASA satellites picked up wildfires on the ground
- Breezy AI Chat - Talk with out chatbot and ask it questions using our live data
- Breakdown of Air Pollutants: See details about PM10, PM2.5, NO2, CO, SO2, O3 in the air

PRO users also get access to:
- Home Screen Widgets
- Push Notifications on Level Changes
- Apple Watch Support
- No Ads
- Extended History & Forecasts
- Extended Access to Breezy AI Chat

Where do we get out data from:
AirCare uses a multitude of satellite, ground and weather stations to calculate the most accurate AQI for a location. Our sources include:
- Purple Air
- Environmental Protection Agency (EPA)
- Sensor Community (Luftdaten)
- 40+ other government, university and volunteer networks of sensors

Download AirCare now and find out why millions of people have already used the app to know what they breathe!

By using our app, you agree to the Terms of Use stated here: https://getaircare.com/projects/eula.html",Weather,"AirCare Data, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/air-quality-pollen-aircare/id1190987663?uo=4,4.7801,3097,healthcare
382952264,MyChart,"MyChart puts your health information in the palm of your hand and helps you conveniently manage care for yourself and your family members. With MyChart you can:
•	Communicate with your care team.
•	Review test results, medications, immunization history, and other health information.
•	Connect your account to Apple Health to pull health-related data from your personal devices right into MyChart.
•	View your After Visit Summary® for past visits and hospital stays, along with any clinical notes your provider has recorded and shared with you.
•	Schedule and manage appointments, including in-person visits and video visits.
•	Get price estimates for the cost of care.
•	View and pay your medical bills.
•	Securely share your medical record from anywhere with anyone who has Internet access.
•	Connect your accounts from other healthcare organizations so you can see all your health information in one place, even if you've been seen at multiple healthcare organizations.
•	Receive push notifications when new information is available in MyChart. You can check whether push notifications are enabled under the Account Settings within the app.
Select features are also available on Apple Watch. 

Note that what you can see and do within the MyChart app depends on which features your healthcare organization has enabled and whether they’re using the latest version of Epic software. If you have questions about what’s available, contact your healthcare organization.

To access MyChart, you must create an account with your healthcare organization. To sign up for an account, download the app and search for your healthcare organization or go to your healthcare organization’s MyChart website. After you’ve signed up, turn on Face ID, Touch ID, or a four-digit passcode to quickly log in without needing to use your MyChart username and password each time. Then, make sure you have push notifications enabled to receive updates on your device when new information is available in MyChart. 
  
For more information about MyChart’s features or to find a healthcare organization that offers MyChart, visit www.mychart.org.

Have feedback about the app? Email us at mychartsupport@epic.com.",Medical,Epic Systems Corporation,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/mychart/id382952264?uo=4,4.61416,488209,healthcare
922978966,Stanford Health Care MyHealth,"Accessing your personal health information has never been easier. The MyHealth mobile app from Stanford Health Care puts your personal information at your fingertips to make managing your health care simple, quick, and completely confidential. 

With the Stanford Health Care MyHealth app you can:

1.	Schedule your in-person appointments or video visits, and eCheck-in for appointments
2.	Communicate with your care team
3.	View test results and manage medications
4.	Inside our buildings, follow step by step directions to your appointment location
5.	Review and pay bills
6.	Get up to date health information during a stay at the hospital
7.	Share your vitals with your doctor via integration with the Health app.

and more…",Medical,Stanford Health Care,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/stanford-health-care-myhealth/id922978966?uo=4,3.84129,1487,healthcare
1070287228,ZoomCare,"Keeping up with your health shouldn’t be a chore. ZoomCare makes it easy to get the care you need, when and where you want it. With online scheduling, evening and weekend hours, and nearby clinics, ZoomCare makes getting exceptional care easy.

1. SEARCH available appointments at neighborhood clinics across the Pacific Northwest. Experience Urgent, Primary, Emergency, and Speciality Care with wait times a fraction of what you'll find at other clinics. Best part? Same-day visits are likely! 

2. SCHEDULE in a matter of seconds using our state-of-the-art scheduling system. Find the right provider at a location and time that's most convenient for you. We're committed to ensuring visits start on time, providing onsite labs, and making prescription pickups easy, so you can confidently take your next steps toward better health.

3. ACCESS your medical records and see your visit history, provider notes, and labs with easy-to-find links to our new patient portal, powered by Athenahealth. Have a question? This is the right place to talk to your care team. 

We're focused on a single goal: to deliver innovative, high-quality, and convenient healthcare. If you're looking for a better healthcare experience, ZoomCare is the answer.",Medical,"Zoom Care, PC",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/zoomcare/id1070287228?uo=4,4.73651,6194,healthcare
1537375704,Heart Rate: Pulse Monitor & BP,"Heart Rate Monitor:Instant Blood Pressure Testing, Blood Pressure App Free & Finger Blood Pressure App Free.

Pulse Point: Your smart heart health companion. Measure heart rate instantly, track pulse trends, and log blood pressure with ease. Whether you need a quick heart rate check or long-term heart monitor, our app provides reliable insights for a healthier life.

Heart Rate Monitor:Health Care is a famous, lightly app, which can help you examine your heart rate any time.
The normal resting heart rate for adults, is between 60 and 100 beats per minute (bpm)
My stress watch, equipped with an HRV tracker and AI stress monitor, helps me monitor my hrv health and provides real-time insights into my stress levels.
Track your heart rate with only your smartphone. Blood Pressure App Free.
Finger Blood Pressure App Free
Amazing Heart Rate Monitors for 2025

We offer:
【Test HeartRate anytime in your Daily life】
Introducing a comprehensive free health tracker that includes essential tools like the free heart rate pressure tracker and a blood oxygen app, all accessible through the Apple Health app at no cost. With My Pulse heart rate monitor, you can conveniently check your heart rate instantly. The Blood Pressure app - SmartBP offers a user-friendly interface for monitoring blood pressure levels effectively. Additionally, there's a free blood oxygen app available to help you track oxygen saturation levels. Whether you need to monitor your blood sugar level or check your heart rate now, these integrated tools provide a seamless way to manage and monitor your health wherever you go.

【Instant Blood Pressure Tracker】
This innovative tool allows you to track your blood pressure using just your camera and your finger. It’s especially convenient for those who are concerned about their blood pressure, providing an easily accessible way to stay informed about your cardiovascular health. Whether at home or on the go, this technology makes monitoring your blood pressure simple and easy.

【ASMR and Good Sleep Helper】
Find your inner peace with Relaxing Sounds
Soothing nature sounds and scenes to use during meditation, yoga or to help you sleep
A natural source that helps you to fall asleep and masks environmental noises of the night
Experiencing better sleep, lower stress, and less anxiety with our guided meditations
【Health Accompany】
Discover the convenience of monitoring your cardiovascular health with a range of innovative apps. Start with the free Pulse app, which provides instant access to your heart rate. Pair it with the free blood pressure monitoring app to track your blood pressure readings effortlessly. For a more comprehensive approach, the Blood Pressure: Health Monitor app offers detailed insights into your cardiovascular well-being. Upgrade to the Pro blood pressure monitor for advanced features and accurate heart rate monitoring with the Heart Rate Monitor.
Benefit from better sleep, reduced stress and anxiety with our guided meditations


Premium Subscription Service:
Full explanation of healthy testing
Unlock all Relaxing Voice
`Weekly Subscription:
`$3.99/Weekly, and 3 Days Free Trail.
`$3.99/Weekly
`Yearly Subscription:
`$49.99/Yearly, and 3 Days Free Trail.
`$49.99/Yearly
- Subscription automatically renews unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24-hours before the end of the current period
- Payment will be charged to iTunes Account at confirmation of purchase
- Subscriptions may be managed by the user and auto-renewal may be turned off by going to the user's Account Settings after purchase
- Any unused portion of a free trial period, if offered, will be forfeited when the user purchases a subscription to that publication, where applicable
`Our Terms of users:
https://sites.google.com/view/heartbeat-termsofuser/home
`Our Privacy Policy:
https://sites.google.com/view/heartbeat-privacypolicy/home
`Contact us:
bananapie233@gmail.com",Health & Fitness,"Imageview Technology Co., Limited",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/heart-rate-pulse-monitor-bp/id1537375704?uo=4,4.83584,2327,healthcare
1031312446,CareCredit Mobile,"Now there's a simple, convenient way to manage and use your CareCredit credit card. With the CareCredit Mobile App, you can access your digital card, pay your bill, find enrolled providers and retail locations that accept CareCredit, set alerts and pay bills from participating doctors and healthcare providers in the network. With a new, vibrant and simple design, the CareCredit Mobile app offers features such as:

Easy Set-Up and Login Access 
• Securely log into your CareCredit account with your username and password then enable Touch ID® or Face ID® (on supported devices) to make logging into the app even more convenient. If you’ve never accessed your account online; tap, “I’ve never logged in before” to get started. 
• Looking for help or information about the app? Simply tap the ""?"" icon at the top right of the login screen to access contact information, login assistance, and FAQs at any time. 

Secure Digital Card Access 
• Your CareCredit credit card is preloaded when you log in. Just access the Summary and swipe down to view your digital card.
• Your CareCredit digital card can be used for purchases within the network of enrolled providers.

Convenient Account Management 
• View your CareCredit statements and manage your statement delivery preferences 24/7.
• Make monthly payments to your CareCredit account.
• Always know where your account stands. Check your balance and credit limit anytime, anywhere.
• View your promotional purchase details, transaction & payment history.
• Make payments directly to your doctor or healthcare provider with CareCredit.

Find a Location
• Search for providers, partners, and retail locations that accept the CareCredit credit card.
• Save and quickly access your favorite locations.
• Use the map view to explore nearby CareCredit Network locations and get directions.

Stay Informed
• Set custom notifications to remind you about payments and changes to your account.
• Access to helpful information, cardholder resources, and tips for using credit wisely in the Knowledge Center.

Learn More: https://www.carecredit.com/app",Finance,Synchrony Financial,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/carecredit-mobile/id1031312446?uo=4,4.81511,44930,healthcare
1596403446,Me+ Lifestyle Routine,"“We are what we repeatedly do. Excellence, then, is not an act but a habit”, This quote from Aristotle goes to the heart of our philosophy. We believe establishing good daily habits and healthy routines are necessary to thrive. This is what we aim to achieve: to help our users develop good habits and daily routines, like following a morning exercise routine or tidying their rooms, and to consistently repeat those actions until they become habits integrated into their lifestyle. This will enable people to lead a wholesome and fulfilling life.

Of course, accessibility is important. This is why Me+ now provides a daily routine planner and self-care schedule to establish a healthy habit and help with your daily routine. By repeating good actions daily and following your planner and self-care schedule, you will gain a new outlook, confidence, and strength. Obstacles that seemed unsurpassable will soon be overcome and forgotten.

Enjoy and utilize our self-care systems:
· Daily Routine Planner and Habit Tracker
· Mood and Progress Tracker

The systems in our app make it easier to seize the day and begin self-development by planning your daily routines and habits.

Here are some great things you can do with the new daily routine features:
-Create your own daily and morning routines.
-Track your self-care plan, daily habits, mood, and progress daily.
-Set friendly reminders in your daily planner for your to-do list.
-Get comprehensive evidence-based self-care information on establishing habits and healthy routines.

Potential benefits of Me+:
-Boosts energy: Exercise, healthy eating, and sleep habits in your Me+ daily planner energize your body and provide motivation for self-care.
-Improves mood: relieve stress and increase happiness through your daily healthy habits and routines.
-Increases focus: Sleep habits and nutritious food improve your concentration, productivity, and motivation.

Build your own self-care schedule and daily routine planner with the icons and colors you choose! Record your daily goals, habits, mood, and more in your Me+ app to celebrate the success and growth of your healthy routines!

HOW TO START SELF-CARE:
-Use the professional Me+ planning template and daily habit tracker: Take the MBTI test to find the routine and habits that suit you best.
-Find a role model: Set a goal to become the person you aspire to be through developing habits and daily self-care routines

Tens of millions of self-care advocates choose Me+ to improve physical and mental health, promote weight loss, experience anti-aging benefits, and more through developing healthy daily habits and self-care routines. Fill your days with self-care habits and meet your best self! Don’t wait for tomorrow; start your healthy routines today!

Subscription Information:
Me+ offers an auto-renewing subscription at $39.99/year and $9.99/month to provide you with unlimited access to the VIP features. Your payment will be charged to your iTunes Account as soon as you confirm your purchase. You can manage your subscriptions and turn off auto-renewal from your Account Settings after the purchase. Your subscription will renew automatically unless you turn off auto-renew at least 24 hours before the end of the current period. The cost of renewal will be charged to your account in 24 hours prior to the end of the current period. When canceling a subscription, your subscription will stay active until the end of the period. Auto-renewal will be disabled, but the current subscription will not be refunded. Any unused portion of a free trial period, if offered, will be forfeited when purchasing a subscription.

For the End User License Agreement (EULA), please visit https://www.apple.com/legal/internet-services/itunes/dev/stdeula/

Terms of service: https://enerjoy.life/alarm-ios/TermsofService.html
Privacy policy: https://enerjoy.life/alarm-ios/PrivacyPolicy.html
Feedback email: meplus_ios@support.enerjoy.life",Health & Fitness,ENERJOY PTE. LTD.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/me-lifestyle-routine/id1596403446?uo=4,4.81412,211170,healthcare
1672585105,HealthBit-Lifestyle&Heart Care,"Protect Your Heart and Live Healthier

HealthBit is your all-in-one, convenient solution for monitoring your body and overall well-being. With HealthBit, tracking your vital signs has never been easier. The app allows you to monitor key health indicators such as pulse, blood sugar, blood pressure, oxygen levels, body temperature, and weight, while providing long-term trend analysis. You can also log your daily calorie intake and consult AI health advisors to enhance your overall health.

For more accurate insights, we recommend taking multiple readings throughout the day—especially upon waking, before bed, and after exercise. HealthBit makes this process simple and its accuracy has been validated through professional testing.

Key Features:
Track daily calorie intake
Monitor your pulse anytime during the day
Keep track of trends in heart rate and other vital signs
Log your blood sugar, blood pressure, oxygen level, weight and body temperature
Export personal health reports to share
Take heart risk assessments and MBTI personality tests
Meditate with guided sessions and get healthy eating advice

How to Use:
HealthBit is easy to use with just your phone. Place your finger on the back camera, remain still, and start measuring your pulse. Wait for the result once the process completes.

Important Information:
HealthBit is intended for fitness purposes only and is not a substitute for medical devices or advice. It provides general health insights but cannot be used for medical diagnosis or treatment. The app does not measure blood pressure, oxygen level, or body temperature. Extended use may cause the camera to overheat.

Subscribe for Full Access:
Subscription options: 1 week, 1 month, or 1 year
Payment is charged to your account upon confirmation of purchase
Subscriptions automatically renew unless auto-renew is turned off 24 hours before the current period ends
Manage your subscriptions and disable auto-renewal in your account settings after purchase

Privacy Policy: https://www.panadiamedia.com/terms-of-service 
Terms of Service: https://www.panadiamedia.com/privacy-policy",Lifestyle,Panadia Media Limited,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/healthbit-lifestyle-heart-care/id1672585105?uo=4,4.63906,7691,healthcare
1424178757,Plant Nanny Cute Water Tracker,"Essential to life, water is often under-consumed leading to dehydration, fatigue, skin problems, and other serious health issues. Address these problems with Plant Nanny, your cute and friendly hydration companion! This water reminder app motivates you to drink water daily and lets you grow adorable plants in parallel with your hydration journey.

-------------------------------------------
◈ Why Choose Plant Nanny? ◈
-------------------------------------------
With Plant Nanny, you and your water-loving digital plants thrive together! Drink water, hydrate your plant, and watch your personal greenhouse flourish. It's a fun, interactive way to ensure you maintain good hydration habits.

-------------------------------------
◈ Fresh and Engaging Features! ◈
------------------------------------
1. Grow your favorites: With plants available in 3 difficulty levels, witness your hydration habits bloom.
2. Comprehensive Hydration Tracking: Monthly comparisons of your water intake, track your progress effortlessly.
3. Easy Editing: Quickly update your water logs for accurate data.
4. Motivational Visuals: Track progress with charming charts and engage in mini-challenges.
5. Greenhouse Creatures: Marvel as your plants thrive amidst beautifully designed greenhouses and captivating creatures.

And, stay connected with our cute water reminder widget for a glance at your hydration habits and plant health! 

------------------------------------------------------
◈SPARKFUL Subscription: Better Living with Water◈
------------------------------------------------------
 Subscribers are 2.4x better at sticking with their goals! 
＊ Unlimited exclusive plants inspire you to take better care of yourself
＊ Gentle nudges tailored to your schedule and style
＊ Advanced water log for precise, effortless tracking
＊Ad-free, enjoyable drinking experience

◈ Intuitive Charts and User-friendly Interface
＊Graphics that progressively track your daily water intake
＊Track your water consumption history and view daily, weekly, and monthly trends quickly
＊Simple design and user-friendly interface, so you can easily build good habits

◈ Tailored Hydration Goals and Comprehensive Management 
Customize your water intake goals based on your personal health data and exercise habits. Enjoy automated reminders, rewards for consistency, and motivating missions.

◈ Delightful and Animated Plants to Liven Up Your Day! 
＊Each glass of water you drink also waters the plants so that you can grow and thrive together!
＊All kinds of special pots and containers. Develop your own cute plant family!
＊Unlock and collect a variety of different plants, and even interact with mysterious new creatures!

Plant Nanny syncs hydration data with Apple Health.

▼Any questions or suggestions?
For queries or suggestions, go to Plant Nanny > Menu > Settings > FAQ. Still didn't find what you're looking for? Contact our “Garden Assistant” (customer service) via the envelope icon on the top right.

▼Feel free to reach out to our support team with any suggestions
Find us on Instagram: https://link.sparkful.app/instagram
Privacy Policy and Terms of Service: https://sparkful.app/legal/privacy-policy

Stay hydrated and healthy, and let's grow with Plant Nanny!",Health & Fitness,SPARKFUL INC.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/plant-nanny-cute-water-tracker/id1424178757?uo=4,4.71936,100187,healthcare
445594701,Healthcare Bluebook,"Healthcare Bluebook helps consumers save money on healthcare by empowering them with simple, clear Fair Price information so they can find the best value. Prices among healthcare providers can vary by 5x to 10x depending on the facility used. Armed with Fair Price information, people can see those variances and become smart shoppers - potentially saving thousands of dollars on common procedures.
 
Healthcare Bluebook can be customized for employers to include more detailed provider pricing and quality information. Ask your human resources department if they are working with Healthcare Bluebook to offer a customized version for your company.",Health & Fitness,"CareOperative, LLC",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/healthcare-bluebook/id445594701?uo=4,2.36364,22,healthcare
1492017640,Tappy: Self Care Fidgeter,"Welcome to Tappy, where wellness meets fun!

Tappy is a feature-packed self-care fidgeting app designed to help you reduce stress and anxiety in a fun and satisfying way! As you tap or slide, you will enjoy incredible haptic responses and sound effects. And there is also so much more to Tappy! Check out the entire app to discover ways to be mindful, improve mental health, reduce stress, and ease anxiety. You'll find great fidget games and tools (like a Fidget Spinner!) that give satisfying haptic feedback responses, as well as guided meditations, soundscapes, breathing exercises, mood tracking, journaling, and habit tracking! Tappy aims to be your one-stop self-care fidget app for relaxing, focusing, and just having some fun!

Tappy (Health Bar and Actions):
• Tap on Tappy to boost your count!
• Tap the Actions button to show a list of Actions you can do with Tappy such as Sleep, Send Love, Celebrate, and Start the Focus Timer!
• Tappy energy bar at the top of the Tap tab: Throughout the day this health bar with lower, keep Tappy nice and energized by tapping on him to increase his energy!
• Change the haptic feedback type by tapping the customizer.
• In the customizer there are multiple locked features. Press these locks to see how many taps you need to unlock it! 
• Time yourself with the 30 second countdown timer! See how many times you can tap in 30 seconds. Your score will be recorded in Game Center if you are logged in so you can compare your score with people around the world.

Fidget:
• Fidget with a whole bunch of satisfying haptic fidgeting activities and tools!
• Provides sensory stimulation, helping you stay focused and relaxed.
• Turn on sound (and turn off vibrate) to hear the sound effects!

Arcade:
• The Arcade is a place to play some fun quick games with haptic vibrations that will be either multiplayer or single-player.
• New games will be added in the future.
• Grab your friend, warm up your fingers, and get ready to tap! Click the yellow question mark on any game to see the instructions on how to play.

Journal + Mood Tracking:
• Plus members will be able to track their mood and journal about it!
• You can view your mood entries in the ""Insights"" section of the Mood Tracker widget.
• Lock your journal entries with your device's Face or Touch ID!

Habit Tracking:
• Create New Habits to track easily, just choose a habit you want to develop, like reading or exercising.

Leaderboards:
• Tap the yellow circle (with the Game Center icon) under Tappy's face to view your current rank that is based off your Tappy Count!
• You can also view your fastest bubble popping times!

Meditations, Feelscapes, and Breathing Exercises:
• Guided meditations!
• Breathe with the haptic breathing guide.
• Relax, focus, and calm down with powerful repeating haptic vibration Feelscape patterns, some are with sounds or music so be sure to plug in some headphones! More Feelscape patterns coming in the future!
• Each vibrating pattern can be set up with a timer!
• Designed to help you focus, relax, and support mindfulness!
• iPhone 8 or newer is required for a full Feelscape haptic audio experience.

Apple Watch App:
• Perfect for moments when you need a quick fidget.

More:
• Haptics: Enjoy the super satisfying haptic activities throughout the Tappy app!
• Theme Color: Go to the Tappy settings, then under the Theme Color section tap the color wheel to select and change the color theme of the Tappy app!

Once you unlock any new feature you'll get an alert.

More features coming soon so get tapping!

Website:
• https://www.pacific.dev

By using Tappy you agree to the Terms and Conditions at https://www.pacific.dev/terms
and have read our Privacy Policy at https://www.pacific.dev/privacy

Disclaimers: 
• Requires iPhone with a Taptic Engine for the full haptic experience.
• Tappy may not be safe for some people with Epilepsy. Some lighting or colors used in Tappy may be disruptive to people who are sensitive to light.",Games,Cameron Nazemi,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/tappy-self-care-fidgeter/id1492017640?uo=4,4.81891,16831,healthcare
983826477,Productive - Habit Tracker,"Meet Productive - the app that helps you build positive life-changing habits. With Productive, you can set personal goals, track your progress, and focus on what makes you healthier, happier and more productive!

FEATURES

HABIT MANAGEMENT
Create, complete, stop, or pause habits whenever it is convenient for you. Add notes to your habits to highlight the main points during the day.

PROGRAMS
Сhoose your goal, receive daily habit tips, reflection check-ins, and motivation prompts to get the boost you need.

CHALLENGES
Improve your daily routine by completing guided tasks and competing with other users from all over the world.

ARTICLES
Grow awareness of your own productivity and motivation with personalized expert insights.

CUSTOMIZATION
Customize the app the way you want! You can name your habit, choose a unique icon, and even pick its color.

STATISTICS
Track your habits and analyze progress by building motivating chains of completed habits and perfect days. The longer your chain of completed habits, the more likely you will keep the streak going.

NOTIFICATIONS
Set up smart reminders, and personalize the app to get notifications of what's scheduled for each part of the day.

ADHD ASSISTANCE
Manage distractions and deal with ADHD by concentrating on a focused daily routine.

PREMIUM FEATURES
- Unlimited number of habits
- Endless motivation with various challenges
- Full-text articles to draw inspiration 
- Improved reminders for individual habits
- Location-based reminders
- Motivating stats for each habit
- Habit trends with week-by-week data

SUBSCRIPTION INFORMATION
Subscription payments will be charged to your App Store account at confirmation of your purchase. Subscriptions will automatically renew and you will be charged unless auto-renew is turned off or unless you cancel at least 24 hours prior to the end of the current subscription or trial period. Any unused portion of a free trial period will be forfeited when you purchase a premium subscription during the free trial period. The cost of renewal depends on the Subscription Plan you choose. 
Subscriptions and auto-renewal may be managed by going to Account Settings after purchase or by contacting Customer Support.

If you have any questions or suggestions on how we can improve the application, please do not hesitate to contact us at productive@bendingspoons.com

Privacy Policy: http://www.apalon.com/privacy_policy.html
EULA: http://www.apalon.com/terms_of_use.html
AdChoices: http://www.apalon.com/privacy_policy.html#4
California Privacy Notice: https://apalon.com/privacy_policy.html#h",Productivity,Mosaic S.r.l.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/productive-habit-tracker/id983826477?uo=4,4.59783,91123,healthcare
466079030,HealthTap Primary Care Doctors,"HealthTap is a telehealth app where you choose & keep one primary care doctor you love to get ongoing care — affordably with or without great insurance or benefits!

Get personalized, quality medical advice without an expensive and inconvenient trip to a doctor’s office. Meet with your favorite new doctor regularly for health checkups, prescriptions, lab tests & results, treatment plans and referrals to specialists. Our amazing doctors seek to build long-term, trusted relationships with their patients to take care of Americans' ongoing health needs.

Our top U.S. board-certified doctors are available for virtual visits 7 days per week in all 50 U.S. states.

~~~ SUBSCRIPTION BENEFITS ~~~

Subscribe for $15/month* (billed twelve months at a time) to save hundreds of dollars & countless hours each year with:

• Same day or week video appointments with your doctor — $44/visit or less**
• Free texting with your doctor for follow-ups and clarifications
• Speak with the first available doctor during nights, weekends, holidays, or while traveling out of state for urgent care — $59/visit or less**
• Get prescriptions, lab tests ordered, referrals to specialists, and even doctor’s notes for school or work
• Save up to 75% on prescriptions with coupons for local pharmacies
• Set up profiles for your children at no additional cost

We accept hundreds of insurance plans and even HSA/FSA cards.

* Subscription may be covered by select insurance plans
** Insurance coverage may reduce your out-of-pocket cost

~~~ AVAILABLE WITHOUT SUBSCRIPTION ~~~

$129 Urgent Care Video Visits — talk with the first available doctor within minutes (7 days per week) over video or text for advice, prescriptions, test orders, and referrals. Just $129 per visit (retail price) or your insurance copay.

FREE Educational Doctor Answers — Get educational text answers to your health questions from a network of over 90,000 U.S. doctors across 147 specialties volunteering their time to help millions like you for FREE! Search millions of answers or post your own and get responses from real doctors within hours.

~~~ WHAT WE TREAT ~~~

We can help with a broad range of medical issues, including the following examples:

MANAGING YOUR CONDITION
High blood pressure, diabetes, asthma, allergies, high cholesterol, arthritis, thyroid disorders

WOMEN’S HEALTH
UTI, birth control, menopause, period problems, yeast infections, skin and hair care

CHILDREN’S HEALTH (ages 2+)
Cold & flu symptoms, diarrhea or constipation, skin rashes, allergies

MEN’S HEALTH
STI symptoms, erection issues, bladder or bowel issues, skin and hair care

SENIOR HEALTH (ages 65+)
Muscle or joint pain, medication management, preventive health screenings

WELLNESS & PREVENTION
Weight counseling, skin and hair care, supplements, health screenings, stress reduction

SEXUAL HEALTH
STI prevention or testing, erectile dysfunction, birth control counseling

MENTAL & BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
Anxiety, depression, sleep issues, school or work stress, alcohol abuse, smoking cessation

…and much more!

~~~ SEE WHAT MEMBERS ARE SAYING ~~~

“Great prices, very friendly doctor, very convenient, and I was able to get a same or next-day appointment and prescriptions that I needed.” – Joe C

“Super quick and efficient. Doctor was very personable and made me feel comfortable through the telehealth visit. She explained everything and made sure I understood.”  – Katlyn A

“When I moved I lost my medical insurance.  I found HealthTap and it was a lifesaver.  I have told many people about it.” – Steven B

“My doctor is extremely accommodating. She has multiple appointment times open throughout the weekend. She is never in a hurry and very thorough. HealthTap is a wonderful service!” – Diana C

~~~

100% SECURE & CONFIDENTIAL:
We take your privacy very seriously. Your visit with the doctor is confidential and HIPAA compliant.

QUESTIONS?
You’re always welcome to contact us at support@healthtap.com for responsive and helpful support.",Medical,HealthTap,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/healthtap-primary-care-doctors/id466079030?uo=4,4.68939,4475,healthcare
6444341206,DailyCare - Heart Rate Monitor,"The key to keeping overall good health is having a healthy heart.

With DailyCare you can measure your heart rate anywhere with iPhone, track your health, and export your PDF Report.

DailyCare provides soothing ambient and nature sounds to help you relax and unwind from your stressful day. The app is the ideal companion for your everyday rituals like meditation, yoga, and bedtime.

Disclaimer
DailyCare is NOT intended for medical use. It is only used for fitness purposes and is a source of general health information. Consult your primary care physician if you need any help.

FEATURES:
- Heart Rate Measurement: Instantly read your heartbeat by placing your finger on your smartphone's camera within different states.
- HRV: Track your body's health status including Stress, Energy, Tension, and more.
- Measurement History: Display the measured result information and heart analyzer in graph form.
- Health Insights: Learn more about health knowledge and insights into well-being.
- Log Blood Pressure & Temperature: Manually Log your blood pressure and temperature data and analyze trends using DailyCare.
- Guided Meditation: A wide range of meditation sounds chosen carefully are provided to help you release stress, ease anxiety and fall asleep easily.
- Healthy Diet: Eating is important in our daily life. In DailyCare, you are free to taste the varied weekly nutritious recipes we prepare for you. 
- Self-assessment Tests: Get to know yourself better and find out who you really are. Give a better understanding of your mental health with mental health self-tests.

How to Check Your Pulse:
- First, hold your phone and keep it still.
- Stay calm and take a breath when taking your heart rate.
- To measure an accurate heart rate, put your index finger's tip on the phone's back camera lightly.

SUBSCRIPTION NOTES:
- We provide the week, month, and year subscription.
- You can subscribe for unlimited access to all app’s features.
- Subscription automatically renews unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24 hours before the end of the current period.
- Subscriptions may be managed by the user and auto-renewal may be turned off by going to the user's Account Settings after purchase.
- Any unused portion of a free trial period, if offered, will be forfeited when the user purchases a subscription to that publication, where applicable.

For more information, please check our terms and privacy policy:
Terms of Service: https://www.metaveoslimited.com/terms-of-service
Privacy Policy: https://www.metaveoslimited.com/privacy-policy",Health & Fitness,Metaveos Limited,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/dailycare-heart-rate-monitor/id6444341206?uo=4,4.28585,1025,healthcare
920161006,Breethe: Sleep & Meditation,"Rather than making meditation and wellness more items on your to-do list, Breethe makes it easily fit into your everyday life — and we try to do it with a sense of humor. We want to be the best ‘peace’ of your day ;).
 
WHAT YOU’LL GET:

Our ever-growing library (over 1700 tracks!) of down-to-earth and effective content includes:

¥ ‍An A to Z of Ways to Zzz: 

Breethe gives you the most ways to tune out, wind down, and drop off, including meditations, hypnotherapy (we are the only ones who have this!), tapping, sleep stories, bedtime visualizations, music, and sounds.

¥ ‍Self-Care on Your Schedule: 

The app is organized to easily fit into your busy day with intuitive sections  including Start Your Day, Take a Break, and Go to Sleep. We’re there for you with tons of easy and short (under 5 minutes!) tracks, whether you’re having an afternoon slump or a bout of late night worries.

¥ ‍Real Help for Your Life: 

The “My Life Kit” was designed to get to know you through a series of easy, naturally progressing questions and create a toolkit personalized for your specific needs.

¥ Insanely Relatable & Specific Meditations:

Examples of our meditation include “My Boss is a Jerk”, “My Family Drives Me Nuts”, and “Tax Season—Adulting Is Hard.”

¥ Music for Every Mood: 

DJ your day or ease into sleep with playlists you create.

¥ ‍From Zero to Zen: 

Our 7-Day, 30-Day, and 90-Day learn to meditate programs introduce you to daily meditations that are easy-to-follow and soothing — most new meditators quickly find themselves hooked on the habit.

¥. World Renowned Experts, Here for You.

Talks, series, and masterclasses from qualified professionals (including NY Times bestselling authors) to create the most effective and supportive experience.

BREETHE IN THE NEWS:

""Life-changing and so simple even my 7–year-old daughter uses it! ...Highly Recommend. "" —  INSTYLE MAGAZINE

""Super-easy guided meditations that even the most spirituality-averse person can get into.""  —  PEOPLE MAGAZINE

""For those busiest amongst us, this is a great app for you.""   —  HARPER’S BAZAAR

""There are plenty of meditation apps out there, but this is one of our favorites.""   —  GOOP

""Without a doubt the best and most comprehensive meditation app available in the App Store."" —  APPPICKER.COM

"" A well thought-out app, fun but serious, playful and helpful.. and very appealing."" —  MINDFUL.ORG

Selected Best New App by Apple in 95 countries.

ADDITIONAL FEATURES:

¥ Mindfulness program for kids and teens

¥ Great practical tools such as setting morning alarms, saving favorites, creating reminders, and adjusting background music volume levels

¥ Available on your phone, tablet or computer. Your progress is synced across all devices

¥ Use the Free version as long as you want or unlock all content with a Premium Membership!

¥ Adds Mindful Minutes to your Apple Health app thanks to an integration with the Apple Health kit

Monthly membership autorenews for USD $14.99 per month
Yearly plan membership autorenews for USD $89.99 per year
Lifetime membership . one time payment of USD $179.99.
Prices in USD may vary due to exchange rates.

This app provides general wellness support and does not replace professional medical advice. Always seek a doctor’s advice before making medical decisions.

NEED HELP ?
Contact us at support@breethe.com.

For more info, consult
https://breethe.com/more/terms-and-conditions/
https://breethe.com/more/privacy-policy
Copyright © 2015 OMG. I Can Meditate! Inc.",Health & Fitness,OMG. I Can Meditate! Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/breethe-sleep-meditation/id920161006?uo=4,4.73066,64106,healthcare
1312926037,journal & mental health－stoic.,"stoic is your mental health companion – it helps you understand your emotions and provides insights on how to be happier, more productive, and overcome obstacles.

At its heart, stoic helps you prepare for your day in the morning and reflect on your day in the evening. In the process, we also guide you to journal with thought-provoking prompts, build better habits, track your moods, and more.

** ‘Featured App of the Day’ - Apple **

* Join over 3 million stoics bettering their lives *

“I have never used a journal app that has impacted my life so much. It's my best friend.” –  Michael

MORNING PREPARATION & EVENING REFLECTION:

• Start the perfect day with our personalized daily planner. Prepare your notes and to-do list so nothing can surprise you during the day.
• Track your mood throughout the day and do bite-sized mental health exercises if you need them.
• Reflect on your actions with our habit tracker in the evening to grow as a human and get better every day.

GUIDED JOURNALS:

Whether you're a journaling pro or new to the practice, stoic offers a welcoming space with guided journals, suggestions, and prompts to inspire reflection and cultivate the habit. If writing is not your cup of tea, you can also journal with voice notes and pictures/videos of your day.

Choose from topics in productivity, happiness, gratitude, stress & anxiety, relationships, therapy, self-discovery, and much more. Stoic also has templates to help you with a variety of situations like preparing for a therapy session, CBT-based thought dumps, dream & nightmare journal, etc.

Journaling is a therapeutic tool for clearing the mind, expressing thoughts, setting goals, practicing gratitude, emotional wellbeing, and promoting self-reflection.


MENTAL HEALTH TOOLS:

stoic provides you with the tools you need to feel better, reduce stress & anxiety, manage ADHD, be mindful and more.

• Meditation – unguided or guided sessions to help you meditate with background sounds and timed chimes.
• Breathing – science-backed exercises to help you relax, focus, feel calm, sleep better and more.
• Stoic Shield - block distracting apps and reduce screen time.
• Sleep Better - journal your dreams, nightmares, and overcome insomnia with lessons by Huberman and Sleep Foundation.
• Quotes & Affirmations – read up on stoic philosophy and better your mood.
• Therapy Notes – prepare for your therapy sessions, track your progress, and reflect on them.
• Daily Prompts - thought-provoking prompts to help you journal better.

AND SO MUCH MORE:

• Privacy – protect your journal with a passcode, TouchID, or FaceID.
• Streaks & Badges – stay motivated on your journey with our habit tracker.
• Journey – reflect on your history, search based on prompts, see how your responses changed over time and see your growth.
• Trends – visualize metrics that matter to you including mood, emotions, sleep, health, writing, and more.
• Export – share your journal diary with your therapist.
• iCloud Sync – seamlessly sync your journal across your iPhone, Mac, iPad and Apple Watch and safely backup stoic on your personal iCloud storage.
• Siri Shortcuts – start a journal by simply asking Siri.
• Health App Integration – track your mindful minutes, sleep and more in Trends.

We’re constantly adding more mental health tools to help you overcome more obstacles and situations. You can also join our supportive community on Discord and leave your suggestions in our feedback board.

STOIC PREMIUM:

• Enjoy unlimited access to premium features on a subscription basis.
• Your payment will be charged to your iTunes account upon confirmation of purchase. Your account will be charged for renewal within 24 hours prior to the end of the current period.
• You can easily manage your subscription and turn off auto-renewal in Apple's settings.
• Read our Terms & Conditions at https://getstoic.com/terms-and-conditions

If you choose not to purchase stoic Premium, you can still journal with stoic for free.",Health & Fitness,Stoic app inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/journal-mental-health-stoic/id1312926037?uo=4,4.83523,30965,healthcare
1241229134,Reflectly - Journal & AI Diary,"Reflectly is the #1 journaling app that’s like your best friend. Vent your thoughts & feelings to improve your mood and practice mindfulness. Write down how you feel each day in your own mood diary. It’s the world’s first intelligent journal app & mood tracker that gives you personalized motivation and prompts the more you use it.
 
THE BEST JOURNAL APP FOR SELF-CARE AND MINDFULNESS
 
How you’re feeling on a daily basis matters. Reflectly is a personal journal driven by AI to help you deal with negative thoughts and increase positivity.
 
Be prepared for stress relief, reducing anxiety & depression in your life. Your self-care and mental health should always be a priority.
 
Reflectly uses positive psychology, mindfulness, and cognitive behavioral therapy (cbt) to help you thrive. It gives you the tools and mindset to build a positive cycle with our habit tracker. Fancy a bit of self-dating? Reflectly supports your self-love journey.
 
Never journaled before? No need to worry, our intelligent journal system gives you personalized prompts and reminders. If you want to build a health-focused lifestyle, increase motivation & gratitude, practice mindfulness, or combat anxiety, our personalized questions encourage deeper reflection. 
 
RECOMMENDED BY PROFESSIONALS
 
Journaling is a respected method to improve your mood, productivity, and mental health. Psychologists, therapists, and industry experts reaffirm this. It’s time to invest in your self-care routine.
 
HOW REFLECTLY WORKS
 
• Write down how you feel each day. Morning daily motivation quotes & challenges, evening daily insights, and whenever you need to vent.
• Using AI & smart tech, Reflectly’s mood tracker helps by showing you mood correlations and graphs. Been stressed for the last 10 days and can’t pin-point why? Reflectly has answers.
• We ask personalized questions based on your diary entries so you can reflect deeper.
• Read or edit previous journal entries.
• Receive daily, weekly, and monthly overviews with personalized insights and reminders.
 
REVIEWS
 
- ""It’s a really amazing app. It’s the one app I go to write about my feelings and how my day was :) I really recommend this app to ANYONE.""
- ""I love that this app lets me keep all my entries to read later. I also love that it gives some direction for people like me who want to journal but don’t know where to start.""
 
SAY HI TO US
 
We'd love to hear about your Reflectly experience: Reach out to us if you have any feedback or questions:
 
• Facebook - https://facebook.com/reflectlyio/
• Instagram - @reflectlyapp
• Twitter - @reflectlyapp
• E-mail - hello@reflectly.app :)
 
REFLECTLY PREMIUM
 
Unlock Reflectly and become your own hero.
 
• Create unlimited stories in your personal planner
• Get a new question and reminder each day to help you reflect
• Unlock advanced statistics, actionable insights, and much more!
 
Reflectly offers auto-renewing subscriptions:
 
• $9.99 billed monthly
• $59.99 billed annually
 
After free trial, the total amount for the subscription will be charged to your iTunes Account. The subscription automatically renews unless it is canceled at least 24 hours before the end of the current period. Your account will be charged for renewal at the total subscription price within 24 hours prior to the end of the current period. Subscriptions and auto-renewals may be managed or canceled via your iTunes Account settings. Any unused portion of free trial is forfeited after purchase. Special introductory offers only apply to first billing term.
 
These prices are in US Dollars (USD). Pricing in other currencies and countries may vary and actual charges may be converted to your local currency depending on the country of residence.
 
Read more about our Terms of Service and Privacy Policy here:
 
• https://growthbundle.com/terms-of-service/
• https://growthbundle.com/privacy-policy/",Health & Fitness,Reflective Technologies ApS,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/reflectly-journal-ai-diary/id1241229134?uo=4,4.56716,81705,healthcare
1325992472,FreeStyle LibreLink - US,"The FreeStyle LibreLink app allows you to monitor your glucose with your phone. [1] Check your glucose by holding your phone near your FreeStyle Libre Sensor. The App is compatible with both 10-day and 14-day Sensors.

You can use the App to:

* Check your glucose with a painless scan, instead of a routine fingerstick [1]
* View your current glucose reading, trend arrow, and glucose history
* Add notes to track your food, insulin use, and exercise
* See glucose reports, including your Ambulatory Glucose Profile
* Connect to healthcare professionals with LibreView [2]

◆◆◆◆◆◆

SMARTPHONE COMPATIBILITY
Compatibility may vary between phones and operating systems. Learn more about compatible phones at http://FreeStyleLibre.us

◆◆◆◆◆◆

USING YOUR APP AND READER WITH THE SAME SENSOR
If you would like to use both the FreeStyle Libre Reader and the App with the same Sensor, you need to start the Sensor with the Reader first and then scan with your phone. Note that FreeStyle LibreLink and Readers do not share data with each other. For complete information on a device, scan your Sensor every 8 hours with that device; otherwise, your reports will not include all your data. You can upload and view data from all of your devices on LibreView.com. 

APP INFORMATION
FreeStyle LibreLink is intended for measuring glucose levels in people with diabetes when used with a Sensor. For more information on how to use FreeStyle LibreLink, refer to the User’s Manual, which can be accessed through the app. If you require a printed User’s Manual, contact Abbott Diabetes Care Customer Support.

Learn more about FreeStyle LibreLink at http://FreeStyleLibre.us

[1] If you are using the FreeStyle LibreLink app, you must also have access to a blood glucose monitoring system as the App does not provide one. Fingersticks are required for treatment decisions when you see the Check Blood Glucose symbol, when symptoms do not match system readings, when you suspect readings may be inaccurate, or when you experience symptoms that may be due to high or low blood glucose. 

[2] Use of FreeStyle LibreLink requires registration with LibreView.
 
The circular shape of the sensor housing, FreeStyle, Libre, and related brand marks are marks of Abbott. Other trademarks are the property of their respective owners. 

For additional legal notices and terms of use, go to http://FreeStyleLibre.us.

Before using the App, review product labeling and the interactive tutorial at https://www.freestyle.abbott/us-en/support/overview.html#app",Medical,Abbott Diabetes Care Inc,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/freestyle-librelink-us/id1325992472?uo=4,2.86127,3251,healthcare
1468882685,Tangerine: Self-care & Goals,"** Developer Spotlight - Apple (2021) **
** App of the day - Apple (2020) **
** Best of the month - Apple (March, 2020) **
** New apps we love - Apple (2020) **
** Apps for Self-Care - Apple (2020) **

Tangerine is your guide to daily self-care. Form habits, track your mood and journal. All in one app. 

** TAKE GOOD CARE OF YOURSELF ** 

Start putting you first — physically, mentally and emotionally. Improve your overall wellbeing and be happier through better self-esteem and less stress.

** FORM HABITS THAT LAST ** 

Forming lasting habits can be hard, but we're here to help. As part of your self-care journey, Tangerine allows you to create and track habits while reminding you to do them and celebrating your achievements. 

** TRACK YOUR MOOD ** 

Mood tracking is a technique in positive psychology that includes the tracking, recording, and analysis of a person’s mood. With that in mind, Tangerine not only helps you reflect on your days, but also realise what activities in your life make you happy or sad. 

** JOURNAL, REFLECT AND LOOK BACK ** 

Journaling has become a hallmark of the self-care movement. It helps you prioritize and clarify thinking, but most importantly it gives you a boost in mindfulness, memory and communication skills. In addition to tracking your daily mood, on Tangerine you can write down your thoughts as they pop-up or leverage one of our guided journaling templates. 

** MEASURE YOUR PROGRESS WITH THE POWER OF DATA ** 

Get insights & stats on your routine and on how much you've evolved with elegant and comprehensive reports.

Tangerine integrates with the Health app in order to automatically complete health related habits.

** DON'T BE SHY, SAY HI **

Do you have any questions or suggestions on how we can make Tangerine even better for you? Get in touch at hi@bitdreams.co.

** TANGERINE PREMIUM **

Subscribe to unlock all features and be the boss of your life.

• Unlimited habits.
• Unlimited reminders per habits.
• Insights & Stats.
• Add photos to your notes & journal.
• Access to all guided journaling templates.

Tangerine offers auto-renewing subscriptions, including a 7-day free trial on the yearly plan:

• $2.49/month, billed yearly as one payment of $29.99.
• $4.99/month.

After the free trial, the total amount for the subscription will be charged to your iTunes Account. The subscription automatically renews unless it is canceled at least 24 hours before the end of the current period. Your account will be charged for renewal at the total subscription price within 24 hours prior to the end of the current period. Subscriptions and auto-renewals may be managed or canceled via your iTunes Account Settings.

These prices are in US Dollars (USD). Pricing in other currencies and countries may vary and actual charges may be converted to your local currency depending on the country of residence.

Terms of Use: https://tangerine.app/terms-of-use
Privacy Policy: https://tangerine.app/privacy-policy",Health & Fitness,Bitdreams OU,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/tangerine-self-care-goals/id1468882685?uo=4,4.71129,6564,healthcare
1324094530,Prescription Scanner,"Staying home and need your glasses prescription? 
Scan it off your current glasses with our FREE app.
 
With our Prescription Scanner App, it’s easy & fast to scan the prescription details off your current eyeglasses from the comfort of home and immediately start shopping for a new pair online. 
 
Key Benefits:
* Get prescription details without leaving the house
* Scan takes under 5 minutes!
* FREE
* Accurate
* FDA-Listed
* All you need is a smartphone, a computer and any standard-sized magnetic card
* Complete scan & receive a discount coupon for your first pair at GlassesUSA.com


How it works:
>Download the app and scan your current glasses using only a smartphone, a computer screen and magnetic card.
>Get the prescription details of your current glasses through a quick, simple process with audio & video tutorials to guide you every step of the way.
• Continue to purchase new glasses online with an exclusive discount at GlassesUSA.com.
 

About us:
GlassesUSA.com is the #1 online retailer for prescription eyewear in the US, with a pair of glasses sold every minute! We’re proud of changing the way people buy glasses and making them affordable for everyone.

Discover 7000+ styles and a huge selection of brands including Ray-Ban, Oakley, Versace, Gucci and more. Find eyewear for every need including kids’ glasses, sports glasses, protective eyewear, progressives, blue light protection and contact lenses. Try on any frame from home with our Virtual Mirror to see how they look on you. Enjoy free shipping on all orders right to your door, free returns and a 100% money-back guarantee.


Who can use the Prescription Scanner?
• Healthy individuals, 18 or older
• People with see well their current prescription
• Single vision prescription between -6.00 and +3.00
• Cylinder measurement lower than -2.50

Note: Please read our full Terms of Use. It includes, amongst other information, a detailed list of conditions and illnesses that are not eligible for accurate results.


Distributed by GlassesUSA.com.
Manufactured by 6over6 Vision Ltd. 
For more details go to https://6over6.com/",Medical,Optimax Investments Ltd,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/prescription-scanner/id1324094530?uo=4,4.74281,15553,prescription
578505616,Musely,"Musely provides skincare medical treatments through technology. Musely enables the best dermatologists and pharmacists to deliver and administer medical treatments online for both skin conditions and skincare using the most effective medication and therapeutic procedures. With its revolutionary approach, Musely enables the science of youth quickly and affordably online at the convenience of your home.
 
Founded by successful Silicon Valley serial entrepreneurs, Musely is on a mission to deliver health and healthy living to every consumer in the world.",Shopping,Trusper Inc,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/musely/id578505616?uo=4,4.738,7126,prescription
1040093707,iScanner: PDF Document Scanner,"Looking for an advanced and reliable document scanner to scan anywhere, anytime?

iScanner is a #1 US-based scanning and document management tool that makes it easy to scan PRO documents on the go. iScanner allows you to work and study anywhere, even if you don’t have access to a laptop or scanning and printing machine.

Our scanner is available for iPhone and iPad!

DOCUMENT SCANNER
Our smart document scanner is a must-have for those who work remotely or on the go, students and educators, and anyone involved in a small business: accountants, realtors, managers, or lawyers. Scan the files you need – contracts, tax forms, tickets, receipts, handwritten notes, assignments – and export them as PDF, JPG, DOС, XLS, PPT, or TXT!

SCANNER WITH CLOUD STORAGE
– Keep your files in a secure cloud
– Sync items and folders in real time
– Transfer and view files from any platform or web browser
– Access and manage documents anytime
– Use one subscription for all your devices

AI-POWERED TOOLS FOR DOCUMENT SCANNER
– Get document borders detected and adjusted automatically
– Straighten scan pages and get rid of curves and skews
– Recognize text in 20+ languages

FULL FREE PDF SCANNER & FILE MANAGER
– Edit scans using color correction and noise removing features
– Sign your scan manually or add a signature from an image
– Mark up documents, cover or blur text you don’t need to be seen
– Add text over the forms or autofill documents using custom templates
– Use file manager with folders and drag & drop
– Protect your confidential scans by locking folders and files with PIN
– Split scan by pages or merge documents into one
– Number your document pages, insert footers, and add watermarks

VARIOUS SCANNER MODES
• DOCUMENTS – scan multipage documents on the go 
• ID-CARD & PASSPORT – create scanned versions of your personal documents 
• MATH – solve math problems and complex equations 
• AREA – measure object length and calculate its area
• COUNT – count similar objects automatically
• QR CODE – read any QR-code with your device camera


iScanner: Making your documents better than they are!

iSCANNER PRO 
– Subscribe to get Pro access to all features. You will be charged after the purchase confirmation.
– Subscriptions to our scanner app auto-renew 24 hours before the expiration date. You can manage your subscriptions in account Settings on the App Store.

Privacy Policy of iScanner: Scanner App: http://iscanner.com/mobileapp/privacy
Terms of Use of iScanner: Scanner App: http://iscanner.com/mobileapp/terms

We’d love to hear from you! Please leave a review to help us make our document scanner even better. You can also get in touch with us at http://iscannerapp.com/scanner/support.",Business,BP Mobile LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/iscanner-pdf-document-scanner/id1040093707?uo=4,4.76033,1302662,prescription
595012291,healow,"healow™ lets you communicate with your doctor’s office and access up to date medical records. You will be able to access your appointments, lab results, vitals, manage medications and other personal data all within one app. From the healow™ app you can manage multiple accounts and access your and your family’s medical information. 
Find a doctor and book your appointment - fast, free & easy, at your convenience – morning, noon or late at night! No more waiting on the phone with your doctor's office for an appointment. Find an appointment that works for you and book instantly – on the go!
Set your goals and track them easily using trackers. Use our weight management & activity trackers to reach your fitness goals. Track your numbers regularly to watch the trends change and share your progress with your doctor. Stay motivated to make healthy choices.",Medical,eClinicalWorks LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/healow/id595012291?uo=4,4.69155,498004,prescription
1478850874,Zeelool - Eyewear For Everyday,"Welcome to Zeelool - where eyewear meets every moment of your life! Discover frames that blend style and function through our seamless digital shopping experience.

EXPLORE YOUR STYLE
- Wide selection of trendy frames
- Quality prescription & non-prescription options
- Fresh designs added regularly
- Styles for every occasion
- Affordable premium eyewear

SMART SHOPPING FEATURES
- Virtual AR try-on technology
- Precise size measurements
- Face shape analysis
- Accurate pupillary distance tool
- Style recommendations engine

SEAMLESS EXPERIENCE
- Easy prescription uploads
- Secure payment processing
- Global shipping
- Hassle-free returns
- Premium quality assurance


PERFECT FIT FOR EVERY MOMENT Whether you need professional frames for work, stylish sunglasses for weekends, or classic designs for everyday wear, find eyewear that matches your lifestyle. Our designers stay on top of trends so you can focus on enjoying life's moments.

FEATURES YOU'LL LOVE:
- Real-time virtual try-on
- Smart size recommendations
- Professional lens options
- Style preference matching
- Easy prescription management

Your privacy matters:
- Secure data protection
- Safe payment processing
- Private prescription handling
Regular updates bring you new styles, enhanced features, and an even better shopping experience.",Shopping,"Zhengzhou Xiaomoshou E-Commerce Co., Ltd",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/zeelool-eyewear-for-everyday/id1478850874?uo=4,4.78279,9424,prescription
1521857953,BuzzRx: Prescription Discounts,"BuzzRx: Your Rx Savings Prescription Care Partner! Save on prescriptions with BuzzRx, the ultimate savings app for local Rx discounts.  Need to save on prescription meds, at Walgreens, Walmart, CVS, Safeway, and Rite Aid? Or perhaps you need a prescription refill? BuzzRx has you covered! Navigate our Rx coupons to get unbeatable pharmacy discounts right in your neighborhood!


Why BuzzRx?
Save on prescriptions: Find prescription discounts at Walgreens, Walmart, CVS, Rite Aid, and over 60,000 pharmacies nationwide.
Local Rx Discounts: Easily access local pharmacy discounts with our free coupons for meds.
Rx Coupons for Pets: Care for your furry friends with unbeatable Rx savings on their meds.
Prescription Refill: Stay on top of your prescriptions with our built-in medication reminder.

Get BuzzRx now for incredible Rx savings and enjoy great discounts on all your prescriptions at your local pharmacy!

BuzzRx Features

Prescription Discount Finder
Use our savings app to find the best Rx prices:
Enter your prescription Rx details and zip code.
Compare discounted Rx prices at pharmacies near you.
Redeem free Rx coupons by showing your BuzzRx card or coupon at checkout – no insurance required, and save up to 80% on prescriptions!

Prescription Refill Reminder

Never miss a dose! BuzzRx helps you stay organized with a personalized medication tracker and Rx medication reminder.

Free Coupons for All Rx Medications

Whether you have insurance or not, BuzzRx offers prescription discounts for every member of your family. Save on pet prescriptions, too!

Accepted at 60,000+ Pharmacies

BuzzRx partners with major pharmacy chains like:
- CVS Pharmacy
- Walmart Pharmacy
- Walgreens Pharmacy
- Rite Aid Pharmacy
- Target Pharmacy
- Safeway Pharmacy
- Albertsons Pharmacy
- Publix Pharmacy
- Vons Pharmacy
- Kroger Pharmacy
- HEB Pharmacy
- & much more!

How It Works

Download BuzzRx and search for Rx savings on your prescription meds.
Use our pharmacy discount My Card or unlock Rx coupons for specific medications.
Redeem your savings and enjoy affordable prescriptions at any participating local Rx pharmacy.

More Than Just Savings

By using BuzzRx, you support charities like Make-A-Wish®, helping to create a positive impact while you save on prescriptions.



Medication Tracker & Free Prescription Refill Reminder
Never miss a prescription refill again with BuzzRx's handy reminder feature. Set a personalized Rx medication reminder to ensure you always have your medications on time, eliminating the stress of running out. We'll also keep you updated on the best Rx coupons and discounts available for your saved prescriptions.

Redeem it at Your Local Pharmacy

BuzzRx collaborates with over 60,000 pharmacies across the nation, including well-known names like CVS, Walgreens, Rite Aid, Kroger Pharmacy, Safeway Pharmacy, Walmart, and many more. Wherever you are, BuzzRx is there to help you save on prescriptions and enjoy affordable family care at your trusted pharmacy!

BuzzRx: Your Prescription Discount Solution

BuzzRx isn’t just about saving on prescriptions—it’s a comprehensive tool for managing your family’s healthcare. With features like personalized Rx refill reminders and pharmacy price comparison, BuzzRx ensures you stay on top of your care. Whether it’s finding the best local Rx pharmacy discount, saving on prescriptions for pets, or using free coupons to cut costs, BuzzRx is the ultimate Rx saver for all your healthcare needs. Take control of your well-being while saving money effortlessly.

Affordable Rx care, local Rx savings, and more—all in one app. Save on prescriptions now!

By downloading BuzzRx, you agree to be bound by our Terms of Use.

Read more at https://www.buzzrx.com/terms-of-use
Notice of Collection:
https://www.BuzzRx.com/California-Consumer-Privacy-Act-Privacy-Policy",Medical,Buzz Group Holdings LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/buzzrx-prescription-discounts/id1521857953?uo=4,4.84408,2014,prescription
502147249,FollowMyHealth®,"Take control of your health information. The new and improved mobile version of your personal health record, powered by FollowMyHealth®, is easy to use and easy to navigate.
 
From the home screen, you can view your current health summary, reminders and recent account activity—and quickly click to your medical profile and profiles of family members you’re authorized to view. You also get 24/7 access for: 

• Communicating securely with your care team. 
• Scheduling appointments.
• Viewing test and lab results. 
• Requesting prescription refills.
• Managing your preferred pharmacy for prescription renewals.
• Managing connections with healthcare organization to access your health information and interact with providers.
• Paying outstanding bills and view your billing history.
• Viewing and manage your demographics, contact information, and insurance policies.

(Please note: The availability of some features may be dependent on your connected organizations.)

Take full advantage of the modern iOS features such as:

• Passcodes and Touch ID: Create a Mobile Passcode or use Touch ID to quickly and easily sign in to FollowMyHealth® Mobile. Touch ID requires iOS 8 and up. Mobile Passcode will work on any iOS device.

• Push Notifications: In addition to receiving FollowMyHealth® notifications via text and/or email, notifications can now be pushed directly to your iOS device. App badges notify you at a glance of important new information within your FollowMyHealth® account. 

• Apple Watch: Convenient access to FollowMyHealth® push notifications and Action Center items directly from your Apple Watch.

• Apple VoiceOver: Improves accessibility for visually impaired users.

• Apple Health: Automatically import blood pressure, steps, weight and glucose readings from Apple Health into your FollowMyHealth® account.",Medical,"Allscripts Healthcare Solutions, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/followmyhealth/id502147249?uo=4,4.77471,92526,prescription
295076329,WebMD: Symptom Checker,"From WebMD, the one healthcare app you need to check symptoms, set medication reminders, learn about conditions and drugs, research treatments and diagnoses, find doctors and specialists in your area, and save on prescriptions at your local pharmacy.

Key Features: 

• Symptom Checker – Choose your symptoms, learn about potential conditions or issues, and lookup treatment and care options.
• Medication Reminders – Never miss a dose. You’ll receive reminders when it’s time to take your medications. View daily prescription schedules and instructions, plus pill images with dosage and timing information for each drug. Reminders sync to your other mobile devices when you sign-in with your WebMD account.
• WebMD Rx – We partner with major pharmacy chains to find the lowest prescription drug prices, which often beat insurance co-pays. It’s 100% free to use. No registration required.
• Doctor Directory – Find the closest doctors and specialists based on your current location or search by city, state or zip. 
• Conditions – Find medically-reviewed information about conditions relevant to you and learn more about causes, treatments, and related symptoms. 
• Customization and Saving Functionality – Save your conditions, drugs, doctors, hospitals, pharmacies, and healthy living articles for secure, easy access and reference. 
• Drug Interaction Checker – Find and identify potentially harmful and unsafe combinations of prescription medications by entering two or more drugs in question.

If you are a California resident, California law may provide you with certain rights regarding our use of your personal information. For more information relevant to our users who are California residents, please review the ""California Residents"" section of our Privacy Policy linked on this download page or within our app.

ABOUT WebMD
WebMD Health Corp. (Nasdaq: WBMD) is the leading provider of health information services, serving consumers, physicians, healthcare professionals, employers, and health plans through our public and private online portals, mobile platforms and health-focused publications. More than 95 million unique visitors access the WebMD Health Network each month.

The WebMD Health Network includes WebMD Health, Medscape, MedicineNet, emedicineHealth, RxList, theheart.org, drugs.com and Medscape Education.
SOURCE WebMD Health Corp.
WebMD. Better Information. Better Health.

WebMD does not provide medical advice, diagnosis or treatment. Always seek the advice of your physician or other qualified health provider with any questions you may have regarding a medical condition. Never disregard professional medical advice or delay in seeking it because of something you have read on the WebMD mobile application.

*Prescription savings vary by prescription and by pharmacy, and may reach up to 80% off cash price.",Medical,WebMD Health Corporation,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/webmd-symptom-checker/id295076329?uo=4,4.73635,130771,prescription
281935788,epocrates: Drug Checker App,"epocrates is the #1 medical app trusted by healthcare professionals for fast, reliable clinical decision support. Since 1998, epocrates has supported over one million clinicians with drug information, pill identifiers, interaction checkers, and more. Whether you’re a physician, nurse practitioner (NP), physician associate (PA), pharmacist, or med student, epocrates helps you confidently prescribe, stay up to date, and save time at the point of care. 

Top features: 
	•	6,000+ Rx and OTC Drug Monographs: Full coverage of brand and generic drugs, including adult and pediatric dosing, contraindications, black box warnings, and pharmacology. 
	•	Drug Interaction Checker: Safely manage polypharmacy with a checker that flags potential interactions among up to 30 drugs at once. 
	•	Pill Identifier: Instantly identify pills using imprint, shape, color, and images. Clinicians use this tool as one of the most essential pill finder tools. 
	•	Lab Reference Values: Access lab ranges, interpretations, and guidance to support diagnostics. 
	•	Dosing Calculator: Weight• and age•based calculators for precise prescription guidance. 
	•	Symptom Checker & Disease Reference: Using the symptom and disease guide to evaluate symptoms and conditions efficiently. 
	•	Herbs & Supplements: Search herbal, supplement, and alternative medicine info with known interactions. 
	•	Offline Access: Use the full app without a signal—perfect for remote care or rural rounds. 

Whether you’re searching by pill identifier, entering ICD-10 codes, or looking up a prescription, epocrates delivers fast, reliable results. It’s more than a drug reference—your trusted clinical assistant. 

Why epocrates: 
   • 	Rated the #1 clinical app by U.S. physicians, NPs, and PAs. 
   • 	Built-in tools are used millions of times every month. 
   • 	Helps reduce medication errors and improve patient safety. 
   • 	Continuously updated by medical editors and healthcare experts. 
   • 	Saves hours each week across clinical workflows. 
   • 	Also supports use in medicine delivery and prescription fulfillment environments. 

Join clinicians who trust epocrates for everything from drug interaction checking to clinical pharmacology reference to symptom triage. Search ""pill identifier apps"" and discover why epocrates is consistently ranked at the top. 

Subscription & Payment Info: 
Payment will be charged to your iTunes Account upon confirmation of purchase. Subscriptions automatically renew unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24 hours before the end of the current period. Your account will be charged for renewal within 24 hours before the end of the current period. You can manage your subscriptions and turn off auto-renewal by going to your Account Settings after purchase. Introductory pricing or discounts, if available, apply only to the first subscription period. 

Learn more: 
   • 	Terms of Service: https://www.epocrates.com/termsOfUse.do 
   • 	Privacy Policy: http://www.epocrates.com/privacy",Medical,Epocrates,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/epocrates-drug-checker-app/id281935788?uo=4,4.50074,6800,prescription
950510633,Push Health: Telehealth App,"Push Health is your personal telehealth app, providing convenient, reliable, and secure medical services from the comfort of your home. Whether you need a prescription refill, virtual consultation, or lab testing, Push Health connects you with licensed medical providers ready to assist you. Transparent, affordable pricing with no health insurance or subscriptions required.

Join the 1,000,000+ patients who have made Push Health their go-to telehealth solution. Download now and experience a seamless, personalized healthcare experience like never before.

FOR PATIENTS
Navigating the healthcare system can be overwhelming, inconvenient, and costly. Push Health simplifies this process, offering a hassle-free way to connect with licensed medical providers for a range of medical services - all without leaving your home.

WHY PUSH HEALTH?
Convenience: Access healthcare anytime, anywhere.
Efficiency: Streamlined process enables faster, more efficient care.
Affordability: Transparent pricing with no hidden fees.
Quality Care: Connect with licensed and experienced providers.
Privacy: Secure, encrypted communication protects your health information.

HOW IT WORKS
Sign Up: Download Push Health and create your account in minutes.
Connect: Choose a service and connect with an independent, licensed medical provider.
Receive Care: Get medical advice, prescriptions, and lab tests as needed.
Follow Up: Receive follow-up care and manage your health through the app.

POPULAR SERVICES :
Antibiotics: Azithromycin, Augmentin, Cephalexin, Clindamycin, Z-Pak
Asthma: Albuterol, ProAir, Ventolin
Weight Loss: Zepbound, Ozempic, Wegovy, Saxenda, Semaglutide, Tirzepatide

OTHER CONDITIONS & PRESCRIPTION REFILLS:
Acne: Aczone, Dapsone, Doxycycline, Tretinoin
Anti-Inflammatory: Prednisone
Antivirals: Acyclovir, Valtrex
Antidepressants: Prozac, Sertraline, Zoloft
Birth Control: Apri, Xulane, Yaz
Diabetes: Glyburide, Glipizide, Metformin, Mounjaro
Erectile Dysfunction: Cialis, Levitra, Sildenafil, Tadalafil, Viagra
Eye Care: Latisse, Vuity
Hair Loss: Finasteride, Minoxidil, Propecia
High Blood Pressure: Amlodipine, Lasix, Lisinopril, Losartan, Metoprolol, Propranolol
Cholesterol: Atorvastatin, Simvastatin
Scabies: Ivermectin, Permethrin
Strep Throat: Amoxicillin, Penicillin
Thyroid: Levothyroxine, Synthroid
UTI: Bactrim, Ciprofloxacin, Nitrofurantoin
Yeast Infections: Fluconazole, Diflucan

Push Health is available in the United States.

FOR MEDICAL PROVIDERS
Push Health provides the tools you need to operate a secure, virtual medical practice. Create your free account, set your professional fee, and start connecting with patients today. Connected with 55,000+ pharmacies and integrated with Quest Diagnostics for lab testing, Push Health ensures secure, efficient service delivery. Through Push Health, you can message securely with patients and other providers, document encounters, e-prescribe, order labs, and send invoices with just a few clicks.
Whether you are looking to grow an online practice with new patients or serve your own patients or network, Push Health can help you take your practice online. Join the thousands of medical providers using Push Health to practice independently again today.
Key Features for Providers:
KEY FEATURES FOR PROVIDERS:
Bank-level security and encryption
Connected to 55,000+ pharmacies
Integrated with thousands of lab locations in the United States
LegitScript certified

TESTIMONIAL
""I frequently get asked for medical advice from patients and my personal network when I am outside of the ER or the office. Push Health enables me to document electronically and send prescriptions, lab orders, messages and invoices to patients from my mobile phone and eliminates many of the hassles of being curbsided. I think Push Health is a big step in the right direction for improving access to healthcare.""
- Stephen Phan, MD
For more information, please visit our FAQ page: pushhealth.com/pages/faq",Medical,"Push Health, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/push-health-telehealth-app/id950510633?uo=4,4.60799,18829,prescription
591981144,Doctor On Demand,"Doctor On Demand by Included Health offers 24/7 access to board-certified doctors, licensed therapists, and psychiatrists via secure video visits from your phone, tablet, or computer. When you're feeling sick, want a doctor’s note, need help with a prescription, and more, we make it easy to get quality telehealth anytime, anywhere—with or without insurance. Download the free Doctor On Demand app to get started. 

Why Choose Doctor On Demand?

Fast Access to Online Doctors – See a board-certified, US-based provider with telehealth appointments anytime, day or night.

Therapy & Psychiatry – Book virtual visits for mental health concerns like stress, anxiety, depression, PTSD, trauma, and more.

Online Urgent Care, Treatment, Prescriptions – For colds, flu, allergies, skin conditions, UTIs, headaches, and more, our providers can send prescriptions to nearby pharmacies if medically appropriate. 

Doctor’s Notes – Need a doctor’s note for work or school? We’ve got you covered. See an urgent care provider for help. 

Insurance or Self-Pay – We work with major health plans and many employers to reduce the costs of visits for eligible members. If not covered, we offer affordable visit costs to all patients with no surprise bills. 

How It Works

Download the app and create an account for free.
Choose to see the first available provider, or schedule a visit.
Get personalized care, prescriptions, and treatment plans in an online visit. 

Conditions We Treat
- Cold, Flu & Sinus Infections
- UTI Treatment Online
- Acne, Rashes & Skin Issues
- Allergies & Asthma
- High Cholesterol, Diabetes & Thyroid Screening
- Headaches & Migraines
- Mental Health Support: Anxiety, Depression, Grief & More
- Prescription Refills & Lab Orders

Frequently Asked Questions
When are doctors available?
Our virtual providers  are available 24/7, 365 days a year, including weekends and holidays. Mental health appointments are often available within days—much faster than traditional providers who can take weeks

How much does a visit cost?
You’ll always see your exact visit cost upfront. We accept most insurance plans and partner with top employers and health plans to lower your costs. No insurance? Our telehealth visit costs are affordable.

Who are the doctors?
Our US-based, board-certified doctors, licensed psychiatrists, and therapists have an average of 15 years of experience and come from diverse specialties to ensure you receive expert care.

How does it work? 
Join a telehealth visit to connect face to face with a provider from your phone, tablet, or computer in as little as ten minutes. Like an in-person visit, your provider will discuss with you how you’re feeling, your healthcare history, and propose a recommended treatment plan. Labs, screenings, and prescriptions will be sent to nearby facilities.

What can you treat? 
Our urgent care doctors can treat hundreds of issues, including cold and flu, urinary tract infections, allergies, headache, sprains, and skin conditions. They can also order labs and screenings to help with preventative care and help manage chronic care conditions. Our extensive team of therapists and psychiatrists are able to treat anxiety, stress, depression, PTSD, trauma and loss relationships, and more. 

Your Privacy is Our Priority
We adhere to strict HIPAA guidelines to protect your health data and personal information.

Our providers are unable to prescribe controlled substances. 

Get Started Today
Join millions of patients who trust Doctor On Demand for fast, convenient, and reliable healthcare. Download the app now to sign up for free!",Medical,"Doctor On Demand, Inc",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/doctor-on-demand/id591981144?uo=4,4.89459,119419,prescription
1016290130,ScriptSave WellRx Rx Discounts,"ScriptSave® WellRx is here to make it easier and more affordable to access the medicine you need. WellRx has helped patients locate over 64 million discounts for their prescriptions and offers reduced prices on over 85,000 medications. 

With your free membership, you can search for savings on prescriptions, get discounts at pharmacies near you, and save an average of 65%* on your Rx medications!**  

Because prescription costs often vary between pharmacies, it can be tough to know whether you’re paying the most competitive price. With WellRx, you don’t have to wonder. We give you access to our powerful price checker so you can find the best deal without a lot of digging.  

Saving with WellRx is as easy as 1-2-3: 

1. Compare prices at pharmacies in your area and make your selection. 

2. Print, text, email, or download your coupon. 

3. Show it at the register when you check out to pay the discounted price. You’re all done! 

WellRx doesn’t just help you save money—it also helps you stay on top of your medications. Here are some of the other features available to you as a member: 

- Drug interaction warnings that alert you to conflicts with saved medications 

- Pill and refill notifications to remind you to take your medications and refill your prescriptions 

- A virtual medicine chest to store, manage and instantly price your medications 

- Medication information, images, and videos 

- Notes and mood tracking to refer to as you take your medication 

- Nutrition tools to identify foods that align with your health goals and specific health conditions (including pregnancy, heart health, and diabetes) 

- “Better for You” grocery recommendations that meet your nutritional needs 

Get these benefits and more by downloading WellRx today! 

For more information about our discount prescription savings card and program, visit us at www.wellrx.com. 

 

You can feel safe with the resources we share and the savings we bring. ScriptSave WellRx is part of Medical Security Card Company, LLC; offering some of the most advanced technology, pharmacy expertise, and customer service in the industry for more than 25 years. 

 

By downloading the ScriptSave WellRx prescription app for iOS, you agree to be bound by our Terms of Use. ScriptSave WellRx values your privacy and will never sell or share your personally identifiable data. 

 

*Average savings based on 2020 national program savings data. 

 

**DISCOUNT ONLY – NOT INSURANCE. Discounts are available exclusively through participating pharmacies. The range of the discounts will vary depending on the type of prescription and the pharmacy chosen. This program does not make payments directly to pharmacies. Members are required to pay for all prescription purchases. Cannot be used in conjunction with insurance. You may contact customer care anytime with questions or concerns, to cancel your registration, or to obtain further information. This program is administered by Medical Security Card Company, LLC, Tucson, AZ.",Medical,"Medical Security Card Company, LLC.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/scriptsave-wellrx-rx-discounts/id1016290130?uo=4,4.82998,6988,prescription
1607968890,Visory Health Rx Pharmacy App,"Visory Health is a FREE prescription & rx savings card! Our app is built for all of you on the front line, taking care of yourself, your family, and our communities. Our prescription discount card is made for everyone, including your fuzzy 2 and 4 legged friends, yes, that means pet medications too!

No rx coupons required. No signup required. Just prescription savings. Simple.

We know life can be complicated but finding the best prices for prescription drugs at your local pharmacy shouldn’t be. At Visory Health, we’re doing healthcare differently so that you have the time and extra savings to do what you love most. Visory makes it easy to save money at your local pharmacies and reduce the cost of prescription drugs.

Visory has already helped millions of customers save over 1.3 billion dollars on their prescriptions using the Visory Health card. 

All while saving time. 

For Pharmacists:
If you work in the pharmacy, this is a great tool to help you find the lowest drug costs for your families and customers. 

For Individuals:
Visory Health can be used in place of insurance or if you have no insurance. We help you avoid overpaying for rx prescriptions or dealing with complicated discount coupons and physical cards. Simply show the Visory Health diacount card to your pharmacist when you drop off your prescription. It's completely free (no signup required) and the whole family and friends can use it to save money on prescriptions.

How to Use Your Rx & Prescription Discount:
Step 1. Download the Visory Health App and add the digital prescription card to your Apple Wallet Account.
Step 2. Ask about Visory Health at one of our preferred local pharmacy locations.
Step 3. Look up prescription rx drug prices and save.

This is what Visory customers are saying about us:

Visory helped me save $50 on my medication! The pharmacy ran my insurance then tried Visory and I’m so glad they did.  –Rachel, Visory Customer, Maryville, TN

I have taken the same blood pressure medication for years and the price recently went up to costing $44 a month. I used the Visory card and it lowered the cost to $15. I am so thankful I found this program! - Kevin, Visory Customer, Littleton, CO

My company recently switched to a high deductible plan and my medications used to all cost less than $20. I was struggling to figure out how I was going to pay for my maintenance medications, then a friend of mine gave me the Visory Card and it has drastically reduced my medications costs. – Allana, Visory Customer, Plano, TX

Available at over 30,000 pharmacies nationwide including Kroger, Walgreens, CVS, Walmart and more",Medical,"Visory Health, LLC",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/visory-health-rx-pharmacy-app/id1607968890?uo=4,4.83439,471,prescription
1463564258,Prescription Lens Scanner,"Need new glasses but can’t remember your prescription details? Try the SmartBuyGlasses Prescription Lens Scanner app! Our free eyecare prescription app makes buying prescription glasses online easier than ever.

The SmartBuyGlasses Lens Scanner app is pioneering a new way of buying glasses online by providing users with the option to extract their glasses prescription from their phone, completely for FREE! Our app, which is FDA listed, will help you save both time and money when buying your next pair of RX glasses, since you will no longer need to visit an eye clinic to get your current eyeglasses prescription.  

Our Lens Scanner allows people who already have glasses, but don’t remember their prescription details, to extract their accurate glasses prescription immediately. Thanks to this new technology, eye care can be provided in a convenient and direct way, anywhere.      

The process is very easy. You just need 4 things:
1. A smartphone with the Lens Scanner app installed
2. A laptop or computer (with a 12” screen or larger)
3. Your current pair of prescription eyeglasses
4. A standard size magnetic card for measurement
 
Key benefits:
Get your accurate RX prescription in less than 5 minutes
Save money - our lens scanner is FREE
FDA listed
Ultra-convenient: use anywhere, anytime!
Shop prescription eyewear online easily

How does it work?
Download the Prescription Lens Scanner app & pair it with your computer
Scan your current prescription eyeglasses using your phone
Measure your pupillary distance (PD)
Get your accurate glasses prescription details
Your glasses prescription will be saved to your account so you can easily start shopping RX glasses online

Disclaimer
It is recommended that the Lens Scanner app is used by individuals 18 years old and above, with stable vision, and who are happy with their current prescription. Further requirements include cylinder measurement lower than -2.50 and single vision prescription between -6.00 and +3.00.

It is not recommended to use the Lens Scanner app if you:
• Have a progressive, multifocal, or bifocal prescription
• Have a prescription that includes a prism measurement
• Have a high single-vision or astigmatism prescription
• Take any medication that affects your vision
• Have any illness or condition that affects your eye health

Note: Please read our full terms of use. It includes, amongst other information, a detailed list of conditions and illnesses that may inhibit the lens scanner from producing accurate results.

About us
SmartBuyGlasses Optical Group is one of the world’s leading designer eyewear e-retailers with websites in more than 20 countries, including SmartBuyGlasses.com in the US and VisionDirect.com.au in Australia. We offer a catalogue of over 80,000 products from more than 180 brands.

Distributed by SmartBuyGlasses Optical
Manufactured by 6over6 Vision Ltd.
For more details go to https://6over6.com/",Health & Fitness,Motion Global Limited,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/prescription-lens-scanner/id1463564258?uo=4,4.48247,941,prescription
6447446857,VCRx: Prescription Discounts,"VCRx offers discounts on over 10,000 prescriptions and is accepted at more than 35,000 pharmacies nationwide. Find your medication, select your pharmacy and load the digital coupon to start saving up to 80%* instantly. No signup required.

How it Works:
1. Search for your medication. We offer savings on thousands of prescriptions.
2. Enter your location. Find participating pharmacies in your area and easily compare prescription prices.
3. Redeem and save on prescriptions. Show your VCRx coupon card in the app to your pharmacist so your prescription savings can be automatically applied.

You can use the VCRx prescription discount app every time you refill your medication for maximum savings.

Accepted at 35,000+ pharmacies nationwide including: 
- CVS Pharmacy
- Target Pharmacy
- Walmart Pharmacy
- Walgreens Pharmacy
- Rite Aid Pharmacy
- Albertsons Pharmacy
- Duane Reade Pharmacy
- Fry's Pharmacy
- H-E-B Pharmacy
- Hy-Vee Pharmacy
- Kroger Pharmacy
- Long's Drug Pharmacy
- Meijer Pharmacy
- And More!

App Features:
- No sign up or account required to use our health app.
- Free to use with a simple interface. 
- Find discounts on thousands of FDA-approved medications. 
- Compare costs across local pharmacies to find the lowest prescription price.
- Find information on medications including directions, side effects, storage, what to avoid and more. 

Who Can Use the VCRx Prescription Savings App?
- VCRx is for anyone who has a prescription - insurance or no insurance. It can benefit patients with high deductibles, high copays, limited drug formularies, and those without insurance. If you have insurance, the prescription discount card can be used instead of insurance if the discount makes the prescription cheaper than the copay.
- Use VCRx digital rx coupons for the entire family, including pets.
- The app can be used anytime you fill a prescription and can continued to be used for medication refills.

The VCRx app is your digital assistant when it comes to finding the best prescription prices. Start saving on your medications today!

*Prescription savings vary by prescription and by pharmacy, and may reach up to 80% off cash price.

Pharmacy names, logos, brands, and other trademarks are the property of their respective owners. This is not insurance. This is a discount prescription drug card and it’s free to our members. If assistance is needed, please call the VCRx help line at 877-848-4379.

By downloading and using VCRx, you agree to our terms and policies. Read more at: https://www.vividclearrx.com/terms-of-use/",Medical,"GoodRx, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/vcrx-prescription-discounts/id6447446857?uo=4,4.08333,12,prescription
1564691415,Vooglam - Eyewear and Glasses,"Try on trendy prescription glasses & sunglasses virtually with smart AR technology.

Welcome to Vooglam - where eyewear meets self-expression. Break free from conventional style and embrace your funky side with frames that celebrate individuality and creative freedom.

WHY CHOOSE VOOGLAM:
EMBRACE YOUR STYLE Express your individuality through unconventional eyewear that breaks mainstream fashion rules. Our eclectic collections celebrate creative freedom and personal flair.
FIND YOUR PERFECT MATCH
Virtual AR Try-On technology
Smart size measurement tools
Face shape analysis
Precise pupillary distance measurement
Personalized style recommendations
SHOP WITH CONFIDENCE
Easy prescription uploads
Secure checkout process
Global shipping
Hassle-free returns
Premium quality, affordable prices
Whether you're drawn to psychedelic patterns, retro vibes, or bold color combinations, Vooglam helps you create a look that's uniquely yours. Join our community of free spirits who believe life's too short for ordinary glasses.",Shopping,"Zhengzhou Stripe E-Commerce Co., Ltd.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/vooglam-eyewear-and-glasses/id1564691415?uo=4,4.89445,13055,prescription
1150095080,Prescription Drug Cards : Top 300,"Learning essential information about the top 300 prescription drugs doesn’t have to be tedious. With Prescription Drug Cards: Top 300, you’ll get a comprehensive, easy-to-use study tool that will tell you everything you need to know about these most-prescribed drugs. And as a bonus, you’ll get the top 100 non-prescription drugs, too. This tool is ready to go with quick image and
information retrieval—no Internet connection necessary!

Install the free version today and jump start your studying! We have provided a limited free version of the app that you can try before deciding to upgrade. This version includes a limited amount of prescription drugs and resources.

Upgrade to the Premium version with a one-time, in-app purchase that includes lifetime access to crucial information about the top 300 prescription drugs, including:

• Generic and common name
• Class
• Dosage Forms
• Approved Dose and Indications
• Off-Label Use
• Contraindications
• Adverse Reactions
• Drug Interactions
• Monitoring Parameters
• Medication Safety Issues and Black Box Warnings

Learn vital drug information: Download Prescription Drug Cards: Top 300!",Medical,"Higher Learning Technologies, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/prescription-drug-cards-top-300/id1150095080?uo=4,3.6,10,prescription
1581141346,PrescriptionHub,"The PrescriptionHub mobile app helps you manage your pharmacy and prescription drug benefits with transparency and ease. Powered by Prime Therapeutics, the PrescriptionHub app offers comprehensive pharmacy benefit manager solutions and member support to ensure you receive cost effective healthcare.

With PrescriptionHub, you can access real-time prior authorization updates, insightful medicine information, and drug cost savings tools—all in the palm of your hand.


PrescriptionHub app features:


Check the status of prior authorizations:
•	See where a prior authorization is in the review process with six easy statuses: Ready, Not Ready, Under Review, Needs Approval, Not Covered, or Quantity Limit.
•	Receive real-time prior authorization status updates through push notifications.


Save money on prescriptions:
•	Compare pharmacy prices and find the best pharmacy savings.
•	Get accurate drug pricing from nearby pharmacies.
•	Compare retail pharmacy and home delivery prices.


Get Relevant Prescription Information:
•	Access clinical solutions and drug education for your prescribed medicines.
•	View common side effects.
•	Receive alerts about potential drug-drug interactions between your medicines.


View Rx prescription claims history:
•	Access a comprehensive history of your previously filled prescriptions.


Rx Search:
•	Use the Rx search tool regardless of prescription status.
•	Get Rx information and compare pharmacy prices.


With PrescriptionHub, you also benefit from our specialty pharmacy management services and employer pharmacy solutions, ensuring health plan management that is transparent and effective.


Download the PrescriptionHub app by Prime Therapeutics for a smooth pharmacy and prescription management experience.",Medical,"Prime Therapeutics, LLC",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/prescriptionhub/id1581141346?uo=4,3.0,8,prescription
1524212453,Zenni - Eyewear for Everyone™,"Our app offers you the widest selection of affordable, high-quality prescription glasses at your fingertips. Explore thousands of styles starting at just $6.95, including basic prescription lenses. Finding the perfect prescription glasses or sunglasses has never been easier - or more fun! Found a glasses style that you like? Find a similar pair with our AI-Powered Image Search Tool. Take a pic or upload a photo and find the Zenni frame that matches the style. Use our enhanced 3D Virtual Try-On to see how they look on you before you buy. You can also shop for eyewear accessories and specialty lenses such as Transitions®, progressives, bifocals, Blokz® blue-light-blocking, and more.  
 
Exclusive to App  
•	Personalized shopping experience
•	Special offers and promotions
•	See how you look in glasses with our enhanced Virtual Try-On
•	AI-Powered Image Search Tool
 
Customized Style  
•	Explore thousands of frames to find a pair (or two!) that is uniquely you
•	Save your favorites with one click 
•	Get the same quality lens options for one tenth the price of traditional retail 
•	Choose from more than 20 tint options, including mirrors and polarized lenses, for chic prescription sunglasses starting at $12
•	Discover our star-studded collaborations 
•	Shop all the accessories you need, from chains and deluxe cases to cleaning kits

Zenni Rewards  
•	Enroll and start earning exclusive rewards 
•	Track your status 
 
Customer Care 
•	Enjoy hassle-free 30-day returns  
•	Store prescriptions for the whole family  
•	Manage your orders and payment methods 
•	Need help? Access chat or Help Center instantly",Shopping,"OCUSUN, LLC",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/zenni-eyewear-for-everyone/id1524212453?uo=4,4.84187,169090,prescription
1610485344,CareCard Prescription Savings,"Save up to 85% on prescriptions at your local pharmacy with CareCard's prescription discount card and pharmacy coupons. No insurance is required. Search and compare actual drug prices at over 80,000 pharmacies nationwide in just one place with CardCard's mobile app. Get instant savings coupons to use at CVS, Walgreens, Rite Aid, Walmart, Kroger, Duane Reade, Tom Thumb, Albertsons, Publix, Costco, and many more! CareCard prescription prices are often lower than insurance copays. Use CareCard today regardless of your insurance or Medicare status.",Medical,Carecard Inc,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/carecard-prescription-savings/id1610485344?uo=4,4.65035,715,prescription
1136903980,Prescription ( نسخه ),"نسخه  یک نرم افزار راهنمای تجویز دارو مخصوص پزشکان می باشد

در این اپلیکیشن سعی شده تا برای هر بیماری نسخه ای نوشته شود که در آن از انتخوابی ترین دارو، با حداقل قیمت با کمترین تداخل دارویی در کوتاه ترین زمان ممکنه و راحت ترین روش مصرف استفاده شود.

از جمله امکانات این اپلیکیشن :

-امکان جستجوی قوی فارسی و انگلیسی بیماری ها
- نسخه دارویی با دوز و زمان بندی مناسب
- توجهات لازم جهت ارجاع بیمار
- طبقه بندی مصرف در حاملگی
- کنترااندیکاسیون ها، موارد احتیاط و تداخلات دارویی
- نحوه مصرف و آموزش به بیمار
- توضیحات مختصر در مورد بیماری ها
- امکان بحث  و ثبت نظر برای هر بیماری
- امکان ارسال و درخواست بیماری جدید
- امکان افزودن بیماری های پربادید به لیست علاقه مندی ها",Medical,Ali Mojahedi,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/prescription-%D9%86%D8%B3%D8%AE%D9%87/id1136903980?uo=4,4.5,20,prescription
333710667,Scanner Pro - Scan Documents,"Effortlessly scan, organize, and share documents on the go to have everything you need at your fingertips. Scanner Pro brings you high-quality document scan technology in a convenient and simple mobile app. Scan agreements, receipts, IDs, books, and more using your device to convert them into PDFs in seconds. Safely store and share your documents with anyone in just a few taps with Scanner Pro. 

Experience the simplicity of on-the-go document scanning. Scan travel expenses, convert sketches into PDFs, and even fax important files all from your smartphone. Scanner Pro brings professional scanner capabilities, like OCR and full-text searches to your device. With advanced image processing, Scanner Pro will automatically detect borders, correct perspective and distortions, remove shadows, and more. 

Introducing QR Code Mode!
Effortlessly scan and decode QR codes directly from your Camera screen. Simply point your device at the code, capture it, and let Scanner Pro do the rest—no extra steps required! It's that easy.
 
Share, email, and upload your scans anywhere with cloud compatibility.  With Scanner Pro you can share as many scans as you want completely free. Simply send an email, upload to your photos, or use any third-party application to conveniently deliver scanned documents.
 
What people have to say:
""I will confess to some serious love for Scanner Pro."" – Rick Broida, CNET
""Scanner Pro is an excellent app for those who’d like to digitize and organize their paper worlds."" – Marc Saltzman, USA Today
""There really isn’t a better scanner app for iPhone than Scanner Pro."" – Matthew Panzarino, TNW

Enjoy professional scans and convenient document sharing completely free of charge with Scanner Pro. Download today for a quick and easy mobile scanner that does it all.
 
SCANNER PRO FEATURES
 
SCANNING FEATURES
- Scan documents, pictures, and more wherever you are
- Unlike other apps, Scanner Pro saves the original document that you scanned
- Conveniently edit your scans by highlighting, writing, and drawing on your documents
 
SMART DOCUMENT ORGANIZER
- Automate your workflow when you rename, send, and upload scans in just one tap
- Effortlessly create folders to find any important document in seconds
 
FULL-TEXT SEARCH
- OCR and full-text search let you highlight important sections of your scans with ease
- Turn your scans into text, so you can read, copy, and export it to other apps
 
SHARE SCANS
- Scan a document on your iPhone or iPad and access it on all your other devices with iCloud sync
- Automatically export and upload scans to Dropbox, Evernote, Google Drive, Box, iCloud Drive, OneDrive, OneNote, or any other WebDAV-enabled storage
- Share unlimited files with your contacts for free
 
Scanner Pro supports 25+ languages: Catalan, Croatian, Simplified Chinese, Traditional Chinese, Czech, Danish, Dutch, English, Estonian, Finnish, French, German, Greek, Hungarian, Italian, Japanese, Latin, Norwegian, Polish, Portuguese, Romanian, Russian, Spanish, Swedish, Tagalog, Turkish and Ukrainian.

Download Scanner Pro today for a quick and compact way to professionally scan, organize, and share documents wherever you are, whenever you want.

Share your feedback and comments at http://readdle.com/contact

Privacy Policy: https://readdle.com/scannerpro/legal/privacy
Terms of Service: https://readdle.com/scannerpro/legal/terms",Business,Readdle Technologies Limited,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/scanner-pro-scan-documents/id333710667?uo=4,4.8787,313665,prescription
799061555,Banfield Pet Hospital,"Petcare management in your pocket! Download now and get secure, easy-to-use access to your pet’s veterinary information anytime, anywhere with the Banfield Pet Hospital app.

· Easily make and check appointments.
· Get details about your next appointment.
· Pick the appointment type that’s right for you.
· Get alerts for duplicate appointments.
· Send us even more info about new pet patients.
· Stay on top of your pet’s preventive care needs with our easy-to-use dashboard and timely reminders for appointments, vaccinations, and more.
· View, filter, and download your pet’s records — including medical summary reports, medications, lab tests, visit summaries, and invoices.
· Attend virtual visits directly through the app with push notification reminders.

Have an Optimum Wellness Plan? The app is a great place to ping Pet Chat™ for 24-7 live advice to give you petcare peace of mind.

Don’t have an Optimum Wellness Plan? Visit our website to check out our smart packages of high-quality preventive care services like vaccinations, physical exams, deworming, and more for cats and dogs!",Medical,Medical Management International Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/banfield-pet-hospital/id799061555?uo=4,4.83028,95404,prescription
1533949987,RxGo: Prescription Rx Coupons,"Save up to 80% on prescription medication.

Compare prescription drug prices and discover hundreds of coupons & discounts.

Average savings per user of over 65%.

Pharmaceutical pricing has always been extremely opaque. A lifesaving medication may cost $100 at one pharmacy and $10 at another. RxGo.com understands that high medication costs can prove to be an extreme financial hardship for many hard-working families across the US.

Our software allows everyone to compare pricing at nearby pharmacies and print coupons to further lower their costs. Since its inception in 2012 RxGo has saved patients tens of millions of dollars.

 

Here are what a few people have said about RxGo:

""THESE COUPONS LITERALLY SAVED MY LIFE!!!! My husband and I do not have insurance in our state because we are an ""intact"" family with three children and own our business so we do not qualify for any state funded/discounted insurance and we can not afford private insurance. I have been battling an addiction to prescription pain meds for the last 2 years following a surgery. After 2 years of complete devastation to our lives emotionally, physically and financially I hit rock bottom. I decided to come clean with my husband, family, and friends on my personal private battle. After reaching out for help falling off and on the recovery wagon, I found a treatment program in which my medication is prescribed along with intensive outpatient care and support. The downfall was/is that it is very expensive, not only the doctor visits that range from $175-$250 a week for the first month then once a month there after but the medication ranged at a minimum $400-$1000 each prescription. I then found myself feeling helpless and hopeless knowing I could NOT afford the medication to assist in regaining my life back. Until one night after spending some time googling coupons and discount cards I came across this website offering their FREE discount card guaranteeing great discounts WELL I am here to tell you that my monthly prescription went from $460 to a very manageable and affordable $143. No gimmicks no long applications no deductible no waiting no NOTHING but complete savings. This card has literally saved my life I have been able to afford my treatment and regain my life back. I am enjoying life again and working everyday towards a better life I am clean and free from my addiction and this program/card has a huge part of that!""

C. Pearl

 

“I wanted to say thank you and yes I have used my card already and have saved $312 just in one month. It was hard to get my medications without help from family and friends but now I think I might be able to handle it on my own. Thank you so much”

Jessica L.

 
“I just got back from a month’s vacation to Africa! I was quite busy before that trying to get everything ready to go. BUT…I wanted to let you know of my success with using your coupons. In order to go to Africa, I needed to take anti-malaria pills daily while I was there. Using your card I was able to save $157.18!!""

Jeannie M.

 
“Totally awesome pharmacy trip my meds went from $70 to $17 with your card thank you!!”

E. Ison",Medical,Medication Discount Card LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/rxgo-prescription-rx-coupons/id1533949987?uo=4,4.76613,124,prescription
307345672,Prescription for Sleep Lite,"---
Prescription for Sleep 2 now available, featuring 4 all new songs and visualizers that provide even better relaxation benefits!
---

We live in a stressful world, where getting a good night's sleep can be a difficult thing.  Lack of quality sleep can lead to even more stress and disorders, and it all becomes a vicious circle.  

To combat this problem, the Hibino Sound Therapy Lab (led by renowned composer Norihiko Hibino) and Mission One have worked together to develop the ""Prescription for Sleep"" application for iPhone and iPod Touch.

FEATURES

・Peaceful Sleep Via Music and Imagery
There are four stages of sleep, and the goal of Prescription for Sleep is to guide you to the relaxed state necessary to enter the first stage.  This is done through soothing imagery and therapeutic music, recorded live on acoustic instruments at a rhythm that recreates the pulse of a mother's heartbeat as heard from the womb.  

・High-Quality Sound with Therapeutic Frequencies
The music in Prescription for Sleep contains some inaudible frequencies in the 50-60 kHz range, which replicate frequencies found in nature, such as those of a murmuring forest stream.  These 24-bit, 96 kHz recordings were created using special mastering techniques, and have a bandwidth that most standard sound sources cannot duplicate.

・Simple, Peaceful Melodies
Beautiful, simple melodies give you something to appreciate while the healing effects of the music and visuals are taking place.

・A Dreamlike Story
This work features four complete songs that take you on a journey -- from a storybook, to the stars, to heaven, and to the source of life.  The soft colors and slow movements will provide tranquility as you embark on this journey.",Health & Fitness,"NEXTVISION Co.,Ltd.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/prescription-for-sleep-lite/id307345672?uo=4,3.33333,3,prescription
991327711,Imprivata ID,"Imprivata ID is a secure authentication application that helps improve clinical workflows for medical professionals for electronic prescribing of controlled substances (EPCS), remote network access, and others.

For EPCS, Imprivata ID enables Hands Free Authentication, a breakthrough solution that delivers exceptional speed, security, and convenience for providers while meeting DEA two-factor authentication requirements for EPCS. Instead of typing a manual token code, Hands Free Authentication wirelessly retrieves and verifies a one-time password from the Imprivata ID application on the user’s mobile device, even if it is locked and/or in the user’s pocket, which delivers unparalleled speed and convenience with minimal impact to clinical workflows.

For remote network access, Imprivata ID enables fast, convenient push notifications. Users receive a notification on their mobile phone asking them to verify their identity. The user simply swipes the notification from the lock screen of their device and taps “Approve,” and the second factor of authentication is complete.",Medical,Imprivata Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/imprivata-id/id991327711?uo=4,5.0,5,prescription
1209102842,Virtual Vision Test,"Still seeing well out of your current glasses or contacts prescription, but now it's expired? Virtual Vision Test by Warby Parker lets you renew it from home in 10 minutes using just your phone! And it starts at just $15.

*Pricing*
- You’ll only be charged if we can renew your prescription
- You’ll hear back from our doctors within 48 hours. If the doctor renews your prescription, you’ll pay just $15. For multiple prescriptions you'll pay $25.
- If they cannot renew your prescription and instead recommend you get an in-person, comprehensive eye exam, you will not be charged.

*Eligibility*
To use Virtual Vision Test, you must meet eligibility requirements set by state regulations and our doctors. Virtual Vision Test is great for anyone who:
- Is between 18 and 65 years old
- Does not live in one of the following states: AK, AZ, AR, CO, CT, DE, DC, GA, ID, IN, KS, KY, LA, ME, MD, MI, MN, NV, NJ, NM, ND, RI, SC, SD, VA, WA, WV
- Has a single-vision distance Rx (not readers or progressives)
- Has no eye health concerns or symptoms
- Sees well with their current glasses or contacts

How it works!

It’s as simple as reading the eye chart at the doctor’s office—but on your phone. You just need your eyeballs, your glasses or contacts, and your phone.
1. We’ll guide you through a simple (but thorough) eligibility quiz to make sure the app is a good fit for you.
2. If you’re eligible, the app takes you through an equally simple vision test. You'll need to complete it in a quiet, well-lit spot where you have about 10 feet of space.
3. In about 48 hours, an eye doctor will assess your results. If they determine that you're still seeing well out of your current prescription, then the doctor may renew it and you'll pay the $15, or more, if you have multiple prescriptions.

FYI: Virtual Vision Test by Warby Parker is not a comprehensive eye exam and it isn’t meant to replace visits to your eye doctor. It’s important to get your eye health examined periodically, even if you aren’t experiencing any vision problems, so please follow the advice of your doctor. Good to keep those peepers in check.",Medical,Warby Parker Inc,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/virtual-vision-test/id1209102842?uo=4,4.76258,17252,prescription
1486641404,RxSS: Rx Savings Solutions,"If your employer or health insurance company works with Rx Savings Solutions (RxSS), we’re here to help you save money on prescription drugs. We'll show every lower-cost option available for your prescriptions and how much you’ll pay with your insurance. 
Managing your prescriptions can be hard, so let the RxSS app do it for you. 


HOW RxSS WORKS


RxSS helps you take control of your prescription drug expenses. 
•	The app is connected to your individual health plan, so you’ll see any medications you’re taking and lower-cost alternatives covered by your insurance.
•	Easily search and compare drug prices with your doctor before they write a prescription.
•	Switch to a lower-cost option with one tap, and certified pharmacy technicians at RxSS will take care of everything else—even getting your doctor’s approval when needed.


KNOW ALL YOUR OPTIONS

RxSS pharmacists find equally effective, affordable medications to treat your condition. You and your doctor decide what’s best for your health and budget. Here are just a few ways you might be able to save money: 
•	Generic forms of name-brand drugs 
•	Better prices at different pharmacies near you or through home delivery
•	Equally effective medications that treat the same condition but cost less than your current prescription


TALK WITH Rx EXPERTS

One tap from the app and you’ll have access to an entire team of certified pharmacy technicians ready to answer your questions. Connect live with a pharmacy expert who will help you:
•	Switch to a lower-cost prescription
•	Transfer a prescription to home delivery or a pharmacy offering a lower price
•	Understand your out-of-pocket costs and deductibles


MANAGE YOUR PRESCRIPTIONS FROM ONE PLACE

The RxSS app makes it easy to stay organized by showing all your current prescriptions on one screen for easy tracking, scheduling and budgeting. 
•      View all your medication names, strengths, dosages and quantities automatically—no manual entry. 
•	See Rx information and savings opportunities for dependents on your health plan.
•	Switch a prescription to convenient home delivery.
•	Set text or push notifications reminding you to take each medication on schedule.",Medical,"Rx Savings, LLC.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/rxss-rx-savings-solutions/id1486641404?uo=4,4.80822,219,prescription
1038369065,Flo: Period Tracker,"Take control of your health with the world's leading female health partner*, backed by 100+ doctors and medical experts, recommended by OB-GYNs, and trusted by 420M+ women worldwide.

Whether you're tracking your cycle, trying to conceive (TTC), understanding PMS or PMDD, or navigating pregnancy or perimenopause, Flo is here for every life stage.

Get personalized insights, accurate menstrual cycle predictions, and a better understanding of your ovulation, fertile signs, and overall health with Flo’s period calendar and symptom tracker. Join Flo’s growing community today.

Why choose Flo?
- Trusted by 420M+ worldwide with over 10 million 5-star ratings. 
- Log symptoms daily for smarter cycle tracking, learn what they might mean, and feel more confident during doctor visits.
- Set birth control reminders and share your calendar with a partner to stay in sync.
- Use our ovulation tracker, BBT (basal body temperature) logging, and tips to better recognize when you're more likely to conceive. This is helpful for couples on a TTC journey.
- Check if symptoms match those common in PCOS, endometriosis, uterine fibroids, or perimenopause with our Symptom Checker tool.**
- Sync with your smartwatch or wearable for even deeper tracking and insights.
- Teens can use Flo to understand their first cycles and track symptoms in a safe, supportive space.
- Flo for Partners: Share Flo with your partner to get support during your cycle, make trying to conceive (TTC) a joint effort, or track your pregnancy journey week by week.
- Stay on top of changes caused by hormone shifts during perimenopause with dedicated tracking tools and expert guidance.
- Understanding PMS and PMDD and tracking your mood could help you notice patterns and plan ahead.
- Industry-leading privacy and security with dual ISO certification.
- Optional Anonymous Mode protects your privacy — no one, not even Flo, can identify you through your health data.

Enjoy more with Flo Premium
Premium-only features include:
- Personalized symptom patterns analysis.
- Symptom Checker for PCOS, perimenopause, endometriosis, and more.
- In-depth pregnancy and baby tracking for each milestone.
- Flo for Partners: Full cycle sharing designed for couples.
- 24/7 virtual Health Assistant.
- Expert-reviewed articles, videos, and courses.
- Information around contraception and fertility planning.

Please note: Flo is not a diagnostic tool and should not be used as a method of contraception or to facilitate conception. Predictions and insights provided by the app are intended for informational purposes only and are not a substitute for professional medical advice, diagnosis, or treatment. Always consult a qualified healthcare provider for any health concerns or decisions.

Contact support@flo.health for assistance with our free period calendar and ovulation tracker.

Download Flo today and join the millions of women who trust Flo as their period and menstrual cycle tracker, calendar, and pregnancy app.

* Sensor Tower, August 2023, by downloads.
** Not available in the UK or EU.",Health & Fitness,FLO HEALTH UK LIMITED,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/flo-period-tracker/id1038369065?uo=4,4.76518,1616899,medical
289560144,Pregnancy & Baby Tracker - WTE,"Start tracking your baby's growth today with the pregnancy and baby app chosen by more than 15 million parents.

What to Expect, the world’s best-known, most trusted pregnancy and parenting brand, offers an all-in-one pregnancy and baby tracker app with thousands of medically accurate articles to help you navigate pregnancy and parenthood.

Find guides for each step of your journey, from starting a family and pregnancy through the baby and toddler years.

During Pregnancy
* Due Date Calculator that reveals your due date based on last period, IVF transfer, conception, and ultrasound plus offers fun facts about your baby
* Week-by-week pregnancy tracker with info about baby development and pregnancy symptoms
* Themed baby size comparisons and visual countdown for each week of pregnancy
* Helpful daily tips tailored to where you are in your pregnancy
* Keep track of symptoms, pregnancy weight, kick counts and memories with our My Journal tool
* Expert-reviewed articles on mom’s pregnancy symptoms and health
* Videos showing baby development in utero during each week of pregnancy
* Registry Builder to help you with your baby registry throughout your pregnancy
* Pregnancy Weight Gain Calculator to see how your pregnancy weight is tracking
* Detailed pregnancy and baby product reviews and expert buying guides

After Baby’s Arrival
* Baby Tracker that lets you time and track baby’s feedings, log pump sessions and diaper changes, record tummy time, and more
* Pregnancy month-by-month and milestone tracker for each step of your baby’s life, from the newborn to the toddler stage
* Daily tips customized by baby’s age and stage, your postpartum recovery, and your parenting journey
* Record your postpartum symptoms, medications and memories
* Videos and expert articles about sleep schedules, feeding tips, milestones, and baby’s growth and week by week development
* Medically reviewed articles and info about baby’s health, doctor’s appointments and vaccines 
* Connections in Community groups related to your baby’s birth month, health conditions, parenting styles and more

When Starting a Family
* Ovulation Calculator that pinpoints your most fertile days based on last period and cycle
* Pregnancy Due Date Calculator, which helps you figure out baby’s potential due date when you’re TTC
* Ovulation tracker and early pregnancy signs, plus keep a journal of your feelings when you’re trying to get pregnant
* Expert advice and articles to help you understand your cycle, signs of ovulation and pregnancy, fertility issues, adoption and surrogacy, and more
* Supportive Community groups devoted to preparing for pregnancy and fertility treatments

About Us
All content on the What to Expect app is accurate, up-to-date and regularly reviewed by the What to Expect Medical Review Board and other pregnancy, baby and parenting health experts. It’s in line with the latest evidence-based medical information and accepted health guidelines, including the What to Expect books by Heidi Murkoff.

The medical guidelines and recommendations on the What to Expect app come from highly respected expert organizations including the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists (ACOG), the American Academy of Pediatrics (AAP), and the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC), as well as from peer-reviewed medical journals and other reputable sources.

For more about What to Expect's medical review and editorial policy, visit: https://www.whattoexpect.com/medical-review/

Do not sell my info: https://dsar.whattoexpect.com/

Use our pregnancy tracker app to help with happy, healthy pregnancy & baby! Let’s connect:

* Instagram: @whattoexpect
* Twitter: @WhatToExpect
* Facebook: facebook.com/whattoexpect
* Pinterest: pinterest.com/whattoexpect
* TikTok: @whattoexpect",Medical,"Everyday Health, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/pregnancy-baby-tracker-wte/id289560144?uo=4,4.86566,355357,medical
657189652,Clue Period & Cycle Tracker,"Get to know your menstrual cycle with the award-winning Clue app. Clue makes it easy to stay in sync with your body and track your period, fertility, and cycle-related experiences accurately and effortlessly. 

Whether you’re trying to get pregnant, tracking cycle-related experiences, or navigating the changes of perimenopause, Clue’s got you covered. 

Backed by science and founded and led by women, Clue is trusted by millions of people worldwide. Thanks to our Berlin headquarters, your data with Clue is protected by some of the strictest data privacy laws in the world (GDPR). Your health data will never be sold or disclosed. No matter where you live. 

What can Clue do for you? 

PERIOD & MENSTRUAL CYCLE TRACKING

Clue Period Tracking empowers you to become the expert of your unique body.

• Know when to expect your period and plan ahead with advanced, personalized predictions
• Discover your body’s unique patterns by tracking 100+ experiences connected to your cycle like feelings, PMS, cravings, pain, sex drive, and much more
• Review an analysis of your past periods and cycles, including average cycle length, period length, period flow, and cycle variation
• Log your birth control method, including pills, IUD, ring, patch, and more
• Set up calendar reminders for your period
• Add a widget to your home screen so you can see your current cycle and know when your period is predicted to start
• Sync your period data with Apple Health
• Get answers to your health questions with science-based content that breaks down complicated topics like fertility, STIs, and the science of sex into easy-to-understand articles

FERTILITY & OVULATION CALCULATOR

Clue’s clinically-tested technology takes the mystery out of getting pregnant and can easily tell you your most fertile days.

• Get personalized ovulation and fertility predictions for the best time to try or do home insemination
• Access tips and advice from fertility experts to help you understand the science behind getting pregnant

PREGNANCY TRACKING

• Follow the growth of your baby with weekly updates on size, weight, and development
• Track your body's changes during pregnancy, like increased smell and taste, pregnancy glow, sleep quality, the supplements you take, and more
• Receive weekly tips and support from OB-GYNs and Nurse Midwives

PERIMENOPAUSE

Get support throughout your transition to menopause (a time known as perimenopause)

• Track hot flashes, sleep changes, your mood, and more 
• Stay on top of your changing cycle
• Learn how your body is changing with expert-led articles

Get the most out of Clue, plus access to all four tracking modes (like Clue Conceive and Clue Pregnancy), with a Clue Plus subscription!

A few legal details:

After you choose the Clue subscription that’s right for you & confirm your purchase, the credit card associated with your iTunes Account will be charged. Once purchased, your subscription will automatically renew unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24 hours before the end of the current period. If you currently have a free trial, any unused time will be forfeited when you purchase a subscription.

If you want to renew your subscription, your account will be charged the same amount you paid for your initial subscription, 24 hours before the end of the current period. You can manage or change your subscription at any time, including turning off auto-renewal, by going to the ‘Account Settings’ on your device after the purchase.


Note: Clue should *not* be used as a contraceptive. Clue is made to help people understand their menstrual and reproductive health by tracking their data, as well as predicting fertile days to aid conception. The app does not substitute professional medical advice, diagnosis, or treatment. Your healthcare provider can give you advice on your specific needs and situation.

Helloclue.com
support.helloclue.com

Terms of Service: www.helloclue.com/terms
Privacy Policy: www.helloclue.com/privacy",Health & Fitness,BioWink GmbH,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/clue-period-cycle-tracker/id657189652?uo=4,4.76382,375766,medical
386022579,BabyCenter Track Pregnancy App,"From a top-rated pregnancy and parenting brand, BabyCenter’s pregnancy and baby tracker app guides you through pregnancy and parenting with daily updates and week-by-week baby development information. The BabyCenter community provides resources and information to improve your pregnancy, motherhood and parenting experience.

Enter your baby's due date (or find it using our Pregnancy Due Date Calculator) to customize our pregnancy tracker and get updates timed to your week of pregnancy. State-of-the-art photos and 3-D videos track your baby’s development and growth. Get answers to your pregnancy questions with thousands of medically reviewed articles. 

BabyCenter’s free pregnancy and baby tracker also supports you after your baby’s arrival with daily parenting updates, tools like the Baby Growth Tracker, and baby sleep and feeding guides. 

All health information is written by experts and reviewed and approved by the BabyCenter Medical Advisory Board. These doctors and other professionals ensure that our pregnancy and parenting information is thorough and accurate. 

Pregnancy & Maternity
* Learn about your baby’s growth during pregnancy with our 3-D fetal development videos 
* Get helpful tips about dealing with common pregnancy symptoms 
* Enjoy pregnancy workouts, food guides and nutrition advice tailored to your trimester 
* Use our Pregnancy Calendar to track appointments and symptoms 
* Find the best pregnancy and baby products recommended by parents and editors 
* Choose a name for your baby with our Baby Names Finder 
* Get organized with our comprehensive Baby Registry Checklist 
* Take BabyCenter’s online birth class so you’re prepared for labor and delivery 
* Discover fun baby shower games 
* Get ready for the big day with our printable hospital bag checklist and birth plan. 

Parenthood
* Use our Baby Growth Tracker to chart your baby’s progress 
* Follow along with your baby’s big milestones 
* Get ideas for fun baby games and activities to boost your child’s development 
* Sing your little one to sleep with our lullabies for babies 
* Solve feeding problems with our breastfeeding and formula-feeding tips 

Starting a Family
* Track fertility with our Ovulation Calculator 
* Get tips on how to get pregnant 
* Learn which prenatal vitamins experts recommend 
* Spot the early signs of pregnancy

BabyCenter Community
* Take comfort in this supportive space and connect with parents and parents-to-be during your pregnancy journey 
* Join your Birth Club to meet people with due dates in the same month 
* Ask questions, read stories, and share your pregnancy and parenting experiences

Pregnancy Tools
* Ovulation Calculator: Predict your fertile window while TTC 
* Pregnancy Due Date Calculator: Calculate your baby’s due date 
* Registry Builder: Research your favorite pregnancy and baby products 
* Baby Name Generator: Choose the perfect baby name 
* Baby Kick Tracker: Count your baby’s kicks during pregnancy 
* Baby Growth & Development Tracker: Track your baby’s growth milestones 
* Birth Plan Template: Document your preferences for your birth experience 
* Contraction Timer: Track contractions during late pregnancy and labor 

An Award-Winning Experience
BabyCenter is proud to be recognized by leading organizations for its excellence in delivering expert content and top-of-the-line experiences to the parents who visit our site and use our pregnancy and baby tracker app. https://www.babycenter.com/awards

Do not sell my info: https://www.babycenter.com/0_notice-to-california-consumers_40006872.bc

We value you as a part of the BabyCenter community and would love to hear from you. Please tell us what’s on your mind:
feedback@babycenter.com

Let’s connect!
Facebook: facebook.com/babycenter
Instagram: @babycenter
Twitter: @BabyCenter
Pinterest: pinterest.com/babycenter
YouTube: youtube.com/babycenter

© 2011–2025 BabyCenter, LLC, a Ziff Davis company. All rights reserved.",Health & Fitness,"Everyday Health, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/babycenter-track-pregnancy-app/id386022579?uo=4,4.88759,266040,medical
748920931,MyQuest for Patients,"Take control of your health. 

With the MyQuest app from Quest Diagnostics, all your lab results and appointments are at your fingertips – so you have the information you need to stay healthy: 

•	View your lab results securely and quickly 
•	Find nearby Quest locations that are convenient for you
•	Schedule and manage your appointments 
•	Manage the health of your loved ones with MyCircle 
•	Browse and buy your own tests with QuestDirect 
•	Share your health information with your healthcare providers
•	Integrate your results with Apple Health 

Did you know that people are more likely to know their WiFi password than important health information, such as their blood type, cholesterol, and blood sugar levels? Take control of your health with the MyQuest app, and view your lab results, manage appointments, and more, all in one place.  

Download MyQuest today to get access to an all-new way to manage your healthy journey with Quest.",Medical,"Quest Diagnostics, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/myquest-for-patients/id748920931?uo=4,4.67523,286213,medical
573214169,MediCalc®,"""The standard for clinical calculations and analytics in Medicine™"".

MediCalc® is the best and most innovative Clinical Decision Support tool in the world, now featuring the mCalx™: a game-changer, Master Medical Calculator, for custom, disease- & patient-specific computations. You add equations & scores ad lib to the same panel!. The calx are ""linked"" to the ""dynamic tables"" for visually efficient ""point of care knowledge & info"". MediCalc® is now Integrated with iDox® and ready for your HOSPITAL EHR/EMR.

-----------------------------------
Join our more than half a million users worldwide!  
-----------------------------------
MediCalc® leapfrogs the competition with the most advanced and comprehensive ""Medical Calculator System™"", performing automatic and integrated computation of more than 500 clinical Formulas, Equations & Scores ""commonly used"" in medical practice. In addition, we don't do Advertising!

MediCalc® facilitates the organization and processing of Patient's data. 
It is a physician-friendly™ app, intuitive and very easy to use. 
Available ONLINE (free access & Print options). 

+Unique Clinical decision, reference and productivity tool. 
+Trusted resource with proven and reliable data processing.
+For physicians, residents, med students, PAs and NPs... 
+Developed by Board-certified physicians in the US. 
+Evidence-based and Validated Selection 
+Highly acclaimed, reviewed and tested (since 1996). 

-----------------------------------
The MediCalc® FEATURES:

* Master mCalx™: Customizable Calculator Panel
* dynamic tables, synchronized with calculators
* arithmetical processing
* automatic unit conversion
* MultiCalx™ Panels
* multiple-unit entries
* color-coded normal-abnormal outputs
* normal values (range-checks & limits)
* intuitive user interface
* easy navigation and info access
* Search bar with filters
* smart decimal rounding
* Système International notation
* tables of parameters
* mobile & online (free access)
* fully referenced
* highly organized and standardized

-----------------------------------
MediCalc® CONTENTS:

mCalx™ Master calculator (customizable)
SOFA, qSOFA, LODS, SEPSIS PRO, NEWS, NEWS2
CHADS2, CHA2DS2-VASc, HAS-BLED
PORT Score, CURB-65, SMART-COP, 
IDSA/ATS Criteria for Severe Pneumonia, COPD Calx
Wells Score for PE, DVT, Geneva Score, PESI Score, PE Calx 
SF Syncope Rule, ESCAPE Risk
MAGGIC, GRACE, A FIB master, MESA-CAC
BODE Index, MMRC Dyspnea SSA-a Gradient Master  
Coronary Heart Disease (10y Risk), ASCVD Risk  
Metabolic Syndrome (Met Sx)
NCEP Major Risk factors 
DKA Master
RenalCalc™ Master
LiverCalc™ Master  
GFR Master
Renal Failure Diff. Diagnosis Master 

Cholesterol Master  
Anion Gap Master
Body Metrics Master  
Calorie Master  
BP Mstr, Cardiac Output Mstr, VR Mstr  
Nitrogen & Nutrition Master   
Osmolality Master
O2 Master  
Ped Master 
Anthropometric Master  

Glomerular Filtration Rate (Cockcroft + reverse)
Glomerular Filtration Rate (MDRD-4, MDRD-6, CKD-EPI cr & cis)
Chronic Kidney Disease Classification
Anion Gap, Delta Delta, HCO3 Def
Fractional Excretion of Na+, Urea, K+, Mg, HCO3, PO4
TransTubular Potassium Gradient
Creatinine Cl
Henderson - Hasselbalch Equation
Metabolic Acidosis ""Winter's formula""
Osmolality, BAL
Cardiac Output (Fick)  
Ejection Fraction (EF)
Target Heart Rate (HR_t)
Stroke Volume (SV)
Mean Arterial Pressure (MAP)
Ankle Brachial Index (ABI)
Q-T interval correction  (Q-T_c)
A-a Gradient  (PA-aO2)
Barometric Pressure (PB)
arterial Oxygen Content  (CaO2)
Oxygen Delivery  (DO2)
Vital Capacity (VC )
Bohr equation (Bohr)
Body Mass Index  (BMI) & IBW
Waist to Hip Ratio  (WHR)
Harris Benedict Equation (HBE)
Nitrogen Balance (NB)
Body Fat Percentage (BF%)
Calcium Correction (Ca++_c)
Glucose (estimated average)
Child-Turcotte-Pugh Class
MELD-unos, MELD-Na+
Serum:Ascites Albumin Ratio  (SAAG) (DiscFx)
Absolute Neutrophil Count  (ANC)
NIH SS, ABCD2

Conversion (temp, mass, length)

and many more...",Medical,"ScyMed, Inc",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/medicalc/id573214169?uo=4,4.52381,21,medical
416456429,Leafly: Find Weed Near You,"Leafly is the world's #1 cannabis resource and weed app. Use Leafly to find dispensaries near you, review strains, or order weed delivery.

Millions of people use Leafly's award-winning weed finder app to discover cannabis that's right for them based on reported effects, feelings, and reviews of thousands of marijuana strains. Find nearby legal weed for your medical or recreational needs with our dispensary finder.

Leafly App Features:
- Discover your ideal strains, tinctures, topicals, concentrates, or pot edibles based on thousands of user-submitted reviews.
- Browse strains by desired effects, aromas, flavors, recommended lists, and availability at nearby dispensaries or retail stores.
- Use our dispensary finder to find weed delivery services and pickup options in your area. Locate a doctor, clinic, THC or CBD products, or leave a review.
- Browse menus, view weed deals and specials and read the latest user reviews.
- Receive daily notifications from your favorite medical marijuana dispensaries, retail stores, or weed delivery services.
- Read the latest news and lifestyle information with Leafly News and Learn, where we bring you Cannabis 101 resources, the latest medical studies, legalization updates, and other compelling cannabis content. 
- Watch videos to learn how to use, grow, cook, and create with marijuana.

No matter your preference, the Leafly app will help you choose the right type of weed for you. Whether you're a medical marijuana patient or a recreational cannabis user, you'll love the Leafly app!",Medical,Leafly,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/leafly-find-weed-near-you/id416456429?uo=4,4.82929,274575,medical
505864483,Pregnancy + | Tracker App,"Download the world's leading pregnancy tracker app today, for free week-by-week pregnancy information and articles!

The Pregnancy+ app features expert advice, daily articles, healthcare tips and interactive 3D models so you can track your baby's development. Our pregnancy app has been downloaded over 80 million times by expecting families. Join our worldwide community today! 

Baby Development
► Unique, interactive 3D models showing your baby's development 
► Baby Size Guide helps you visualize your baby's size in fruits, animals & sweets
► Pregnancy Week-by-Week Guides explain what to expect in each pregnancy week
► Simple & informative Pregnancy Timeline highlighting important milestones

Pregnancy Guides & Information
► In-depth Pregnancy Guides covering breastfeeding, exercise, food, twins & more 
► Daily Pregnancy Articles, tailored to your pregnancy stage
► 2D & 3D Scans by pregnancy week for you to browse
► Daily Blog Posts with tips, tricks & helpful advice
► Upload photos in My Bump to create a visual pregnancy diary

Pregnancy Tools
► Pregnancy Due Date Calculator helps you work out when your bundle will arrive
► Kick Counter tracks your baby's movements & activity
► Pregnancy Weight Log helps you keep an eye on changes in your weight
► Contraction Timer measures contractions throughout your labor

Organize & Plan
► Pregnancy Calendar enables you to plan & document your prenatal appointments
► Hospital Bag helps you prepare your hospital visit, for Mother, Birth Partner & Baby
► Birth Plan allows you to customize, organize & export your needs & wishes
► To-Do List & Baby Shopping List for ideas of what you need to do & buy
► Search thousands of Baby Names for inspiration & share your favorites

Our EXCLUSIVE 3D Models
Enjoy our unique 3D models showing your pregnancy's week-by-week development, from blastocyst to fetus to baby. Our 3D models truly help you to connect with the baby growing inside you. 
► Choose from multiple ethnicities
► Zoom in or out & rotate to see the baby's intricate detail
► Watch guided pregnancy week-by-week walk-throughs
► Tap to see baby movements

Pregnancy Articles & Guides
If you're feeling overwhelmed by all the advice out there, don't worry. Our Pregnancy + tracker app will guide you through your pregnancy, week-by-week, keeping you up to date with your baby's development and helping you stay healthy through pregnancy and beyond. The Pregnancy+ app content is written in-house, with the help of medical experts, lactation consultants, midwives and, of course, parents.

Share your journey with friends & family
Our pregnancy tracker app can be personalized so your partner, future grandparents or best friend can join in the fun and follow your baby's development in the womb, from bump to birth! Keep everyone up to date with your pregnancy by inviting them to download the app today.

Follow us on Social Media
Facebook: facebook.com/PregnancyPlusApp
Instagram: @pregnancyplus

◆ Download Pregnancy+ App today ◆

Privacy Policy
https://info.philips-digital.com/PrivacyNotice?locale=en&country=US

Terms of Use
https://info.philips-digital.com/TermsOfUse?locale=en&country=US

Pregnancy+ syncs with Apple’s Health App, but cannot read from or write to the Health App Database unless you grant access.

This app is not intended for medical use, or to replace the advice of a trained medical doctor. Philips Consumer Lifestyle B.V. disclaims any liability for the decisions you make based on this information, which is provided to you on a general information basis only and not as a substitute for personalized medical advice. If you have any concerns about your pregnancy, consult with your doctor or midwife.

The Pregnancy + tracker app wishes you a healthy, full-term pregnancy and a safe delivery.",Medical,Philips Digital UK Limited,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/pregnancy-tracker-app/id505864483?uo=4,4.84384,66969,medical
1351373906,Telehealth by SimplePractice,"Attend your appointment without leaving your home or office, or car, or private outdoor spot. With Telehealth by SimplePractice, clients and clinicians can participate in 100% secure, HIPAA-compliant therapy sessions from anywhere. Start video appointments instantly, no login or password required.",Medical,SimplePractice LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/telehealth-by-simplepractice/id1351373906?uo=4,4.7438,300447,medical
1109518523,myAir™ by Resmed,"Take charge of your sleep therapy success with myAir™, an exclusive app available to Resmed AirSense™ and AirCurve™ users.

GUIDED SETUP

Whether you set up your equipment at home or in person, myAir helps you get started with confidence and ease. The Personal Therapy Assistant* feature provides interactive voice-guided instructions to help you set up your equipment and fit your mask. myAir's Test Drive* feature helps you get comfortable with therapy using your machine at different levels of air pressure. The app also offers a Library of helpful videos and guides that show you how to set up your specific AirSense or AirCurve machine and Resmed mask, as well as how to get comfortable on therapy.

PERSONALIZED SUPPORT

Getting used to therapy can take a little time, but with the right support you can enjoy a great night's sleep. myAir acts like your personal sleep coach. It guides you through therapy and connects you to the support you need, when you need it.

myAir offers tailored coaching, tips and videos to increase your comfort and success. For example, if you have problems with your mask seal, myAir will provide tips about how to fix it. The app also offers a full Library of helpful videos and guides to answer common questions.

Along the way, you'll get email and push notifications that encourage and support you. With regular check-ins*, myAir proactively prompts you to see how your therapy is going and provides coaching if you have problems. With your prior consent, myAir also shares your therapy insights with your healthcare team* so they can be more connected to your care.

SLEEP THERAPY TRACKING

With myAir, you can easily access your daily sleep therapy data to monitor your therapy progress. Simply log in to see your nightly myAir score, which shows how well you slept on therapy at a glance. Detailed metrics help you track your therapy progress over time. You can also download a therapy summary report to keep for your records or share with your healthcare provider.

INTEGRATED WITH HEALTH APPLICATIONS 

myAir integrates with Apple Health and Health Connect to display the health data you track alongside your Resmed therapy data.

Learn more at Resmed.com/myAir.

*Feature available only with an AirSense 11 machine. Not available with AirSense 10 or AirCurve 10.

Note: myAir is available only for Resmed AirSense and AirCurve machines with built-in wireless connectivity. For the AirMini™ machine, please download the AirMini by Resmed app.",Medical,RESMED LTD.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/myair-by-resmed/id1109518523?uo=4,4.65355,85459,medical
542701020,Withings,"Whatever your goal—weight loss, activity, blood pressure management, or better sleep—the Withings App is your gateway to health management, offering education, insights, and a seamless way to stay connected.

Built on clinical expertise, it unifies your health data to drive smarter decisions and lasting results.

YOUR HEALTH ECOSYSTEM, SEAMLESSLY CONNECTED
Easily install all your Withings devices and sync your data to bring your health universe together.

ALL YOUR HEALTH APPS UNIFIED 
Connect your health apps like Apple Health, Strava, MyFitnessPal, and more to centralize your data with ease.

TRUST MEDICAL-GRADE PRECISION, TO DRIVE PROGRESS
Clinical-grade accuracy delivers reliable insights that help you make confident, informed decisions about your health. 
• WEIGHT & BODY COMPOSITION MONITORING
• ACTIVITY MONITORING 
• SLEEP SCORE
• HYPERTENSION MANAGEMENT
• CARDIOVASCULAR DISEASE DETECTION
• MENSTRUAL CYCLE TRACKING 
• NUTRITION TRACKING ""

SHAPE YOUR HEALTH JOURNEY 
Create a tailored health profile, monitor symptoms, and set achievable goals to better understand your body, stay motivated, and improve your health over time

MULTIPLE PROFILES TO TRACK FAMILY HEALTH
Track the health of your entire household from one app and easily share data between profiles for a more connected approach to care.

INSTANTLY SHARE WITH YOUR DOCTOR
Generate secure, shareable reports or send a live link to your health dashboard, giving your healthcare provider immediate access to your most up-to-date metrics.


Withings+ 

POWERING YOUR JOURNEY TO LONGEVITY 
Precision health made personal—AI and in-app cardiologists guiding you forward.
With Withings+, our premium subscription service, you decode your health through clinical reviews and AI assessments, delivering precise, tailored care to strengthen long-term habits and help support your journey toward a better, longer life.

YOUR HEALTH SIMPLIFIED
All metrics consolidated in one powerful Health Improvement Score to guide your long-term health.

SPECIALIST CARE AT YOUR FINGERTIPS
Get your ECG reviewed by a cardiologist within 24 hours — with an average wait time of just 4 hours (Observed Jan–Mar 2025). Feel confident knowing your heart health is in expert hands, quickly and reliably.

DECODE YOUR BODY 
With Withings Intelligence, experience around-the-clock AI-driven insights, smart trend analysis, and personalized coaching to help you take control of your health. 

YOUR WEEKLY HEALTH BREAKDOWN
Track your strengths and weaknesses each week to refine and boost your Health Improvement Score.

EXCLUSIVE HEALTH CONTENT
Explore personalized tips, articles, recipes, and more—curated to support your health and wellness.

ABOUT WITHINGS
​​Withings creates clinically validated health devices embedded in beautifully designed, easy-to-use products. A universe of insights all synced to a single source of truth, providing you with the ultimate way to stay connected to your health.

Terms of use:https://www.withings.com/legal/applications-conditions#/legal/services-terms-and-conditions
Privacy policy: https://www.withings.com/legal/applications-conditions#/legal/privacy-policy
Medical compliance: https://www.withings.com/eu/en/compliance?srsltid=AfmBOoovZiYectAmYJC5gs2HhHrMxHAhPdN4NFQQI5RSImnQdrLoxKSc",Health & Fitness,Withings,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/withings/id542701020?uo=4,4.58043,319560,medical
478687481,Rain Rain Sleep Sounds,"Trouble sleeping? Rain Rain® helps you fall asleep fast! Let over 100 high-quality endless sounds lull you to sleep in no time, with more sounds added all the time. Mix and match any combination of sounds and save your favorite combinations. Download the app that over eight million people have used to fall asleep today!

Works great for: Insomnia - Anxiety - Tinnitus - Working from Home - Studying - AND MUCH MORE

Instead of keeping you awake, your phone can help you sleep!

Here are the top sounds being listened to this week:
Rain Rain Original, Thunderstorm, Rain on a Tent, Rain Rain 3D, Ocean Waves, Summer Rain, Forest Rain, City Rain, Thunder Cracks, Rain Downpour, Crackling Fire, Slow Stream, Desert Wind, Blizzard Wind, Pink Noise, Airliner, Car in the Rain, Windy Storm, Rain Dripping, Gentle Stream, Chill Beats, Cat Purring and Shih Tzu Snoring.

Rain Rain includes for FREE:
• 50+ HD sounds
• No limit on playback time
• Every fade-out timer option
• Mixer - combine multiple sounds with individual volume
• Oscillator - vary sound volume with customizable speed
• Soften - muffle higher frequencies with adjustable dampening
• No audio or video ads; there is a small image banner ad at the bottom
• Use for as long as you like; Rain Rain is not a trial!
• Full support for background audio, AirPlay, and Bluetooth devices

Subscribing to Rain Rain Premium gives you 60+ additional sounds as well as an ad-free experience. Rain Rain Premium includes a free 7-day trial which only begins if you select it within the application and confirm with your Apple ID, Touch ID or Face ID, so you don't have to worry about being charged accidentally. 

MIXER: Combine sounds control the volume of each. Want to hear a campfire in the rain? How about a washing machine and a dryer? It's all possible with the Mixer. Save your favorite sound combinations. Your custom mixes are synchronized between all of your iOS devices with iCloud.

FADE-OUT TIMER: Set Rain Rain to gently fade out and then turn off after a specified duration so that you can get to sleep without leaving your phone or tablet on all night. The Fade-out Timer learns your preferences and automatically starts the next time you use Rain Rain.

BEDTIME REMINDER: The first step to a better night's sleep is a healthy sleep schedule. Get to bed on-time with Rain Rain's Bedtime Reminder by setting the time and days you want a reminder. Rain Rain sends you a gentle, encouraging message when it is time to go to bed so that you can get the rest you deserve.

OSCILLATOR: Customize your experience with the Oscillator, which slowly fades a sound in and out, allowing you to create dynamic, varying soundscapes in concert with the Mixer. You can even adjust how fast the Oscillator changes the volume. When you save a Mix to your Favorites, your Oscillator settings are saved as well, allowing you to save and recall any number of custom soundscapes.

SOFTEN: Adjust the tone of each sound to suit your needs with Soften, which reduces the high frequencies of any sound by an amount you choose. This makes the sound seem as if it is coming from another room or outside, as sometimes you want to sleep with rain outside, not pouring on your head. Soften takes care of any worries about the sound being harsh, tinny, or hissy when played on small speakers or even the built-in iPhone or iPad speakers. Your chosen levels for Soften are stored when you save a Mix to your Favorites to help you create the perfect scenes.

Terms of Use: https://www.rainrainapp.com/tou
Privacy Policy: https://www.rainrainapp.com/privacy

Download Rain Rain today and get a better night's sleep tonight!",Health & Fitness,Tim Gostony,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/rain-rain-sleep-sounds/id478687481?uo=4,4.84676,128111,medical
638021335,Glow Ovulation & Period App,"Glow is the most comprehensive period tracker and fertility app in the world. With Glow, you can track your menstrual cycle, ovulation, and fertility signs, all in one place. Glow also provides you with personalized insights and advice to help you understand your body and improve your chances of getting pregnant.

FEATURES
- Track your menstrual cycle: Glow makes it easy to track your menstrual cycle. Simply input the start and end dates of your period, and Glow will do the rest. Glow will track your cycle length, flow, and symptoms, and provide you with insights into your unique cycle patterns.
- Ovulation tracking: Glow's ovulation tracker is one of the most accurate on the market. Glow uses advanced algorithms to predict your fertile window and ovulation day, so you can know when you're most likely to get pregnant.
- Fertility sign tracking: In addition to tracking your menstrual cycle and ovulation, Glow also allows you to track other fertility signs, such as basal body temperature, cervical mucus, and sexual activity. This information can help you to better understand your fertility and make informed decisions about your reproductive health.
- Personalized insights: Glow provides you with personalized insights and advice based on your cycle data. This information can help you to understand your body better, improve your chances of getting pregnant, and manage your menstrual cycle.
- Community support: Glow also has a large and supportive community of users. You can connect with other women who are trying to conceive, get advice from experts, and share your experiences.
- Apple Health Integration: Sync data between Glow and Apple Health app.

BENEFITS
- Improve your chances of getting pregnant: Glow's ovulation tracker and fertility sign tracking tools can help you to better understand your fertility and make informed decisions about your reproductive health. This can help you to improve your chances of getting pregnant.
- Manage your menstrual cycle: Glow's menstrual cycle tracking tool can help you to track your cycle length, flow, and symptoms. This information can help you to better understand your cycle and manage your menstrual symptoms.

SUBSCRIPTION INFORMATION
Glow is free to download and use. Upgrading to Glow Premium will unlock: 
- Advanced Cycle Chart
- Cycle Analysis
- Comparative Insights
- Forecast
- Advanced BBT chart
- Premium Articles
- Private messaging
- Custom profile
- Premium support
- (More premium features will be coming soon!)

Glow offers quarterly and yearly subscription options: 
- Payment will be charged to your iTunes Account at the confirmation of purchase. 
- Subscription automatically renews unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24-hours before the end of the current period.
- Your iTunes Account will be charged for renewal within 24-hours prior to the end of the current period. 
- Subscriptions may be managed and auto-renewal may be turned off by going to your Account Settings in iTunes after purchase. 

This is modern care for your fertility. Track your cycle with our ovulation calculator and learn more about your reproductive health every time you log on. Easily record your physical symptoms, sexual activity, and day-to-day moods to help you increase your chances of getting pregnant. The Glow app allows users to track their menstrual cycles, and to make informed decisions about the optimal time to conceive. The Glow App is intended as an aid in ovulation prediction to facilitate conception ( not to be used for contraception ).

For full Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service:
https://glowing.com/privacy-policy/
https://glowing.com/terms-of-service/

**Note: The information provided by Glow should not replace professional medical advice. Always consult with a healthcare provider for medical advice. If you are having technical issues or have any questions about your cycle or period, we're here to help. Please send us an email to: support@glowing.com",Health & Fitness,"Glow, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/glow-ovulation-period-app/id638021335?uo=4,4.71308,69218,medical
1002275138,Glow Eve Period Tracker,"Eve by Glow is a savvy period tracker and sex app for women who want to take control of their health and sex lives. Eve predicts your next period and your chances of pregnancy. Track your moods and symptoms to discover trends in your cycles. Own your cycle and feel good in bed. Get it, girl.

PERIOD & HEALTH TRENDS UNLOCKED
+ Log to keep track of sex, moods & symptoms.
+ Quick, elegant logging at any time of day or night.
+ See your health data visualized in beautiful charts.
+ Identify trends and patterns unique to your body.
+ Compatible with the Health App for tracking Sleep, Steps, Walking+Running, Height, Weight, Date of Birth, Water, and of course, menstrual health (Menstruation, Sexual Activity, Spotting).

INTERACTIVE PERIOD & CYCLE TRACKING
+ Fastest and easiest way to track your period.
+ Interactive staircase helps you see your cycle history in a whole new way.
+ Forecast your ovulation and upcoming period with period tracker predictions that are refined over time.
+ Review past periods and menstrual cycles to better understand your cycle.
+ Calendar views on period tracker show your upcoming period.

EPIC COMMUNITY
+ Community provides an extended friend group for discussing sex & health.
+ Ask the community anything--nothing is off limits.
+ Learn from other women who have been there before.

SUBSCRIPTION INFORMATION
Eve by Glow is free to download and use. Upgrading to Glow Premium will unlock: 
- Advanced Cycle Chart
- Cycle Analysis
- Comparative Insights
- Forecast
- Advanced BBT chart
- Premium Articles
- Private messaging
- Custom profile
- Premium support
- (More premium features will be coming soon!)

Eve offers quarterly and yearly subscription options: 
- Payment will be charged to your iTunes Account at the confirmation of purchase. 
- Subscription automatically renews unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24-hours before the end of the current period.
- Your iTunes Account will be charged for renewal within 24-hours prior to the end of the current period. 
- Subscriptions may be managed and auto-renewal may be turned off by going to your Account Settings in iTunes after purchase. 

For full Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service:
https://glowing.com/privacy
https://glowing.com/tos

CONNECT WITH US
Web - http://www.glowing.com
Facebook - http://www.facebook.com/glow

**Note: The information provided by Glow should not replace professional medical advice. Always consult with a healthcare provider for medical advice. If you are having technical issues or have any questions about your cycle or period, we're here to help. Please send us an email to: support@glowing.com",Health & Fitness,"Glow, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/glow-eve-period-tracker/id1002275138?uo=4,4.6673,111971,medical
719135369,Ovia Pregnancy & Baby Tracker,"We are moving to the new Ovia app! 

The new Ovia experience combines Ovia and Ovia Pregnancy into one single experience. Now,
the Ovia app encompasses: cycle tracking, trying to conceive, fertility predictions, pregnancy,
postpartum care, perimenopause, and menopause.

This gives you one single, robust experience to access your health goals and receive personalized content, data tracking and interventions based on your unique journey without having to download another app.

As always, you can still choose your personal health journeys and select your goals, and update them any time they may change. Our content is thoughtfully personalized for your health journey based on your mode you select.

Current users who are already registered and active in the legacy Pregnancy app will need to download and login into Ovia with the same email and password combination that they use for Ovia Pregnancy. Once logged into Ovia, their profile and data will be automatically imported and
available.

Search for Ovia in the app store to download the new Ovia Cycle & Pregnancy Tracker app today!  The legacy Ovia Pregnancy & Baby Tracker app will no longer be available starting next month.

Discover the newly refreshed Ovia Cycle & Pregnancy Tracker app by searching for ""Ovia"" in the App Store and downloading it today!",Medical,"Ovuline, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/ovia-pregnancy-baby-tracker/id719135369?uo=4,4.86915,103209,medical
779656557,Baby Tracker - Newborn Log,"Baby Tracker features native user interface for both iPhone and iPad, and is the only log for your baby’s health that allows syncing among multiple devices without compromising your privacy.

Designed by busy parents, for busy parents, Baby Tracker offers a simple, streamlined way to track your baby’s daily habits, health, and exciting “firsts” of those precious early days and months. Record feedings, diaper changes, and sleep patterns with a quick one-handed tap, then feel free to go back later and add details and even photos. 

Baby Tracker makes it simple to track all of your child’s important information for doctors and caregivers, as well as share all the exciting milestones of his or her development with friends and family. Perhaps most importantly, Baby Tracker handles all the details so you never have to take significant time away from the joys of parenting. 

Comprehensive Feedings Tracker
* Start and stop nursing timer with one tap for convenience and accuracy
* Settings for nursing, formula, solids, or any combination.
* Track time nursing per breast and total for full nursing session
* Tracks pumping totals as well as feedings
* Notes section allows you to enter details on formula brand, preferences, or allergic response 

Track Diaper Changes
* Summary screen shows time of last changing, along with feedings, and sleep schedule
* Accurate records mean faster response time for concerns like dehydration, constipation, or diarrhea
* Easily share documentation on bowel habits with doctors or caregivers

Sleep Schedule
* Know exactly the date that your baby starts sleeping through the night
* Recognize nap time and nighttime sleep patterns to better plan your day or share with caregivers
* Compare against other data to more easily track down potential causes for baby’s fussiness
* Set alarms for putting baby down or to create more structured nighttime feeding sessions

Growth Records
* Enter measurement data and compare against World Health Organization averages
* See baby’s progress and growth over weeks, months, and years
* Look at logs to compare them for a more comprehensive overview of your baby’s health and wellbeing. 

Milestones
* Make custom categories for baby’s first smile, first tooth, or first step
* Snap a picture on the spot, or add one from your existing library
* Use photos for a gallery-style album of baby’s goals and achievements
* Create an entry with a quick tap, or include journal notes for more detail

Health
* Log medical history such as medications, vaccine shots, and temperature checks

Data Interpretation
* View logged data by day, week, or month
* Shows previous 7 days and previous 30 days
* Quickly identify data patterns, habitual trends, or abnormalities
* Export data via email as a PDF
* Print directly from app to add physical copies to your personal records

Data Sync and Auto Backup
* Works with iCloud or Dropbox for secure, cloud-based auto backup
* Sync data among multiple devices for all caregivers or easy sharing of your baby’s progress with others
* Clone data to another device using AirDrop for a fast transfer that doesn’t eat up your data plan",Medical,Nighp Software LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/baby-tracker-newborn-log/id779656557?uo=4,4.8047,220413,medical
568940747,Pregnancy & Baby App: The Bump,"The Bump’s free pregnancy app is the most loved baby and pregnancy tracker for expecting and new parents, providing features you won’t find on other baby apps:

** FEATURES **

HOW BIG IS BABY
The Bump is the original home of the cute fruit.

Prepare to smile and look forward to each week: The Bump compares baby’s growth in utero to beautifully illustrated produce  (“Baby Is As Big As a Peach”) in a way that’s fun and easy to share with friends and family.

Discover comprehensive updates about the changes and developments happening to both baby and your body while you’re pregnant, and learn how best to plan ahead.
 
BABY NAMES
From name length and style to country of origin and meaning, you’ll find baby’s name in one of The Bump’s specially curated lists. 
 
INSIDE THE BUMP
See an exciting and exclusive 3D interactive visualization of baby's week-by-week growth. Interact and learn new facts about baby like never before with the next step in baby growth trackers.

DAILY ADVICE
Every day, the award-winning editorial staff of The Bump delivers fresh and relevant content for your specific week of pregnancy. The articles are timely and comprehensive: always know what’s safe and standard; find out how to ward off morning sickness; learn the best things to pack in your hospital bag; and discover the best prenatal workouts for you.
 
TOOLS
The Bump’s comprehensive suite of helpful tools makes it the versatile free baby app for you. Stay up to date on you and baby’s progress with invaluable tools like the pregnancy countdown tool, the journal, baby growth tracker, a due date calculator, a kick counter, a pregnancy weight gain tracker, and a contraction counter to determine when it’s time to enact your birth plan. And the Bump’s food safety tool provides nutritional guidance and helpful information throughout your pregnancy.

PLANNER+
A feature that equips every expecting mom with important information about their prenatal doctor visits. It suggests questions to ask your doctor and integrates appointments seamlessly with your mobile phone's  calendar.

REGISTRY
The Bump is solving two of Baby Registry’s biggest challenges:

+ The Bump has collected the top registry products across Amazon, Target, Walmart and so much more, complete with reviews from parents who’ve been where you are. This registry has only grown over time, so you can be sure you’ll find everything you want and need.

+ The typical mom-to-be will register at two or more stores, because there are always some items that require a special, secondary registry. When it comes to managing multiple registries, the Bump has you covered. The Bump will automatically track your registries across each retailer, so you can keep tabs on what you’ve registered for, what’s been bought and what’s still waiting on your registry.

PREGNANCY AND BABY PHOTOS
Document your pregnancy by creating a weekly album of your happily growing belly. And once baby is born, the album expands to track their first amazing year in the world.

CUSTOMER SERVICE
The Bump team reads every email, answers each phone call and takes all of your reviews to heart.
 
Here's what our users are saying:

“My OBGYN recommended this app because it has the most accurate information regarding pregnancy.” c_nou

“I’ve loved this app throughout my pregnancy. It’s fun to keep track of development milestones by week, well written weekly summaries, and links to endless, timely additional articles and resources. My favorite feature is the 3D view of both baby and bump that points out fun facts about physical developments that week or relevant symptoms.”  Allie_G
 
“Loved it during and post pregnancy” cwebs234
 
“Love the tips and progress tracking” Ki_Nap
 
Privacy Policy:
https://www.thebump.com/privacy-policy
Terms and Conditions:
https://www.thebump.com/terms
Do Not Sell My Info:
https://theknotww.zendesk.com/hc/en-us/requests/new?ticket_form_id=360000590371
CA Privacy: 
https://www.theknotww.com/ca-collection-notice",Health & Fitness,The Knot Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/pregnancy-baby-app-the-bump/id568940747?uo=4,4.83802,34201,medical
703547387,Life - Period Tracker Calendar,"Life Period Tracker lets you track your period, predict your ovulation, schedule cycle reminders, track your symptoms, moods, and more! Upgrade to Premium and track your health using all nine new health trackers! Track sex, fertility, weight, nutrition, fitness, sleep, medication, health, and even keep a diary! Download the best and most customizable women's health tracker on the App Store!

***We take your privacy very seriously! Unlike many other women's health apps, we don't require your email address to sign up and we don't sell or share your personal health data. All proceeds come from your support. It's your Life and it should stay with you!***

---

REVIEWS 
5/5 ""Best period tracker ever!!"" 
5/5 ""Great features, great design"" 
5/5 ""Beautiful UI, period tracking is all grown up"" 
5/5 ""Slick, Sexy, & Accurate"" 
5/5 ""Finally, a sophisticated adult period app"" 
5/5 ""All I need in one app :)"" 
5/5 ""PERFECT!!"" 
5/5 ""Super easy and gorgeous!""

---

INNOVATIVE CALENDAR
We weren't satisfied with the methods other apps used to enter women's cycle dates. We went through hundreds of prototypes before we were satisfied with the result. 

PERIOD TRACKER
We wanted a display that was simple yet beautiful. A page that could be viewed with only a passing glance yet still has its own personality. 

OVULATION PREDICTIONS
Viewing your ovulation predictions is fast and easy with our calculator. Gone are the days of information clutter.

IRREGULAR CYCLE SUPPORT
By default, the app defines cycles as irregular if the cycle has a length of less than 21 days or over 36 days but these values are easily personalized to fit your needs within Settings. 

MENSTRUAL HISTORY
The menstrual history was visually optimized to include thoughtful choices with an easy-to-read vertical orientation. 

CYCLE HISTORY 
The days of difficult-to-create reminders are over. Our cycle reminders are easy to create, modify, and set.

SYMPTOM TRACKER 
One of the best features: each symptom can be kept as a separate entry for later analysis or to share with your physician. 

---

***Subscribe to Premium and unlock Life's full potential!!***

PREMIUM TRACKERS 
• Sex Tracker
• Weight Tracker
• Fitness Tracker
• Fertility Tracker + Temperature
• Medication Tracker
• Health Tracker
• Personal Diary
• Pregnancy Tracker

PREMIUM ESSENTIALS
• Full Access to Livia - Your AI Assistant for Health Insights
• Share the Cycle with your Partner
• No Ads
• Custom Wallpaper
• Year Calendar
• PDF & CSV Data Export

PREMIUM REMINDERS
• Birth Control (Pill, Patch & Ring)
• Custom Reminders
• Extra Cycle Reminders
• Fertility Reminders
• Period Late Reminder

PREMIUM CUSTOMIZATION
• Create Custom Tags
• Hide Irrelevant Tags
• Hide Irrelevant Trackers
• Hide Fertility & Ovulation
• Tag Filter

PREMIUM HISTORY & ANALYSIS
• Full Timeline View
• Analyze Your Entries by Tag
• View Your Entries by Tracker
• Search Your Entries by Year

*Life integrates with HealthKit, allowing you to automatically synchronize your data with the Health app.
**Life app does not replace professional medical advice or contraception. Always consult a doctor for health concerns.


SUBSCRIPTION INFO:

Subscribe for Premium features.
• Options: Weekly, Monthly.
• Payment charged to iTunes Account at confirmation.
• Manage subscriptions and auto-renewal in Account Settings after purchase.
• Auto-renews unless turned off 24 hours before period ends.
• Renewal charged within 24 hours before period ends.
• Subscriptions remain active until end of period; no refunds for cancellation.
• Unused trial forfeited upon purchase.


Terms of service: https://www.appholdings.org/termsofuse.html
Privacy policy: http://appholdings.org/privacypolicy.html
Contact us at life@appholdings.org",Health & Fitness,Life Fertility Tracker IVS,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/life-period-tracker-calendar/id703547387?uo=4,4.75961,62061,medical
570244389,Ovia Cycle & Pregnancy Tracker,"Whether you're tracking your period, trying to get pregnant, monitoring your pregnancy, or tracking your health, join millions worldwide and download the Ovia app.  

Voted one of the best pregnancy and fertility tracker apps, Ovia helps you stay on top of your reproductive health—track your pregnancy, menstrual cycle, period and ovulation predictions, postpartum recovery, perimenopause symptoms, menopause support, and overall wellness, all in one place!

YOUR HEALTH IN YOUR HANDS
◆ Period & Fertility calendar - Fertility forecasting algorithm predicts your fertility widows and ovulation cycles.
◆ Pregnancy - Baby growth calendar, due date countdown, bump and fetal movement tracker, and more. Watch your baby grow, track your symptoms, and learn what to expect each week.  
◆ Postpartum Experience - personalized recovery modes based on delivery (vaginal, c-section, VBAC), symptom tracking, and more.
◆ Perimenopause & Menopause support - comprehensive health tracking for real-time alerts & personalized feedback.
◆ Access over 2,000 free expert articles on fertility, ovulation, conception, postpartum, menopause & reproductive health.

OVULATION CALCULATOR & FERTILITY TRACKER
◆ Fertile window and ovulation time predictions and a daily fertility score. An ovulation app that helps you know when you’re ovulating when trying to conceive (TTC).
◆ Daily TTC tips and period cycle insights delivered to your timeline.

PERIOD AND MENSTRUAL CYCLE TRACKER
◆ Ovia is not only a period tracker, it also helps you keep track of your overall health.
◆ Customizable data logging inclusive of symptoms, moods, sex, and nutrition. 
◆ Support for regular & irregular menstrual cycles.  
◆ Birth control tracking

PREGNANCY & POSTPARTUM
◆ A personalized, 12-month program focused on birth recovery, postpartum conditions and complications, reproductive planning, return to work support, mental health, and more.

PERIMENOPAUSE & MENOPAUSE SUPPORT
◆ Symptom tracking, education, and support to navigate perimenopause and menopause confidently. 

STAY UP TO DATE ON YOUR PREGNANCY WITH ESSENTIALS
◆Pregnancy Week by Week: Know what to expect each week with a baby due date countdown and weekly videos and content about pregnancy symptoms, body changes, and baby tips.
◆ Pregnancy Tracker and Baby Growth Calendar: Compare your baby’s weekly size to a fruit, toy, pastry item, or animal. View 3D illustrations of your baby each week and track baby’s growth. 
◆My Baby Names: Swipe through thousands of baby names and save your favorites.
◆Baby Hand and Foot Size: See a life-size image of how big your baby's hands and feet are today compared to how big they'll be at your due date!
◆Bump Tracker: Keep a record of your growing baby bump in countdown.
◆Safety Lookup Tools: Use lookup tools for symptoms and food safety.
◆Kick Counter & Contraction Timer: Count baby kicks and contractions as your due date approaches.

OTHER FEATURES OUR MEMBERS LOVE
◆ Friends & Family Sharing: Add your spouse, partner, sibling, or your BFF to share your daily updates. 
◆ Privacy and Security: Add an extra layer of protection by adding a PIN to your account.
◆ Apple Health & Fitbit Integrations: Share data from Ovia to the Apple Health app. Sync your Fitbit to share steps, sleep & weight with Ovia.

OVIA HEALTH
Ovia Health is the leading digital health companion for women across their entire health journey, from general and preventive health through perimenopause and menopause.

Have Ovia Health through your employer or health plan? Download the app, enter your plan info, and access premium tools like health coaching, personalized content, and programs for birth control tracking, endometriosis, PCOS, and more.

CUSTOMER SERVICE
We're always working to improve your experience with our products. Email us at support@oviahealth.com",Medical,"Ovuline, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/ovia-cycle-pregnancy-tracker/id570244389?uo=4,4.82477,82535,medical
720207987,Allē,"Allē is your go-to app for your aesthetic needs, giving you access to curated content, treatment information, exclusive offers, and your Allē Wallet.

With Allē, you can earn and save on aesthetic products and treatments at your participating provider.

Allē’s app gives you access to all that Allē offers, including Allē Flash, which enables you to scan for a surprise offer while at your provider’s office.

Simply log in to your Allē Account within the app and you’re all set. Or, download the app and create a new account in a few simple steps. 

Now, let’s see what’s inside. With the Allē app, you can:

Scan for Surprise Savings In-Office:
Earn a surprise offer at your Allē provider’s office. Just scan the Allē Flash QR code when you arrive, and you may receive an additional offer that can be redeemed instantly. 

Browse Offers from the Palm of your Hand:
Take advantage of exclusive offers for Allē Members that you can redeem right away.

Read up on the Latest in Aesthetic Treatments:
Learn about products and treatments that might be right for you. Search for Allē treatments and browse educational articles within the app.

Access your Wallet in a Few Taps:
Check your point balance and your membership status, view your transaction history, available offers, and more. 

Purchase and Send Gift Cards to other Allē Members:
Never worry about losing a gift card again. Allē’s digital gift cards are added directly to your Wallet upon purchase and can be easily gifted to other Allē Members.

The Allē app makes it easier than ever to manage your aesthetics rewards. It’s all just a tap away. Download today.

Instagram: @Alle
Facebook: @Alle",Medical,"Allergan, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/all%C4%93/id720207987?uo=4,4.8742,12846,medical
1356589861,BioLife Plasma Services,"Donating plasma just got easier with the BioLife Plasma Services mobile app.

BioLife Plasma Services is part of Takeda TKPHF (OTCMKTS), the leading global biotechnology company focused on serving people affected by rare diseases and highly specialized conditions. These diseases are often misunderstood, undiagnosed and life-threatening. 


Key Features:
Scheduling
• Scheduling appointments is even easier now with one click scheduling on-the-go

Check Reward Payments
• Reward payment balance is easily accessible on the home screen
• Quick reference to payment history

Promotional Offers
• Receive notifications for exclusive offers 
• Track your donation progress towards promotional rewards
• Refer-a-friend via text, email or social and qualify to receive a Buddy Bonus",Medical,Takeda Pharmaceuticals International AG,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/biolife-plasma-services/id1356589861?uo=4,2.50305,2952,medical
500772134,PulsePoint Respond,"PulsePoint Respond is a 911-connected mobile app that can immediately inform you of emergencies occurring in your community and can request your help when cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) is needed nearby. If you’re trained in CPR and are willing to assist in an emergency, the app will alert you if someone near you is having a cardiac emergency and may need CPR.

In addition to nearby “CPR Needed” notifications, you can choose to be notified of other events that may impact you and your family, such as wildland fires, flooding and utility emergencies. You can also monitor live dispatch radio traffic for most PulsePoint-connected communities with a simple tap on the speaker icon.

PulsePoint currently provides coverage for thousands of communities in North America, with many more on the way. For more information, visit pulsepoint.org, contact us at info@pulsepoint.org.

PulsePoint Respond is an end-to-end FirstNet Certified™ application. FirstNet Certified solutions must demonstrate 99.99% availability and pass independent third-party security, data privacy and performance audits.

PulsePoint is a 501(c)(3) public non-profit foundation building applications that help public safety agencies inform and engage their citizens.

NOTE: Continued use of GPS running in the background can dramatically decrease battery life. Your actual experience is always visible in Settings | Battery | PulsePoint.",Medical,PulsePoint Foundation,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/pulsepoint-respond/id500772134?uo=4,4.79763,234819,medical
855275752,Qardio heart health,"Qardio makes it easy to manage your heart health. Record and store your vitals, and have the power to make more informed health choices. Track blood pressure, irregular heartbeat, 12 body composition metrics (BMI, body fat %, muscle %, bone %, water %, etc.), weight, temperature, blood oxygen and pulse rate.

The Qardio app works exclusively with our award-winning devices: QardioArm smart blood pressure monitor, QardioBase X smart body composition scale, QardioTemp forehead thermometer and QardioSpO2 pulse oximeter. Get your Qardio device at qardio.com or Amazon.

MEDICALLY ACCURATE
Qardio devices are clinically validated, generating accurate blood pressure, weight management and heart health data with medical precision.

SIMPLE TO USE
Easy to set up and pair with any Qardio device. Take a measurement with the touch of a button.
There is no need for pen and paper, as all your measurements are conveniently stored on your phone or smart device and accessible whenever you need it.

EASY TO UNDERSTAND
You can track your progress with smart charts, stats and trends, set up goals and reminders and find out how your lifestyle impacts your health.

SHARE YOUR DATA
Share your numbers with your doctor between visits so they can give you more personalized care and identify changes earlier. Give peace of mind to family and friends by sharing data, and notifying them when a measurement has been taken.

WORKS WITH APPLE HEALTH AND APPLE WATCH
Qardio and Apple Health work seamlessly together, enabling easier health tracking with all your health and wellness information in one place.
 
QARDIO+ SUBSCRIPTION 
 
Qardio App offers an auto-renewing monthly subscription for QardioArm users called Qardio+. This monthly subscription includes a medically detailed auto generated health summary report, data enriched with weather and air quality information, medication tracking, dedicated customer support, etc., for just $9.99/month.

**Featured in Forbes, The New York Times, The Huffington Post, GQ, Vogue, NBC, The Financial Times, WIRED, Wall Street Journal, BBC, PC Magazine, Vanity Fair and many more.**

Qardio is for anyone who wants to take control of their heart health, improve fitness and achieve their health goals. It is also for people with a heart condition or chronic condition, which needs to be monitored or improved, and for those recommended by their doctor to track their blood pressure and manage their heart health.

Compatible with iOS version 12.4 and higher, Apple Watch and Siri.

Privacy is at the core of our business. Data is stored and protected with the most advanced systems and technologies. Qardio App has voice-over functionality for the visually impaired.

QardioArm and QardioCore have regulatory clearance in the United States, the European Economic Area, Australia and Canada.
QardioBase X has regulatory clearance in the United States, the European Economic Area and Australia. 
QardioTemp and QardioSpO2 have regulatory clearance in the United States and the European Economic Area.

Qardio’s products and application should be only used in conjunction with professional medical advice, diagnosis, or treatment, and not as a substitute, or a replacement for it.

Terms of Use: https://www.apple.com/legal/internet-services/itunes/dev/stdeula/",Health & Fitness,"Qardio, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/qardio-heart-health/id855275752?uo=4,4.59249,18115,medical
1089747982,MedBridge GO for Patients,"The MedBridge GO mobile app for patients gets you moving! Keep up with your home exercise program in the app powered by award-winning content and technology.

Patients can also set reminders, track overall progress, and view all of the Patient Education materials included by their therapist, from 3D models and explanatory exercise videos to clinician notes and PDF guides.

Follow these two steps to get moving:
1. Enter the access code from your provider to sync your program
2. Tap 'GO' to follow along with the exercise videos as they play on-screen",Health & Fitness,MedBridge Education LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/medbridge-go-for-patients/id1089747982?uo=4,4.75621,107398,medical
515430900,1-800 Contacts,"The 1-800 Contacts app is the fastest, easiest, and downright pleasantest (totally a word) way to order contact lenses. 

WE HAVE ALL THE CONTACTS

We have millions of contact lenses in stock and ready to ship. They’re the same contacts your doctor prescribed but they cost less and you don’t have to go into a doctor’s office to buy them. Same Prescription. Better Experience. ™

SUPER SIMPLE ORDERING

Ordering for the first time? Enter your prescription information or simply scan the lens box to import your prescription. Done. Ordered with us before? Re-order in three simple taps. (Pssst. Protip: Get faster shipping when you upload a picture of your paper prescription.)

RENEW YOUR PRESCRIPTION WITH EXPRESSEXAM™ 

Tired of paying for an online eye exam for contacts every year just to get the same prescription? Want to skip the trip to the doctor's office? Use our app to take a quick online vision exam with ExpressExam and renew your contact prescription. A board-certified eye doctor will issue a new prescription within a couple of hours.

FIND THE CONTACTS THAT WORK BEST FOR YOU

With ExpressExam you can receive multiple prescriptions so you can find the contacts that work best for your eyes, lifestyle, and budget. Try something new. Returns and exchanges are free – including shipping.

DON’T LEAVE MONEY ON THE TABLE

We’ve partnered with major vision insurance companies so we can quickly find and apply your benefits when you order from the app.

MANAGE YOUR SUBSCRIPTION

If you’ve subscribed you can easily manage your orders: snooze, cancel, update a prescription, etc.

OUR GAJILLION PERCENT PROMISE

(Because “100% satisfaction guaranteed” doesn’t cut it.)
• Free shipping and returns? Always.
• Tear a lens? We'll replace it for free.
• Still have contacts from your old prescription? We'll exchange them for free.
• Find a lower price? We’ll beat it.
• And the best customer service in the industry…

WE’RE AVAILABLE TO HELP 24/7

Call, email, or text us right from the app. You’ll receive a prompt reply from a real, live person with an adorable Utah accent who really wants to help you. (NOTE: You only get the adorable accent if you call).

Yup. Downloading the 1-800 Contacts app could be the best choice you make today.

PRIVACY

In order to provide great features, and to continually make the app better, some privacy-related data may be collected. Specifically, we request your location if you take our ExpressExam (since it’s only available in certain states), or when searching for your doctor. ExpressExam also needs to use your camera and microphone so we can verify you are reading the letters from an eye chart correctly. Any time we need to access this data, we make sure to request your permission first! In addition, you can choose to send us a photo of your prescription as a convenience. If you choose to enter your purchase information, we will save it so that you don’t have to re-enter it again. We also support Apple Pay! We only keep the purchase history of products you buy from us -- we don’t have access to any other purchase information. These features are all optional and you don’t need to give the app access to them if you are not comfortable doing so. We value your privacy.",Medical,"1-800 CONTACTS, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/1-800-contacts/id515430900?uo=4,4.87995,143256,medical
1585628503,Delta Dental Mobile App,"Your oral health is important to Delta Dental — and to your overall health! We’ve designed our mobile app to make it easy for you to make the most of your dental benefits. Maximize your health, wherever you are! Search for a dentist near you, view ID cards and more, right on your mobile device. 


Delta Dental Mobile App features


- Mobile ID card: No need for a paper card. View and share your ID card from your phone, and easily save it to your device for quick access, including Apple Passbook and Google Wallet.


- Find a dentist: It’s easy to find a dentist near you. Search and compare dental offices to find one that suits your needs. Save your family’s preferred dentists to your account for easy access.


- Dental Care Cost Estimator: Find out what to expect with our Dental Care Cost Estimator. Our easy to use tool provides estimated cost ranges on common dental care needs for dentists in your area, now with the option to select your dentist for tailored cost estimates.",Medical,Delta Dental Plans Association,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/delta-dental-mobile-app/id1585628503?uo=4,1.40641,1405,medical
911428916,Blood Donor American Red Cross,"The American Red Cross Blood Donor App puts the power to save lives in the palm of your hand. Donating blood, platelets and AB Plasma is now easier than ever. 

Features:

· Find local blood drives and donation centers quickly and easily
· Convenient, easy appointment scheduling and rescheduling
· Complete your RapidPass®
· Get notified when your blood is on its way to a patient
· View the results of your mini-physical
· Receive appointment reminders and special blood shortage alert messages
· Keep track of total blood donations
· Stay updated on special promotions
· Earn badges for special donation milestones
· Join or create a lifesaving team, recruit other blood donors and view rankings on the Blood Donor Teams Leaderboard 
· Stay updated on special promotions",Medical,American Red Cross,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/blood-donor-american-red-cross/id911428916?uo=4,4.85057,66639,medical
1239522573,Speech Blubs: Language Therapy,"WHAT DOES SPEECH BLUBS OFFER?

Speech Blubs is a voice-controlled speech therapy app designed to help your child learn new sounds and words, and to practice speaking in a stimulating, educational environment. 

**FEATURED IN** Autism Parenting Magazine, Brisbane Kids, Speech Chick Therapy, Beautiful Speech Life, and The Speech Teacher. Awarded the Social Impact Award and supported by the Facebook Start Program, and winner of the “Safe for Children” certificate, the Mom’s Choice Award, the Parent’s Picks 2020 Award Winner, and techozens.com’s “Best and Trusted Speech Therapy App for Kids.

WHY LEARN WITH SPEECH BLUBS?
Our app was created with speech therapists, teachers, & parents, and uses video modeling for effective speech development. Our apps have zero ads and no flashy features, thus providing a safe and non-intrusive learning experience. We use ABA therapy-inspired positive reinforcement that rewards kids with fun games and stickers for trying. Having the app at your fingertips makes it easy to practice in a routine that suits you, and helps avoid stressful disruptions that can upset your child.
Our apps use multiple child and platform support, so with one sign-in ALL of your kids can use the app, no matter if it's on your device, a partner’s, or grandparents’. One sign-in also includes our new reading app READING BLUBS – designed with over 200 teachers and literacy experts.
You can now get access to language versions in US and UK English, Spanish, French, & (Brazilian) Portuguese. 

KEY FEATURES:
Parents’ Academy:
A newly-added parent section provides access to an ever-growing content library of 350+ articles on parenting, homeschooling, education, speech therapy, and more. All written by 20+ speech and teaching professionals. Also, check out our practical video tips!


Kids’ area:
There are over 1500+ exercises, activities, videos, mini-games, and dozens of NEW face filters. We have lions, firefighters, monkeys, giraffes, hats, glasses, and more. Also, the app’s look and feel is even more child-friendly and engaging. There are some new animal characters to guide and motivate kids through exercises to achieve learning goals and make learning fun!
Choose from 28 fun sections: Early Sounds, When I Grow Up, Get into Shapes, Living Colors, Yummy Time, This Is My Body, Mouth Gym, Animal Kingdom, Ride Your Wheels, Sing-Along, and many more!

SCIENTIFICALLY-PROVEN LEARNING TECHNIQUES
Speech Blubs uses video modeling for immersive learning, where children observe their peers as “teachers'' on video. When children watch their peers in real-time, their MIRROR NEURONS fire up! This scientifically proven and effective approach was confirmed in a UCLA study published by the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association and showed that kids learn faster and better when learning from other kids.

SUBSCRIPTION, PRICING, & TERMS
With Speech Blubs membership you get a free personalized report with tips & tricks, plus unlimited access to all the activities to try our app. Your subscription automatically renews unless the auto-renew feature is turned off at least 24 hrs. before the end of the current period. The account will be charged for renewal within 24 hrs. before the end of the current period. Payment will be charged to your iTunes Account at the confirmation of purchase. Subscriptions may be managed by the user and auto-renewal may be turned off by going to the user’s Account Settings after purchase. Any unused portion of a free trial period will be forfeited when the user purchases a subscription to that publication.

WE HELP CHILDREN LEARN TO SPEAK & READ!

Read our full Terms & Conditions and Privacy Policy here: https://speechblubs.com/legal",Education,Blub Blub Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/speech-blubs-language-therapy/id1239522573?uo=4,4.55867,29069,medical
931986739,Your Texas Benefits,"The Your Texas Benefits app is for Texans who have applied for or get:  
• SNAP food benefits 
• TANF cash help 
• Health care benefits (including Medicare Savings Program and Medicaid)  

Manage and view your cases anytime you want – right from your phone.  
 
Use the app to send us documents we need. 
 
Get alerts, like when it’s time to renew your benefits.  
 
Manage your Lone Star Card.  
 
You also can report changes to your cases and find an office near you. 
 
To get started, set up a Your Texas Benefits account (if you don’t already have one). 
 
Here are features you can access once you set up your account: 
 
View your cases: 
• Check the status of your benefits. 
• See your benefit amounts. 
• Find out if it’s time to renew your benefits. 
 
Manage account settings: 
• Change your password. 
• Sign up to go paperless and get notices and forms sent to you on the app. 

Send us documents: 
• Attach photos of the documents or forms we need from you and then send them to us.  

Get alerts and view case history: 
• Read messages about your cases. 
• View documents you’ve attached and sent us through the website or app. 
• View any changes you’ve reported. 
 
Report changes about your: 
• Phone numbers  
• Home and mailing addresses 
• People on your cases 
• Housing costs 
• Utility costs 
• Job information 

Manage your Lone Star Card:  
• View your balance. 
• Track your transaction history.  
• Check your upcoming deposits. 
• Change your PIN. 
• Freeze or replace your stolen or lost card. 
 
Find an office: 
• Find HHSC benefit offices. 
• Find community partner offices. 
• Search by your current location or ZIP code.",Health & Fitness,Texas Health and Human Services Commission,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/your-texas-benefits/id931986739?uo=4,4.84016,325510,medical
579769143,Kardia,"Kardia works with the FDA-cleared KardiaMobile, KardiaMobile 6L, or KardiaBand personal EKG devices, which can detect the most common arrhythmias in just 30 seconds. The Kardia app is designed to make managing heart care from home easier than ever, giving you the ability to seamlessly record EKGs, share heart data with your doctor remotely, keep track of your health history, and more.

Capture a medical-grade EKG with your Kardia device anytime, anywhere—no patches, wires, or gels required. Get an immediate result from Kardia's Instant Analysis of normal, possible atrial fibrillation, bradycardia, or tachycardia. For additional analysis, you can choose to send the recording to your physician or to one of our partners for a Clinician Review by a cardiologist (US, Australia only) or cardiac care physiologist (UK, Ireland only).

The Kardia system is recommended by leading cardiologists and used by people around the world for accurate EKG recordings. Track your heart health data from home with the medical accuracy your doctor can trust.


NOTE:  This app requires KardiaMobile, KardiaMobile 6L, or KardiaBand hardware to record an EKG. Get your Kardia device now at alivecor.com.

Kardia integrates with Apple Health to create a combined view of your health metrics.

NOTE: Requires KardiaMobile or KardiaBand hardware to record an EKG

FDA 510(k) numbers: K191406, K181823, K171816, K183319
CE # 0123",Medical,"AliveCor, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/kardia/id579769143?uo=4,4.82655,166854,medical
877303791,Contraction Timer & Counter 9m,"*** Most downloaded Contraction Timer app in the world! Number 1 in the USA, UK, Australia, Canada, Italy and elsewhere! ***

This is the simplest-to-use contraction timer. The app will help to track your contractions and determine when it's time to go to the hospital.
If you plan on having a home birth, the app will tell you what stage of labor you are in at any given moment.

Keep track of your labor by tapping a single button at the start and at the end of each contraction. The Contraction Timer analyzes the duration and frequency of contractions and will notify you when it's time to go to the hospital.

Thousands of pregnant women around the world have become mothers using our app.

Always consult your doctor to orient yourself in terms of contraction frequency and duration.
This app is not a medical device and our recomendations are based on standard indicators. Your labor may occur differently. Therefore, do not rely exclusively on our app.
If the duration and frequency of contractions do not yet correspond to the necessary indicators but labor pains become unbearable, it is better to go to the hospital as soon as possible rather than give birth at home or on the way there. Trust what your body is telling you.

If you have any questions or suggestions, please email us at neumandev@gmail.com. Your feedback is very important to us.",Medical,Aleksei Neiman,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/contraction-timer-counter-9m/id877303791?uo=4,4.79904,59595,medical
1169136078,Huckleberry: Baby & Child,"Help your family get the sleep they need with Huckleberry, the award-winning baby tracker app trusted by over 4 million parents worldwide.

This all-in-one parenting tool becomes your family's second brain, giving you the confidence to make informed decisions. Born from real parent experience, we combine sleep science and smart tracking to transform restless nights into restful routines.

TRUSTED SLEEP GUIDANCE & TRACKING

Your baby's sleep and daily rhythms are unique. Our comprehensive baby tracker helps you understand their natural patterns while providing expert sleep guidance every step of the way. From breastfeeding to diapers, our newborn tracker gives you peace of mind in those early days and beyond.

SWEETSPOT®: YOUR SLEEP TIMING COMPANION

A most-loved feature that predicts your baby's ideal nap times with remarkable accuracy. No more guessing about sleep windows or watching for tired cues—SweetSpot® learns your child's unique rhythms to suggest optimal sleep times. Available with Plus and Premium memberships.

FREE APP FEATURES

• Simple, one-touch baby tracker for sleep, diaper changes, feedings, pumping, growth, potty training, activities and medicine
• Complete breastfeeding timer with tracking for both sides
• Sleep summaries and history, plus average sleep totals
• Track multiple children with individual profiles
• Reminders when it’s time for medication, feedings, and more
• Sync with multiple caregivers across different devices

PLUS MEMBERSHIP

• All free features, and:
• SweetSpot®: See the ideal time for sleep 
• Schedule Creator: Plan age-appropriate sleep schedules
• Insights: Get data-driven guidance for sleep, feedings, and milestones
• Enhanced Reports: Discover your child’s trends
• Voice & Text Tracking: Log activities through simple conversation

PREMIUM MEMBERSHIP

• Everything in Plus, and:
• Custom Sleep Plans from pediatric experts
• Ongoing support as your baby grows
• Weekly progress check-ins

GENTLE, EVIDENCE-BASED APPROACH

Our sleep guidance never requires ""crying it out."" Instead, we blend trusted sleep science with gentle, family-centered solutions that respect your parenting style. Every recommendation is made for your family's needs and comfort level.

PERSONALIZED PARENTING SUPPORT

• Expert newborn tracker tools and analytics
• Get custom sleep schedules based on your baby's age and patterns
• Science-backed guidance for common sleep challenges
• Navigate sleep regressions with confidence
• Receive timely recommendations as your baby grows
• Help your newborn develop healthy sleep habits from day one

AWARD-WINNING RESULTS

The Huckleberry baby tracker app ranked #1 in the iOS medical category globally. Today, we help families across 179 countries achieve better sleep. Up to 93% of families using our baby sleep tracking report improved sleep patterns.

Whether you're navigating newborn sleep, infant solids or toddler milestones, Huckleberry provides the tools and guidance your family needs to flourish.

REAL FAMILIES, FLOURISHING

“This baby app has been really helpful with mental load lately. I got it to track poo, kept it for the sweet spot recommendations.” - Cassie P.

“I am so glad we decided to use this tracker app!!! The frequent newborn nighttime feedings turned my brain to mush. Keeping track of my little one's feedings helped so much. At 3 months, we decided to upgrade and track his sleep. He started sleeping through the night (8:30pm - 7:30am) within 3 days! Such a game changer!!! I HIGHLY recommend it!” - Georgette M.

Terms of Use: https://www.huckleberrycare.com/terms-of-use
Privacy Policy: https://www.huckleberrycare.com/privacy-policy",Medical,Huckleberry Labs Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/huckleberry-baby-child/id1169136078?uo=4,4.90406,44529,medical
698092608,Oral-B,"Realize a superior clean with the new revolutionized Oral-B mobile experience.

Studies show that the average person brushes for only 30-60 seconds, compared to the dentist- recommended 2 minutes. Also, up to 80% of people spend an insufficient amount of time brushing in at least one zone of their mouth. This includes 60% of people who either don’t brush their back molars at all or don’t spend enough time when they do[1]. 

At Oral-B we strive to improve those stats to help deliver a superior clean. The breakthrough technology of the Oral-B  Bluetooth® enabled toothbrushes seamlessly connects to the Oral-B app to deliver brushing intelligence at the next level. The Oral-B app is your digital coach to help you brush correctly as recommended by Dental Professionals.

Brush for a Clean that Wows
3D Teeth Tracking and A.I. Brushing Recognition[2] guides you in real-time as you brush. This ensures you cover all areas of your mouth and surfaces of your teeth. 

Assess Your Brushing Habits
Pull up your brushing data summary after each guided brushing session and view your brush score to quickly see just how well you did. 

Get Personalized Coaching
Receive individual coaching tips and insights tailored to your unique brushing behavior to see how you can improve the next time you brush. 

Access Personalized Insights at a Glance
Browse through your personal brushing coverage to see which areas you need to pay more attention to. You can also view high-pressure dentition maps to learn where you need to apply less pressure and view trends based on your recorded brushing history – all easily filtered by week, month, and year. 

Track Your Gum Bleeding
The unique Gum Guard[3] technology helps improve your brushing while protecting your gums. It includes an interactive gum bleeding tracker to help you capture instances of gum bleeding for better oral health.
 
Revolutionize Your Oral Health
Statistics show that brushing with an Oral-B connected toothbrush paired with the app will transform your brushing behavior. 
•	Over 90% of brushing sessions last longer than the dentist-recommended 2 minutes with almost no instances of overly applied pressure
•	Over 82% of people who brushed with Oral-B SmartSeries experienced a noticeable improvement in their oral health[4]

You can now connect Oral-B App with Apple Health App. This helps you track and review your brushing habits on the Apple Health App. We’ll motivate you to improve your brushing routine!


**The Oral-B app connects to Oral-B iO, Genius and Smart Series electric toothbrushes with Bluetooth 4.0 compatible devices**
**Check app.oralb.com for app availability and compatibility details**

[1] Oral-B Motion Tracking Research.
[2] 3D tracking only available at iO M9 model, AI Brushing Recognition  available at iO Series & Genius X.
[3] Gum Guard available for all iO Series, Genius 10000 and Genius X models.
[4] After 6-8 weeks of use. Based on a practice-based trial with 52 subjects",Health & Fitness,"Procter & Gamble Productions, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/oral-b/id698092608?uo=4,4.77497,178497,medical
1000017994,Cardiogram: Heart & BP Logger,"Cardiogram: Heart & BP Logger

Join over 10 million users in 100+ countries using Cardiogram to monitor heart rate, migraines, and log blood pressure, with powerful tools powered by AI and wearable data.

Start your 30-day Free Trial and subscribe to Heart IQ, Migraine IQ, or both. Designed to help you manage your health proactively.


HEART IQ Your Personal Heart Health Companion
Heart IQ turns your Apple Watch and other smartwatches into clinically-informed heart monitors. Track your heart rate minute-by-minute, tag symptoms, and view patterns that help you understand and manage your cardiovascular health.

Key Features
• Real-time heart rate and pulse monitor
• High and low heart rate alerts
• ECG and BP readings imported from Apple Health
• AI health report card with weekly risk scores for:
 – Hypertension
 – Sleep Apnea
 – Diabetes
• Color-coded charts for HR, symptoms, steps & medications
• PDF & CSV data exports to share with your doctor
• Apple Watch companion app
• Works with Apple, Fitbit, Garmin, Google Pixel, WearOS watches & more

Benefits
• Spot trends in resting heart rate, symptoms, and activity
• Monitor your risk of chronic heart conditions
• Share health data with family or doctors
• Help train our AI by joining 500,000+ Heart IQ users

MIGRAINE IQ – Predict, Track & Understand Your Migraines
Migraine IQ is the first app to predict migraine risk using AI. Built in collaboration with headache experts and thousands of users, it helps you discover personal triggers and manage pain more effectively.

Key Features
• Log, track & manage migraine episodes
• Predictive Risk Analysis based on patterns in your data
• Track symptoms like pain intensity, stress, sleep & meals
• View heart rate, sleep, and steps during migraine episodes
• Summary reports and detailed episode logs
• Designed with input from 15,000+ migraine users

Benefits
• Identify triggers like poor sleep, stress, or diet
• Map pain locations, log severity, and frequency
• Use insights to adjust habits and reduce future episodes
• Supports proactive, data-informed migraine care

Start Free. Upgrade Anytime.
New users get a 30-day free trial. After that, choose a plan that fits you:
• Heart IQ
• Migraine IQ
• Or both, for complete tracking and insights

Your Health Data Is Yours
We respect your privacy. Your data is never sold and is securely stored.
Use of the app implies agreement to our Terms of Use:
https://www.cardiogram.com/terms-of-use

Clinically-Informed AI
Cardiogram’s technology is based on research published in:
• JAMA Cardiology
• Heart Rhythm Society
• American Heart Association

Our DeepHeart neural network detected atrial fibrillation with 97% accuracy in the mRhythm Study. While the app does not diagnose conditions, it helps you stay informed and better prepared.",Health & Fitness,Cardiogram Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/cardiogram-heart-bp-logger/id1000017994?uo=4,4.57437,13371,medical
469863705,Khan Academy,"You can learn anything. For free.

Spend an afternoon brushing up on statistics. Discover how the Krebs cycle works. Get a head start on next semester's geometry. Prepare for upcoming exams. Or, if you're feeling particularly adventurous, learn how fire-stick farming changes the landscape of Australia.

Whether you're a student, teacher, homeschooler, principal, adult returning to the classroom after 20 years, or a friendly alien trying to get a leg up in earthly biology — Khan Academy's personalized learning library is available to you, for free.

- Learn anything, for free: Thousands of interactive exercises, videos, and articles at your fingertips. Study math, science, economics, finance, grammar, history, government, politics, and much, much more.

- Sharpen your skills: Practice exercises, quizzes, and tests with instant feedback and step-by-step hints. Follow along with what you're learning in school, or practice at your own pace.

- Keep learning when you're offline: Bookmark and download your favorite content to watch videos without an internet connection.

- Pick up where you left off: Tailored to your current learning level, our mastery system gives instant feedback and recommendations on exactly which skills and videos to try next. And, if you choose to create a free account, your learning syncs with http://khanacademy.org, so your progress is always up-to-date across all your devices. 

Learn using expert-created videos, interactive exercises, and in-depth articles in math (arithmetic, pre-algebra, algebra, geometry, trigonometry, statistics, calculus, differential equations, linear algebra), science (biology, chemistry, physics), economics (microeconomics, macroeconomics, finance and capital markets), humanities (art history, civics, finance, US history, US government and politics, world history), and more (including computer science principles)!

Already familiar with the Khan Academy website? Not all functionality is available in this app. Community discussions, computer programming content, test prep, parent tools, teacher tools, and district tools should all be accessed directly at http://khanacademy.org.

Khan Academy is a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, with the mission of providing a free, world-class education for anyone, anywhere.",Education,Khan Academy,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/khan-academy/id469863705?uo=4,4.56595,92423,biology
745089947,Brainly: AI Homework Helper,"Brainly, the AI Learning Companion.
Learn with Brainly — the world’s most popular homework help app! Get quick solutions from students and Experts, while enjoying features that make studying fast, easy, and fun! In just seconds, you can find correct solutions with step-by-step explanations to help you understand concepts, boost your knowledge, and improve your grades.

- Scan a pic of your math equation or word problem to get answers in seconds using Brainly’s Scan to Solve feature!
- Improve your grades using 24/7 access to AI Tutor and Live Expert support.
- Get Expert-Verified homework answers from Community Q&A.
- Find personalized, in-depth answers powered by AI.

Get ahead in school while earning points, finding study buddies, competing with other students, and climbing the leaderboards.

– Do you struggle with math?
Math Solver to the rescue! If you’re stuck and confused, just scan a pic of the question for a fast answer in seconds, plus a step-by-step explanation. Algebra, geometry, trigonometry, or calculus: no equation is too tough for Brainly! Solve math equations and word problems at any school level — including AP and college courses.

– Why have just one study buddy when you can have millions?
Never study alone again with Brainly Community Q&A, where you can ask any question for Expert-Verified answers from users around the world! Our large community of Experts is available 24/7 to help you with any question in math, science, history, English, & other subjects. Our network of reliable moderators ensures that all the answers you get are correct and easy to understand. We also allow parents and children to pair accounts as part of our commitment to safety.

– Struggling with any particular subject or topic?
A Live Expert* will help you get back on track! Get in-depth guidance and see all the steps to make homework easier and exams less stressful. Understand complex concepts in science & math with your own learning guide at your fingertips! And for personalized AI support, you can switch to the AI Tutor for on-demand help, available in seconds.
*This feature is available if you have a Brainly Tutor Plan.

– Do you spend a lot of time searching for textbook answers?
Explore Brainly's library of solutions for structured, step-by-step answers written by Experts. Find explanations for practice questions in STEM textbooks and more by searching for your book's grade, title, author, or ISBN.

– What if we told you that studying can be fun?
Competition thrives on Brainly with learning-based leaderboards, badges, and achievements. Make tough questions a competition for others as you get rewards for answering the trickiest questions. Learning can take a lot of effort, but it doesn’t need to be all work and no play. 

– Get more out of Brainly with Brainly Plus & Brainly Tutor!
Access to Brainly is 100% free. However, if you want to enjoy all of Brainly’s features without ads, upgrade to Brainly Plus or Brainly Tutor.

***

Get fun updates from us on:
Instagram @brainly
Facebook @brainlygroup
Tiktok @brainly

For any problems, reach out to our support team: https://brainly.com/contact | contact@brainly.com
Marketing: https://brainly.com

Terms of use: https://brainly.com/pages/terms_of_use
Privacy policy: https://brainly.com/pages/privacy_policy",Education,Brainly sp. z o o,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/brainly-ai-homework-helper/id745089947?uo=4,4.71806,278711,biology
385758163,Chegg Study - Homework Help,"Get ready for exam season with the Chegg Study® app. 

Used by millions of students, the Chegg Study app is the homework helper which offers school help and personalized support for each of your courses—from homework to exam prep, study your courses inside-out and learn your own way. Tap into our huge library of millions of fully explained, step-by-step solutions, and flashcards for subjects including Math, English, Physics, Engineering, Chemistry, and more.  

Get school help for 80 subjects and hundreds of courses and flashcards. The Chegg Study app is the homework helper that has you covered for your toughest concepts, classes, and assignments, for school. 

Now with AI solutions backed by experts you can get your homework help even quicker and boost your education using the latest technology. 

Get 24/7 study help and expert Q&A responses. Snap or scan a pic of any homework question and submit it with our question scanner to our Chegg experts. You will get detailed solved answers in as little as 30 minutes.* 

Get unstuck and be your own problem solver, learn about tough concepts with detailed explanations, solutions, and answers provided. 
Search our library of over 60 million fully solved homework questions. See how to solve them with our question scanner feature. 
Take control of your education and learn at your own rate and in your own style. With Chegg there are a variety of ways to study your courses so you can learn and have fun at the same time!

The fine print: 
Your Chegg Study subscription will be charged to your credit card through your iTunes account. Subscription automatically renews unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24 hours prior to the end of the current subscription period. Your account will be charged for renewal within the 24 hours prior to the end of your current subscription period. You can manage your subscription and turn off auto-renewal by going to your Account Settings after purchase. 
For bug reports and general feedback, email cheggstudy.appsupport@chegg.com or tweet @Chegg #iOSapp. 

Privacy Policy: http://www.chegg.com/privacypolicy/ 
Terms of use: http://www.chegg.com/termsofuse/ 

 *Experts’ response time for answers and solutions varies by question and subject. Average response time is 46 minutes. 
 **Available for select problems only.",Education,"Chegg, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/chegg-study-homework-help/id385758163?uo=4,4.69456,204916,biology
1423499530,Biology Answers - AP Biology,"Biobrain is an essential learning tool for anyone studying Biology!

What makes it great? Biobrain allows you to not only test yourself on key knowledge but also provides detailed learning material with comprehensive diagrams. Biobrain makes learning fun!

Biobrain takes the need away from carrying heavy textbooks with you everywhere and has the content in a simple and easy to use format. Who needs a tutor when you have Biobrain!!
_________________________________________________

WHY YOU WILL LOVE BIOBRAIN…

ESSENTIAL LEARNING MATERIAL AT YOUR FINGERTIPS
Choose a topic and work your way through the learning material and quizzes that assess your understanding

PERFECT TOOL TO USE TO REVISE FOR A TEST OR EXAM
With thousands of questions, it’s a great way to revise before class tests. 

YOUR QUIZ RESULTS ARE TRACKED
Previous quiz results are stored to enable you to track your progress throughout your course. 

YOUR OWN COMPREHENSIVE GLOSSARY AT YOUR FINGERTIPS
Thousands of key biological terms are defined and illustrated. 

LEARNING MATERIAL IS GRADED OVER THREE LEVELS
Master level 1 content and try yourself at Level 2 or 3. 

YOUR ABILITY TO REPEAT QUIZZES
The opportunity to quickly and easily repeat a quiz that you need to improve on.
_________________________________________________

USEFUL FOR BIOLOGY STUDENTS STUDYING

Secondary school Biology completing the following courses:
•	NGSS Biology
•	AP Biology
•	High school Biology

University students studying:
•	AP Biology
•	Biological Sciences
•	Biology
•	Biomed Science
•	Medicine
•	Science

_________________________________________________

POWERFUL FEATURES AT YOUR FINGERTIPS

Biobrain packs all these capabilities and so much more:

•	Ability to search for a glossary term.
•	Search the learning material to find a topic you need to brush up on.
•	Comprehensive biological diagrams to help you understand difficult concepts.
•	Multiple types of quiz questions – multiple choice, true / false, short answer, drop down and many more. 
•	Hints for quiz questions.
•	Multiple attempts at questions.
•	Quiz questions graded over three levels.
•	Excellent scientific diagrams.
•	Learning material included links to an illustrated glossary to assist learning without leaving the screen. 
•	Review answers to questions.


This unmatched set of features combines with an intuitive interface to make Biology Answers - AP Biology an essential app for secondary school and university Biology students!

Download now!!
_________________________________________________

FOR INSPIRATION & SUPPORT:

>	Instagram: @biobrain_app
>	Email: support@biobrain.com.au
>	Web: http://www.biobrain.com.au

A subscription ton Biobrain allows you to access all the content. You can subscribe and pay through your iTunes account. Payment will be charged to your iTunes account at confirmation of purchase. Your subscription will automatically renew unless cancelled 24 hours before the end of the current period. Your account will be charged for the renewal within 24 hours prior to the end of the current period. Subscriptions may be managed by the user and auto-renew may be turned off after purchase by going to the “Manage Subscription’ page in settings. Any unused. Portion of the free trial period, if offered, will be forfeited when the user purchases a subscription to that publication, where applicable. The subscription will renew at the same cost.

Terms of Service: https://biobrain.com.au/terms-of-service/

Privacy policy: https://www.biobrain.com.au/privacy",Education,Caroline Cotton,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/biology-answers-ap-biology/id1423499530?uo=4,4.74854,171,biology
1353224144,Seek by iNaturalist,"Use the power of image recognition technology to identify the plants and animals all around you. Earn badges for seeing different types of plants, birds, fungi and more!

• Get outside and point the Seek Camera at living things
• Identify wildlife, plants, and fungi and learn about the organisms all around you
• Earn badges for observing different types of species and participating in challenges

OPEN THE CAMERA AND START SEEKING!

Found a mushroom, flower, or bug, and not sure what it is? Open up the Seek Camera to see if it knows!

Drawing from millions of wildlife observations on iNaturalist, Seek shows you lists of commonly recorded insects, birds, plants, amphibians, and more in your area. Scan the environment with the Seek Camera to identify organisms using the tree of life. Add different species to your observations and learn all about them in the process! The more observations you make, the more badges you’ll earn!

This is a great app for families who want to spend more time exploring nature together, and for anyone who wants to learn more about the life all around them.

KID-SAFE

Seek does not require registration and does not collect any user data by default. Some user data will be collected if you choose to sign in with an iNaturalist account, but you must be over 13 or have your parents permission to do so.

Seek will ask permission to turn on location services, but your location is obscured to respect your privacy while still allowing species suggestions from your general area. Your precise location is never stored in the app or sent to iNaturalist unless you sign in to your iNaturalist account and submit your observations.

Our image recognition technology is based on observations submitted to iNaturalist.org and partner sites, and identified by the iNaturalist community.

Seek is part of iNaturalist, a not-for-profit organization. Seek was made by the iNaturalist team with support from the California Academy of Sciences, the National Geographic Society, Our Planet on Netflix, WWF, HHMI Tangled Bank Studios, and Visipedia.",Education,iNaturalist,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/seek-by-inaturalist/id1353224144?uo=4,4.7702,30458,biology
922208952,Course Hero: AI Homework Help,"Get fast, 24/7 homework help from expert tutors, or use our math solver to get step-by-step solutions to tackle tough math problems.

 - Browse our ever-expanding library of textbook solutions and explanations.
 - Access over 100 million course-specific study materials for your school.
 - Review previous course documents and study guides.
 - Understand concepts with easy to understand explanations.

Math Solver
 - Quickly understand how to solve math problems
 - Just snap a picture or type in the question and solve

Get Better Grades
 - Study now or save materials to read later.
 - Gain offline access to resources you've previously viewed.
 - Get alerts for new resources based on your previous searches.

Subjects Included
 - Math
 - Physics
 - Biology
 - Psychology
 - Computer Science
 - Business
 - Accounting
 - Economics
 - Health
 - Engineering
 - Chemistry
 - Foreign Languages
 - Music
 - and More!

For Customer Support, please visit support.coursehero.com/hc/en-us. We're happy to help!

Privacy Policy: www.coursehero.com/privacy-policy/
Terms of Use: www.coursehero.com/terms-of-use/

Please Note:
Payment will be charged to your iTunes account at confirmation of purchase. Subscriptions renew automatically unless canceled more than 24 hours before the end of the current subscription period. You may manage your subscription and turn off auto-renewal by visiting Account Settings in iTunes, but you cannot cancel an existing subscription before it ends.",Education,"Learneo, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/course-hero-ai-homework-help/id922208952?uo=4,4.68454,64309,biology
6446930976,Solvely - AI Study Companion,"Solvely: Your AI Study BFF
 Stuck on a problem? Snap a pic or type it in—no judgment here—and let Solvely break it down step by step so you actually understand. Perfect for any level, from Baby Math 101 to those advanced courses you pretend don't exist. Ditch the stress, level up your grades, and get more time for, well… everything else.

Why You'll Love It
- Stress-free Zone – Save yourself those 2 A.M. panic attacks
- No More Guesswork – We guide you through every step
- All Subjects, All Levels – Math, science, whatever's on your plate
- Smart Live Notes – transcribing everything, spotlighting the juicy stuff, and freeing you from frantic note-taking.
- Unlock Real Understanding – Because grades are nice, but knowing is cooler
- Flexibility – Study help that fits your vibe (and schedule)

Download Solvely now and say goodbye to late-night homework meltdowns. Let's make learning click!

► SMART AI SOLUTIONS THAT TEACH
 Stuck on that tricky assignment? Our AI doesn't just spit out answers—it walks you through every step so you actually get the ""why"" behind the solution. Say goodbye to blank stares and hello to real understanding.

► AI LIVE NOTES
Let AI Live Notes handle the heavy lifting in class by transcribing every word and extracting the need-to-know highlights, so you can actually pay attention (or daydream—no judgment). Perfect for those days when the professor talks at light speed! Say goodbye to note-taking FOMO, and hello to easier studying!

► ADVANCED LEARNING ENGINE
 Powered by next-level AI that meets you where you are—elementary, college, or even PhD. Get custom-tailored explanations that match your vibe and help you lock in long-term knowledge.

► COMPREHENSIVE SUBJECT COVERAGE
 Crush it in Math, Science, Humanities—you name it. Whether it's basic algebra or advanced calculus, physics or philosophy, our expert guidance keeps you ahead of the game.

► INSTANT PHOTO SOLUTIONS
 Snap a pic of any question—textbooks, handwritten notes, or even whiteboards—and get a detailed breakdown in seconds. No more waiting. No more guesswork.

► SEAMLESS LEARNING EXPERIENCE
 Sync your studying across iPhone and iPad like a pro. Whether it's late-night cramming or a quick homework check between classes, Solvely's got your back.

► ALL-IN-ONE STUDY COMPANION
 One app to rule them all: Smart Reader, Writing Assistant, AI Note-Taking, Focus Mode, and Calculator. Everything you need to knock out assignments and boost those grades.

► SUBJECTS WE CRUSH:
 • Mathematics (Elementary to Advanced)
 • Sciences (Physics, Chemistry, Biology)
 • Humanities (English, Literature, History)
 • Test Prep (SAT®, ACT®, AP®, GRE®)

► PROVEN RESULTS
 8 out of 10 students see their grades climb within 30 days. Join 5M+ learners rocking smarter study habits with Solvely!

► UPGRADE TO PRO:
 • Unlimited, in-depth explanations
 • Advanced problem-solving superpowers
 • Interactive learning support
 • AI-powered lecture notes
 • Tons of practice materials
 • Priority support (because you're VIP)

► PAYMENT DETAILS
• Payment charged to your Apple ID at purchase confirmation
• Subscription renews automatically unless you cancel at least 24 hours before the current period ends
• Your account is charged for renewal within 24 hours before the end of the current period
• Manage or cancel your subscription in your App Store account settings
• Prices and offers may change without notice

► STAY CONNECTED
• Official Website: https://solvely.ai
• TikTok: https://www.tiktok.com/@solvely.ai
• Instagram: https://www.instagram.com/solvely.ai/

Got suggestions or questions?
• Email us at support@solvely.ai
• Terms of Service: https://solvely.ai/term
• Privacy Policy: https://solvely.ai/privacy-policy

Need Last-Minute Help?
Download Solvely → Snap Your Question → Get Expert Solutions in Seconds!",Education,Aignite Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/solvely-ai-study-companion/id6446930976?uo=4,4.67819,19036,biology
6739428387,Homework Solver AI Answer Help,"Solve Your Homework with AI !

Your AI companion for every subject: Transform your homework routine with AI! Our AI assistant is ready to help, providing instant guidance whenever needed.
Scan your tasks and let AI handle the rest: Simply scan your task, and the AI will break it down step-by-step, offering clear explanations and detailed answers.
Expert assistance in every subject: Get accurate answers in any subject, empowering you to deepen your understanding and excel in your studies.
Accurate answers you can trust: With AI’s precise and dependable solutions, you can approach any homework problem with confidence.

Your AI-powered assistant for all needs: Harness the power of AI to make homework simpler and quicker. Get reliable support across all your subjects!
Easily scan your tasks and let AI do the work: Simply scan your homework, and the AI will analyze the problem, giving you step-by-step explanations and detailed answers.
Get expert support in a wide range of subjects: Chat with AI and receive accurate answers that will boost your understanding and performance in each subject.
Your opinion helps us grow and improve: We are always striving to provide the best experience possible. Please share your feedback or concerns and help us grow.
Get reliable answers for all your questions: You can tackle any homework assignment with confidence, knowing that the AI will provide you with solutions to help you.

Premium Subscription: Weekly subscription, Monthly subscription, Annual subscription

Unlock Full Access: 
Get instant homework solutions
Scan tasks for quick answers
Chat with AI across all subjects

All subscriptions may include a 3-day trial. Your iTunes account will be charged after purchase confirmation. Subscriptions automatically renew unless canceled at least 24 hours before the end of the current period. Manage subscriptions and auto-renewal settings easily in Account Settings.

Your privacy is our top priority.  Privacy and Support:
Review our privacy policy:https://www.baklowarn.info/HomeworkSolverAIAnswerHelp_PrivacyPolicy.html
Check our Terms of Use to understand how we protect your data:https://www.baklowarn.info/HomeworkSolverAIAnswerHelp_TermsOfUse.html
For assistance, contact our support service:nixonsmall582849@outlook.com


Download now and start to use it!",Education,Nixon Small,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/homework-solver-ai-answer-help/id6739428387?uo=4,4.25641,39,biology
6473804806,Biology AI - Answer Bio HW,"Answer any biology question INSTANTLY with Biology AI. 

Are you stumped by a complex biology question? Seeking clear, step-by-step explanations? Turn to Biology AI, your academic superhero in the realm of biology.

Biology AI expertly tackles an array of biology queries – be it multiple choice, word-based, diagrams, math-centric, or any other type. Simply snap a photo or upload your question, and watch as Biology AI swiftly deciphers and guides you through a comprehensive solution.

EXCEPTIONAL FEATURES

- Effortlessly upload or capture photos of both handwritten and digital biology problems.
- Seamlessly copy and disseminate intricate solutions.
- Comprehensive coverage of biology topics, catering to students from high school through to doctoral research.
- Detailed, step-by-step mathematical solutions.
- Experience the app's capabilities with a complimentary trial period.

Your use of Biology AI signifies your agreement to our Terms of Use and Privacy Policy.

A subscription is required to access app contents.

Terms of use: https://renaissanceapps.com/terms-conditions
Privacy Policy: https://renaissanceapps.com/privacy-policy",Education,Renaissance Apps LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/biology-ai-answer-bio-hw/id6473804806?uo=4,4.62703,185,biology
1119601770,Nebo: Note Taking for Students,"Nebo is a free app with a one-time purchase to unlock the full version – no subscriptions, no hidden fees.

Create stunning notes and professional documents effortlessly by hand, brainstorm ideas on an infinite canvas, and annotate PDFs seamlessly. Powered by the world's leading AI handwriting recognition technology, Nebo offers a dynamic platform where handwriting, text, drawings, diagrams, and images seamlessly coexist on an expandable canvas. Enhance your note-taking experience with intuitive pen gestures, effortlessly converting handwriting and shapes into typed text and precise forms.

Nebo understands every word you write in your choice of 66 languages, and works on all platforms - so you can access and search your notes from any device.

Enjoy 4 powerful experiences in one app:

** Create unlimited notebooks and fixed-size pages for your daily notes. **
** Take freeform notes on boards – the world's most advanced endless canvas. **
** Handwrite responsive documents, adding math calculations and diagrams. **
** Import existing files as PDFs, ready to annotate. **

** NEBO ON IPAD: FEATURES **
• Digital handwriting:
- Write¹, type or dictate in the same page, sentence or even word.
- Accurately convert handwriting and math to typed text, and drawn diagrams to perfect shapes. Diagrams stay editable when pasted into PowerPoint!
- Write emoji and symbols with your pen.

• Edit with your pen:
- Use intuitive gestures to edit and format content without breaking your flow.
- Use the marker to highlight or color, the lasso to select, and the eraser to delete entire strokes or precisely defined content.

• Write, type and draw freely on a board:
- Enjoy an infinite canvas, ideal for brainstorming, mind mapping and freeform note-taking.
- Pan around and zoom in or out for a fresh perspective.
- Use the lasso to select, move, copy, delete or resize content - and to convert handwriting to typed text.

• Switch to a document for a responsive experience:
- Create and edit structured notes – your handwriting will automatically reflow as needed.
- Make edits, adjust layout, rotate your device or split your screen without worrying about readability.

• Enrich your notes:
- Personalize content using a range of pen types and page backgrounds.
- Add photos, sketches and smart objects like math and diagrams.
- Handwrite math equations and matrices across several lines, solve simple calculations and copy math as LaTeX or image.

Nebo respects your privacy and never stores content on our servers without your explicit consent.

For help or feature requests, create a ticket at https://myscri.pt/support

Nebo requires a separate purchase for each platform, as each store has its own licensing system, and these licenses are not shared across platforms.

¹You can use any compatible active or passive pen, including Apple Pencil, to write in Nebo. Check minimum and recommended requirements for Nebo: https://myscri.pt/notes-devices",Productivity,MyScript,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/nebo-note-taking-for-students/id1119601770?uo=4,4.72468,36267,biology
6739575231,Homework Solver Chat AI Helper,"Take pictures of tasks to get answers to them!

Get instant results by scanning photos - Just upload a photo of your homework, and our smart system will quickly analyze it to provide solutions

Improve projects with AI Chat - Use it to spark ideas, conduct research, and create content that drives your creative journey and brings your projects to life

Store and organize your answers - Store instant answers in dedicated learning chats, organize lessons, and create custom chats to optimize learning

Instant answers with GPT Chat - Our AI system provides accurate and confident solutions for all your homework, questions, and creative projects 

Just snap a picture of your assignment, and our smart system will instantly analyze it, providing quick answers
Our AI-powered chat helps generate ideas, conduct research, and create content to fuel your creativity and growth
Want to revisit answers later? Easily save solutions and helpful answers in custom chats to access them at any time
Our AI-powered system delivers correct and confident answers to all your homework, ensuring reliable support

Key features: 
Scan photo to get a quick response!
Develop your projects with GPT chat!
Save answers in special chats!

Premium Subscription:
Weekly subscription
Monthly subscription
Annual subscription

Open everything
AI-driven solutions with AI Chat !
Analyze photos for quick answers
Receive accurate and clear responses

All subscriptions may include a 3-day trial. Your iTunes account will be charged after purchase confirmation. Subscriptions automatically renew unless canceled at least 24 hours before the end of the current period. Manage subscriptions and auto-renewal settings easily in Account Settings.

Privacy and Support:
Your privacy is our top priority. Review our privacy policy: https://xrolokran.info/HomeworkSolverChatAIHelper_PrivacyPolicy.html
Check our Terms of Use to learn how we safeguard your data: https://xrolokran.info/HomeworkSolverChatAIHelper_TermsOfUse.html
For help, reach out to our support service: keiraallen614655@outlook.com

Your journey starts here. Don’t wait—join thousands already loving the app!
Download our app on the App Store today and unlock a world of possibilities.",Education,Keira Allen,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/homework-solver-chat-ai-helper/id6739575231?uo=4,4.2381,63,biology
331399332,3D Brain,"Use your touch screen to rotate and zoom around 29 interactive structures. Discover how each brain region functions, what happens when it is injured, and how it is involved in mental illness. Each detailed structure comes with information on functions, disorders, brain damage, case studies, and links to modern research.

Created by Vivid Apps and AXS Biomedical Animation Studio for the Cold Spring Harbor Laboratory DNA Learning Center. 3D Brain was produced for the Genes to Cognition (G2C) Online website funded by the Dana Foundation and Hewlett Foundation.",Education,Cold Spring Harbor Laboratory,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/3d-brain/id331399332?uo=4,3.71324,136,biology
1441417054,Homo Evolution,"Create your own little world and drive on human evolution. Merge two people and get a new, more modern life form, populating the planet with different creatures: from simple animals to diverse and unpredictable personalities.

There are 4 ways to shape the world as humanity emerges:

▪ BEGINNING
Animal evolution, from the embryo to modern individuals!
▪ FIRST PEOPLE
The path from the ancient world to the first citizens!
▪ SPECTACLE
A creative Bohemia, from poets to crazy party people!
▪ BREAD 
Civilization with a degradation from natural to modified products!

There are also 8 stages of evolution:

▪ TELEVISION
▪ INTERNET
▪ SPORTS
▪ SCIENCE
▪ TELEUNITY
▪ VIRTUALIZATION
▪ TRANSFORMATION
▪ POWER CULT

Explore each branch to open the next.

You start in the BEGINNING world with a small lizard. By combining two creatures you create a new, more perfect being. By tapping the last two at this stage, you get access to a new, previously unknown world! Explore all the worlds in Homo Evolution: Tap Tap Idle Clicker!

Start creating your own world right now!


SUBSCRIPTION PRICING AND TERMS

Meet the GOLD MEMBERSHIP!
The GOLD MEMBERSHIP is a $4.99 weekly subscription with a 3-day free trial period. Enjoy 2x gold bonus, an ad-free experience, 30 Crystals every day and a 20% discount on all crystal purchases!


End of 3-day trial period and subscription renewal:

This price is for United States customers. Pricing in other countries may vary and actual charges may be converted to your local currency depending on the country of residence.

Payment will be charged to your iTunes Account upon purchase confirmation.

Subscription automatically renews unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24-hours before the end of the current period.

Your Account will be charged for the next period within 24-hours prior to the end of the current period.

Subscriptions can be managed and auto-renewal disabled in the user’s Account Settings after purchase.

Any unused portion of a free trial period, if offered, will be forfeited when the user purchases a subscription, where applicable.


Canceling your trial or subscription:

You can disable auto-renew at any time through iTunes. Check https://support.apple.com/HT202039. When your current trial/subscription period expires, you will be unsubscribed. The current active subscription period cannot be canceled. 

Privacy Policy and Terms of Use: https://privacy.azurgames.com",Games,AZUR INTERACTIVE GAMES LIMITED,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/homo-evolution/id1441417054?uo=4,4.62772,10527,biology
284943090,Molecules,"Molecules is an application for viewing three-dimensional renderings of molecules and manipulating them using your fingers.  You can rotate the molecules by moving your finger across the display, zoom in or out by using two-finger pinch gestures, or pan the molecule by moving two fingers across the screen at once.  These structures can be viewed in both ball-and-stick and spacefilling visualization modes.

Molecules can be stored on your handheld device for later viewing and are loaded via a standard document-based file browser.

Custom molecular structures can be downloaded to the application via file sharing or iCloud, and obtained via sources like the RCSB Protein Data Bank (http://www.rcsb.org/pdb), an international repository of biological molecules and their 3-D structures, or NCBI's PubChem (http://pubchem.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov), a public database of compounds.  For more details, please visit our website.

Molecules is a BSD-licensed open source project.",Education,Brad Larson,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/molecules/id284943090?uo=4,3.59639,166,biology
1218548084,AP Biology Exam Review,"Do you feel unprepared for your AP Bio exam?? Improve your AP Biology knowledge FASTER than with any other app on iTunes. Applying the latest in cognitive science techniques, AP Biology Exam Review by Next Step Test Prep will help you efficiently learn over 740 dynamic AP biology flashcards. It's the perfect study supplement! 

Brainscape has embarked on setting the highest standard for AP prep in the mobile community by partnering with Next Step Test Prep. The idea is to mesh the complete College Board outline of material with clear explanations in a streamlined adaptive flashcard software, so you can study as efficiently as possible.  The adaptive platform lets you immediately diagnose weak areas (which will repeat more frequently as you study) and avoid over-studying already strong areas (which will be sorted out for you). It also tracks your overall success throughout. This won't completely replace your books -- indeed, we still recommend doing practice problems separately -- but it's the mobile prep tool you've been waiting for.  
 
AP Biology Exam Review includes: 

-745 adaptive flashcards with in-depth coverage of AP Biology
- Organization mirroring the College Board's subdivision of topics
- An expert-designed tiered system, which progressively tests each topic from simple definitions to the most complex examples and applications
- Brainscape's famous Confidence-Based Repetition (CBR) algorithm that dratically improves learning speed and retention
- Convenient ""browse"" and ""search"" functions to allow you to quick locate specific cards and topicss
- Ongoing feedback, statistics, and visualization tools to help you track your progress
- Check the leaderboard to see who's studying the most!
   
Spread the good word, and hit us up with stars as your score starts climbing!",Education,"Bold Learning Solutions, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/ap-biology-exam-review/id1218548084?uo=4,4.20571,175,biology
6447069698,Solvo: AI Homework Helper,"Master your homework and get ready for exams with Solvo, your ultimate study companion.

Solvo is your AI homework helper and math solver trusted by over a million users. Need help with homework, tricky tests, or exam preparation? Solvo has your back. With step-by-step explanations, it helps you master any subject.

The Solvo app is loved by students, pupils, parents, and tutors alike. And here’s how this AI homework helper and math solver can help you learn effectively.

STUDY FLASHCARDS
Supercharge your learning with AI-powered flashcards! Convert study notes, textbook pages, or even entire research papers into bite-sized cards with just a snap! Or fill them in yourself for a more personalized touch.

SCAN TO SOLVE
Snap a picture, and let Solvo do the hard work. Get accurate solutions for various subjects, complete with detailed explanations.

• Mathematics
With our math solver, you can tackle any mathematical topic, no matter if you're in school, college, or university. This math solver covers:

- Algebra, with real numbers, arithmetic, expressions, logarithms, and complex numbers
- Functions, with linear, quadratic, polynomial, exponential, rational, and logarithmic functions
- Trigonometry, from trigonometric ratios to the law of sines, law of cosines, and reciprocal properties
- Geometry, with plane and solid geometry, lines and planes in space, and transformations
- Linear algebra, with matrices and systems of linear equations
- Calculus, with topics such as derivatives, integrals, limits, and tangent line and area problems 
- Logic, from reasoning and proofs to logical problem-solving techniques
- Statistics and data analysis, with probability, data representation, as well as normal and Poisson distribution
With our math solver, all answers are explained in detail and step by step. 

• Tests and Quizzes
Our AI homework helper supports all types of academic questions, including multiple-choice, true or false, and essay-style answers. You’ll be ready for any quiz or test.

• Chemistry
With Solvo’s chemistry solver, you can decode formulas, balance equations, and explore case studies, both text-based and formula-focused.

• Biology
Whether it’s genetics, anatomy, or ecology, Solvo gives science answers that break down even the toughest topics.

• Physics
From motion to magnetism, Solvo’s physics solver will explain formulas and text-based problems with clarity.

TYPE TO SOLVE
Type your question and get guided study help from our AI homework helper.

• Do math manually with our Calculator: just enter your problem and have it solved in seconds
• Chat across subjects, if you need science answers, essay guidance, or general academic support 
• Write high-quality essays on any topic 
• Rewrite various types of content 
• Summarize your educational materials 

Why Solvo?
As your best study companion, our AI homework helper is here to support your study journey anytime, anywhere. With Solvo, you get access to a math solver, physics solver, essay writer, and chemistry solver—all in one place. If you're learning for exams or completing assignments, Solvo’s powerful tools (math solver, in particular) will help you learn more effectively.

TikTok with quick study tips: @solvo.app
Any questions about our homework helper and math solver? Send a message to support@aiby.com

Be unstoppable in class with Premium. A subscription allows you to:
• Remove usage limits
• Get more detailed answers
• Use text recognition (OCR)
• Get instant responses

Subscriptions are auto-billed based on the chosen plan.

Privacy policy: https://aiby.mobi/ai_study_ios/privacy
Terms of use: https://aiby.mobi/ai_study_ios/terms",Education,AIBY Incorporated,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/solvo-ai-homework-helper/id6447069698?uo=4,4.60267,4276,biology
583702070,Biology Today,"Biology Today is one among the four competitive magazines published by MTG Learning Media Pvt. Ltd. With a readership of more than one crore readers, MTG Learning Media Pvt. Ltd. is a pioneer in the education publishing business in India, catering to the needs of IIT and PMT aspirants. Established in 1982, the group is committed to improving the quality of science education, enhancing students' interest in science, fostering their analytical ability and, most importantly helping thousands of young engineering and medical aspirants to become successful professionals – their cherished dream.  
Biology Today supplies the essential material such as important texts, sample papers, previous years’ papers, flowcharts and memory tips required for achieving success in pre-medical exams.

Magazine Subscriptions are available for purchase inside this app. 

Three months subscription - $1.99 (automatically renewed until canceled)
Six months subscription - $3.99 (automatically renewed until canceled)
One year subscription - $7.99 (automatically renewed until canceled)

Your subscription automatically renews unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24-hours before the end of the current period. 

Your iTunes account will automatically be charged at the same price for renewal within 24-hours prior to the end of the current period unless you change your subscription preferences in your account settings. 

You can manage your subscriptions through your account settings after purchase on your device. 

No cancellation of the current subscription is allowed during active subscription period.

Please visit http://www.magzter.com/ns/privacy-policy.html for our Privacy Policy and http://www.magzter.com/ns/terms_condition.html  for our Terms & Conditions",Magazines & Newspapers,Magzter Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/biology-today/id583702070?uo=4,5.0,3,biology
1021592299,Science Dictionary by Farlex,"Science Dictionary by Farlex gives you free, instant access to more than 100,000 scientific terms, thousands of images, and more than 35,000 audio pronunciations from multiple authoritative science encyclopedias and dictionaries covering all scientific fields. 

Whether you're a student, professional, or just curious about the world around you, this free science dictionary app can help you find clear, in-depth definitions of science terminology right on your iPhone or iPad. Search across multiple disciplines for entries on: 

Biology
Physics
Chemistry
Geology 
Astronomy 
Oceanography 
Environmental science 
Computer science
+ much more…

FEATURES:

* Search 100,000+ terms across all scientific fields from top sources you won't find anywhere else. 

* Learn by seeing: Thousands of diagrams, illustrations, and more.

* Save unlimited bookmarks to quickly access your favorite articles.

* Use native voice search to look up a word just by saying it. (With supported devices)

* See search suggestions as you type and always find what you're looking for.

* View your recent searches.

* Perform advanced searches, including ""Starts with,"" ""Ends with,"" ""Contains,"" and ""Wildcard.""

* Listen to 35,000+ audio pronunciations for both American and British speakers. 

* Adjust font size.

* Share definitions via social networks, email, and text. (With supported devices)

User-friendly, Comprehensive, and Authoritative: Science Dictionary by Farlex is the perfect free scientific dictionary for students, professionals, and anyone looking to learn more about the world of science. This is NOT a preview or a trial version, and there is no ""locked"" content. Open the app on your iPhone or iPad and immediately access all content — no subscriptions required!

How do we do it?

TheFreeDictionary.com - Farlex apps have been downloaded tens of millions times across multiple platforms, with top ratings after hundreds of thousands of reviews. We work with the best publishers to bring together trusted content in the most comprehensive, authoritative dictionary apps on the market. Our flagship app is The Free Dictionary (TFD), powered by TheFreeDictionary.com. Find our other apps by searching ""Dictionary by Farlex"" in the App Store.",Reference,"Farlex, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/science-dictionary-by-farlex/id1021592299?uo=4,4.59558,408,biology
6720764069,Biology AI: Science Answers,"Unlock the power of AI-assisted biology learning with Biology AI: Homework Helper! This revolutionary app is your personal tutor, ready to tackle any biology question you throw its way. Whether you're struggling with complex concepts or need quick clarification, our advanced AI is here to help.

Key Features:
- Instant Answers: Type in your biology questions and receive detailed, step-by-step explanations in seconds.
- Photo Recognition: Snap a picture of your textbook problem or handwritten notes, and let our AI decipher and solve it for you.
- Comprehensive Coverage: From cellular biology to ecology, genetics to evolution, we've got every aspect of biology covered.
- 24/7 Availability: Get help anytime, anywhere – perfect for late-night study sessions or last-minute homework panic.
- User-Friendly Interface: Designed for students of all ages, from high school to university level.
- Continuous Learning: Our AI improves with every interaction, ensuring you always get the most up-to-date and accurate information.

Biology AI: Homework Helper is more than just an app – it's your pathway to excelling in biology. Whether you're aiming to boost your grades, prepare for exams, or simply satisfy your curiosity about the living world, our app is your go-to resource.

If there are questions, please contact us at support@eastfrisiallc.com

Privacy Policy: https://www.eastfrisiallc.com/privacy-aibiology
Terms of Use: https://www.apple.com/legal/internet-services/itunes/dev/stdeula/",Education,East Frisia LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/biology-ai-science-answers/id6720764069?uo=4,4.25926,27,biology
6467015077,homie AI: Math Photo Solver,"Your Ultimate AI Homework Helper and AI Tutor built on GPT-4o API!

Unlock the power of AI with homie, your go-to app for seamless studying, efficient homework help, and expert guidance. Whether you're tackling math problems, writing essays, or mastering any subject, homie has you covered.

MATH SOLVER:
Snap and solve math problems effortlessly with homie's AI-powered math solver. Say goodbye to math stress and hello to step-by-step solutions tailored just for you.

ESSAY WRITING ASSISTANT:
Elevate your writing with homie's AI essay writing assistance. Craft professional-grade essays with ease, thanks to intelligent suggestions for grammar, style, and clarity.

STUDY SUPPORT:
From history to science, homie provides versatile homework assistance. Study any subject with confidence, guided by personalized AI tutoring that adapts to your unique learning style.

HOMEWORK HELPER:
Tired of struggling with assignments? Let homie be your dedicated homework helper. Receive expert support for any task, making learning enjoyable and efficient.

AI-POWERED TECHNOLOGY:
With homie, experience the future of education. Leverage advanced AI for text recognition, editing, and personalized tutoring. It's not just an app; it's your all-in-one study companion.

Download homie now and discover the perfect blend of AI, math solving, essay writing, and study support. Say hello to stress-free learning with homie – your ultimate homework solution!

Privacy Policy: https://www.iubenda.com/privacy-policy/27023519
Terms of Use: https://www.iubenda.com/terms-and-conditions/27023519

This app is independently developed and not affiliated, endorsed, or sponsored by OpenAI.",Education,Tappz GmbH,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/homie-ai-math-photo-solver/id6467015077?uo=4,4.45643,482,biology
6466818929,Trivia Spin - Smart Questions,"Dive into the exciting world of knowledge with Trivia Spin! Our game will not only test your knowledge of the world around you, but also teach you new things. Get ready to test your knowledge in an exciting quiz with new and unique game mechanics.

In Trivia Spin you will answer interesting questions by matching the correct pairs on the outer and inner wheel. Learn new and fascinating facts, expand your horizons and educate yourself by playing in more than 20 different categories.

Enjoy a dynamic and engaging experience with beautifully designed visuals and smooth animations that make learning fun. With each spin, you’ll unlock new challenges, uncover surprising facts, and improve your problem-solving skills in an entertaining way.

This game will give you unforgettable moments of exciting quizzes. Become an expert in various fields of knowledge and immerse yourself in a fascinating world of facts and answers.

Features:
- Unique quiz mechanics with rotating wheels
- Over 20 different question categories
- Interesting facts and learning as you play
- Increase your horizons and become an expert in various fields
- Simple and intuitive interface
- Endless levels to test your knowledge

Solve our puzzles and energise your brain, train your logic and increase your dopamine levels. The more you play, the higher your IQ will be!

Get ready for an exciting adventure in the world of Trivia Spin! Try to match the correct cells with the answers, discover interesting facts and become a real quiz guru! Download the game and go on an exciting journey through the world of knowledge!

Privacy Policy: https://severex.io/privacy/
Terms of Use: http://severex.io/terms/",Games,Severex PL SP Z O O,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/trivia-spin-smart-questions/id6466818929?uo=4,4.64752,7816,biology
6736654449,SmartyMe: Daily Microlearning,"Introducing SmartyMe — a comprehensive knowledge app featuring interactive lessons that last just 15 minutes. Achieve your goals and broaden your understanding of subjects that spark your curiosity.

Our app combines various learning methods to help you acquire knowledge more efficiently. Tackle real-world problems, exercise your mind, and enjoy the process!

WHAT DOES SMARTYME OFFER YOU?

Diverse Subjects for Different Learning Levels
Explore a wide range of topics suitable for beginners, intermediate learners, and advanced individuals. This variety lets you select lessons that match your current level and interests.



WHAT TOPICS CAN YOU MASTER?
- Art
- History
- Logic
- Biology
- Math
- Literature
- Finance
- Public Speaking
- Communication skills
- Philosophy

750+ Life-Changing Book Summaries
Gain key insights from top nonfiction bestsellers in under 15 minutes. Whether you prefer reading or listening, our concise summaries cover a wide range of topics to help you grow.

Transformative Self-Growth Challenges
Elevate your life and skills with targeted challenges on Success, Wealth, Healthy Relationships, Modern Parenting, Self-Confidence, Emotional Intelligence, Personal Development, and Leadership Influence.

Engaging and Accessible Learning
Reach your goals and boost your confidence in your knowledge base. Our expert-designed content ensures an optimal learning experience tailored for you.

Learn Anytime, Anywhere
Practice during your morning coffee or lunch break. Looking to improve your sleep? Try a short lesson before bed. You can learn at your own pace whenever you find a little free time.

Break the Habit of Mindless Scrolling
Dedicate just 5, 10, or 15 minutes each day without interrupting your busy routine. Utilize this time to enhance your knowledge instead of procrastinating.

Master In-Demand Skills
Keep your mind active and enhance your memory. Improve your focus and nurture your creativity. Strengthen your problem-solving and critical thinking skills for real-life applications.

Unlock a Wealth of Knowledge
Become the most engaging person in any conversation and confidently share what you’ve learned with others.

Tailored Learning Plans Based on Your Goals and Skill Level
Enjoy a personalized learning journey crafted around your individual objectives and current capabilities. This ensures you concentrate on the areas that will benefit your growth the most.

Collection of Concise 15-Minute Lessons Covering Key Concepts
Delve into brief lessons that convey essential ideas in just 15 minutes. This structure makes it easy to incorporate learning into your hectic lifestyle.

Terms of Use: https://www.smartymeapp.com/terms-of-use-m
Privacy Policy: https://www.smartymeapp.com/privacy-policy-m",Education,ApexTech Ltd,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/smartyme-daily-microlearning/id6736654449?uo=4,4.44346,7225,biology
6738112532,AI Math Solver-Science Answers,"Math just got a whole lot easier with AI Math! Whether you're facing tricky equations, complex quizzes, or just need help with homework, AI Math is here to support you every step of the way. Snap a photo, and let our AI-powered scanner handle the rest – from instant answers to in-depth explanations, this app has everything you need to succeed!

Key Features:
- Math Scanner & Camera Tool
Effortlessly solve math problems by simply snapping a photo! Our smart camera recognizes equations instantly and gives you accurate solutions. No more struggling with long equations – AI Math is your go-to equation solver, always at your fingertips.

- AI Chatbot & Instant Answers
Need help understanding a concept or finding the right answer? Just ask! Our built-in AI chatbot (powered by GPT) is ready to assist with math questions, practice exercises, and even general homework questions. Get the answers you need in seconds, so you can stay focused and keep learning.

- Homework Helper & Quiz Support
Stuck on a tough homework question? Preparing for a big quiz or test? AI Math has your back with step-by-step explanations and solutions for a wide range of topics. From basic practice problems to advanced equations, get the support you need to ace every exam and assignment.

- Analyze & Visualize Graphs
Struggling with graph equations? Our advanced tools can read and analyze graphs, providing insights and explanations to help you understand every detail. Perfect for visual learners and anyone needing extra support with graph-related questions.

- Virtual Math Tutor
Consider AI Math your personal math tutor! Whether you’re studying algebra, geometry, calculus, or just need quick help with daily exercises, this app provides a reliable, on-demand tutor experience that’s as close as it gets to having a real teacher by your side.

- Practice, Test, & Improve
Practice makes perfect! With AI Math, you can solve math problems and take quizzes to sharpen your skills and improve your math knowledge over time. Tackle practice tests or random problems to see where you stand – the best way to stay prepared for any exam.

Why Choose AI Math?
- Instant Answers: Snap and solve with ease – perfect for students needing fast solutions.
- Free Access with Enhanced Options: Enjoy essential features for free, and upgrade to unlock unlimited access and premium tools.
- Ad-Free Experience: Learn without interruptions – no ads, just answers.
- Always There for You: Get reliable help whenever you need it, from homework support to exam prep.

Whether you’re working through a tough homework assignment, preparing for exams, or just brushing up on math, AI Math is here to make math easier, faster, and more accessible. Join thousands of students transforming their learning experience with AI Math – download now and explore the power of AI in math!

Perfect for:
- Students at all levels – from middle school to college.
- Parents helping kids with homework.
- Anyone looking to refresh their math skills.

Start using AI Math today and experience math made easy!",Education,Giang Nguyen,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/ai-math-solver-science-answers/id6738112532?uo=4,4.5919,321,biology
6446278509,Study AI: Math Homework Helper,"Study AI is a cutting-edge mobile application that harnesses the power of artificial intelligence (AI) to revolutionize the way you approach scientific tasks. With Study AI, you can simply snap a photo of any complex problem from the fields of algebra, chemistry, physics or other scientific subjects, and let the app do the rest. It's like having a personal tutor in your pocket, available anytime, anywhere. 

Key Features:

Intelligent Photo Analysis: Study AI utilizes advanced AI algorithms to analyze the photo of your scientific task accurately. Whether it's an algebraic equation or a chemical formula, the app can decipher the problem, break it down, and identify the relevant components.

Instant Solutions: Within seconds, Study AI provides you with comprehensive solutions to your scientific problems. The app's AI-powered engine applies complex calculations, rule-based algorithms, and extensive scientific knowledge to generate step-by-step solutions tailored to your specific task.

Detailed Explanations: Understanding the process is just as important as finding the solution. Study AI goes beyond providing answers and offers detailed explanations for each step of the solution. This helps you grasp the underlying concepts and enhances your learning experience.

Comprehensive Subject Coverage: Study AI supports a wide range of scientific subjects, including algebra, calculus, chemistry, physics, and more. No matter the complexity or topic, the app is designed to handle a variety of scientific tasks, making it a versatile tool for students, professionals, and enthusiasts alike.

User-Friendly Interface: Study AI features an intuitive and user-friendly interface, ensuring a seamless experience for users of all skill levels. Its sleek design and easy-to-navigate layout make it effortless to capture photos, view solutions, and explore additional resources.

Please note, some of the features are limited or available only to premium subscription holders. Namely: detailed and step-by-step solutions, unlimited AI queries and ads-free experience.

Privacy and Security: Rest assured that your data and scanned photos are treated with the utmost confidentiality. Study AI prioritizes user privacy and implements robust security measures to protect your information. For more details please see our privacy policy https://telegra.ph/APENGAMES-O%C3%9C-Privacy-Policy-10-20 and Terms of use https://telegra.ph/APENGAMES-O%C3%9C-Terms-of-Use-EULA-06-02

Unlock the power of AI and transform the way you tackle scientific challenges with Study AI. Whether you're a student looking for quick homework help, a professional needing on-the-go problem-solving assistance, or an enthusiast eager to explore scientific concepts, Study AI is the ultimate tool for your academic and scientific journey.

Note: Study AI is intended to assist users in their scientific tasks and learning process. It is always recommended to understand the underlying principles and concepts rather than solely relying on automated solutions.",Education,ApenGames OU,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/study-ai-math-homework-helper/id6446278509?uo=4,3.66667,78,biology
6670184163,AI Math Homework Solver App,"This app revolutionizes how students approach learning, offering a dynamic platform to explore new topics, prepare for exams, and achieve success in subjects like math, chemistry, and physics. Rather than simply providing answers like traditional tutoring, this app guides users through each problem with comprehensive, step-by-step instructions. This approach empowers students to grasp the underlying concepts and independently solve similar problems with confidence.

Here's how the app transforms your learning process:
- Thorough homework assistance: Whether you're tackling challenging algebraic problems or complex chemical reactions, the app delivers the detailed support needed to conquer even the most difficult assignments. It's designed to help you manage and overcome the toughest academic hurdles!
- Efficient organization: Students can easily store completed tasks and questions within the app's directory, making it simple to review past work, share with classmates, or print for future reference.
- Enhanced group learning: For those in need of additional support, the AI Homework Helper facilitates collaborative study sessions, allowing users to work together on math problems with friends, classmates, or others. This creates an engaging and interactive learning environment that promotes teamwork and shared understanding.

Payment Details

• Your Apple ID will be charged once the purchase is confirmed.
• Subscriptions automatically renew unless canceled at least 24 hours before the end of the current billing cycle.
• Renewal charges will be applied to your account within 24 hours before the current billing period ends.
• You can manage or cancel your subscription in the App Store account settings after making a purchase.

Privacy Policy: https://docs.google.com/document/d/1BXTOkSk_1H8zsKdgM20zF5OPNmL6VNXp6ekzlFb0xcU/edit?usp=sharing
Terms of Use: https://docs.google.com/document/d/1ao_h2nZ4HCF0NJ7Ty6RJ4K5acYcJhBZm0fUyShugs5E/edit?usp=sharing",Education,Muhammet BASBUGA,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/ai-math-homework-solver-app/id6670184163?uo=4,4.55625,160,biology
364882015,HudsonAlpha iCell,"***Updated 3.6.1***

iCell now works even better on the iPhone. We have added larger text for all descriptions and included the ability to change text description levels for the iPhone as well as the iPad. 

iCell gives students, teachers, and anyone interested in biology a 3D view inside a cell.  Included are examples of three types of cells:  animal, plant, and bacteria.  Learn about the various parts of the cell, which biologists, biochemists, and DNA researchers at the HudsonAlpha Institute study and use to advance the limits of biotechnology.

You can use your finger to tap on parts of the cell to select and zoom in on that particular organelle.  Each organelle comes with a name and a short description of its function in the cell.

For a better view of each cell, hold down one finger on the screen, and drag to rotate around the cell or selected organelle.  You can zoom in and out by pinching or flaring with two fingers at once.

We hope you enjoy!",Education,HudsonAlpha Institute for Biotechnology,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/hudsonalpha-icell/id364882015?uo=4,3.00697,287,biology
6473721582,"Whiz: Homework, Math AI Helper","Welcome to Whiz, your study companion! Unleash your study prowess with your personalized AI education assistant!

Introducing Whiz, an AI-powered app that revolutionizes the way you approach study tasks. Simply scan, type, or upload your assignments, and experience the seamless transformation!

Discover what Whiz offers:

• Scan and solve any equations
Facing a challenging math problem? Snap a picture, and Whiz not only solves it but also provides comprehensive steps. Whiz's lightning-quick assistance boosts your problem-solving confidence.

• Get answers to any quiz
Whiz handles various question formats—True/False, multiple-choice, and open-ended. Just snap a photo, choose Text-Based Problems, and receive immediate answers. This tool is your secret weapon for self-assessment and exam preparedness.

• Create essays effortlessly
Struggling to express your ideas? Whiz's Create Essay feature effortlessly turns your concepts into coherent compositions.

• Improve your writing style
Upload your draft to Whiz, and witness it transform into a polished masterpiece. This feature is your go-to for refining writing assignments.

• Simplify smart reading
Need a concise summary of a lengthy text? Input the content or specify the book's details, and Whiz's Generate Summary feature will extract the essence in seconds!

While studies may present challenges, Whiz equips you to conquer them all! Access instant homework support wherever and whenever you need it, making study sessions stress-free and productive.

Stay ahead with Whiz Premium! Subscribers enjoy:
• Unlimited answers;
• Higher word limit;
• Full Category Access.

Subscription renewal occurs automatically according to your selected plan.

Privacy Policy - https://whiz.mobi/privacy-policy
Terms of Use - https://whiz.mobi/terms-and-conditions",Education,FLOOMIX LTD,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/whiz-homework-math-ai-helper/id6473721582?uo=4,4.6646,161,biology
1236664368,Marine Biology — dictionary,"Are your marine biology exam at the corner? Then our app is just for you!

""Marine Biology"" is your personal helper that provides you with all information required. Can you just imagine that with the help of one mobile app you can easily learn marine biology?

Downloading our app you get:

▶ TERMS

• Dictionary with key terms and their definitions
• Flashcards provided - an easier and smarter way of definitions to be organized and kept in mind
• Visual explanations are also included
• “Term search” allowing you to look for in all sections simultaneously makes the process of learning to be an easy one

▶ 146 VIDEO LESSONS

▶ TEXTBOOK

• It covers major topics
• Textbook is easy-to-read and easy-to-understand
• The book divided into:
- The general characteristics of the sea shore
- The sea-side naturalist
- Sea angling
- The marine aquarium
- The preservation of marine objects
- Examination of marine objects—dissection
- The protozoa of the sea shore
- British sponges
- The cœlenterates—jelly-fishes, anemones, and their allies
- Starfishes, sea urchins, etc.
- Marine worms
- Marine molluscs	
- Marine arthropods
- Marine vertebrates
- Sea weeds
- The flowering plants of the sea-side

Stop being scared, download ""Marine Biology""!",Education,App Crab OOO,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/marine-biology-dictionary/id1236664368?uo=4,4.0,8,biology
1613901277,Anatomy Atlas & Human Biology,"Anatomical Atlas of Human Body is a suitable app with a voice search for the elements of our body. Delve into the complexities of anatomy with interactive visible 3D human body models and detailed information.


We offer you the following topics for study:


3 systems of the human body: SKELETON, ORGANS AND MUSCLES;


- The most DETAILED INFORMATION about the skull and bones;
- 3D MODELS with description.


Test your knowledge by taking tests on:


- Skeletal system
- Organ system
- Muscular system


Perfect for anyone who is interested in anatomy learning! Get all achievements, by passing or even failing anatomy tests!

We will continue to expand the content of our application, adding information about various systems and functions of the body, in order to further delight you with Anatomical Atlas of Human Body.


Subscription may be required for specific features such as unrestricted access to all content sections and tests. In contrast, the free version offers limited access to the ""Skeleton"" section and test, as well as access to voice search.

https://toolsassistant.kz/privacy
https://toolsassistant.kz/tos",Education,"TOOLS ASSISTANT, TOO",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/anatomy-atlas-human-biology/id1613901277?uo=4,4.45679,81,biology
6736764300,Biology Solver: Answer Helper,"Quickly solve biology problems by uploading a photo or typing your question. Get detailed answers with explanations, track your history, and easily access previous tasks. Perfect for students and professionals who need fast, accurate solutions.

Subscribe for Full Access: $4.99 per week, cancel anytime.


Terms of Use: https://www.apple.com/legal/internet-services/itunes/dev/stdeula/
Privacy Policy: https://sites.google.com/view/dalineapa-policy/?v=2",Utilities,Irma Dolidze,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/biology-solver-answer-helper/id6736764300?uo=4,4.44444,27,biology
6739805497,Biology AI,"Dive into the wonders of life sciences with AI Biology & Science Solver, your ultimate companion for mastering biology questions effortlessly. Whether you're preparing for exams or exploring the intricacies of the natural world, this app provides fast, reliable answers and detailed insights. Perfect for students, teachers, and biology enthusiasts — AI Biology & Science Solver makes learning biology smarter and more efficient.

Key Features:

*Scan & Solve: Snap a photo of your biology question and get instant answers.
*Quick & Detailed Answers: Get clear, concise solutions or explore in-depth explanations tailored to your needs.
*Revisit Previous Inquiries: Easily review your solved questions for effective studying.
*Powerful Results: Leverage advanced AI technology for accurate and comprehensive answers every time.

***********
Premium access

To access all the premium features and content, you need to subscribe or pay once for lifetime access. The cost of the purchase is charged to your iTunes account.
Subscriptions automatically renew and are billed at the rate and period you choose based on your subscription plan. User accounts are charged for auto-renewal within 24-hours prior to the end of the current period.
Subscriptions may be managed and auto-renewal may be turned off in iTunes Account Settings after purchase. Any unused portion of a free trial period, if offered, will be forfeited when the user purchases a subscription to that publication, where applicable.

Privacy Policy: https://camplain-apps.com/privacy-policy.html
Terms of Use: https://camplain-apps.com/terms-of-use.html",Education,Thinkabout LTD,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/biology-ai/id6739805497?uo=4,5.0,13,biology
6499339703,Solve Homework: AI Math Helper,"Unlock the Power of Learning with Solve Homework: AI Math Helper

Welcome to your ultimate study partner, Solve Homework: AI Math Helper! Designed to assist students of all levels, this app isn’t just about providing answers — it’s about empowering you to understand and master the material.

Features:
- Comprehensive Support Across Subjects: Whether it's mathematics, physics, or chemistry, our AI is equipped to help with a wide array of subjects, ensuring you have the assistance you need, all in one place.
- Interactive Problem Solving: Go beyond the answers with step-by-step explanations that help you grasp the underlying concepts and learn how to tackle similar problems on your own.
- Customizable Learning Experience: Tailor your study sessions with personalized learning paths that adapt to your pace and style of learning. This way, you're not just preparing for exams — you're also building lasting knowledge.
- Articles with Study Tips: Regularly published articles provide tips on effective studying, memory retention, and productivity to enhance your learning experience and help you achieve academic success.
- Instant Help with Homework: Stuck on a problem? Get immediate assistance with our AI Helper, ensuring you never feel left behind.
- Safe and Secure Learning Environment: With privacy and security as top priorities, your data and progress remain protected, allowing you to focus on your studies without concerns.

Embark on your journey to academic success with Solve Homework: AI Math Helper. Learn efficiently, understand deeply, and prepare thoroughly. Download now and transform the way you study!

Have Questions? Contact Us: If you have any questions, feel free to reach out via email at ilonkadantsevich@gmail.com

Privacy Policy: https://docs.google.com/document/d/1f9B_i8daq0vjSg0H-tASq1_IOdumlcjflF2QGVXQOjs/edit?usp=sharing 
EULA: https://www.apple.com/legal/internet-services/itunes/dev/stdeula/ ",Education,Ilona Dantsevich,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/solve-homework-ai-math-helper/id6499339703?uo=4,4.75861,29,biology
361907181,SPARKvue,"SPARKvue is a popular data collection, visualization and analysis application for STEM learning. SPARKvue enables wireless data collection and live data sharing with anyone in the world to unleash the learning experience. 

Capture data from the world around you:
● Graph live sensor data from the world around you in real time—pH, temperature, force, carbon dioxide and much more!
● Connect PASCO’s new wireless Bluetooth Smart sensors directly to your iPad or iPhone—just turn on the sensor and connect right in the app. Nothing could be easier!
● Connect any of 80+ PASCO sensors via our Bluetooth interfaces
 ● Capture images with the integrated cameras and use SPARKvue’s image analysis capabilities
● Collect and display live data using the onboard accelerometer and sound sensors

Key features:
● Measure and display sensor data in real time
● Display data in a graph, bar graph, analog meter, digits or table
● Build custom displays--mix display types, images, videos, text and assessments (Build feature not available on iPhones due to screen size)
● Analyze data with built-in statistical tools (min, max, mean, standard deviation, count and area)
● Select from 8 different curve fits including linear and quadratic
● Pinch and zoom manipulation of graphs
● Capture and annotate images
● Add videos, photos and GIFs
● Includes 14 preloaded SPARKlab interactive lab activities, plus over 80 more available free online
● Create and export electronic student lab journals
● Integrated with cloud-based file sharing services such as Dropbox and more
● Add assessments including multiple choice, drop down lists, and free text response (not available on iPhones)
● Live data sharing and session sharing across devices--with each student capturing the shared data on their own device for further analysis. Share with the class or even across geographies-in real time.

Designed for science learning:
● Convenient annotation, snapshot and electronic journaling are among the features supporting peer dialogue, classroom presentations, and assessment.
● With SPARKlab interactive lab activities, teachers can blend instructional content, live data collection & analysis, reflection prompts and more, all completely within the SPARKvue environment. Use PASCO free SPARKlabs or build your own!

Common user experience across platforms:
SPARKvue is a member of PASCO’s SPARKscience family, providing the same user experience across all technology environments:
● tablets
● phones
● computers
● interactive whiteboards
No matter what the mix of technology is in the classroom or the school, teachers and students all share the same user experience--placing the learning experience in the forefront and simplifying classroom management.


Where do I get sensors?
PASCO offers over 80 sensors to measure almost anything in the world around you in life, earth and physical sciences plus out in the field exploring the environment. See our newest wireless sensors to measure Temperature, pH, Pressure and Force/Acceleration—all with no need for an expensive interface or wires. Just turn them on and collect data! For purchasing information, see http://pasco.com/sparkvue

Languages:
SPARKvue supports 28 languages. See http://pasco.com/sparkvue for details.

Support:
SPARKvue has an integrated help system, just a touch away with the help icon. Further assistance with SPARKvue or any PASCO product is available free from PASCO Teacher Support.

About PASCO Scientific:
PASCO Scientific brings a rich history of innovation and support for science education, with over 50 years of service to educators around the world.",Education,PASCO scientific,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/sparkvue/id361907181?uo=4,1.89365,583,biology
1011023479,Trivia Quest™ Biology - trivia questions,"How do most frogs drink water?
How do bats find their way in the dark?
What do newborn blue whales eat?
Test your biology knowledge to the max! Challenge your brain like never before with this highly addictive #1 user-rated biology trivia game in the App store!

Thousands of original questions created by experts. Simple game play: 1 question, 4 possible solutions, which is the correct answer?

FEATURES:
- Thousands of original questions.
- New trivia added daily!
- Photo Trivia: Questions with pictures!
- Challenge Friends via Social Media & text messages!
- Stuck on a question? You can always pass it for free! No in-app purchase necessary!
- Hundreds of hours of fun, free to play for life!

***Become Trivia Master! Get Trivia Quest™ Now!***

Don't forget to check out other games in the series. Search ""Trivia Quest"" in app store!",Games,Yiyuan Qu,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/trivia-quest-biology-trivia-questions/id1011023479?uo=4,4.09999,30,biology
522996341,Vernier Graphical Analysis GW,"Graphical Analysis™ GW is a tool for science students to collect, graph, and analyze data from Vernier Go Wireless® sensors.

Sensor data-collection support:
• Vernier Go Wireless® Temp and Go Wireless pH sensors
• Vernier Go Wireless Heart Rate and Go Wireless Exercise Heart Rate monitors
• Vernier LabQuest® sensors used with Go Wireless Link or LabQuest Stream interfaces
• Basic support for some Vernier Go Direct® Sensors
• NODE (by Variable Inc.) sensor support 

Additional experiment options:
• Data Sharing via Wi-Fi connection to LabQuest 2 or Logger Pro® 3
• Built-in Sensors (accelerometers)
• Manual Entry

Note: Sensor data collection and Data Sharing require the purchase of hardware from Vernier Software & Technology. Built-in sensor and manual entry of data can be performed without a hardware purchase. For more information on Data Sharing, visit http://www.vernier.com/css 

Key Features - Data Collection
• Multi-sensor data-collection support
• Time Based, Event Based, and Drop Counting data-collection modes
• Configurable data-collection rate and duration for time-based data collection
• Sensor calibrations
• Option to zero and reverse sensor readings
• Graph match feature for use with motion detectors
• Manual entry of data from keyboard and clipboard

Key Features - Data Analysis
• Display one, two, or three graphs simultaneously
• View data in a table or show a graph and table side-by-side
• Draw Predictions on a graph to uncover misconceptions
• Examine, interpolate/extrapolate, and select data
• Apply Statistics calculations to find mean, min, max, and standard deviation
• Perform curve fits, including linear, quadratic, natural exponent, and more
• Add calculated columns based on existing data to linearize data or investigate related concepts
• Pinch to scale graphs

Key Features - Collaboration and Sharing
• Add graph titles
• Export graphs and data for printing and inclusion in lab reports
• Export data in .CSV format for analysis of data in spreadsheet software such as Excel®, Google Sheets™, and Numbers®

Vernier Software & Technology has over 35 years of experience in providing effective learning resources for understanding experimental data in science and math classrooms. Graphical Analysis GW is a part of the extensive system of sensors, interfaces, and data-collection software from Vernier for science and STEM education.",Education,Vernier Software & Technology,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/vernier-graphical-analysis-gw/id522996341?uo=4,2.41026,156,biology
1385963326,Vernier Graphical Analysis,"Graphical Analysis™ is a tool for science students to collect, graph, and analyze data from Vernier sensors.

Sensor data-collection support:
• Vernier Go Direct® sensors - with Bluetooth® wireless technology
• Vernier Go Wireless® Heart Rate and Go Wireless Exercise Heart Rate monitors
• Vernier LabQuest® sensors used with a LabQuest Stream interface

Additional experiment options:
• Data Sharing via Wi-Fi connection to LabQuest 2 or Logger Pro® 3
• Manual Entry

Note: Sensor data collection and Data Sharing require the purchase of hardware from Vernier Science Education. Manual entry of data can be performed without a hardware purchase. For more information on Data Sharing, visit http://www.vernier.com/css

Key Features - Data Collection
• Multi-sensor data-collection support
• Time Based, Event Based, Drop Counting, and Photogate data-collection modes
• Configurable data-collection rate and duration for time-based data collection
• Optional triggering of time-based data collection based on sensor value
• Customizable unit display on supported sensors
• Sensor calibrations
• Option to zero and reverse sensor readings
• Graph match feature for use with motion detectors
• Manual entry of data from keyboard and clipboard

Key Features - Data Analysis
• Display one, two, or three graphs simultaneously
• View data in a table or show a graph and table side-by-side
• Draw Predictions on a graph to uncover misconceptions
• Examine, interpolate/extrapolate, and select data
• Use Tangent tool to show instantaneous rates of change of the data
• Find area under a curve using the Integral tool
• Apply Statistics calculations to find mean, min, max, and standard deviation
• Perform curve fits, including linear, quadratic, natural exponent, and more
• Add calculated columns based on existing data to linearize data or investigate related concepts

Key Features - Collaboration and Sharing
• Create text annotations and add graph titles
• Export graphs and data for printing and inclusion in lab reports
• Export data in .CSV format for analysis of data in spreadsheet software such as Excel, Google Sheets, and Numbers
• Adjust font sizes for easier viewing when presenting to your class

Vernier Science Education has over 35 years of experience in providing effective learning resources for understanding experimental data in science and math classrooms. Graphical Analysis 4 is a part of the extensive system of sensors, interfaces, and data-collection software from Vernier for science and STEM education.",Education,Vernier Software & Technology,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/vernier-graphical-analysis/id1385963326?uo=4,2.01165,515,biology
1080195219,Khmer Biology,"The First Khmer Biology is now available on App Store.
Khmer Biology is the reference for students to help the studying.
In this app, it contains useful materials such as:
- Formulas for calculation
- Biology glossary
- Questions and Answers
- Lesson and bio-glossary grade 12

Now, Your studying will easier than ever with Khmer Biology!",Education,Cheab Kunthea,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/khmer-biology/id1080195219?uo=4,4.5,4,biology
1301129866,Amino Acid Quiz,"Test and improve your knowledge of the 20 standard amino acids using this app's customizable quizzes. 

Multiple choice quizzes cover the following 6 topics:

- Amino acid names
- Structural formulas
- 1-Letter codes
- 3-Letter codes
- Codons
- Side chain classes

All topics can be studied for free using this app. An in-app purchase is available to remove the banner ad.

The game language can easily be changed in-app to English, French, Spanish, German, Simplified Chinese, Traditional Chinese, Japanese, Korean, Italian, Indonesian, Russian, Portuguese, Swedish, Norwegian, and Dutch.",Education,Atlas Educational Software,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/amino-acid-quiz/id1301129866?uo=4,4.88598,763,biology
514734550,Scientific American,"Founded in 1845, Scientific American provides expert insights on the most important and awe-inspiring advances in science and technology. With news and commentary about current events and in-depth features by experts, including more than 200 Nobel Prize-winning scientists, Scientific American is the essential guide to the modern world. Support Science Journalism. Become a Subscriber.

A subscription to Scientific American is available through iTunes for $49.99 annually and is renewed automatically at the end of the subscription term, until canceled. Individual issues are $9.99 each. Payment for all purchases will be charged to your iTunes account. For more information, please visit iTunes Terms and Conditions: https://www.apple.com/legal/internet-services/itunes/volume/us/terms.html 

 
Founded in 1845, Scientific American provides expert insights on the most important and awe-inspiring advances in science and technology. With news and commentary about current events and in-depth features by experts, including more than 200 Nobel Prize-winning scientists, Scientific American is the essential guide to the modern world. Support Science Journalism. Become a Subscriber.


Scientific American Customer Service:

Email: help@sciam.com",News,"Springer Nature America, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/scientific-american/id514734550?uo=4,4.76457,9175,biology
881467558,Science News & Discoveries,"Become an expert in the world of science and nature! New discoveries, research, expert interviews and research studies. The latest science stories, videos, podcasts and research brought to you in an easy-to-use, efficient app.

Features include:

- A summary of top stories from the best sources featuring a clean feed with no repeat stories. See all the sources that covered any story with a simple tap

- Subscribe to push notifications for prominent stories

- New discoveries, interviews, research results, studies and informative talks 

- brought to you from the leading video channels

- Your very own news feed - choose the topics you want to follow and the topics you want to block - long tap a story to block the source

- Join an active community of science lovers featuring an in-app posting & commenting system, article tagging, reputation points and badges!

- Topics ranging from space exploration and astronomy to physics, biology, climate, environment and earth sciences - discover the mysteries of the universe and learn about our own planet from sources like Science Magazine, Science News, Nature and Scientific American

- An awesome widget

- Free, built-in read later feature - save interesting articles to read later

Privacy Policy and Terms of Use: https://www.loyal.app/privacy-policy",News,"Loyal Foundry, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/science-news-discoveries/id881467558?uo=4,4.44925,1665,biology
1270676408,QANDA: AI Math & Study Helper,"Your Personalized AI Study Companion!

Join over 75 million students who trust QANDA, the 24/7 AI study assistant that delivers instant, accurate answers and step-by-step solutions for all your academic questions. From complex math problems to college admissions support, QANDA connects you with knowledge, skills, and a community to excel in school and daily life.

【 Key Features 】

• AI Problem Solver
Simply snap a photo or type your problem to receive step-by-step solutions for math, science, languages, and more. Our advanced AI chatbot breaks down complex calculus problems, making them easy to understand and master. Get instant, accurate responses to any academic question!

• AI Video Solutions
Access premium 3-minute video explanations from top university tutors for challenging exam questions. These tailored tutorials help you understand difficult concepts that textbooks can't explain. Try free for 7 days!

• 1:1 Expert Assistance
Still got a question that AI can’t solve? Connect directly with real-life personal tutors from prestigious universities when you need specialized help. Get personalized feedback and in-depth explanations for math, English, science, social studies, and essay writing.

• Study Productivity Timer
Boost your productivity with our advanced study time tracker. Set learning goals, monitor focused study sessions, and build effective study habits that improve your academic performance and information retention.

• Learning Community
Join our social network of millions of students sharing flashcards, forming study groups, and solving problems together. Exchange knowledge, connect with peers facing similar challenges, and grow your skills collectively.

【 Why Students Choose QANDA 】

• Unlimited Learning Support
Access our AI assistant whenever you need help, with no restrictions on questions or subjects. Your study companion is ready 24/7 to answer your question.

• Accurate & Reliable
Powered by cutting-edge AI technology, QANDA delivers precise solutions and explanations, helping you build a strong foundation in your studies. You can rely on QANDA to provide accurate answers that support your academic success.

• Beyond Simple Answers
QANDA doesn't just provide quick solutions—it teaches you how to approach and solve complex problems independently so that you actually understand the material. From solving single problems to mastering entire subjects, QANDA supports every step of your learning journey.

Download QANDA now and transform how you study! Whether you're tackling homework, preparing for exams, or need a tutor for personalized learning, our AI assistant is ready to respond with accurate, tailored information to all your questions.

【 Contact Us 】

• Email
support.en@mathpresso.com

• Instagram
www.instagram.com/qanda__global
    
• Tiktok
www.tiktok.com/qanda__global

• Privacy Policy
www.qanda.ai/terms/info_term/en_US

• Terms and Conditions
www.qanda.ai/terms/use_term/en_US",Education,Mathpresso Inc,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/qanda-ai-math-study-helper/id1270676408?uo=4,3.53571,756,biology
1474537352,Biology Master Animals Plants,"Tired of getting lost in endless pages of biology notes? Biology Master is your solution!

With a simple camera click, transform your notes into super-organized flashcards and mind maps. But that's not all!

Immerse yourself in an interactive biology world with:
• A periodic table that comes to life under your fingers
• Colorful mind maps to visualize key concepts
• Stimulating quizzes to test yourself
• Theory explained in a simple and engaging way
• An incredible animal glossary with all the characteristics of each species

Explore the fascinating world of biology through:

Atoms and Molecules:
• Atoms, ions and molecules
• Covalent and ionic bonds
• Properties of matter
• Energy and thermodynamics
• Water
• Biological molecules

Cells:
• Introduction to cells
• Prokaryotic and Eukaryotic cell structure
• Cell Movement
• Cell Junctions
• Energy transformations
• Cell Life Cycle
• Forms and Functions of Organisms

Living Beings:
• Organism functions
• Classification of Living Beings
• Digestion in Living Beings
• Gas exchange in Living Beings
• Substance transport
• The Nervous System
• Movement and Support in Living Beings
• Reproduction

Genetics and Evolution:
• Genetics
• Evolution: Theories

And with our exclusive Animal Glossary, discover the unique characteristics of each species: from habitat to behavior, from diet to survival strategies.

Don't let biology become a nightmare! Download Biology Master now and transform studying into an exciting adventure. Join the community of students who have already discovered the smartest way to study biology!

Terms of Use (EULA): https://www.apple.com/legal/internet-services/itunes/dev/stdeula/",Education,Carlo Terracciano,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/biology-master-animals-plants/id1474537352?uo=4,4.48649,37,biology
590208430,EarthViewer,"What did Earth’s continents and oceans look like 250 million years ago, or even 1 billion years ago? What do we know about the climate back when our planet formed? How has sea level changed since the melting of the last ice age and what does the future hold?

EarthViewer is like a time machine for exploring Earth’s deep history. Based on the latest scientific research, it lets you scroll through the last 4.5 billion years with your fingertips. Follow a favorite landmark, be it Greenland or New York City, as its position shifts through time, or watch a famous fossil like Tiktaalik make an incredible journey from its origin to its current location. Layer your view of shifting continents with data on atmospheric composition, temperature, biodiversity, day length, and solar luminosity, to get a more complete view of our dynamic planet. 

EarthViewer features include:
 
• Continental reconstructions and accompanying data dating back billions of years
• Sea level maps for the last 21,000 year and for 8,000 years into the future
• Global temperature maps for the last 100+ years
• Ability to manipulate the globe and zoom to any location
• Locations of modern cities tracked back over 500 million years
• In-depth features on major geological and biological events in Earth history
• Clickable details on geologic eons, eras, and periods 
• Automated play modes 
• Animations between globe and flat map projections
• Extensive reference list 
• Suggestions for classroom use

The Howard Hughes Medical Institute (HHMI) is a non-profit medical research organization that ranks as one of the nation’s largest philanthropies. HHMI’s BioInteractive initiative opens a window on cutting-edge science through interactive web features, short films, virtual labs, and scientific animations. Since teachers play a pivotal role in launching the careers of future scientists and in helping the public understand the beauty and import of science, the BioInteractive team partners with the teaching community to create and distribute media that is engaging and relevant to the science curriculum.",Education,Howard Hughes Medical Institute,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/earthviewer/id590208430?uo=4,4.38999,100,biology
1044805956,InCell VR (Cardboard),"InCell is an action/racing game with a bit of strategy and bio science thrown into the mix in a rare and highly unusual micro world of the carefully recreated human cell. This is the right project to start your acquaintance with Cardboard VR or receive new VR impressions. The game is focused on Virtual Reality but you can play just fine without a set (Cardboard or any other). 
To switch VR mode off - just tap & hold the screen or use Cardboard's trigger to open main menu.

A unique experimental project made by Luden.io to test the opportunities of the new Virtual Reality provided by Google Cardboard.

Compatible with View Master, Fibrum, Homido, Lakento, Archos, Durovis and others Cardboard like headsets.",Games,"NIVAL, INC.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/incell-vr-cardboard/id1044805956?uo=4,3.9726,73,biology
1501744528,Pocket Prep Nursing School '25,"Unlock thousands of nursing school exam practice questions and mock exams for the HESI A2, ATI TEAS, NCSBN NCLEX-RN, NCSBN NCLEX-PN, NLN PAX, and more with Pocket Prep, the largest provider of mobile test prep for professional certifications.

Whether at home or on the go, reinforce key concepts and improve retention to pass your exam confidently on the first try.

Since 2011, thousands of nursing students have trusted Pocket Prep to help them succeed on their certification exams. Our questions are crafted by experts and aligned with official exam blueprints, ensuring you're always studying the most relevant, up-to-date content.

Prep for 7 Nursing School entrance and exit exams, including:
- 2,000 ATI® TEAS practice questions
- 500 College Biology practice questions
- 500 College Chemistry practice questions
- 1,475 HESI A2 practice questions
- 1,200 NCSBN NCLEX-PN® practice questions
- 1,500 NCSBN NCLEX-RN® practice questions
- 1,495 NLN® PAX practice questions

Pocket Prep will help you feel confident and prepared for exam day.
- 8,000+ Practice Questions: Expert-authored, exam-like questions with detailed explanations, including textbook references used by nursing educators.
- Mock Exams: Simulate the test day experience with full-length mock exams to help build your confidence and readiness.
- A Variety of Study Modes: Tailor your study sessions with quiz modes like Quick 10, Level Up, and Weakest Subject.
- Performance Analytics: Track your progress, identify weak areas, and compare your scores with other nursing school students.

Earn a high score on your nursing school exam!
Get started with free access to 30–80* free practice questions across 3 study modes – Question of the Day, Quick 10, and Timed Quiz.

Upgrade to Premium for:
- Full access to all 7 Nursing School exams, featuring thousands of practice questions
- All advanced study modes, including Build Your Own Quiz, Missed Question Quiz, and Level Up
- Full-length mock exams to ensure exam-day success
- Our Pass Guarantee 

Choose the plan that fits your goals:
- 1 Month: $15.99 billed monthly
- 3 Months: $39.99 billed every 3 months
- 12 Months: $95.99 billed annually

Trusted by thousands of nursing students. Here's what our members say:
""This app allowed me to identify where I needed to focus while also refreshing what I learned before. The explanations are thorough and concise, worth the money.""

""I passed! I used this app as my only study tool for Reading, Biology, Vocabulary, and A&P and passed on my first try. I love this app!""

""I almost exclusively used Pocket Prep to study and passed my HESI with a cumulative of 87%. This app made studying on the go convenient, and I'd say the premium plan was well worth it.""

---

LEGAL
For more information on our Terms of Use and Privacy Policy, please visit the following websites:
https://www.pocketprep.com/terms-of-service/
https://www.pocketprep.com/privacy-policy/",Education,"Pocket Prep, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/pocket-prep-nursing-school-25/id1501744528?uo=4,4.83028,7695,biology
563130137,Enjoy Learning Anatomy puzzle,"An educational puzzle game produced by Digital Gene. This is an educational game that allows you to learn the human body as if you play a jigsaw puzzle. This game is designed to be simple yet fun to play.
 
The app is best suited for people who want to learn the human body or students who want to get ready for the exams. 

You can improve your knowledge as you play the game aiming for the fastest time or compete against players from all over the world. You can also collect picture panels when you satisfy certain conditions. So do your best to get all of them. 

When you're stuck on finding the position, use the assist function. It will help you to navigate the correct location without hassling yourself.",Games,Plus Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/enjoy-learning-anatomy-puzzle/id563130137?uo=4,4.25472,106,biology
1522219588,bartleby: Math Homework Helper,"Get the support you need to tackle your hardest homework assignments and trickiest problems; get to know bartleby—an app filled with experts ready to guide you through your homework!


WITH THE BARTLEBY APP YOU CAN:


• Browse 8+ Million Step-by-Step Textbook & Homework Explanations:
Access valuable insights for college textbook questions to help you efficiently tackle your schoolwork. Our expanding collection covers a wide range of topics, including math, history, engineering, business, accounting, biology, chemistry, geometry, and more. It’s like your own personal homework helper.

• Get 24/7 Expert Q&A Support:
Anytime you need help, simply snap a photo or ask a question to our subject matter experts and receive a detailed explanation in as fast as 30 minutes.* Our tutors cover 30+ subjects, from math to biology and everything in between, and are waiting 24/7/365 to assist you with your study needs.

• Easily Search Our Digital Database of Resources:
No more struggling with confusing websites or apps. Our easy-to-use resource library lets you quickly find helpful materials shared by fellow students—saving them to your profile for future reference. With dozens of subjects and courses available, you’ll have a hassle-free way to get the information you need to learn and succeed.

• Access 24/7 Online Support:
You’ll never study alone with bartleby! If you have a question about your app, your subscription, or how to use all the great services in our student suite, drop us a line and we’ll respond ASAP.

Subscribers to “bartleby learn” can seamlessly access 24/7 homework help, including math help, from our team of expert tutors through their phones, tablets, and supported mobile devices. We also offer textbook guides, study materials, and more. bartleby helps students learn on-the-go with expert guidance every step of the way.

OVER 30 SUBJECTS SUPPORTED, INCLUDING:
• BUSINESS: Accounting, Economics, Finance, Operations, Management, Marketing
 • ENGINEERING: Chemical, Civil, Computer, Electrical, Mechanical Engineering
 • MATH: Advanced Math, Algebra, Calculus, Geometry, Probability, Statistics, Trigonometry
 • SCIENCE: Physics, Biochemistry, Biology, Chemistry, Nursing
 • SOCIAL SCIENCE: Psychology, Sociology
Check Out Our New Subjects: Anatomy & Physiology, Earth Science, Geography, History, Political Science.


BARTLEBY REVIEWS:


Here’s what a real student had to say about bartleby’s focus on student success:

“Other study platforms online often only provide the result, which isn’t ideal for true learning. I appreciate the effort bartleby puts into providing high-quality, detailed guidance.” — Grant B, Georgetown University

Access “bartleby learn” for just $9.99/month with no long-term commitment—cancel anytime!**

Study smarter with bartleby. Homework made easier, faster, and more effective.

*Response times may vary based on subject and complexity. Median response time is 34 minutes, though some responses may take longer for new subjects.
**Payment willhttps://www.bartleby.com/terms be charged to your iTunes account upon purchase confirmation. Subscriptions renew automatically at $9.99 each month unless canceled.

Terms of use: https://www.bartleby.com/terms",Education,"Barnes & Noble Education, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/bartleby-math-homework-helper/id1522219588?uo=4,4.28131,2499,biology
1517313390,Codon One: Learning Biology,"Start your exciting journey of learning Molecular Biology, Genetics, Evolution and the Chemistry of Life with Codon One!
    The main course consists of modules that will teach you the essence of each subject in short sections and tiny chunks of distilled knowledge. Each section ends with a quick quiz to unlock the next one and to solidify the take-home-messages, so you will know all the most important aspects of each subject. Currently, we offer ""Module 1: Chemistry of Life"", ""Module 2: Genetics"", ""Module 3: Evolution"" and ""Module 4: Science History"", but we are already working on and further topics, which we will add soon one by one.
    Meanwhile, take a deeper dive into the most important biological molecules, like nucleic acids and proteins and their building blocks in the molecule reference. All the structures of each of the 20 amino acids or the different nucleobases, and what each of the 64 codons encode is all hard to remember, so use this as your reference to come back to if you forget any of it.
    Or test your knowledge in the separate quiz mode on the topics of biochemistry, genetics, evolution and the history of life science. We offer statistics for the quizzes you take, so you can keep track of how you are doing over time. We will constantly add more questions, but if you thought of one that we should add you can easily submit it right from the app. 
    Finally, we have put some fun and useful tools into the app. You can translate DNA sequences, get their reverse complement or receive useful statistics with the built-in sequence operator tool. See how changing single positions in codon triplets changes the encoded amino acid with the codon picker. And now you can encode your own message as amino acid single letter code into DNA sequence. Conversely, just translate the DNA to decode a message. These are the tools in more detail:

Sequence Operator
- Write or paste DNA sequences and perform simple operations
- Reverse the sequence, get the complement or the reverse complement
- Transcribe it to RNA or translate into its amino acid sequence using all six possible open reading frames
- Get stats for the sequence: length, GC content and melting temperature

Codon Picker
- Play around with the codon triplet picker to see which of the 64 codons corresponds to which amino acid or termination signal
- Change bases at different positions and see how the genetic code works

Triplet Encoder
- Almost all letters of the alphabet symbolize an amino acid in the single letter code and each amino acid is encoded in DNA by codon triplets.
- Write a message in amino acid sequence and get the encoded triplet sequence to hide your message in DNA. 

Did you find a bug or any other problem with the app? Send an email to codon-one@gmx.de and we will take care of it. Suggestions about improvements to the app are equally welcome.",Education,Daniel Gebert,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/codon-one-learning-biology/id1517313390?uo=4,4.58824,17,biology
1630448015,Step Into Biology,"Step Into Biology, which is free to all students, creates engaging AR field trips allowing for kinesthetic exploration of various biology subject matter. Students can explore animal cells, plant cells, prokaryotic cells, chloroplasts, DNA replication, and more.",Education,Zoic Labs LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/step-into-biology/id1630448015?uo=4,4.3125,16,biology
1131203560,Kahoot! Play & Create Quizzes,"Play engaging quiz-based games (kahoots) at school, at home and at work, create your own kahoots, and learn something new! Kahoot! brings the magic of learning to students, teachers, office superheroes, trivia fans, and lifelong learners.


Here’s what you can do with the Kahoot! app, now available in English, Spanish (LATAM), French, German, Italian, Brazilian Portuguese, Japanese, Dutch, Turkish, Polish, Arabic, Simplified Chinese, Traditional Chinese, Norwegian, Swedish, Danish, Ukrainian and Korean:

Young students
- Make your school projects awesome by building kahoots on any topic using pre-made templates, fun question types, themes, and background music.
- Supercharge your games with unique rewards including new characters and accessories.
- Enjoy premium game modes, perfect for birthday parties and family game nights!
- Ace upcoming exams by setting learning goals and testing yourself with advanced study modes.
- Make math fun with interactive games to get ahead in algebra, multiplications, and fractions.

Students
- Study with unlimited free flashcards and other smart study modes
- Join kahoots hosted live - in class or virtually - and use the app to submit answers
- Complete self-paced kahoots
- Challenge your friends in study groups with kahoots you found or created
- Create your own kahoots and add images or videos
- Host kahoots live for family and friends directly from your mobile device

Families and friends
- Find a kahoot on any topic, fit for any age
- Host a kahoot live by sharing your screen to Apple TV or via video conferencing apps
- Play a live kahoot using SharePlay. Start a FaceTime call and select the kahoot you want to play. No host is required - everyone can participate!
- Engage your kids with studying at home
- Assign a kahoot to challenge family members and friends
- Create your own kahoots and add different question types and image effects

Teachers
- Search among millions of ready-to-play kahoots on any topic
- Create or edit your own kahoots in minutes
- Combine different question types to increase engagement
- Host kahoots live in class or virtually for distance learning
- Assign student-paced kahoots for content review
- Assess learning outcomes with reports

Company employees
- Create kahoots for e-learning, presentations, events and other occasions
- Encourage audience participation with polls and word cloud questions
- Host Kahoot! live in person or in a virtual meeting
- Assign self-paced kahoots, for example, for e-learning
- Assess progress and results with reports

Premium features:
Kahoot! is free for teachers and their students, and it’s our commitment to keep it that way as part of our mission to make learning awesome. We offer optional upgrades that unlock advanced features, such as an image library with millions of images and advanced question types, such as puzzles, polls, open-ended questions and slides. To take advantage of these features, users will need a paid subscription.

To create and host kahoots in a work context, as well as get access to additional features, business users will need a paid subscription.

Recurring billing, cancel anytime
- Payment will be charged to your iTunes account at confirmation of purchase.
- Subscription automatically renews unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24 hours before the end of the current period.
- Account will be charged for renewal within 24 hours of the end of the current period, and the cost of the renewal will be provided.
- Subscriptions may be managed by the user. Auto-renewal may be turned off by going to the user’s Account Settings after purchase. No cancellation of the current subscription is allowed during the active subscription period.
- Any unused portion of a free trial period, if offered, will be forfeited when you purchase a subscription.

Privacy Policy: https://kahoot.com/privacy
Terms and conditions: https://kahoot.com/terms",Education,Kahoot ASA,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/kahoot-play-create-quizzes/id1131203560?uo=4,4.56601,46278,science
875063456,Elevate - Brain Training Games,"Elevate is a brain training program designed to improve your mind’s focus, memory, speaking abilities, processing speed, math skills, and more. Each person is provided with a personalized training program that adjusts over time to maximize results.

The more you train with Elevate, the more you’ll improve critical cognitive skills that are proven to boost productivity, earning power, and self-confidence. 90%+ report improved vocabulary, math skills, and overall mental sharpness when they frequently use Elevate.

IN THE NEWS

“Elevate comes out ahead” in the battle of the brain training apps. - CNET

Elevate is a “cognitive pick-me-up” with games that are “good for mental breaks throughout the workday.” - Washington Post

FEATURES

• 40+ Brain Training Games: Improve your critical cognitive skills like focus, memory, processing, math, precision, and comprehension with 40+ brain training games.
• Performance Tracking: Measure your performance against yourself and others. Weekly reports highlight your key accomplishments and opportunities.
• Personalized Workouts: Customize your daily training focus and choose between 3 and 5 games. Get personalized daily workouts that include the skills you need most.
• Adaptive Progression: Train your brain with adaptive difficulty progression that ensures your experience is challenging.
• Workout Calendar: Track your streaks and stay motivated with Elevate’s workout calendar.
• Elevate Dash on Apple Watch: Play 4 additional mini-games and review your performance on your Apple Watch with Elevate Dash.
• And more!

WHY YOU NEED ELEVATE

• Express yourself more effectively in writing. Write with clarity, persuasiveness, and concision.
• Improve your spelling and punctuation. Avoid common writing pitfalls.
• Become a better reader. Read everyday materials faster and with greater understanding.
• Expand your vocabulary.
• Quickly and easily solve everyday math problems. Get better at comparing prices, splitting bills, and calculating discounts and markups. 
• Speak more effectively. Become more articulate and better at communicating tone and meaning.



RESEARCH BEHIND ELEVATE

Elevate's games are designed in collaboration with experts in neuroscience and cognitive learning and are based on extensive scientific research. Elevate’s brain training algorithms further focus the learning experience by drawing from research in memory studies to develop a personalized training program for each member.

ELEVATE SUBSCRIPTION TERMS

Elevate offers a 7-day free trial as well as a basic free version. To access the free version, tap the X in the upper left-hand corner after you sign up for an account.

If you choose to subscribe, you will be charged a yearly subscription fee according to your country. The subscription fee will be shown in the app before you complete the payment. Your subscription will automatically renew at the end of each subscription term, unless auto-renewal is turned off at least 24 hours before the end of the term. Subscription renewals cost the same as the original subscription, and your credit card will be charged through your iTunes account at confirmation of purchase.

You may manage your subscription and turn off auto-renewal at any time after purchase by going to your iTunes Account Settings. Refunds will not be given for any unused portion of the term.

For additional information, please read our Terms of Service (https://www.elevateapp.com/terms) and Privacy Policy (https://www.elevateapp.com/privacy).",Education,"Elevate Labs, LLC",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/elevate-brain-training-games/id875063456?uo=4,4.77357,485266,science
905869418,DHgate-Online Wholesale Stores,"The DHgate shopping app allows free access to the DHgate wholesale marketplace on the go – connecting you directly to wholesale sellers and getting you the best prices available.



The DHgate app provides one-stop solution for your online purchasing, from international logistics and payment, to internet finance and customer services. DHgate app features over a million Chinese wholesalers, 40 million products for sale and has amassed 10 million buyers from 230 countries and regions.



We provide the easiest and most cost effective all-in-one solution for your business. We enable anyone to buy and sell products in wholesale price globally by providing secure payment services, logistics solutions, escrow protection services, and internet financing.



With a variety of over 20 million products in categories ranging from electronics to wedding dresses and from cosmetics to furniture – you’ll never miss what you’re looking for. Simply tell the app whether you’re buying for wholesale or personal use, choose your favorite categories and receive personalized discounts and recommendations.



DHgate Shopping APP Features:

• Secure, organized and reliable mobile platform.

• Shop directly from sellers and enjoy lower-than-retail prices.

• Check daily deals to find new discount products every day.

• Make purchases individually or in bulk (for additional discounts).

• Filter and customize to find the perfect product.

• Get smart product recommendations based on preferences and browsing history.

• Read customer reviews for insight on any product.

• Pay using innovative and easy payment options.

• Ship using worldwide delivery on most products.

• Scan QR codes to jump straight to a product’s page.

• Shop at the $1.99 store for the best discounts.

• Join the VIP club to receive exclusive benefits including 24/7 customer support and more.

• Redeem seasonal promotions for coupons on all your favorite seasonal items.



Shopping Categories Include:

• Electronics

• Cellphones

• Apparel & Clothing

• Home & Garden

• Jewelry

• Fashion Accessories

• Watches

• Toys & Hobbies

• Shoes

• And much, much more!



Whether you’re an entrepreneur making a bottom line or just a savvy consumer looking for the best deals, the DHgate app offers the value you need at the prices you want.



Quick Facts for DHgate Shopping APP

• Approximately 1.2 million sellers globally

• 10 million enterprise and individual buyers from over 230 countries and regions 

• 33 million wholesale and retail product listingsA transaction every 3 seconds

• Multilingual Sales: English, French, German, Italian, Portuguese, Russian, Spanish

• Our Partners: American Express, DHL, FedEx, MasterCard, Visa, UPS



Download DHgate app and discover the best prices on clothes, electronics, shoes and more!",Shopping,Digital Trading Science & Technology (Beijing) Co. Ltd.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/dhgate-online-wholesale-stores/id905869418?uo=4,4.54495,539526,science
1380452295,Adventure Academy,"Works best with: iPhone X, XR, XS, XS Max, 11, 11 Pro, 11 Pro Max; iPad Mini 4 (2015), iPad Mini (2019), Pro 9.7 (2016), 10.5 (2017), 12.9 (2018), 11

Adventure Academy MAY NOT FULLY support: iOS devices not listed above

______________

ADVENTURE ACADEMY 

Your quest for knowledge begins now! 

Adventure Academy is the new interactive learning program for kids from the creators of ABCmouse! The Founders of this prestigious school have created one of the world’s largest collections of educational games, books, learning challenges, and more, all designed to help strengthen children’s skills across thousands of key elementary and middle school learning objectives.   

Key Features: 

Discover and play thousands of learning activities to help boost key skills and abilities across many subjects, including math, language arts, reading, science, social studies, and more 

Share amazing experiences with your best friends in a safe and secure environment 

Play simultaneously with up to three other scholars within the same account on your individual smartphone, tablet, or computer 

Crafted by teachers and early learning education experts with a curriculum-first approach for 2nd-5th grade 

Complete quests and learning challenges with your friends to level up and advance your character’s abilities  

Great for homeschoolers and learning on the go 

As you continue your journey through Adventure Academy, you can also earn amazing rewards for your accomplishments. Hundreds of clothing items, hair styles, and looks give a seemingly unlimited number of choices to customize your character. Also, you can earn your own 3D virtual home within the game that you can decorate with items you earn from completing learning activities. 

Trusted by teachers and designed by early learning education experts, Adventure Academy provides a safe learning environment for students. Parents can monitor progress, control the level of interaction through filtered chat, or block in-game communication entirely. 

Welcome to Adventure Academy. Your endless adventure awaits! 

See our full Terms and Conditions at:  

https://www.adventureacademy.com/terms-and-conditions 

View our Privacy Policy at:  

https://www.adventureacademy.com/privacy-policy",Education,"Age of Learning, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/adventure-academy/id1380452295?uo=4,4.61818,117422,science
1111281685,Science Channel GO,"Catch up with your favorite Science Channel shows anytime, anywhere with the all-new Science Channel GO app - and now get access to up to 14 additional networks including Discovery, Travel Channel, ID, TLC and more - all in one app. It’s FREE with your pay TV subscription. 

Link your pay TV provider (cable, satellite, telco, live TV streaming service) to access Science Channel favorites like How It’s Made, How the Universe Works, Forbidden History, Strange Evidence, Mysteries of the Abandoned, What on Earth? and many more - plus top shows from other networks including Crikey! It’s the Irwins (Animal Planet), Dirty Jobs (Discovery), Dr. Pimple Popper (TLC), Good Eats (Food Network), Ghost Adventures (Travel Channel) and more. New episodes are available the same day as they premiere on TV. 

With Science Channel GO You Can:
• Stream Science Channel and more networks LIVE anytime, anywhere on all your favorite devices
• Find shows to watch with the live schedule guide
• Access thousands of episodes on demand - from current hits to classic favorites
• See new episodes of shows on the app the same day and time they premiere on TV
• Binge your favorite Science Channel series and specials including How It’s Made, How the Universe Works, Forbidden History, Strange Evidence, Mysteries of the Abandoned, What on Earth? - and many more! 
• Get unlimited access to everything the Discovery family of networks has to offer - free with your pay TV subscription

Features:
• Stream live TV when you link your pay TV provider
• Watch select episodes and entire seasons of your favorite shows from up to 15 networks!
• Browse by genre - from Natural History, Science and Tech to Food, Home and more - to find your favorite shows and discover new ones
• Continue watching episodes where you left off across all of your devices
• Save shows and episodes to watch later with My List
• Compatible with tvOS and Chromecast
• Closed-captioning support

Requirements:
• Available in the U.S. only
• Wi-Fi connection recommended
• iOS 12 or higher 

Need help? Visit gohelp.discovery.com.

Visitor Agreement: https://corporate.discovery.com/visitor-agreement/

Privacy Notice: https://corporate.discovery.com/privacy-policy

California Privacy Notice: https://corporate.discovery.com/privacy-policy/#cappi

California Do Not Sell My Personal Info: https://corporate.discovery.com/california_dns

We may work with third-party advertising companies and other partners that help us deliver tailored advertisements to you. To opt out of behavioral tracking on mobile devices, you may use the DAA AppChoices Tool, available at http://www.aboutads.info/appchoices.",Entertainment,Discovery Communications,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/science-channel-go/id1111281685?uo=4,4.68838,5250,science
416345319,Talking Ben the Dog,"Ben is a retired chemistry professor who likes his quiet comfortable life of eating, drinking and reading newspapers. To make him responsive, you will have to bother him long enough that he will fold his newspaper. Then you can talk to him, poke or tickle him or even have a telephone conversation with him.

If you get Ben to his laboratory however, he becomes as happy as a puppy. There you can do chemistry experiments by mixing a combination of two test tubes together and see the hilarious reactions.

HINT: Record a funny video of your telephone conversation with Ben and send it to your friends.

HOW TO PLAY:
- Poke Ben's newspaper to make him fold it.
- Then you can talk to Ben and he will repeat.
- Poke or slap Ben's face, belly, feet or hands.
- Tickle Ben's belly.
- Poke or swipe Ben's graduation picture.
- Press the phone button and have a conversation with Ben.
- Record a funny video of your telephone conversation with Ben.
- Press buttons to make Ben eat, drink or belch.
- Press the chemistry button to switch Ben to the laboratory.
- Mix any two test tubes together and see the hilarious chemical reaction.
- Record videos and share them on YouTube or send them to your friends and family by email.

This app is PRIVO certified. The PRIVO safe harbor seal indicates Outfit7 has established COPPA compliant privacy practices to protect your child’s personal information. Our apps do not allow younger children to share their information.

This app contains:
- Promotion of Outfit7's products and contextual advertising
- Links that direct customers to our websites and other Outfit7 apps
- Personalization of content to entice users to play the app again
- Watching videos of Outfit7's animated characters via YouTube integration
- The option to make in-app purchases

Please note, we do not process all the data disclosed on the label for users under the age of digital consent. For more information, please check our Privacy Policy.

Terms of use: https://talkingtomandfriends.com/eula/en/
Privacy policy for games: https://talkingtomandfriends.com/privacy-policy-games/en
Customer support: support@outfit7.com",Entertainment,Outfit7 Limited,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/talking-ben-the-dog/id416345319?uo=4,4.43977,113832,science
364049283,Popular Science,"Popular Science is the magazine for anyone curious about what’s new and next.  With a readership of over 6.4 million, Popular Science is a must-have for technology fans, early adopters, and thought leaders. 

Popular Science puts the latest news in gadgets, software, and robotics in the palm of your hand! Our articles help anyone understand the ideas and people driving the big issues of the day – whether healthcare, energy, robotics, or defense.  News and features also provide perspective on the latest breakthroughs in science and technology. 

Popular Science represents the best hopes for our planet, our lives, our children, and our future. And we reveal those hopes by featuring the innovations today that are laying the groundwork for a better tomorrow. This is a magazine for readers that want the future now. 

Social Media loves Popular Science:
- 3.5 Million Facebook Fans
- 1,250,00 Twitter Followers

====

For more information, read our Privacy Policy and Terms of Use:
Privacy Policy: https://recurrent.io/privacy-policy/
Terms and Conditions: https://recurrent.io/terms-and-conditions/
Cookie Compliance: https://recurrent.io/cookie-compliance/",News,The Drive Media Inc.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/popular-science/id364049283?uo=4,4.29104,134,science
963040173,Science vs.Magic-2 Player Game,"Fantastic 2-player game collection! 

◆ Bunch of games, totally intuitive and fun! 
◆ Play with your friends on a same device! 
◆ 3 different level AI! 
◆ Beautiful graphics supported by Retina Display. 
◆ GameCenter leaderboard supported! 
◆ Enjoy real-time competition! 
◆ A real party-killer! 

Is it a game which have to play with others? 
No! It not only allows 2 player's battle,but also allows player to challenge himself/herself.",Entertainment,Hang Li,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/science-vs-magic-2-player-game/id963040173?uo=4,4.31623,1189,science
376183339,TED,"Get personalized recommendations that match your unique interests, or browse TED’s library of thousands of inspiring, informative, transformational videos for free.

Features on iPhone, iPad and iPod touch:

・Sign in to get personalized recommendations and sync videos across all your devices
・Watch videos with subtitles in over 100 languages
・Check out the newest and trending videos, browse by topic, or select from our curators’ picks
・Stream videos to your Apple TV with AirPlay
・Download videos to watch offline
・Add talks your list to watch later
・Toggle between dark mode or light modes
・Get instant inspiration with the “Surprise Me!” feature

Get the TED app to stay curious, informed and inspired.",Education,TED Conferences LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/ted/id376183339?uo=4,4.61203,10238,science
1195233335,Yarn - Chat & Text Stories,"Ever wanted to snoop through people’s conversations and not feel guilty for it? Want to enter a world of suspense and horror but not up for a long read? Well, now you can!

Every Yarn story is told as a short text message conversation, as if you are watching someone else's text messages. Whether it be hypothetical conversations between two of your favorite celebs, a frantic group chat after accidentally liking an ex’s photo on Instagram, or those suspenseful mysteries you just can’t get enough of, Yarn lets you tap through it all!

It’s about time to make reading fun, fast, and fabulous again. Stay up to date with your favorite Yarn stories as we update episodes and conversations daily!

Subscribe for unlimited access to all the best Yarn stories.

YARN UNLIMITED SUBSCRIPTIONS:
– You can subscribe for unlimited access to Yarn content
- Yarn offers offer weekly, monthly, and annual subscriptions
- Trials will be 7 days, after which the subscription will auto-renew
- Annual subscriptions will be charged at $69.99/year*
- Weekly subscriptions will be charged at $4.99/week*
- You'll be able to access unlimited stories for the duration of your subscription
– Payment will be charged to iTunes Account at confirmation of purchase
– Subscription automatically renews unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24-hours before the end of the current period
– Account will be charged for renewal within 24-hours prior to the end of the current period
- Subscriptions may be managed by the user and auto-renewal may be turned off by going to the user's Account Settings after purchase
- No cancellation of the current subscription is allowed during active subscription period
- Any unused portion of a free trial period, if offered, will be forfeited when the user purchases a subscription to that publication

*Prices are equal to the value that ""Apple's App Store Matrix"" determines is the equivalent subscription price in $USD

By using Yarn, you agree to our Terms of Use (https://mammoth.la/terms) and Privacy Policy (https://mammoth.la/privacy)",Book,"Science Mobile, LLC",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/yarn-chat-text-stories/id1195233335?uo=4,3.31641,26320,science
530703273,First Grade Learning Games,"Millions of parents and teachers use RosiMosi games and lessons to educate and entertain young children.
The app is perfect for kids from 5 to 8 years old. Whether they are just starting first grade, or need to review and master the subjects, this is a perfect learning tool for kids. Discover 24 fun games meant to help your child develop a lifelong love of learning! 

All RosiMosi games are designed using real school math and reading curriculums with core curriculum state standards. Plus, your student or child will stay entertained with the help of voice narration, colorful images and animations, and lots of fun sounds and music. 

First Grade Learning Games cover the following educational topics: 

MATH
• Skip Counting - Skip count by 2's, 3's, 4's, 5's, 10's and more
• Compare Numbers - Advanced math topic that compares numbers to see what is greater or less than
• Patterns - Learn to identify repeating patterns
• Timed Facts - Quickly answer math facts to play a fun basketball game
• Ordering - Place objects in order based on size, numbers, and letters
• Fractions - Fun way to learn the visual representation of fractions
• Add & Subtract - Help learn advanced math skills like additional and subtraction 
• Add & Subtract Coloring - Solve math problems while coloring beautiful images 

LANGUAGE, SPELLING & READING 
• Reading Basics - Read articles, answer questions, and get help with tough words
• Word Bingo - Help your first grader with reading and spelling skills in a fun bingo game
• Compound Words - Combine words to build compound words
• Contractions - Teach your 1st grader how to combine words to make contractions
• Spelling - Learn how to spell hundreds of words with helpful voice assistance
• Verbs, Nouns, and Adjectives - Your child will learn different types of words like verbs, nouns, and adjectives
• Sight Words - Learn how to spell and recognize important words
• Plurals - Form plurals for different types of nouns

SCIENCE 
• 5 Senses - Learn the 5 senses, how they help us understand the world, and which body part each uses
• Geography - Identify the oceans, continents, and various types of landforms
• Animals - Classify and learn about a variety of animals, such as mammals, reptiles, birds, fish, and more
• Body Parts - Learn and identify all the body parts of the human body
• Photosynthesis - Help the plant conduct photosynthesis and learn about the process vital for all plant life
• Dinosaurs & Fossils - Identify different dinosaurs and fossils
• Cause & Effect - Listen and match a cause with the correct effect
• Great Scientists - Learn about the greatest scientists in history, such as Pythagoras, Albert Einstein, Marie Curie, and Charles Darwin.


===
Terms of Use and Privacy Policy: https://www.rosimosi.com/privacy
===

ALREADY PURCHASED?
If you have purchased the games already and they are now showing locked you can tap the Options icon in the upper right corner, and then tap 'Restore Purchase' to unlock the games again for free!

PROBLEMS WITH THE GAME?
If you are having issues with the game or have questions please email us at help@rosimosi.com and we will get it fixed for you ASAP.",Education,RosiMosi LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/first-grade-learning-games/id530703273?uo=4,4.39229,43129,science
1050773989,PBS KIDS Games,"PBS KIDS Games makes learning fun and safe with 250+ educational games from your child's favorite shows. Play games with Daniel Tiger, Wild Kratts, Lyla in the Loop, and more.

Play hundreds of free educational games designed for your child and watch as they learn with their favorite PBS characters like Daniel Tiger, Wild Kratts, Lyla in the Loop, and more! 

Your child can play and learn with PBS KIDS in English and Spanish thanks to familiar faces like Alma, Rosie, and more. Download games and play from the safety of your home or anywhere you take your device to keep the fun going offline.

Make preschool and early elementary education fun and easy with a safe, kid friendly interface. Start your child’s learning adventure today!

SAFE GAMES DESIGNED FOR KIDS
* PBS KIDS Games provides a safe, friendly playing experience for toddlers and kids
* Play mini games that boost imagination and allow kids to learn with beloved PBS KIDS characters

PLAY OFFLINE GAMES
* Download games and play offline!
* Kids can easily browse and play at home, on the road, or anywhere

LEARNING GAMES FOR GRADE SCHOOL EDUCATION
* 250+ FREE curriculum-based games for kids ages 2-8
* Encourage early learning with educational games for kids with different school subjects
* Explore mazes, puzzles, numbers, play dress-up, coloring, and more
* Math games
* Elementary school games
* Science games
* Reading games
* Art games

NEW GAMES ADDED WEEKLY
* Kids will learn and have fun with new games added frequently
* Play new games with accessibility features to enhance the fun!
* Build STEM skills with science, engineering, math, and puzzles
* Play games about social concepts like kindness, mindfulness, and emotions
* Foster healthy habits by learning daily routines
* Spark creativity and imagination with art games

PLAY GAMES FROM PBS KIDS SHOWS
* Daniel Tiger’s Neighborhood
* Wild Kratts
* Lyla in the Loop
* Work It Out Wombats!
* Rosie’s Rules
* Alma’s Way
* Donkey Hodie
* Odd Squad
* Pinkalicious & Peterrific
* Arthur
* Elinor Wonders Why
* Let’s go Luna
* Xavier Riddle and the Secret Museum
* Scribbles and Ink
* Clifford
* Molly of Denali
* Sesame Street
* Nature Cat

PLAY IN ENGLISH OR SPANISH
* Bilingual kids will enjoy playing with Alma, Rosie, and more in English and Spanish
* Spanish speakers can play 17 fun-filled, educational games

PARENT RESOURCES
* Manage the app’s device storage for offline fun
* Download related PBS KIDS apps to expand your child’s learning
* Learn more about PBS TV shows, such as intended age and learning goals
* Find your local PBS KIDS station schedule

Play fun games and join your kids on an educational adventure alongside their favorite PBS KIDS characters with the PBS KIDS Games app!

Download PBS KIDS Games to start playing and learning today!

ABOUT PBS KIDS
PBS KIDS, the number one educational media brand for kids, offers all children the opportunity to explore new ideas and new worlds through television, digital platforms, and community-based programs. PBS KIDS Games is a key part of PBS KIDS’ commitment to making a positive impact on the lives of children through curriculum-based media—wherever kids are. More free PBS KIDS games are also available online at pbskids.org/games. You can support PBS KIDS by downloading other PBS KIDS apps in the App Store.

AWARDS
* Kidscreen Awards (2024): Best Game App – Branded, Digital, Preschool
* Webby Winner and Webby People’s Voice Winner (2023)
* Kidscreen Award Winner (2021 and 2022): Preschool - Best Game App
* Parents' Choice Recommended Mobile App (2017)

PRIVACY
Across all media platforms, PBS KIDS is committed to creating a safe and secure environment for children and families and being transparent about what information is collected from users. To learn more about PBS KIDS’ privacy policy, visit pbskids.org/privacy",Education,PBS Kids,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/pbs-kids-games/id1050773989?uo=4,4.35963,306630,science
658561085,Fourth Grade Learning Games,"21 fun and educational games to help your child learn 4th Grade lessons! Teach Fourth Grade lessons like multiplication, division, grammar, geometry, vowels, science, STEM, spelling, fractions, reading, remainders, and more. Whether they are just starting fourth Grade, or need to review and master the subjects, this is a perfect learning tool for kids aged 8-11. Math, language, science, STEM, reading, and critical thinking skills are all tested and practiced in these games.

All lessons and activities are designed using real fourth grade curriculums, so you can be sure these games will help give your child a boost in the classroom. And with helpful voice narration and exciting games, your 4th grade student won't want to stop playing and learning! Improve your child's homework with these 4th grade teacher approved lessons, including science, STEM, language, and math.

These learning games include dozens of important lessons for fourth grade, including:

• Fractions - Compare, add, subtract, and multiply fractions
• Word Problems - Multi-step word problems using addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division
• Angles and Geometry - Use a protractor and learn about different types of angles
• Graphs and Grids - Read a variety of graphs and use coordinates to plot points
• Patterns - Fill in missing values, identify number growths, and time increments
• Remainders - Divide two numbers and then find the remainder
• Missing Vowels - Use missing vowels to complete words
• Timed Facts - Quickly answer fourth grade math facts to earn footballs to kick
• Spelling - Spell hundreds of different words
• Punctuation and Grammar - Fix sentences by dragging the correct punctuation
• Synonyms and Antonyms - Identify different words that mean the same or opposite
• Homophones - Learn about words that sound the same, but have different meanings
• Craft & Structure - Identify narration types, use context, and learn text structure
• Reading - Practice reading comprehension by reading an article and answering questions
• The Earth - Learn about the layers of the Earth, plate tectonics, and volcanoes
• Life Science - Label parts of plants and flowers, and discover animals life cycles
• Weather - Read weather forecasts, identify clouds, and learn about the weather and our climate
• Electricity - Complete circuits, light up bulbs, and understand electrons
• Magnets - Learn the basics of magnets, poles, and how they work
• Moon Phases - Understand the phases of the moon and how they can affect the Earth
• Forms of Energy - Identify different types of kinetic and potential energy

Perfect for 4th grade kids and students who need a fun and entertaining educational game to play. This bundle of games helps your child learn important math, grammar, geometry, multiplication, STEM, division, language, science, reading, and problem solving skills used in fourth grade all while having fun! 4th Grade teachers around the world use this app in their classroom to help reinforce math, language, and STEM subjects.

Ages: 8, 9, 10, and 11 year old children and students.

===================================

PROBLEMS WITH THE GAME? 
If you are having any issues please email us at help@rosimosi.com and we will get it fixed for you ASAP.

LEAVE US A REVIEW!
If you're enjoying the game then we'd love for you to leave us a review! Reviews help small developers like us to keep improving the game.

===================================

Terms of Use and Privacy Policy: https://www.rosimosi.com/privacy",Education,RosiMosi LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/fourth-grade-learning-games/id658561085?uo=4,4.24827,11246,science
471270590,How It Works: digital edition,"Welcome to How It Works, the magazine that explains everything you never knew you wanted to know about the world we live in. Covering science, technology, history, space, transport and the environment, no subject is too big or small for How It Works to explain.

What you’ll find in every issue:
• Global Eye – the latest news, developments and events from the world of science, technology and space
• Amazing images – each issue is loaded with fantastic cutaways, illustrations and photography
• Features – How It Works’ articles explain the most fascinating subjects and topics in an exciting way that everyone can understand
• Brain Dump – get the answers to all your burning 'how and why' questions answered in our reader Q&A section
• How To  – your guide to fun experiments and projects to try out at home

Join thousands of others and download our free app now!

-------------------

Once you’ve downloaded our app, you will need to take a free trial or purchase a single issue or subscription to access our in-depth content. We also publish specials and guides - browse our publications, read what interests you most, and get inspired.

Back issues, specials, and future issues are available for purchase within the app. Subscriptions are available on various monthly and annual terms, and auto-renew until you decide to cancel it. Check inside the app for current pricing.

*** Please Note: Our digital edition is not printable and does not include the covermount items or supplements you would find with the print edition ***
 
• The free trial offer is only available to new subscribers. If you have previously subscribed then payment will be taken immediately.
• You can cancel at any time during the free trial period and you will not be charged. Simply turn off auto-renew in your Apple account subscriptions page at least 24 hours before the auto-renew is due.
• Payment will be charged to your iTunes Account at confirmation of purchase.
• Your subscription automatically renews unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24 hours before the end of the current subscription period.
• You will be charged for renewal within 24 hours prior to the end of the current period, for the same duration and at the current subscription rate for that product.
• You can manage your subscriptions and turn off auto-renewal by going to your Account Settings after purchase .
• No cancellation of the current subscription is allowed during active subscription period.  This does not affect your statutory rights.
• Any unused portion of a free trial period, if offered, will be forfeited when you purchase a subscription.
• We will be collecting information about your use of the app both when you are online and offline. To find out more please see our privacy policy.

The subscription will include the current issue if you don't already own it and subsequently published future issues for the duration of your subscription period.

-------------------

By purchasing a subscription or downloading an app you agree that you have read and accept Future Publishing Ltd's Privacy Policy and Terms of Use:
 
www.futureplc.com/privacy-policy/
www.futureplc.com/terms-conditions/",Education,Future Publishing Ltd.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/how-it-works-digital-edition/id471270590?uo=4,4.67924,159,science
1308057272,Spaceflight Simulator,"This game is about space explorations, its about building your own rocket, and going out to explore and see whats out there, all while following real life physics.

• Realistically scaled universe, with planets up to hundreds of kilometers in size and millions of kilometers of space between them.
• Realistic orbital mechanics
• Open universe, if you see something in the distance, you can go there, no limits, no invisible walls.

Current planets:
Mercury.
Venus.
Earth.
Moon.
Mars.
Phobos.
Deimos.",Games,Spaceflight Simulator UK Ltd,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/spaceflight-simulator/id1308057272?uo=4,4.80862,76350,science
542467126,Little Alchemy,"Explore what you can create by mixing simple elements.

Start with four basic items and use them to find dinosaurs, unicorns and spaceships!

FEATURES

• 580 elements.
• One-handed gameplay.
• Available in English, Spanish, Portuguese, German, French, Polish, Dutch, Swedish and Norwegian.
• Mix elements to create interesting, fun and surprising items.
• Play at your own pace.
• Every combination is a little puzzle to solve.
• Night Mode.
• Achievements.

In this update we introduced many improvements such as new simple design, better performance, many bug fixes, vertical mode for one handed play. And the best of all: you can now sync your progress between devices!

The game is free. And when we say free we mean it!
• No ads.
• No in-app payments.",Games,Recloak Sp. z o.o.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/little-alchemy/id542467126?uo=4,4.53182,2514,science
1148728253,Math Learner: Learning Game,"Have fun while learning and practicing Math with the original Math Learner app! Downloaded by millions of users, we use a proven methodology based on the world's top programs in order to build foundational Math skills and fast-track your progress. Parents, work through thousands of lessons step-by-step!

Features:
- Thousands of exercises and multiple game-based learning strategies
- Unlimited use, online or offline
- No ads!
- High-accuracy digit recognition technology creates an unique interactive experience. 
- Constant updates with new content for all levels!

App subscription:
You can subscribe for access to the full list of Math lessons.
Payment will be charged to iTunes Account at confirmation of purchase.
You will be able to do all exercises for the duration of the subscription.
Subscription automatically renews for the same price and duration period as the original ""one week""/""one month""/""one year"" package unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24-hours before the end of the current period.
Account will be charged for renewal within 24-hours prior to the end of the current period at the cost of the chosen package (weekly, monthly or yearly package).
Subscriptions may be managed by the user and auto-renewal may be turned off by going to the user's iTunes Account Settings after purchase.
No cancellation of the current subscription is allowed during active subscription period.
You may cancel a subscription during its free trial period via the subscription setting though your iTunes account. This must be done 24 hours before the end of the subscription period to avoid being charged. Please visit: http://support.apple.com/kb/ht4098 for more information.
You may turn off the auto-renewal of your subscription via your iTunes Account Settings. However, you are not able to cancel the current subscription during its active period.
Any unused portion of free-trial period, will be forfeited when the user purchases an app subscription.

Links to our Terms of Service and Privacy Policy can be found below.
Privacy Policy: https://www.fungames-forfree.com/app/legal/privacy?bundleId=com.fungames.mathapp&name=mathapp
Terms of Use: https://www.fungames-forfree.com/app/legal/tos?bundleId=com.fungames.mathapp&name=mathapp

* Prices are equal to the value that ""Apple's App Store Pricing Matrix"" determines as the equivalent of the subscription price in $ USD",Education,"Wildlife Studios, Inc",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/math-learner-learning-game/id1148728253?uo=4,4.61517,117768,science
474207297,Kids A-Z,"Blast off into a universe of learning with Kids A-Z! Navigate through an interactive space-themed portal to discover learning planets filled with stellar eBooks and educational activities. Tackle quizzes and monitor progress from your own command center dashboard wherever you go. Crafted for students in grades K-5, this app ensures a cosmic learning journey. Safety is prioritized with robust privacy features. Download and explore today!

The Kids A-Z app is free to download and enables mobile access to any Learning A-Z solution including: 
 - Raz-Plus
 - Raz-Kids
 - Foundations A-Z
 - Writing A-Z
 - Science A-Z
 - Vocabulary A-Z",Education,"Lazel, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/kids-a-z/id474207297?uo=4,3.63324,6402,science
562413829,Udemy Online Video Courses,"Skill up to success. Udemy is a leading  destination for online courses that empowers you to grow professionally and personally. Get the app to explore our expansive library of thousands of topics with cutting-edge online video courses in Coding, Development, Python, Java, Business, Marketing, SEO, SEM, Design, Drawing, Photography, and much more.

Tap into knowledge from around the world by learning from real-world experts. With courses in over 75 languages, you’ll probably find the right course for your goals.

Here’s what makes learning with the Udemy app so valuable:

LEARN OFFLINE: Download courses and learn even when your internet connection is unreliable

LEARN ON THE BIG SCREEN: Watch courses with AirPlay and Chromecast

DARK MODE: Stay focused in any lighting condition

LEARNING REMINDERS: Build your learning routine with customized push notifications that fit your schedule

NOTES: Maximize your learning by taking notes and adding bookmarks to remember more of what you learned

QUIZZES: Take in-course quizzes to reinforce your learning

Q&A: Ask instructors your burning questions to increase your knowledge or get a little extra help

PICTURE IN PICTURE: Watch courses and practice skills at the same time

MULTITASKING: Watch courses and take notes from your iPad. Ask questions from a single screen

LIFETIME ACCESS: Take courses on your schedule. Revisit them as needed.

Many instructors update courses (at no extra cost) to bring you the latest knowledge as it becomes available. Making learning with us a short- and long-term investment in your success.

Other popular topics people are learning to achieve their goals:
App Development: iOS, Swift, Java, Kotlin
Data Science: R, Machine Learning, Artificial Intelligence
Marketing: Mobile, Social Media, SEM, SEO
Art, Music, Drawing, Photography, Health & Fitness

Learners around the world trust Udemy to launch new careers, advance in their current fields, and reap the benefits of lifelong learning.

Take control of your future with online courses that deliver practical, professional skills. Prepare for certification exams in IT, Project Management, and more. Earn certificates of completion for paid courses to showcase on your resume or impress in your next interview.

Join millions of learners around the globe and improve your life through learning!",Education,Udemy Inc,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/udemy-online-video-courses/id562413829?uo=4,4.73576,76375,science
1460077113,Coupert: Coupons & Cash Back,"Coupert — Your AI-Powered Smart Shopping Assistant
Coupert helps millions of smart shoppers save time and money effortlessly — with automatic coupons, cashback, price tracking, and more.
WHY CHOOSE COUPERT?
- Automatic Coupons on 20K+ Stores
 Our browser extension instantly pops up when you're shopping and automatically applies the best coupons at checkout — no manual searching needed.
- Earn Cashback & Rewards
 Get up to 40% cashback* on purchases. Redeem your rewards via PayPal or popular gift cards from Amazon, Walmart, Starbucks, and more.
- Price Comparison & Tracking
 Compare prices across stores, view historical price charts, and receive instant alerts when prices drop for your favorite products.
- Seamless Mobile & Desktop Experience
 Use Coupert’s intuitive app along with the browser extension for a complete, hassle-free shopping experience.
JOIN 8 MILLION+ USERS WHO TRUST COUPERT
- Save time and money while shopping smarter
- Access exclusive coupons and cashback offers
- Shop at leading stores including ASOS, Target, Walmart, Nike, Apple, and many more
- Enjoy a secure, privacy-first shopping experience
GET STARTED IN 3 EASY STEPS
1. Download the Coupert app
2. Enable the browser extension when prompted
3. Shop as usual — Coupert will automatically apply coupons and track cashback for you
Privacy & Security
 Your privacy is our priority. Coupert only activates on supported shopping sites and never sells your personal data.
Ready to shop smarter and save more?
 Download Coupert and start saving today!
*Cashback rates and redemption options vary by merchant. Terms apply.
 All Coupert data presented is based on internal information as of Q1 2025.",Shopping,Coupert Science LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/coupert-coupons-cash-back/id1460077113?uo=4,4.73745,11636,science
736535961,Coursera: Grow your career,"Start, switch, or advance your career with more than 8,000 courses, hands-on projects, certificate programs, and degrees. Coursera partners with world-class companies and universities, so that you can learn with experts and build the most job-relevant, in-demand skills.

WITH COURSERA YOU CAN:
• Learn job-relevant skills and industry-standard tools through hands-on projects
• Build knowledge for your career across a wide range of industry-tailored courses
• Get job-ready for an in-demand role through Professional Certificates
• Master a skill in a specific industry field with Specializations
• Advance your career with a bachelor’s or master’s degree

SO THAT YOU’LL BE ABLE TO:
• Grow your career with confidence
• Develop skills and credentials to stand out
• Enjoy flexibility and control over your career

WITH THE COURSERA APP YOU GET:
• Flexible schedules and on-demand courses
• Downloadable videos for offline viewing
• Audio-only supported courses, so you can learn when and where you want
• Mobile-friendly courses, so you can learn effectively on any device
• Saved coursework, quizzes and projects across your desktop and mobile devices
• Video subtitles for a variety of languages, including: Arabic, French, German, Indonesian, Japanese, Korean, Portuguese, Russian, Chinese, and Spanish

POPULAR COURSES:
• Computer Science: Programming, Mobile and Web Development, Python
• Data Science: Machine Learning, Probability and Statistics, Data Analysis
• Business: Finance, Marketing, Entrepreneurship, Business Strategy, E-commerce, UX, Design
• Information Technology: Cloud Computing, Support and Operations, Data Management, Security

PROFESSIONAL CERTIFICATE PROGRAMS:
• Front end developer, back-end developer, DevOps engineer
• Data analyst, data scientist, data engineer, data warehouse developer
• Project manager, UX designer, digital marketer, social media marketer, marketing analyst
• IT support specialist, application developer, Cybersecurity analyst
• Sales development representative, sales operations specialist bookkeeper, sales representative

DEGREE CATEGORIES:
• MBA and Business Degrees, Management Degrees
• Computer Science and Engineering, Data Science, and Data Analytics
• Social Science, Public Health

Get to Know Us: http://www.coursera.org
Privacy Policy: https://www.coursera.org/about/privacy
Terms of Service: https://www.coursera.org/about/terms",Education,"Coursera, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/coursera-grow-your-career/id736535961?uo=4,4.84518,151927,science
364894352,BrainPOP,"Access BrainPOP’s award-winning animated movies, activities and quizzes made by educators and replace your kids’ passive screen time with active, enriched learning. 

Start your free trial today to access content for grades 3-8 across all subjects. BrainPOP is a research-backed learning platform created by educators that know how kids learn best, and perfect for age-appropriate, independent learning.

Start watching, learning, playing and growing with us!

Terms of Use: https://www.brainpop.com/about/terms_of_use/
Privacy Policy: https://www.brainpop.com/about/privacy_policy/
User Agreement: https://www.brainpop.com/about/user_agreement/",Education,BrainPOP,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/brainpop/id364894352?uo=4,4.73149,34250,science
440159265,"Fotor-AI Clothes, Photo Editor","Fotor is an all-in-one AI photo editing toolbox that makes your photos stand out with just a few simple steps. Whether you're an artist, photography enthusiast, or someone who loves editing, Fotor offers endless creativity for all your photo editing needs.

In the Fotor App, you can:
‒ Use the AI Photo Enhancer to instantly clarify blurry photos. Fix grainy, pixelated and low-resolution images Instantly.
‒ Use the Magic Eraser to quickly remove unwanted elements, such as bystanders, watermarks and buildings, while seamlessly blending with the original background.
‒ Use the Bg Remover to extract subject from your images with one click, and you can replace the background to create highly personalized photos.
‒ Use AI Retouch to achieve flawless skin. Enjoy natural and delicate skin smoothing and blemish removal to effortlessly create a refined appearance.
‒ Use AI Headshot to create PFPs and avatars for LinkedIn and other social media platforms.
‒ Turn text into stunning images! Just describe what you want, like “a magician baking bread in the kitchen” or “Spider-Man at a bar,” then choose a style, and transform your ideas into reality in seconds. 
‒ Curious about what your future baby with your partner might look like? Just try our Baby Generator, and let AI show you the results.
‒ Use AI Face Mimic to upload a photo and have your friends sing or make funny faces. You can also animate old photos, bringing black-and-white images to life.
‒ Use trendy 3D Cartoon and Anime AI art effects to easily transform your selfies into vibrant cartoon comics.

Explore more features of Fotor and unleash your creativity.

AI Tools:
‒ Instantly change outfits, hairstyles, and colors with AI Replace to find your best style.
‒ Extend photo subjects and backgrounds with AI Expand to fit different sizes and achieve a balanced effect.
‒ Generate unique AI avatars from selfies, add luxurious backgrounds, or place yourself in iconic destinations.
‒ Apply stylized AI filters for stunning photo effects.
‒ Restore and colorize old family photos, turning them into vibrant, high-definition images.
‒ Use face swap templates for movie characters or 80s styles to create memorable moments.
‒ Transform line drawings into digital artworks with AI Sketch.
‒ Create masterpieces with AI art effects inspired by Van Gogh, Monet, and Picasso.

Photo Editor:
‒ Use unique photo filters to set the mood and captivate.
‒ Adjust brightness, clarity, contrast, saturation, HSL, curves, hue, and grain.
‒ Auto-focus, blur backgrounds, and sharpen photo subjects.
‒ Crop images into any shape and experiment with perspectives.
‒ Layer images or effects with Overlay for added creativity.
‒ Adjust image size while maintaining aspect ratio.
‒ Add text and stickers to enhance fun and depth.
‒ Sharpen blurry portrait photos with one tap.

Layouts:
‒ Capture and combine moments into vibrant collages with Collage Maker.
‒ Create professional social media posts, flyers, and posters with design templates.
‒ Make mood boards and photo frames with grid or freestyle collages.
‒ Merge multiple images into one with the stitching tool.

AI Cutout:
‒ Add cinematic effects with double exposure.
‒ Create stunning backgrounds for product photos with AI Background.

The Fotor Pro subscription fee is charged monthly or yearly. The fees for the Fotor Pro plan are paid following purchase confirmation. The subscription will automatically renew on expiry unless the automatic renewal is turned off at least 24 hours before the expiry of the current subscription period. Once the subscription is confirmed, your iTunes account will be charged according to the plan you chose. After purchase, you may go to the iTunes Settings to manage your subscription and turn the automatic renewal off. A canceled subscription becomes effective after one month.

Terms of Service:
https://www.fotor.com/service.html?f=iphoneapp&v=1

Privacy Policy:
https://www.fotor.com/privacy.html",Photo & Video,"Chengdu Everimaging Science and Technology Co., Ltd",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/fotor-ai-clothes-photo-editor/id440159265?uo=4,4.67026,37799,science
1154065290,Science Girl Super Star,"~~> Learn how to do awesome science experiments as you try to help Cindy win the science fair competition! 
~~> Jake, Cindy’s arch-enemy, won’t stop putting her down. Will you be able to help Cindy overcome her obstacles and prove she’s a super scientist?
~~> From creating dangerous lava lamps to enchanting perfumes, there’s nothing you and Cindy can’t do!

Cindy, aka Super Science Girl, is determined to win this year’s science fair competition! Her nemesis, Jake, is out to get her and show her that girls can’t be chemists.Cindy needs you to help prove Jake wrong, and to become the coolest chemist there is! 

Features:
> Learn how to be a spectacular scientist as you help Cindy prepare for the science fair!
> Jake, Cindy’s nemesis, says girls can’t be chemists. Help Cindy show him who’s boss! And win 1st place in the science fair!
> Use real lab tools to conduct amazing experiments with Cindy & impress the judges at the fair!
> The big day is here, but oh no! Cindy’s little bro Joey crashed your bike! Help Cindy treat Joey’s injuries and repair the bike quickly so she can make it to the big fair?
> Knock Jake’s socks off by making glow-stick necklaces and candy bracelets!
> Will you and Cindy be able win 1st prize at the fair and show Jake who’s boss? 

In-apps that include ""All Levels"" allow you to enjoy the entire game! Complete each level individually to advance to the next one and achieve your final goal.",Games,TabTale LTD,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/science-girl-super-star/id1154065290?uo=4,4.18,400,science
378009553,EduCalc Classic,"A powerful, flexible graphing calculator

Does far more than most calculators out there.

Features:

1)  Scientific Calculator.  Simple to grasp and easy to use, but powerful features are available when you need them.  Available functions include the following:

• the usual arithmetic functions and exponentiation.
• square root, cube root, nth root, natural log, log base 10, log of arbitrary base, absolute value, factorial, permutations (nPr), combinations (nCr), modulus, random integer, bell curve, cumulative normal distribution, decimal to fraction.

2)  Graphing.  Capabilities:

• Graph up to four equations at once.
• Graphs are labeled.
• You can drag the graph or pinch to zoom in or out.
• Calculator can find roots and intersections.
• Graph in polar coordinates. 
• Graph parametric equations
• Can graph implicit functions, such as x^2+y^2-4=0.  Most calculator apps can't do this!

3)  A unit converter.  With a tap, you can enter the result of your conversion into the calculator.  Currently converts different units of the following: acceleration, angle, area, density, distance, energy, force, mass, power, pressure, speed, temperature, time, and volume.  Great for doing physics homework!

4)  Constants for scientific calculations -- speed of light, strength of gravity at Earth's surface, etc. etc. etc.  Tapping on a constant will insert it into your calculation -- i.e, you don't have to key in the value.  Again, great for doing physics homework!

5)  It can make a table of the values of any function you care to enter.  You can choose the starting x value of the table, as well as how much x increases for each successive row.

6) Help screens linked directly to many of the available functions and constants.  Tap the disclosure arrow to see the definition.

7)  Forgot the quadratic formula?  Or the double-angle formulas for sine and cosine?  The math/science reference hits the high points of various subjects.  Currently includes algebra, differential and integral calculus, geometry, trigonometry, vectors, vector calculus, and classical mechanics.  

8) Keep track of significant figures [AKA sig figs]

9) Statistics -- enter data and make a histogram, box and whisker plot, or scatter plot with optional regression line.

If you are viewing this in iTunes, you will see five iPhone screenshots and five iPad screenshots.  But even ten shots don't come close to showing everything this calculator can do.

I'd love to hear your comments or suggestions.  You can write me at mathscixyzgraphcalc@gmail.com -- but without the xyz.  Thanks!",Education,William Jockusch,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/educalc-classic/id378009553?uo=4,3.92977,299,science
988394506,MEL Science: a science lab app,"MEL Science is the key to limitless adventures! Experiment, play, learn, conduct real science experiments! Play science games and conduct amazing experiments using guidance from the app. 
This app can be used for educational science activities or as a supplement to the MEL Science experiment kits. Find out how molecules and reactions look from the inside. Suitable for homeschool activities and science lab experiment games. MEL Chemistry will show the structures of molecules, including Sulfuric acid, Citric acid, Hydrochloric acid, Lactose, and Tin Chloride. Go through amazing experiments and make your own science projects using the experiment assistant. Pass the test at the end of each experiment to check your knowledge. Bring this science lab app to your classroom to demonstrate educational science to your students. Forget memorizing formulas — learn through firsthand experience!",Education,MEL Science Limited,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/mel-science-a-science-lab-app/id988394506?uo=4,3.67073,82,science
955779551,Car Maker Games: Fun Simulator,"+++ In Car Maker you have to prove yourself as an accomplished master car builder!
+++ Car Maker is the perfect metal construction app for all gamers ages 3 to 103! 
+++ Professionally designed and brilliantly created car making app! Great for all who enjoy car crafting!!

Build your car through a simple to use interface that will allow you to build the car of their dreams. Use a variety of different parts to build your ride. Add brakes, wheels, engines, headlights and more. There is no limit to what you can build! Test your car on the test track in a beautiful 2D environment. Use the gas pedal, acceleration and brakes while cruising down the highway. 

The best part is, this game is not just fun, it can also help increase your I.Q. Car Maker can give you a greater sense of spatial-relationships, mechanical understanding, and the physics of machinery. 

FEATURES: 
• Kid friendly interface
• Amazing learning potential
• Simple and fun car building mechanics
• Build your own cars and test them in the app
• A variety of parts to add to your car, beautiful and fun 2D graphics
• Awesome car upgrades to power up make your cars even cooler
• Driving sound effects, simulation of gas pedals, acceleration and brakes
• Cool graphics and game animations that totally rock
• Fantastic in game test track to push your cars to the limits of your engineering skills

You don’t have to be an auto maker to build cars, just this app!",Games,Raymond NG,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/car-maker-games-fun-simulator/id955779551?uo=4,3.43243,1406,science
1453884781,RISE: Sleep Tracker,"Join over 10 million users! Become a better sleeper and morning person thanks to 100 years of sleep science with RISE, the only sleep tracker that also measures your sleep debt and energy levels.

Recommended by the Sleep Foundation and trusted by teams in the NFL, MLB, and NBA, and top Fortune 500 companies, RISE makes it easy to improve your sleep and energy.

But RISE is more than a sleep and energy tracker. Users can access widgets, calendar integration, sleeping sounds, meditation guides, smart alarm clocks, habit reminders, and a sleep knowledge library.

FROM THE RISE COMMUNITY

***
Chase M.
""RISE helped me understand how vital sleep truly is. In only a few weeks, I found myself more focused, energetic, and productive at work.""

***
Becky G.
""I could see where sleep debt was causing issues, like temper short, not comprehending things, moving slowly.  I had an epiphany... I'm getting 45min more sleep on average than I was before RISE.""


UNLOCK BETTER SLEEP
Tired of the age-old ""eight hours of shut-eye"" advice? Go beyond buying a new mattress or pillow and discover the life-changing concept of Sleep Debt.

Scientifically proven to be a vital factor in your well-being, a low Sleep Debt can improve your life quality and even your longevity—while high Sleep Debt can cause fatigue and harm your health.

RISE calculates your Sleep Debt, helps you understand its impact on your energy, and guides you on how to lower it by improving sleeping habits. Learn about your melatonin window, when to prioritize sleep, and understand the real cost of those late nights—and how you can benefit from naps.

PERSONALIZED SLEEP TRACKER
Do you find your mind racing when your head hits the pillow? Can’t stop doom-scrolling on your phone? Feeling fatigued all day?

Based on your sleep data, circadian rhythm and research, we’ll make recommendations that fit your needs and guide you toward healthier habits.

RISE will get you in bed on time, guide you when you can’t sleep, reduce the times you wake up at night, and make you feel less groggy in the morning.

DISCOVER YOUR CIRCADIAN RHYTHM
We all have an internal brain clock, our circadian rhythm, it signals to our body when to be alert or go into recovery mode. Everyone is unique, from when we perform our best to when we should sleep and wake up. We use advanced algorithms to find your optimal sleep windows.

You’ll gain insight into your circadian rhythm and energy levels, helping you plan for a productive day.

Sleeping refuels energy, and 83% of RISE users feel more energy in a week or less.

AUTOMATICALLY TRACK SLEEP
Through our integration with Apple Health, Apple Watch, Fitbit, Oura, and data from other sleep trackers on your phone, like Sleep Cycle and ShutEye, RISE can determine the hours of sleep you get every night, sleep debt, the number of steps you take each day, as well as data from other activities that affect your sleep pattern.

WHY WE STARTED RISE
We want to help get ahead of the Insufficient Sleep Epidemic (CDC, 2014) we're experiencing, which has been increasing since 1985. This Epidemic has led to elevated mortality rates (Cappuccio, 2010) as well as underperformance in most aspects of life (RAND, 2016).

Today, we look at sleep as a luxury. RISE strives to create a world where healthy sleep is a necessity.

Subscription pricing & terms
RISE offers auto-renewing yearly subscriptions to provide unlimited access to all premium features. There’s also a limited-time free trial of 7 days to explore the premium features for free. A Paid Subscription (or free trial) is required to access the content of the app.

Payment will be charged to the credit card connected to your App Store account when you confirm the initial subscription purchase. Subscriptions automatically renew unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24 hours before the end of the current period. Go to your Profile or App Store settings to manage your subscription.

Terms of Service available at: bit.ly/rise-sleep-app-tos",Health & Fitness,Rise Science Inc,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/rise-sleep-tracker/id1453884781?uo=4,4.66551,33938,science
6450114499,Studdy: Ai Homework Helper App,"Snap a photo -> get every step
Studdy is the fastest way to solve homework and learn the “why.” Point your camera at any Math or Science problem—from Algebra and Chemistry to college-level Calculus and Physics—and Studdy breaks it down with crystal-clear explanations you can actually follow.

Why students pick Studdy
• Photo to Steps – instant solutions for word problems, graphs, equations, and diagrams.
• Ask-Along Chat – tap any step to ask “why?” and get a deeper tutoring reply.
• Covers K-12 → College – Algebra, Geometry, Trig, Calculus, Stats, Chemistry, Physics, Biology, and more.
• Accurate & trusted – 10M+ problems solved with >98 % correctness for Math and Science
• Handwriting recognised – sloppy notes? No problem.
• 24/7 AI tutor – unlimited questions, no scheduling.

Free Plan
- 30 photo scans per day
- Supports every subject & grade

Studdy Plus (subscription*)
- Unlimited scans & chat
- Generate extra practice problems
- Increased accuracy
- Video lessons
- AI tutor

*Pricing starts at US $6.99 / week (price may vary by region). Payment is charged to your Apple ID and subscriptions renew automatically unless canceled 24 hours before the end of the period. Manage or cancel anytime in App Store settings.

Got questions or suggestions?
- Email us at http://studdy.ai/contact 
- Terms of Service: https://studdy.ai/terms-of-service 
- Privacy Policy: http://studdy.ai/privacy-policy",Education,"Studdy, LLC",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/studdy-ai-homework-helper-app/id6450114499?uo=4,4.80633,11308,science
1265019371,Science for Kids by Tappity,"Spark your child's curiosity with Tappity's science experts. Developed by educators and storytellers, Tappity offers fun interactive lessons on more than 100 science topics!

► 1:1 Learning is the Future 

Kids simply learn better when they're engaged one-on-one. Which is why we've created the Tappity Tinkerers. Our instructors will be with your child every step of the way, from explaining complex science topics and leading real science experiments to encouraging them to try their best. Best of all, the app is 100% interactive, so your child is fully engaged with our curriculum, which is teacher-approved and aligned with science standards.

►What does Tappity offer?

• 500+ science lessons, activities, and stories in a curriculum designed for kids ages 4-10
• High-quality and original produced game shows
• A real-life teacher for your child 
• Thousands of interactive science videos
• 1000+ science questions for your child to play
• A science journal for them to unleash their creativity
• Real science experiments that your child can control
• Discussion questions for you to ask your child after each lesson

►What topics do we cover?

• SPACE SCIENCE: Mars, the Moon, the Sun, and more!
• LIFE SCIENCE - Dinosaurs, Ocean Animals, Human Body, Plants, Pollination, and more!
• EARTH SCIENCE - Volcanoes, Plate Tectonics, Earthquakes, and more!
• PHYSICAL SCIENCE - Force, Energy, Friction, Magnets, and more!

►Why do parents and kids love Tappity?

• You get to interact with our science experts!
• You get to learn by reading, listening, and touching. Our app is 100% interactive and 100% narrated!
• You're learning real science. Our lessons align with the Next Generation Science Standards (NGGS).
• You learn by play, just like you would in a game!
• You get to test yourself knowledge with fun science trivia based on what you've learned.
• You're safe from 3rd party advertisements.
• You can play offline. Perfect for long waits, car or plane rides.

For a complete list of FAQ, please visit our website: www.tappityapp.com/faq

►What are people saying?

“This app is awesome! I am a teacher and parent. My child is learning so much from this app. She has developed a love of learning and Tappity has helped her to discuss and have conversations about the content she is interacting with.”

— Alicia, Mother of a 4-year-old

I'm happy to tell you that so far my kids love it! Which makes me love it! It has definitely reached and surpassed my expectations. I homeschool my two boys and it's hard to find things that keep them engaged and interested while learning. But this definitely does! It's fun and they're learning from it. Very well done!! Thanks so much!! 

—Troy Family

►Does it cost anything?

Tappity is free to try with our 14-day free trial! To unlock all content, we offer several types of Tappity paid subscription plans.

Your price may vary depending on the conversion to your local currency. Renewal policy: Auto-renew can be turned off anytime from iTunes Accounts Settings after purchase as long as it’s 24 hours before the end of the current period. Cancellation policy: Manage cancellations from your iTunes Account Settings. Once you cancel during the subscription period, no credit card charges will be made in the next billing cycle.


► Want to stay up to date?

LIKE US – facebook.com/tappityapp
FOLLOW US – instagram.com/tappityapp


►Need help or feedback?

We love hearing from our customers. Contact us any time: hey@tappityapp.com


►Policies

Terms & Conditions: https://www.tappityapp.com/terms
Privacy Policy: https://www.tappityapp.com/privacy",Education,"Tappity, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/science-for-kids-by-tappity/id1265019371?uo=4,4.52037,7341,science
1039067950,Discovery GO,"Catch up with your favorite Discovery shows anytime, anywhere with the all-new Discovery GO app - and now get access to up to 14 additional networks including TLC, HGTV, Food Network and more - all in one app. It’s FREE with your pay TV subscription. 

Link your pay TV provider (cable, satellite, telco, live TV streaming service) to access Discovery favorites like Gold Rush, Moonshiners, Bering Sea Gold, Deadliest Catch, Battle Bots, Street Outlaws, Naked and Afraid, Naked and Afraid XL, Expedition Unknown, Alaska: The Last Frontier and many more - plus top shows from other networks including Home Town (HGTV), Diners, Drive-Ins and Dives (Food Network), Dr. Pimple Popper (TLC), Evil Lives Here (ID), Ghost Adventures (Travel Channel) and more. New episodes are available the same day as they premiere on TV. 

With Discovery GO You Can:
• Stream Discovery and more networks LIVE anytime, anywhere on all your favorite devices
• Find shows to watch with the live schedule guide
• Access thousands of episodes on demand - from current hits to classic favorites
• See new episodes of shows on the app the same day and time they premiere on TV
• Binge your favorite Discovery series and specials including Gold Rush, Moonshiners, Bering Sea Gold, Deadliest Catch, Battle Bots, Street Outlaws, Naked and Afraid, Naked and Afraid XL, Expedition Unknown, Alaska: The Last Frontier - and many more! 
• Get unlimited access to everything the Discovery family of networks has to offer - free with your pay TV subscription.

Features:
• Stream live TV when you log in with your pay TV provider
• Watch select episodes and entire seasons of your favorite shows from up to 15 networks!
• Browse by genre - from Natural History, Science and Tech to Food, Home and more - to find your favorite shows and discover new ones
• Continue watching episodes where you left off across all of your devices
• Save shows and episodes to watch later with My List
• Compatible with tvOS and Chromecast
• Closed-captioning support

Requirements:
• Available in the U.S. only
• Wi-Fi connection recommended
• iOS 12 or higher 

Need help? Visit gohelp.discovery.com.

Visitor Agreement: https://corporate.discovery.com/visitor-agreement/

Privacy Notice: https://corporate.discovery.com/privacy-policy

California Privacy Notice: https://corporate.discovery.com/privacy-policy/#cappi

California Do Not Sell My Personal Info: https://corporate.discovery.com/california_dns

We may work with third-party advertising companies and other partners that help us deliver tailored advertisements to you. To opt out of behavioral tracking on mobile devices, you may use the DAA AppChoices Tool, available at http://www.aboutads.info/appchoices.",Entertainment,Discovery Communications,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/discovery-go/id1039067950?uo=4,4.72335,34749,science
1346247457,Endel: Focus & Sleep Sounds,"Focus, relax, and sleep through the power of sound. Endel creates AI-powered sounds designed to support your everyday life. Backed by science, and enjoyed by millions worldwide.

Endel is powered by its patented core AI technology. It takes inputs like location, environment, and heart rate, to create the optimal personalized soundscape. This happens on the fly and allows Endel to reconnect your state with your circadian rhythm.

Use the free version of Endel with no time limits. Get access to the following classic soundscapes at home, work, or on the move to relax, concentrate, and minimize distractions and brain fatigue:


• Focus – boosts your productivity by helping you concentrate for longer

• Sleep – soothes you into a deep sleep with soft, gentle sounds

• Relax – calms your mind to create feelings of comfort and safety

• Move – feel grounded and present while walking, hiking, or running


ENDEL PREMIUM SUBSCRIPTION


Alongside the classics, the Premium package contains the following Endel Soundscapes and features:


• Colored Noise – choose one of 9 colors of noise to focus, relax, sleep, and mask outside sound

• Study – improves concentration and keeps you calm while studying or working

• Dynamic Focus – get your perfect productivity support with real-time sound tuning

• Hibernation – nourish your ears with cozy sounds for cold-season slumber

• Nature Elements – nurture the mind with sounds of nature, your way

• Rainy Outside – cozy up to the gentle patter of rain, blended with sleep-aiding sounds

• Recovery – revives your wellbeing with sounds engineered to lower anxiety

• Spatial Orbit – venture into a more peaceful dimension with an immersive Spatial Audio experience

• Focus Timer – the famous interval work method, upgraded with science-backed Focus sounds


On top of the much-loved original Endel soundscapes, Endel works with innovative artists and thinkers to create unique experiences. These collaborative Endel Soundscapes are available for Premium users:


• James Blake: Wind Down – prepare your body for sleep with soothing sounds from an award-winning artist

• Grimes: AI Lullaby – supports sleep for babies and adults with original sounds and vocals from Grimes

• Plastikman: Deeper Focus – a deep focus techno soundscape created with Richie Hawtin

• Alan Watts: Wiggly Wisdom – soothing and motivation spoken word soundscape, infused with the playful wisdom from Alan Watts

• Miguel: Clarity Trip – elevate your every step with original sounds from Miguel


Endel Pacific is the patented technology that powers our apps and integrations. All soundscapes are available offline.

Apart from the Premium sounds and features, Endel Premium users get access to the exclusive Apple Podcast shows.


SUBSCRIPTION TERMS


Skip the payment screen by tapping “X” in the top-right corner of the offer. The Free Edition of Endel will start automatically.

You can get access to Endel Premium by subscribing to a recurrent plan of your choice or with a one-time Lifetime purchase.

Subscriptions automatically renew unless auto-renewal is turned off at least 24 hours before the end of the current period.

Payment will be charged to your Apple account at confirmation of purchase.

Account will be charged for renewal within 24 hours of the end of the current period, and the cost of the renewal will be provided.

Subscriptions may be managed by the user. Auto-renewal may be turned off by going to the user’s Account Settings after purchase.

No cancellation of the current subscription is allowed during the active subscription period.

Any unused portion of a free trial period, if offered, will be forfeited when the user purchases a subscription to that publication.


For more information:

Terms of Use - https://endel.zendesk.com/hc/en-us/articles/360003558200

Privacy Policy - https://endel.zendesk.com/hc/en-us/articles/360003562619",Health & Fitness,Endel Sound GmbH,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/endel-focus-sleep-sounds/id1346247457?uo=4,4.64792,27832,science
909118393,Brainwell Brain Training Games,"If you experience these kinds of challenges:
- Fail to remember people’s names
- Forget birthdays, anniversaries, and other important dates   
- Have difficulties expressing your thoughts
- Struggle to stay focused
- Have trouble sleeping, toss and turn at night
- Get stressed throughout the day

Brainwell has the solution:
- Train Multiple Areas of the Brain and use your brain to its full capacity
- Become more focused, engaged, and effective
- Keep your mind sharp
- Reduce stress and sleep well
- Live a more productive and happy life

Why choose the Brainwell application?
- Based on Innovative Neuroscience
- Brainwell - Mind & Brain Training Games are created under the direction of an expert scientific team headed by Elkhonon Goldberg, Ph.D., Diplomate of the American Board of Professional Psychology in Clinical Neuropsychology and Clinical Professor in the Department of Neurology, NYU School of Medicine.
- Our unique team of game designers and developers is suppoted by an international advisory board, which includes neuroscientists, neuropsychologists, and cognitive scientists from leading colleges and universities worldwide.

Brainwell Features:
- 53+ dynamic brain games to train your 6 cognitive domains including Memory, Attention and Language.
- Personalized daily workouts to focus on the skills you need most.
- IQ and Personality Tests to learn more about yourself.
- Meditations to reach improved wellness and peace of mind.
- The Sleep Lab to have a good night's rest.
- Breathing Exercises to reduce stress and prepare for the day ahead.
- Advanced Statistics to measure your performance against yourself and others.
- Achievements to reach your goals and stay motivated.

Brainwell subscription options:
- 1 week: $7.99
- 1 month: $9.99
- 1 year: $39.99
- Lifetime: $69.99

These prices are in USD. Pricing in other countries may vary and actual charges may be converted to your local currency depending on your country of residence.

Your iTunes account will be charged beginning at confirmation of purchase for the entire term of the plan you choose and then again at the beginning of each applicable term. Our 1-week,1-month and 1-year subscription plans renew automatically unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24 hours before the end of the current period. Refunds will not be provided for the unused portion of a subscription term.

CONTACT US: support@brainwell.com
VISIT US: http://www.brainwell.com
PRIVACY POLICY: https://brainwell.com/privacy-policy/
TERMS OF SERVICE POLICY: https://brainwell.com/terms-service/
GENERAL INQUIRIES: support@brainwell.com",Education,"Monclarity, LLC.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/brainwell-brain-training-games/id909118393?uo=4,4.61452,4877,science
644836476,Third Grade Learning Games,"Millions of parents and teachers use RosiMosi games and lessons to educate and entertain young children.

21 fun and educational games to help your child learn 3rd-grade lessons! Whether they are just starting Third Grade, or need to review and master the subjects, this is a perfect learning tool for kids aged 7-10. Math, language, science, STEM, reading, and critical thinking skills are all practiced in these games.

All lessons and activities are designed using real third-grade curriculums, so you can be sure these games will help give your child a boost in the classroom. Plus, your student or child will stay entertained with the help of voice narration, colorful images and animations, and lots of fun sounds and music. Improve your child's homework with the teacher-approved lessons & activities. 

Third Grade Learning Games cover the following educational topics: 

MATH
• Decimals and Fractions - Add decimals, convert from decimals to fractions 
• Multiply - Word problems, solve for x problems, multiply 3-factor and more
• Geometry - Perimeter, area, and different types of angles
• Measure - Measure length, volume, temperature, and time
• Division - Basic division and word problems
• Rounding and Places - Round numbers to the nearest 10 or 100, and identify place values
• Timed Facts - Quickly solve math problems to play a fun baseball game

LANGUAGE, GRAMMAR & READING
• Sentence Jumble - Help with reading compression and grammar
• Parts of Speech - Adverbs, pronouns, prepositions, adjectives, nouns, and verbs
• Syllables - Sound out words to figure out how many syllables they have
• Tense and Grammar - Learn the difference between past, present, and future tense
• Analogies - Compare words to complete the analogy
• Prefixes - Use a prefix to build words in a fun asteroid space game
• Reading - Read articles and answer questions

SCIENCE
• Food Chain - Identify types of animals and their role in the food chain
• Solar System - Learn about the planets and bodies in our solar system
• Water Cycle - Study the phases of the water cycle and how they interact
• Sound and Hearing - Understand what sound is and how the ear works
• Nutrition - Identify types of food and build a healthy plate
• Recycling and Energy - Learn why recycling is important and where energy comes from
• Erosion - Learn the causes and effects of erosion

Advanced Features Include:
- Detailed Progress Reports to help track your child's development
- Lesson Builder to create specific plans for your toddler to follow and play
- Multiple User support so up to 6 kids can play on the same app
- Avatars, stickers, and backgrounds for your toddler to unlock as they learn

===
Terms of Use and Privacy Policy: https://www.rosimosi.com/privacy
===

ALREADY PURCHASED?
If you have purchased the games already and they are now showing locked you can tap the Options icon in the upper right corner, and then tap 'Restore Purchase' to unlock the games again for free!

PROBLEMS WITH THE GAME?
If you are having issues with the game or have questions please email us at help@rosimosi.com and we will get it fixed for you ASAP.",Education,RosiMosi LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/third-grade-learning-games/id644836476?uo=4,4.31276,16703,science
1152362615,Anatomy Quiz - Science Pro Brain Education Game,"Hello, science lovers! If you are doctors or you would like to be one of them, this game quiz can be suitable for your taste! If you like medicine and you like dealing with anatomy, you should better hurry up and download this app, for free! You will come across many interesting questions that are important for this branch of biology and medicine! Learn how human body works and get yourself introduced to the structure of human organism and its parts! Human anatomy, as one of the basic essential sciences of medicine can be very interesting for every human on Earth. Anatomy Quiz - Science Pro Brain Education Game can give you the answers to all of your questions! So go for it and see what humans are made of! 


2 different game plays are available:

*** Endless – Answer a variety of questions until the game is over because of 3 incorrect answers! If you prove your knowledge by providing only correct answers, you may be uninterruptedly playing the quiz for hours!

*** Time Mode – the game is time-limited. Answer correctly to the question to earn additional time to keep you in the game! In case you give a wrong answer, time will be automatically deduced! So, think twice before you answer a question!
It is important to stress that, regardless of the game play you choose, multiple choice questions are to be answered! This is a classic version of trivia quiz with several answers offered to you, where providing a correct answer enables you to advance to further stages of the game!

This awesome quiz app provides you with a great variety of useful facts to which you should probably pay attention! Anatomy is a scientific study of organisms, their systems, organs and tissues! Check your knowledge on these issues and level it up! Educate yourselves and have fun while learning! Get acquainted with many amusing facts on human body and become an expert of human anatomy! Don't miss the opportunity to play this useful brain game of high quality!",Games,Milica Vuksanovic,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/anatomy-quiz-science-pro-brain-education-game/id1152362615?uo=4,4.20735,381,science
1487886467,Math Ai Question Answer,"MathBox does the math homework for you. Just snap a photo of any math problem, and voila - you get clear step by step solution explanation from the best math ai tutors. Get unstuck in math and learn maths better. MathBox will help you solve your math homework faster and have better preparation for math classes and exams. MathBox will provide you with a clear step-by-step explanation of every math problem you have at school.

Just Snap a math photo . We Solve it instantly!

MathBox is all FREE!

● Take a photo of any math problem.
● The app Calculates and Solves the math problem.
●  Math Tutoring 24/7 with instant response to any math topic and any math grades
● You upload a photo of your math problem and a Mathbox math tutor will solve it with a clear explanation helping learning better.
● MathBox handles Handwriting math Problems.
● Step-by-step Solution with clear explanation.
● Graphical and function plots for a perfect explanation.
● Save your results in the ""History"" tab so you can go back to them anytime.
● Save your results in PDF and share them with friends easily.


MathBox covers many math topics for any age or grades:

● Basic math: pre-algebra, integers, rational numbers, decimal numbers, additions, multiplications, fractions, powers, roots, factors, simplifications, exponents, ...
● Algebra: polynomial equations, linear equations with one variable, linear equations with many variables, linear inequalities, quadratic equations, systems of equations, logarithms, graphs, ...
● Calculus: functions graphs, limits, integrals, derivatives, ...
● Tutoring 24/7 with instant response to any math topic and any math grades
● And many more topics


Math could be hard sometimes - but with MathBox , it’s never been simpler and easier :).

Upgrade to MathBox Premium version and get step-by-step solutions with detailed explanations and remove ads.

 Choose from 2 subscription options:
- weekly Subscription
- monthly Subscription

* Subscription payments will be charged to your Apple ID account at confirmation of your purchase and automatically renews your subscription unless it is canceled at least 24 hours before the end of the current billing period.

* You can cancel your subscription anytime by canceling your subscription through your Apple account settings. This must be done 24 hours before the end of the current subscription period. The cancellation will take effect the day after the last day of the current subscription period. Offers and pricing subject to change without notice.

Privacy Policy: https://boxmath.co/privacy_policy.html
Terms and Conditions: https://boxmath.co/terms_and_conditions.html",Education,RLAM FZCO,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/math-ai-question-answer/id1487886467?uo=4,4.41136,13200,science
1160249042,Quizizz: Play to Learn,"Use the Quizizz app to learn anything, anywhere. You can study on your own or engage in group quizzes, assignments, and presentations—in person and remotely. Quizizz is used by more than 70 million people per month in schools, homes, and offices around the world.

Our app is designed to help you participate in group activities and study on your own. 

At home and in the classroom:

- Join a game with your class
- Study on your own with millions of quizzes covering every subject.
- See questions and answer options on your own device.
- Challenge your friends for instant study groups.
- Find free quizzes on mathematics, English, science, history, geography, languages, and general knowledge topics.


At work:

- Participate in training sessions and compete with your peers
- Get the data to see what you know now, and what you need to review.
- Respond to live presentations and polls
- Complete surveys and eLearning.


From the Quizizz Community:

""Wow! Students wanted to do a quiz on @quizizz over again. They never ask to do a worksheet over again."" 
— Nora, High School Math Teacher

""My 3rd graders absolutely loved using @quizizz today to review for their geography test. They asked to play another round! "" 
— Katie, Student Teacher.

""This is the best website EVER!"" 
— 4th grade student at Home Brink Elementary
 

Tried our app already? Share feedback at app_support@quizizz.com.

If you really like us, please share the love with a review.",Education,Quizizz Inc,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/quizizz-play-to-learn/id1160249042?uo=4,4.75356,41897,science
536371867,BrainPOP Jr.,"Access BrainPOP Jr.’s award-winning animated movies, activities and quizzes made by educators and replace your kids’ passive screen time with active, enriched learning. The gentle, humorous, and relatable characters Annie and Moby serve as guides through each topic, empowering kids to form their own ideas. BrainPOP Jr. is designed to cultivate critical thinking skills and encourage children to ask questions and make connections. 

Start your free trial today to access content for grades K-3 across all subjects. BrainPOP Jr. is a research-backed learning platform created by educators that know how kids learn best, and perfect for age-appropriate, independent learning.

Start watching, learning, playing and growing with us!

Terms of Use: https://www.brainpop.com/about/terms_of_use/
Privacy Policy: https://www.brainpop.com/about/privacy_policy/
User Agreement: https://www.brainpop.com/about/user_agreement/",Education,BrainPOP,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/brainpop-jr/id536371867?uo=4,4.63286,20864,science
1272091364,Math and Science Tutor,"1500+ video lessons in Math, Algebra, Calculus, Physics, Chemistry, Engineering, Statistics.  500+ hours of step-by-step instruction.

Features:
- Mark favorite lessons for later viewing.
- Recently watched videos list.
- Search all lessons for any topic.
- View featured courses.
- View recently released courses.
- Worksheets for selected courses.
- Share lessons via email & social media.

Courses
- Basic Math (Arithmetic)
- Algebra 1 & 2
- Geometry
- College Algebra
- Trig & PreCalculus
- Calculus 1, 2, & 3
- Differential Equations
- Calculator Tutorials
- Physics 1, 2, & 3
- Chemistry
- Probability & Statistics
- Electrical Engineering
- Mechanical Engineering
- Engineering Math
- Java Programming
- Matlab, MS Word, MS Excel
- Science Experiments

Excel in school.  Learn any subject fast by solving problems step-by-step.  Our lessons have helped thousands of students achieve success!

Information about Math Tutor subscriptions:
- For $19.99 a month, you will get access to all 1,500+ lessons and courses.
- Your subscription will automatically renew at $19.99 each month, billed through your iTunes account.
- You can cancel anytime by turning off auto-renew in your account settings.
- The subscription automatically renews every month unless auto-renew is turned off at least 24 hours before the end of the current period.
- No cancellation of the current subscription is allowed during the active subscription period.

- Read our terms of service (http://www.mathtutordvd.com/public/73.cfm) and privacy policy (http://www.mathtutordvd.com/public/department12.cfm) for more information.",Education,"Math Tutor DVD, Limited Liability Company",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/math-and-science-tutor/id1272091364?uo=4,4.83518,904,science
649954083,Pharmaceutical Journal,"Keep in touch with the world of pharmacy and medicines with The Pharmaceutical Journal app. Updated daily, you can access the latest content from The Pharmaceutical Journal on your iPhone or iPad at home, at work and on the move.

In The Pharmaceutical Journal app you’ll find the latest news, analysis, features, opinion and learning articles, providing insight and knowledge about drugs, pharmacy practice, medicines use and healthcare policy in the context of the pharmacy profession and pharmaceutical sciences.

The Pharmaceutical Journal publishes authoritative peer-reviewed resources on the clinical management of disease in relation to medicines and up-to-date information about advances in pharmacy and drug development, along with review articles, perspectives and evidence-based CPD articles covering topics from drug discovery to clinical pharmacology and pharmacy.

You can access the app for free if you are a member of the Royal Pharmaceutical Society or have a personal subscription to the pharmaceutical-journal.com website.

The Pharmaceutical Journal is published by Pharmaceutical Press, the Royal Pharmaceutical Society’s knowledge business.",Medical,Royal Pharmaceutical Society of Great Britain,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/pharmaceutical-journal/id649954083?uo=4,1.0,1,pharmaceutical
6443451249,Teva Pharmaceutical Events,"Teva Events
Meetings and events provide the opportunity to communicate, educate, collaborate, and motivate. The Teva Events App provide attendees, speakers, and planners with a digital experience for maximum engagement and interactivity in-person or virtually.  The App is powered by Cvent for use with Teva’s Strategic Meetings Management (SMM) Program for any type of meeting, incentive, congress, or event and is an integrated component of Cvent’s event management platform. Appropriate credentials are required for use.",Business,"Teva Pharmaceuticals USA, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/teva-pharmaceutical-events/id6443451249?uo=4,0.0,0,pharmaceutical
451791347,Chemistry By Design: Target Synthesis Database,"Chemistry By Design is an interactive virtual flashcard that allows students to test their skills using known synthetic sequences. The goal is to display the reagents, starting materials and products for every single step used in constructing a natural product or pharmaceutical. Students are provided with different browsing options to test themselves.",Education,University of Arizona,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/chemistry-by-design-target-synthesis-database/id451791347?uo=4,5.0,12,pharmaceutical
944852932,Elixir Rx Solutions,"The Elixir by MedImpact app helps our members conveniently manage their prescription benefits using a secure connection through their mobile device.
 
Features include:
-View your prescription claims history and see details about your claims
-Track and manage your medications
-Explore cost information for prescriptions
-Identify cost savings opportunities based on member plan design and formulary
-Pharmacy help desk phone numbers
-A secure connection to  personal health information, only accessible with user name and password
-Optional biometric login for extra security
-Digital Member ID Card that can be used by pharmacists and doctors (not supported for Medicare Part D members)
 
Legal Disclaimer: All information presented within the application is for informational purposes only and does not constitute professional medical advice. We exclude all representations and warranties relating to the content and use of this application.",Health & Fitness,"Envision Pharmaceutical Services, LLC",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/elixir-rx-solutions/id944852932?uo=4,1.45,20,pharmaceutical
6473753859,Vet2Pet,"The Vet2Pet app allows pet owners to stay connected with their veterinary practice and easily get the information they need.

With the Vet2Pet app, you can:


Chat with your clinic through the app or SMS text
Request a prescription refill
View and manage appointments
Track your pets visit
Quickly access your practices online store
Share photos of your pet",Business,Strategic Pharmaceutical Solutions,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/vet2pet/id6473753859?uo=4,3.33333,9,pharmaceutical
1494244381,Guide to JPM’25,"This app has detailed information around satellite events taking place between January 13-16, 2025 during the the JP Morgan Healthcare Conference in San Francisco. 
The app has appropriate links for registration in each event. Each event can also be added to your calendar. In case of in-person events, the app loads up your mapping software for directions to the event.",Business,Novateur Ventures Inc,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/guide-to-jpm25/id1494244381?uo=4,5.0,14,pharmaceutical
556671288,PolicePal,"THE PENAL CODE IS FREE, ALL OTHER CODES AND FEATURES CAN BE AVAILABLE WITH AN ASSOCIATED MINIMAL ANNUAL FEE. SEE BELOW FOR PRICING OR EMAIL QUESTIONS TO:  info@legacydata.co

PolicePal is the most useful tool on the App Store for Texas Police Officers. After downloading the Penal Code for free, simply open the app and choose from the following upgrades:

$9.99 - Full access, which includes (Laws and Drugs) or 
$4.99 - Texas Laws Only, which includes 9 Texas Codes

Who else knows what a Police Officer needs better than a Police Officer himself? That’s how PolicePal was founded. A team of Texas Police Officers got together and created a multifaceted tool that has never been seen before. For the first time ever, Police Officers can have access to an iPhone application that not only identifies over 20,000 pills, but we’ve removed all the medical jargon that is commonly found on pill identifying apps. We’ve gone a step further and done something quite remarkable – we’ve eliminated the painful process of manually searching line-by-line through Texas Penalty Groups and other laws. Simply type in a pill imprint and BOOM! In a matter of seconds, a pill can be identified, along with a recommended criminal charge for unlawful possession.

In addition, Officers can enjoy using a searchable database of Texas laws. Below are the included and most commonly used Codes:

• Penal Code
• Code of Criminal Procedure
• Transportation Code
• Health and Safety Code             
• Family Code              
• Alcohol Beverage Code 
• Occupations Code
• Education Code
• Parks & Wildlife Code
 
One of the best features of PolicePal is the ability to save favorite pills and laws. Officers can save pills that are commonly abused or laws that are rarely used and hard to find. PolicePal allows Officers to customize their app to assist them quickly and when they need it most! 

Remember to keep a valid yearly subscription to continue receiving updates on both pharmaceutical and criminal law databases! 

Notice About Subscriptions: 

- Your subscription will expire 365 days after your purchase.

- Payment will be charged to your iTunes Account at confirmation of purchase.

- Your subscription will automatically renew unless you disable the auto-renew at least 24-hours before the end of the current subscription period. Your subscription will auto-renew 24-hours prior to the end of the current period for whichever level of access you initially purchased. You may manage the auto-renew for your subscription by going to your Account Settings anytime after purchase.

- No cancellation of the current subscription is allowed during active subscription period.

- Any unused portion of a free trial period, if offered, will be forfeited when you purchase a subscription to PolicePal.

- You can read about our privacy policy or our terms of use by clicking on the listed URL links:

http://policepal.co/#privacy
http://policepal.co/#terms",Utilities,"Legacy Data Development, LLC",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/policepal/id556671288?uo=4,3.53846,13,pharmaceutical
370146750,Impact Network,"Impact Network is the healthcare industry’s leading pharmaceutical promotion research organization. Our international panel of physicians helps us understand how pharmaceutical promotion efforts influence prescribing behavior. Using the latest mobile technology, our physicians provide their valuable insight on the impact of pharmaceutical promotion as it occurs. This ‘real time’ approach sets our organization apart from all others in the industry.

As an Impact Network member, you will provide your expertise and insights via our mobile app to help influence the future of the healthcare industry. The app is tailored for your specific country and specialty. We also provide international support to make your experience in our study easy and enjoyable. 

In return for their participation, physicians receive a generous honorarium package and opportunities to earn additional honorarium through various research projects.

For more information about Impact Network, please download this app and tap register@impactrx.com on the log in screen to send us an email. We will contact you with additional information about our program.",Medical,"ImpactRx, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/impact-network/id370146750?uo=4,3.46154,39,pharmaceutical
678442949,RxTrax,"Online prescription delivery and tracking system.  Fast, secure, easy way for delivering prescriptions to people’s homes or long term care facilities.  HIPPA compliant.  Permanently stores the date, time, location, signature, picture ID of deliveries, and provides turn-by-turn directions.  Easy retrieval of information with a touch of a button, and customizable routing for the drivers. Pharmacist can see instant, up to date information on all deliveries therefore can see when and where the delivery was made.

Pharmacist and or technicians can add or edit deliveries even after the delivery driver has left the pharmacy. Rx Trax utilizes cloud technology so it is easily accessible from any computer. Quick, easy, accurate and secure, giving you eyes and ears into an important part of your business, delivering pharmaceuticals.

** Please note that GPS is used to obtain accurate delivery location and to track driver's progress. 

*** Continued use of GPS running in the background can dramatically decrease battery life.",Medical,"RxTRAX,LLC",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/rxtrax/id678442949?uo=4,4.58333,12,pharmaceutical
1176203717,ABC Order CSP Mobile,"Welcome to ABC Order Mobile!  ABC Order Mobile fully integrates with AmerisourceBergen's customer platform, ABC Order.  

ABC Order Mobile enables you to:

- Scan barcodes
- Work with your carts 
- Search products and view detailed information
- Make informed purchase decisions by comparing generic alternatives
- Get alerts and reminders
- Review order history
- Complete CSOS Receiving
- Create notes and modify formulary",Business,AmerisourceBergen Services Corporation,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/abc-order-csp-mobile/id1176203717?uo=4,1.875,56,pharmaceutical
1064165358,InTemp,"Onset InTemp data loggers measure temperature and relative humidity in cold chain storage and distribution networks for the life sciences, pharmaceutical, medical, and healthcare industries. InTemp data loggers work with the InTemp app for iOS and the InTempConnect cloud-based data warehousing service.
 
The product line includes InTemp CX400 storage data loggers, the InTemp CX450 temperature and relative humidity data logger, InTemp CX500 in-transit data loggers, InTemp CX600 dry ice data loggers, and InTemp CX700 cryogenic data loggers, as well as the InTemp CX5000 Gateway, for automated data logger configuring and downloading, reporting, and instant alarm notifications by text or email if conditions exceed user-set thresholds.
 
Features:
* Wireless communication via Bluetooth Low Energy technology with mobile devices and/or the InTemp CX5000 Gateway
* InTempConnect cloud-based data warehousing service integration (data storage, analytics, and alerts)
* Visual alarm notifications (plus audible alarms for CX400 and CX450 data loggers)
* PDF report generation
* XLSX data
* Compliance with 21 CFR Part 11 guidelines
* Compliance with FDA and EMA Good Distribution Practices, and World Health Organization (WHO) and Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) guidelines",Utilities,Onset Computer Corporation,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/intemp/id1064165358?uo=4,2.33333,15,pharmaceutical
1570643601,صيدلية المتحدة,"United Pharmacy application is your best choice to provide all your health and daily needs\
Exclusive online offers -
- Fast delivery within 3 hours
- Send your prescription or insurance prescription and it will be delivered to your doorstep -
- Enjoy a unique shopping experience with United Pharmacy",Shopping,United Pharmaceuticals  Medical Supply Co. Ltd.,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/%D8%B5%D9%8A%D8%AF%D9%84%D9%8A%D8%A9-%D8%A7%D9%84%D9%85%D8%AA%D8%AD%D8%AF%D8%A9/id1570643601?uo=4,4.79845,258,pharmaceutical
1082987983,One-on-One Partnering,"This is the One-on-One Partnering™ mobile app for biotech and biopharma events, created by BIO and Inpart and used by dozens of event organizers. Use this app to maximize your partnering experience by leveraging these powerful key features:
- Plan your partnering meetings and program agenda, including sessions, company presentations, and other conference program items
- Manage your scheduled partnering meetings directly from the app
- Send meeting requests to potential business partners and message companies on the go",Business,Inova Software,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/one-on-one-partnering/id1082987983?uo=4,0.0,0,pharmaceutical
1226396951,Dis-Chem,"Here are some of the features you can enjoy while using the new Dis-Chem app:

Dis-Chem DeliverD

Introducing Dis-Chem DeliverD, Dis-Chem’s trial On Demand 60 minute delivery service only available on the Dis-Chem app!

Message Centre

All your push notifications and accouncements are shown in the new message centre, giving you access to alerts whenever you need them.

Submit a Script

It’s now even easier to get your medication and repeat prescriptions with the all new delivery option.

Set Reminders

You can set reminders for yourself or your family members within the app to ensure that you (and your family members) never miss a dose of your medication.

Create shopping lists

Keep all your Dis-Chem to-buys listed conveniently in the Dis-Chem app to make shopping even easier. Create shopping lists you can personalise, save and share.

Dis-Chem Health

We’ve partnered with Kaelo and Centriq Insurance to deliver health products that meet the needs of many South Africans, giving them peace of mind knowing their day-to-day health is in good hands.

Virtual Dis-Chem Benefits Card

We’ve digitized your Dis-Chem Benefits Card for you so that you always have it when you need it. With your virtual card you can earn points every time you purchase in-store, view points (and their rand value) and even give back to the community by donating your Dis-Chem points to the Dis-Chem Foundation.

Bonus Cards

An added benefit is our virtual bonus card which lets you earn rewards for purchasing the products you love. Our app features a sticker book that will be virtually stamped every time you purchase a promotional product from one of our Dis-Chem stores. Once you’ve earned enough stickers you can choose your FREE gift from the list of our bonus products in-store.

The Dis-Chem app is free and available for anyone to use. Whether you’ve been a customer for a short while or a lifetime, you can enjoy the convenience of having your favourite pharmacy at your fingertips.",Shopping,DIS-CHEM PHARMACIES PTY LTD,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/dis-chem/id1226396951?uo=4,2.0,2,pharmaceutical
1112461321,Takeda Meetings,"The Takeda Meetings App is the mobile application supporting Takeda Meetings and Events.

The app is a container for Takeda meetings and events, providing up-to date information, cutting-edge interactivity and engagement to all participants.

IMPORTANT – To use the application you must be registered HCP at a Takeda meeting or event and in the possession of a valid activation code. This application is intended for participants outside of the US.
The Takeda Meetings app can access data from the Health app, if permission is granted, to improve your event experience
Added new Activity Challenge in Steps Count""
Item Code: INTSP/C-ANPROM/MTP/16/0001
Date of Preparation: May 2016",Business,Takeda Pharmaceuticals International AG,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/takeda-meetings/id1112461321?uo=4,3.75,4,pharmaceutical
1534619555,myWAV,"Download the myWAV app to help you get started and support your treatment. As the 24/7 online resource for adults who have been prescribed XYWAV® (calcium, magnesium, potassium, and sodium oxybates) oral solution, 0.5 g/mL total salts (equivalent to 0.413 g/mL of oxybate), this app puts information about XYWAV and answers to some of your questions right at your fingertips. 

The myWAV app is your personalized tool to:

• HELP you get started and support your treatment
• ACCESS instructions for use, support programs, treatment tips and more
• RECEIVE treatment support tailored to your personal needs
• MEASURE your treatment progress

The myWAV app is intended for education, planning, and tracking purposes only, and is not a medical device. The myWAV app is not intended to offer or replace professional medical advice. It is intended for US audiences ages 18 and up only.

Please note that comments posted on the Apple App Store are not associated with or endorsed by Jazz Pharmaceuticals (Jazz). Jazz values your comments, questions, and concerns but will not respond to questions posted on iTunes. If you are experiencing a medical emergency, contact your healthcare professional immediately. You are encouraged to report negative side effects of prescription drugs to the FDA. Visit www.fda.gov/medwatch, or call 1-800-FDA-1088.

To access the XYWAV full Prescribing Information, including BOXED Warning, and Medication Guide, visit https://pp.jazzpharma.com/pi/xywav.en.USPI.pdf and https://pp.jazzpharma.com/pi/xywav.en.MG.pdf

To access the Jazz Pharmaceuticals Privacy Policy visit https://www.jazzpharma.com/privacy-statement/

©2025 Jazz Pharmaceuticals plc or its subsidiaries US-XYW-2000257 Rev0125",Medical,"Jazz Pharmaceuticals, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/mywav/id1534619555?uo=4,2.94444,18,pharmaceutical
1587709646,RxSteward,"The Northwind Pharmaceuticals patient portal allows users to engage with their pharmacy benefits through their employer sponsored plan and employer worksite health clinic, if applicable. Features of the app include:
•	Start home delivery or transfer prescriptions to Northwind Pharmacy
•	Manage prescriptions through Northwind Pharmaceuticals
•	Enroll in Clinical BlueprintTM programs sponsored by employers
•	Schedule consultations with the Northwind pharmacy team
•	Search for medications available for home delivery and at on-site health centers (as applicable) through the employer’s benefit plan
•	Update demographic and payment information to ensure timely and accurate delivery of prescriptions",Health & Fitness,"Northwind Pharmaceuticals, LLC",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/rxsteward/id1587709646?uo=4,3.4,5,pharmaceutical
1502630848,ABC Order HS Mobile,"Welcome to ABC Order HS Mobile! ABC Order HS Mobile integrates with AmerisourceBergen's new customer platform, ABC Order HS.
ABC Order HS Mobile enables you to:
- Scan barcodes
- Work with your orders, with or without an active internet connection
- Search products and view detailed information
- Make informed purchase decisions by comparing generic alternatives
- Receive by invoices, totes, or all unreceived items
- More functionality still to come!
*A login to abcorderhs.amerisourcebergen.com is needed to access the ABC Order HS Mobile app.*",Business,AmerisourceBergen Services Corporation,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/abc-order-hs-mobile/id1502630848?uo=4,2.4,10,pharmaceutical
1439710879,AAPS Events,"The AAPS mobile application allows you to view the schedule, presentations, exhibitors and speaker details from the conference. Users can take notes adjacent available presentation slides and draw directly on slides inside the app. Note-taking is also available in the posters and exhibitors modules. 

Additionally, users can share information with attendees and colleagues with in app messaging, tweeting and emailing.",Education,AMERICAN ASSOCIATION OF PHARMACEUTICAL SCIENTISTS,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/aaps-events/id1439710879?uo=4,4.24571,175,pharmaceutical
1074352670,PBC Living®,"PBC Living® helps you to take an active role in tracking and monitoring all aspects of your primary biliary cholangitis (PBC).
Now you can log your symptoms daily, view your symptom history over time, and save questions you would like to ask your doctor or nurse. PBC Living provides a single place to store and share all the information that is important for you and your PBC.

Features:
- Symptom trackers for itching, mood, sleep, and energy level
- Liver marker trackers to input your alkaline phosphatase (ALP) and bilirubin levels from lab reports
- Charts to view your symptom history and liver marker levels over time
- Notes section to store questions to share with your healthcare team
- Educational information through LivingwithPBC.com, your go-to online resource for PBC

What’s New:

In version 2.2.2:
• We've updated the app for a better experience across iOS 12, 13, and 14

As of version 2.0, we've included the following new features:
• Ability to retroactively track symptoms and lab levels
• Calendar functionality to track and add important reminders, such as medications, refills,
and appointments
• Notes sections in key areas for context while tracking
• Design enhancements and improved navigation
• Settings page for important links and user controls

Information
Seller: Intercept Pharmaceuticals, Inc.
Version: 2.2.2
Compatibility: Requires iOS 12 or higher.
Language: English",Medical,"Intercept Pharmaceuticals, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/pbc-living/id1074352670?uo=4,2.61538,13,pharmaceutical
1546088474,ReachRx,"ReachRx - we provide the world's medical knowledge at your fingertips.

Our clinical search is where the country's top healthcare providers get instant answers to their most challenging questions. 

Access information from top-rated sources to:
- Answer patient questions
- Stay up to date on the latest treatments
- Retrieve dosing, side effects, and interactions
- and so much more

Features:
- Clinical Search: Instant answers to complex clinical questions from high-quality medical sources
- Pharma Request: Request a sales rep meeting, product samples, or patient access information
- Rep Message: Securely communicate with sales reps, FRMs, and MSLs",Medical,Patrick DePippo,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/reachrx/id1546088474?uo=4,4.2,5,pharmaceutical
1454444986,EPIDIOLEX® Dosing Calculator,"Calculate your patient’s EPIDIOLEX® (cannabidiol) dosing. This calculator allows you to select a recommended or custom dosage and allows you to enter your patient’s weight. Based on these inputs, the calculator will provide an output of the recommended daily dosage. Additionally, dosing in patients with hepatic impairment can be calculated by first selecting the level of hepatic impairment for more accurate dosing calculations. Results will be provided in total daily and twice daily dosage recommendations. A simple dosage results document can then be generated and provided to your patient or their caregiver for reference.

The content on this app is intended for US healthcare professionals only and should be applied to EPIDIOLEX (cannabidiol). This is not intended to be a substitute for professional medical advice, diagnosis, or treatment. Always seek the advice of your physician or other qualified health provider with any questions you may have regarding a medical condition or medicinal product.

Full Prescribing Information can be found at https://www.epidiolex.com/PI

EPIDIOLEX is a registered trademark of Jazz Pharmaceuticals, Inc.

©2022 Jazz Pharmaceuticals, Inc. All rights reserved.",Medical,"Jazz Pharmaceuticals, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/epidiolex-dosing-calculator/id1454444986?uo=4,4.71429,14,pharmaceutical
815039087,Pharmaceutical Zotsell,"pharmaceutical sales software  order entry  crm  pharmaceutical sales catalog

Download for FREE the fastest order taking app on the planet. Focused on what's truly important for a sales rep: taking orders faster and better. Take orders in a flash. (Easily create, modify, duplicate and send orders, proposals, offers or tenders to all your customers at the speed of light. Your entire customers base at your fingertips. Offline too. Import or consolidate all your contacts and stay in touch with them using our CRM. Keep your customer data always with you. Instantly retrieve any customer information anywhere, anytime... whether you are connected to the net or not. Works online or offline. 

This app has many advantages: 
-Faster sales, super fast order taking 
-User-friendly interface 
-Simple to setup 
-create a PDF catalog with purchase buttons 
-Powerful CRM 
-Digital signature 
-Order tracking 
- Store, send and track Documents and Leaflets 
-Works offline too 
-Useful customer information 

You can use the app with our data for FREE! 

Privacy https://www.zotsell.com/site/privacy 
Terms of service https://www.zotsell.com/site/tos",Business,Tradenet Services srl,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/pharmaceutical-zotsell/id815039087?uo=4,0.0,0,pharmaceutical
734187524,InpharmD,"We save time and resources for healthcare providers by providing tailored, on demand, digital drug information, in order to promote evidence-based medicine.",Medical,"InpharmD, LLC",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/inpharmd/id734187524?uo=4,4.87342,158,pharmaceutical
1590924924,My Thyroid Universe,"SYMPTOM TRACKER
Track your thyroid symptoms such as: body aches and pains, fatigue, hair loss, weight management, mood, and concentration, to help aid you in discussions with your healthcare provider to manage your thyroid treatment.

LAB RESULTS TRACKER
Upload your thyroid lab results directly to the app to track how your thyroid levels change over time.

THYROID MEDICATION REMINDERS
Set automated notifications to get reminders on when to take your thyroid medication(s) to help you take your medication as prescribed.

THYROID FRIENDLY RECIPES
Library of healthy recipes from thyroid health coaches and nutritionists, ranging in difficulty to keep you inspired and motivated in the kitchen and maintain a healthy lifestyle.

EDUCATIONAL ARTICLES 
Over 100 blog posts and articles to supplement your learning about overall thyroid health.

MEDICAL DISCLAIMER
This app is intended for informational purposes only. It is not a substitute for professional medical advice, diagnosis, or treatment. Please seek the advice of your doctor in addition to using this app and before making any  medical decisions.",Health & Fitness,Amneal Pharmaceuticals LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/my-thyroid-universe/id1590924924?uo=4,5.0,7,pharmaceutical
441943186,Mobile Locker,"Transform your pharmaceutical and medical technology sales presentations with Mobile Locker, the premium content delivery platform for healthcare sales professionals and Medical Science Liaisons (MSLs).

Key Features:
- Instant offline access to interactive presentations and forms 
- Seamless content updates with automatic background syncing
- Organized content library with folders, tags, and search
- Real-time analytics and usage tracking
- Badge scanning for medical conferences and congresses
- Flexible, pre-approved email sharing with HCPs
- HTML5 support for rich, interactive content
- Universal CRM integration
- Enterprise-grade security
- Works on both iPad and iPhone

Key Benefits:
- Save time with instant access to content, online or offline
- Ensure compliance with controlled content distribution
- Increase engagement through interactive presentations
- Capture more leads at conferences with badge scanning
- Track ROI with detailed analytics and insights
- Streamline HCP communications with approved email templates

Perfect for teams in the pharmaceutical, medical device, and biotech industries. Mobile Locker ensures your field teams always have the latest approved content, enabling more engaging and compliant customer interactions.

Download Mobile Locker today and elevate your Healthcare Provider (HCP) engagement.",Business,Vorenus Ventures LLC,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/mobile-locker/id441943186?uo=4,4.77304,282,pharmaceutical
1512964231,ISPE,"The ISPE App gives you on-the-go access to all things ISPE. Whether you're an ISPE Member or industry professional participating in an ISPE event, this app will meet your needs securely in just a few clicks. Renew your membership, read the latest articles from Pharmaceutical Engineering® magazine and iSpeak, the official blog of ISPE, check out upcoming ISPE events, connect with colleagues, and so much more!

Key Features Include:

· Pay your membership dues or become a Member

· Access your ISPE Communities of Practice*

· View the membership directory*

· Use Member-to-Member messaging*

· Access event content for our in-person and virtual events including networking, building a custom agenda, exhibit hall, and more

· Read Pharmaceutical Engineering® magazine articles

· Discover the latest industry articles

· Explore online resources

· And so much more!

Download the ISPE app now to make the most out of your membership and/or event experience!

*You must be an ISPE Member to use these features.",Education,"International Society for Pharmaceutical Engineering, Inc.",https://apps.apple.com/us/app/ispe/id1512964231?uo=4,3.0,6,pharmaceutical
1445513315,NeilMed WebShop,"Experience seamless shopping with the NeilMed WebShop app. We bring the entirety of the NeilMed web store straight to your device, offering quality nasal care products from the comfort of your home. Shop securely with Shopify Payments to ensure each transaction is safe, reliable, and swift, giving you the peace of mind you deserve. Discover an easy-to-navigate interface where you can effortlessly browse through our vast range of products, sort by categories, and filter by specific requirements. Add your desired products to your cart and checkout in just a few taps. With real-time order tracking, stay updated about your purchases. Simplify your shopping experience and transact securely with the NeilMed WebShop app. Download the app now and start shopping at your convenience!",Shopping,NeilMed Pharmaceuticals Inc,https://apps.apple.com/us/app/neilmed-webshop/id1445513315?uo=4,4.30769,26,pharmaceutical
